Authors
Jerry Saravia
Number of Reviews
302

Title
Review for X Files, The (1998)
              I've only watched a couple of "X-Files" episodes, but I have to
say that I was mesmerized by their haunting power and sense of dread. Scully
and Mulder were deadpan FBI agents rattled around the bleak, conspiratorial
universe created by Chris Carter where aliens exist. Now comes the inevitable
film version and, although it is not as bleak as the show, it is a nicely
crafted, weirdly paradoxical movie that is quite a pleasure to sit through. 
Of course, Fox Mulder (David Duchovny) and Dana Scully (Gillian Anderson) are
still on the lookout for alien conspiracies. This time, it may have something
to do with the explosion of a Texas office building where black-oil virus
victims are supposedly kept. In the meantime, Mulder is repeatedly visited by a
flaky doctor (the superb Martin Landau) who insists that the Texas bombing was
an alien cover-up. Mulder tries to convince Scully that killer bees, a
black-oil virus and some Tunisian cornfields are all part of a conspiracy
involving the Well-Manicured Man, the Cigarette Smoking Man, and some Syndicate
overlords - the idea is that aliens have been around for thousands of years and
have hidden underground oozing some deadly black oil to unintended victims!
Naturally, in a movie like this, the conspiracy theories abound with so much
abandon that it is impossible to follow who or what is responsible for whom.
The joy of "The X-Files" is to watch David Duchovny and Gillian Anderson play
against and with each other; their scenes together, particularly a brief
emotional moment where they almost kiss, are electrifying to watch. Obviously,
they know their characters well enough to make us care about their plight in
murky waters. 
"The X-Files" has a number of terrifying moments. They include a bombing scene
that has such a creepy realism, it would give the "Lethal Weapon" duo
nightmares for months; the moment when an alien devours a child underground;
and the apocalyptic finale (similar to "Smilla's Sense of Snow") where Mulder
tries to rescue Scully from an icy cavernous fortress where numerous alien
catacombs exist. 
"The X-Files" doesn't make much sense and there are more plot holes than one
can count, e.g., just how does Mulder escape an icy wilderness when his
snowmobile is out of gas? It is still strangely compelling, thrilling,
chilling, eerie, and ably acted by Duchovny and Anderson. That's more than you
can expect from any recent sci-fi movies.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with questions, concerns or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com 

Title
Review for Don't Look at Me (1989)
David Lynch remains one of the most fascinating, illuminating directors in 
the history of cinema. One wonders how he came up with such Bizantine puzzles 
such as "Lost Highway" or "Eraserhead," or sickeningly perverse comments on 
suburbia such as "Blue Velvet." "Don't Look at Me" will not answer many 
questions, nor should it, about Mr. Lynch. Shot back in 1989 in French, it 
will give everyone an opportunity to witness the creative process behind an 
artist.
The documentary is directed by Guy Girard who stylizes the film in a Lynchian 
mode. For example, the opening scene is a conversation with Lynch and Girard 
at Bob's Big Boy in L.A., shot and framed outside the restaurant as if you 
are peering through venetian blinds. Inspired for sure, not to mention the 
various industrial sounds and abstract whistles heard on the soundtrack, most 
often associated with Lynch himself. There are also clips from his work, 
including "Eraserhead" and "Blue Velvet," which are shown on some televison 
monitor as the camera tracks Lynch dictating a script. The most stupendous 
moment is seeing Lynch thinking silently about how to continue a scene in the 
script. 
Girard's focus on Lynch is simply avante-garde in his choices for camera 
set-ups while interviewing the director. In fact, the only time we focus on 
Lynch's face is when Girard hands him polaroids of some shots from his work. 
Often, Lynch shows his back to the camera while wearing a fishing hat. 
Mostly, he refuses to divulge the meaning in his work as he correctly assumes 
that interpretations should be left to the audience (I certainly don't want 
him to tell me why the Lady from the Radiator in "Eraserhead" has puffed-up 
cheeks).  So you will not learn much about Lynch in terms of his background 
or his fixation on the dark side, but you do get glimpses ("Most people do 
not know what they are doing. They are confused."). 
Choice moments include a drive with Lynch and the late Jack Nance (who played 
Henry in "Eraserhead") to a reservoir used in one of his films, seeing Lynch 
sculpting and molding naked  figurines for some mini-environment, recording 
the beautiful voice of Julee Cruise for an unspecified project (she sang 
melodies for many of Lynch's films), and in general seeing Lynch at work, 
indulging in creative ideas ("I like the shape of an ear. An ear, in a grassy 
field, with ants crawling on it - there's hardly anything better than that.") 
Although not as enveloping or cohesive as the other Lynch documentary, 
"Pretty as a Picture," this is still enthralling and informative for anyone 
who wants to see the Dark Side of Genius revel in his own obsessions and 
dreams.  Essential for anyone who is a fan.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com 
or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Men (1998)
Sometimes I will walk into a videostore and find an obscure film that never got
anywhere or got much distribution, yet managed to find its way into a video
store like Blockbuster. There are two major films I can think of that are not
talked about much or receive any merit. There was the delightful Paul Mazursky
comedy "Next Stop, Greenwich Village," and the far more obscure "Crooked
Hearts." "Crooked Hearts" amazingly never attracted any attention at all,
despite a cast that includes Juliette Lewis, Peter Coyote, Jennifer Jason
Leigh, Noah Wyle, among others. Sure enough, I found another film on the video
shelves that I never heard of called "Some Girls" (also known as "Men," 'Some
Girl," and "Girl Talk"). I was immediately interested because of the cast, and
of course Juliette Lewis is in it. What a surprise to discover a fitfully good
film that no one ever heard of! "Men" was shown at the Los Angeles Independent
Film Festival where it won an Audience Award. It never actually got
distribution, but it is now on video.
"Men" stars Marissa Ribisi as Claire, a red-haired girl who drinks heavily with
her friends at singles clubs (though it mostly looks like they are at an
unpopulated bar). Claire had just got dumped and gets into a bitter mood,
ignoring her brothers and family. Her friends include April (Juliette Lewis)
who sleeps around and expects to be picked up by her friends the morning after,
the punk rocker Jenn (Pamela Segall) who has theories on sexual practices, and
the bartender Neil (Michael Rapaport), April's semi-boyfriend who is always
ignored by her. There is also Claire's brother, Jason (Giovanni Ribisi), a
seemingly nerdy, vivacious guy who wants a date with the reluctant Jenn.  
"Men" is written by Marissa Ribisi (Giovanni's sister) and Brie Shaffer, and
they pay special close attention to Claire and April. If nothing else, this
film should have been called "Women," as the women are really the ones who
dominate."Some Girls" (the video title) detracts from the film's emotional
moments - this is not just another twentysomething, Generation X programmer
with bland stars from "Dawson's Creek." At least, these two women possess some
integrity.
Claire is the focus of the film, and her distraught emotions are based on
relationships with guys who find her too weird but love her curly red hair. She
meets one guy at a magazine stand, Chad (Jeremy Sisto), who loves her hair and
finds her "intriguing." Of course, everyone warns Claire that any guy named
Chad is bound to be trouble. 
April supposedly abhors men, and is drawn to Neil's kindness and compassion.
Still, she feels the need to have one-night stands and hurts everyone who gets
in her way.  
If "Men" sounds mediocre and a time-waster based on its scantly told story and
largely underdeveloped characters, then I would not recommend it. However, I
must confess that I enjoyed it. Giovanni lends the film a quietly erratic
energy whenever he is on screen - he gets all the best lines. I also enjoyed
watching short-haired Juliette Lewis (finally a good role since "The Evening
Star") and the lovely, sweet presence of Marissa Ribisi - they make their
characters human and heartfelt. The sight of Ribisi wearing angel wings lends
the film a certain kind of poignance.
"Men" does not feel complete, and has too many characters who drift around
without any insight into their nature (Pamela Segall's Jenn is one character I
wanted to know more about). Still, "Men" is a sweet, innocent, droll film that
merits a little more attention than it got. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with questions, concerns or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at
Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Girl, Interrupted (1999)
I never thought that mental illness could be portrayed in such a
stale, anonymous manner but that is how "Girl, Interrupted" unspools
its subject matter. The film wants to make the case that mental
illness can be a state of mind for some, and a strong reality for
others - If only the young women portrayed possessed some core of
humanity.
The film begins with Susanna Kaysen (Winona Ryder), an 18-year-old who
has just drunk a bottle of vodka while ingesting a bottle of
aspirin. She is diagnosed with "borderline personality disorder," and
is thus sent to Claymoore hospital in Boston. The screenplay, adapted
from Susanna Kaysen's true-to-life novel, never makes it clear whether
Susanna admitted herself to the hospital or if her parents had her
admitted. Nevertheless, she is taken in to Claymoore's psychiatric
facility, and supervised by a head nurse played by Whoopi
Golodberg. Susanna is faced with an array of distinguished women such
as one who nearly burned her face off, another one obsessed with
laxatives and chicken, and so on. The one foxy chick who seems truly
nutty, pardon the pun, is Lisa (Angelina Jolie), a highly dangerous
sociopath who confuses her aorta with her neck. Lisa feels threatened
at first by Susanna but gradually, they click together.
While watching "Girl, Interrupted," I was reminded of the stark
documentary, "Titicut Follies" by Frederick Wiseman, which dealt with
the horrors of a mental hospital. When you saw the patients, you knew
they were patients afflicted with an illness. The same holds true of
Milos Forman's classic "One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest." "Girl,
Interrupted" features patients that might be at home in TV's "Dawson's
Creek" - that might be a little extreme but these women hardly seem
troubled, only bland occupants of a far too sanitized looking
institution.
The problem lies in the screenplay that supplies character types, not
true characters of depth and emotion. Susanna hardly seems the
slightest bit troubled - her scene with the psychiatrist should have
convinced him that she was perfectly sane but what do I know. Perhaps
in 1967, before Prozac became a household name, psychiatrists had
their own preconceived notions of what mental illness was.  But these
girls seem relatively harmless, even to themselves. This is more like
a watered down version of "Cuckoo's Nest," and far too bland to
inspire much interest.
The sparkle of "Girl, Interrupted" can be found in Jolie's vibrant,
edgy performance. She brings soul and an allure to Lisa, and it is
gut-wrenching to watch her. Her long blonde silvery hair and big,
clownish lips evoke a tough, sexy demeanor that is riveting to
watch. I would followed this complex character anywhere.
The rest of "Girl, Interrupted," however, is yawn-inducing and lacking
in thematic richness. It sort of drifts away and hardly leaves a trace
of itself. The boredom is seldom interrupted.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Blue Velvet (1986)
Of all of David Lynch's films, I find myself ranking "Blue Velvet" on
a lower meter. It's a good, blazingly original film that is also
wholly uneven, obscene and tasteless to the core. The latter terms are
not meant as a critique - Lynch at his best is always obscene and
tasteless. But I also find "Blue Velvet" to be underwhelming, as say
compared to "Eraserhead" (his greatest film) or the neo-noir/horror
picture "Lost Highway." It's just that their themes are more complex
and disturbing than this perverse take on suburbia.
"Blue Velvet" was released back in 1986 and was highly controversional
for its time, mainly due to graphic scenes of torture and sex. There
was also much talk about the sequence where Isabella Rossellini
(Ingrid Bergman's daughter) is naked and publicly embarrassed, while
teeth marks and cigarette burns cover her entire body. There is no
question that Lynch has always had trouble protraying women in a
positive light (take a close look at Patricia Arquette forced
stripping at gunpoint in "Lost Highway"), but this particular sequence
is pure misogyny serving no purpose in the entire film. Consequently,
Rossellini also endures several beatings by a helium-sniffing psycho
named Frank (a truly classic performance of psychotic rage by Dennis
Hopper). There are also numerous close-up shots of ants and
cockroaches littering the screen as if they were aware of something
beyond our knowledge. Of course, the wonderful opening scenes of the
film, including the shot of ants scowering the e!  arth, suggest an
evil lurking beneath a conservative town of white picket fences, rose
gardens, people mowing their lawns, etc.
The story in "Blue Velvet" revolves around a potential murder mystery
that is never quite explained or resolved (at least, not to my liking
though Raymond Chandler's novels are often so complex that even he did
not know what they were about). Kyle MacLachlan plays a college
student named Jeffrey, who is visiting his picture-postcard hometown,
Lumberton. One day, he discovers a severed human ear on an open
field. He contacts the police and then decides to investigate on his
own. This all leads to the apartment of a distraught singer (played by
Rossellini), who occasionally sings "Blue Velvet" at a
nightclub. Enter the deranged killer Frank who tortures and humiliates
the poor singer, and the scenes between the two of them are as
startling and effective as any other scene in the film. They contain a
raw, vicious power that is unparalleled in the history of cinema, but
they are often tempered with a joke or some sly humorous poke in the
arm. There is such an intense buildup of em!  otions that eventually
Lynch throws it all away by winking at the audience - in effect
saying, hey, this is not as bad as it looks. This reminds me of a
similar scene in "Wild at Heart" where a similar psycho played by
Willem DaFoe humiliated and sexually teased Laura Dern to the point
where it was lessened by an unnecessary joke.
As Jeffrey veers further into this S & M world with the help of a
policeman's daughter, Sandy (Laura Dern), things get much weirder
especially when Dean Stockwell shows up as a Kabuki transvestite. Both
Stockwell and Hopper must hold the record for spouting more
obscenities on film than Eddie Murphy.
"Blue Velvet" is a fascinating, intriguing film but it is not
completely successful. The elements of the mystery are so warped that
I gave up after a while trying to follow it. It is true that some of
Lynch's later work was more confounding and that it did not bother me
much, but this mystery is actually more conventional and, dare I say,
realistic so I did expect to be able to follow it. The performances
are mostly shouting matches, especially between Hopper and Rosselini
though their scenes lend the necessary realism to their strange,
sexual bond. Kyle MacLachlan and Laura Dern merely react than act,
except for one exquisitely subtle scene at a cafe. I also think the
music by Angelo Badalamenti is far too offputting, though the songs by
Julee Cruise enhance the theme of a town with dark secrets ready to
explode. Plus, the uplifting ending negates the darkness that preceded
it, though I did like the shot of the bird with a wasp in its
mouth. That shot actually adds a sly perv!  erse touch, but I could
have lived without the annoying sappiness of it all.
For whatever strange reason I cannot comprehend, I still liked "Blue
Velvet" because nobody has ever produced or directed anything like it
prior to its release. There isn't anything you can easily compare it
to. It is definitely Lynch's wildest endeavor and, somehow, strangely
compelling. Being a huge Lynch fan, I will probably look at the film
again ten years from now, and perhaps call it a masterpiece as many
have. For now, this is just fairly good Lynch fare.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Chasing Amy (1997)
"Clerks" remains one of my favorite comedies of all time - it is lewd, crude,
off-the-wall, hilarious fun from start to finish. Kevin Smith followed his
mini-masterpiece with the abominable "Mallrats," a lewd, crude, off-the-wall
and desperately unfunny comedy with the worst casting in years - Marvel Comics
creator Stan Lee as himself, and actor Michael Rooker, both of whom couldn't
elicit a smile from my lips if they tried. I thought New Jersey native director
Kevin Smith had a fluke success and had nothing more up his sleeve to share
with the rest of us. What a surprise it is then to see Kevin Smith bounce back
with another lewd, crude, off-the-wall comedy called "Chasing Amy," and not
only is it funny, it is a real movie with tears, laughs, truth and emotions.
"Chasing Amy" is the third film in Smith's New Jersey trilogy, and he ends it
with a comic bang. 
Ben Affleck and Jason Lee star as two comic-book artists, Holden and Banky, who
struggle to get noticed at a comic-book convention with their amiable comic
"Bluntman and Chronic." Holden is immediately entranced by a blonde,
squeaky-voiced female cartoonist, Alyssa Jones (Joey Lauren Adams). She asks
him out to the Meow Mix club, and when Holden meets her, he discovers she is
a...lesbian. Naturally, Holden is upset by this but Banky starts asking stupid
questions when he sees Alyssa necking with another female: "When are we going
to get a chance to see this shit live?" Despite their obviously different
sexual preferences, Holden decides to become friendly with Alyssa, and in a
poignantly emotional scene, Holden confesses that he's in love with her and
wants more than friendship. Alyssa bursts out and starts screaming at him for
denying her her sexual nature and, of course, they kiss in the rainy night.
What's amazing about this sequence is how much emotional truth there is despite
some overacting from Adams - she makes the scene her own and it is gripping. 
"Chasing Amy" never steps wrong from scene to scene in establishing these three
principal characters because the characterizations are balanced seamlessly
between comedy, drama and truth. Ben Affleck makes an affable hero as the
goateed Holden, and if his acting is minimalist at best, he makes the character
naive and obtuse enough to render some sympathy for his misconceptions about
Alyssa. Jason Lee works better in a supporting role than a lead role as the
comic foil, and he is bitingly funny to watch as he grows more and more
contempt towards Holden's relationship with Alyssa. Joey Lauren Adams has the
more difficult role (You try and play a lesbian who has to mend her ways in
order to please a heterosexual.) and she pulls it off beautifully because she
makes Alyssa real, funny and tender without ever resorting to cliches or
needless stereotype posturing. Her voice might be a turnoff (not quite like
Melanie Griffith's) but her character is not - she is the most vividly real
human being we have seen in Kevin Smith's ouevre by far. My favorite scene is
when Alyssa explains to Holden that penetration of the vagina doesn't occur
only with a penis - she goes through a laundry list of different methods and
then she explains what sex between two women entails. It is a classic Smith
scene and Adams plays it with just the right note. 
There is able support from Dwight Ewell as a gay cartoonist who tries to
explain to Banky that the comic character Archie is in fact "gay." And let's
not leave out the return of Jay and Silent Bob (both played by Jason Mewes and
Kevin Smith who appeared in "Clerks" and "Mallrats") as they try to understand
what Holden is going through - Silent Bob gives his theory when he explains
what "chasing amy" signifies. 
"Chasing Amy" is a surprisingly great movie and better than what I expected,
even from Smith. It is thoughful, honest, superbly funny and heartbreaking.
Smith may not have a visual style yet but he knows how to write characters with
panache and humor. Kudos for making us forget the imbecility of "Mallrats," and
for making us remember the comic brilliance of "Clerks." 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general comments at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Unbreakable (2000)
M. Night Shyamalan's "Unbreakable" is an ambitious effort - to deconstruct the myth that people may have special superhuman powers - but it fails to rise beyond that very notion. And yet, as evidenced by Shaymalan's previous effort, "The Sixth Sense," he has an uncanny ability to draw the audience in with precious directorial tools - atmosphere and subtle, introspective performances. 
Bruce Willis, who also starred in "Sixth Sense," is a security guard named David Dunn who has just survived a catastrophic train crash. It is so catastrophic that everyone on board the train dies except for David. He does not have a single wound! How can this be? His wife (Robin Wright-Penn) does not recall a single day in their 12 year marriage where he ever got sick, much less suffered an injury. His idolizing son (Spencer Treat Clark) is worried about his father, arguing that he may have special powers to the point where he wants to show off his father's athletic ability to other kids. I mean, who on earth could survive such a train crash with nary a scratch? 
Enter the cryptic Elijah Price (Samuel L. Jackson), a comic-book gallery owner who has a medical condition where the bones in his body are practically brittle - he was born with broken arms and legs and walks around with a purple cape and a glass cane! He looks like a comic book action hero! Price is interested in David's case, and assumes that David must have superhuman powers. After all, David is able to...oh, I would not dream of revealing much more than that. 
"Unbreakable" is the psychological version of "X-Men," a  supposedly analytical study of one man's amazing ability to survive tragic accidents that should otherwise leave him for dead. The problem is that Willis hardly engages us. He seems to walk around as if in a trance, virtually catatonic to the point of being a zombie. Wouldn't Willis's character, David, at least wonder why he survived the crash? And why his life seems indifferent considering there is the potential of a divorce from his wife? How about the scene where his son threatens to kill him with a gun? Wouldn't David feel any emotion about his curious condition and how it may be affecting others? The problem is that his wife seems to be in a bit of a daze herself over their marriage.
The nature of David's condition brings up all kinds of philosophical questions. I thought writer-director Shyamalan might invite us to ponder the answers but he refuses to. Once David discovers his gifts and abilities, the film shifts into a thriller-of-sorts where the madness of the world and its inhabitants shakes, rattles and rolls David. Unlike the underrated "Fearless" that dealt with how one comes to grip with surviving a tragedy, "Unbreakable" merely turns into a cartoonish version of itself, expunging all drama and tension for the sake of some minor thrills. The surprise ending is not so much a surprise as it is a hindrance, and we are thus left with more questions than answers. That is not necessarily a hindrance in itself (I do love unsolved puzzles) but here it is the result of an underwritten screenplay.
I will say that M. Night Shyamalan has a gift of his own - he knows how to appropriate the right kind of atmosphere and mood. There are superbly visceral moments of fear and dread, such as the scene where David walks among the families of the dead passengers who are perplexed at his survival, the train station scenes where David observes every person walking near him, and a precious moment between David and his son where words are silently exchanged. 
There is a lot to admire in the choice of actors. Leaving out Willis's zombie state, I loved the electric presence of Samuel L. Jackson - a truly unbreakable actor who is irresistible to watch. Robin Wright-Penn does not have much to do in a relatively thankless role but there is some compassion and humanity in her character. Spencer Treat Clark is no Haley Joel Osment but he does have some affecting scenes of his own. 
"Unbreakable" is often fascinating and haunting but its central lead character walks through the film in such a daze that you wish someone would break him. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at jerry@movieluver.com 

Title
Review for Straight Story, The (1999)
After the decadent mania of "Lost Highway," one of my favorite films of the
1990's, I never expected director David Lynch to make a peaceful, simplistic
film thriving on simple pleasures. Sure enough, Lynch always manages to
surprise audiences, and "The Straight Story" is no exception - a wonderful film
that is as illuminating and introspective as Laura Palmer's descent into hell
or the duality of human nature in "Lost Highway." 
Based on a true story, Richard Farnsworth plays Alvin Straight, a stubborn old
man living with his slow, loving daughter, Rose (the amazing Sissy Spacek) in a
small town in Iowa. One day, he learns of that his brother is sick, and decides
to travel on a 1966 John Deere lawnmower from Iowa to Wisconsin to see his
brother. You see, Alvin does not have a driver's license and has no one to
drive him there, so, yes, a lawnmower might do the trick.
Alvin himself is not in perfect health - he has to walk with two canes and has
bad eyes. But the stubborn, eccentric soul must travel against all odds on that
damn lawnmower with an oversized trailer (chock full of Indian coffee beans and
American wieners) and get to his destination. He must overcome speedy monstrous
trucks, a paranoid deer lady, a runaway pregnant teenager, burning houses,
dozens of bicyclists, and so much more. Alvin will be kind to strangers, but
insists on sleeping outside or in his trailer, never in anyone's house. 
And that is it. No time warps, no truly outrageous characters or elephant men,
and no Agent Cooper or mystery men. David Lynch plays it straight, as it were,
never opting for stereotypes or condescencion - this Midwestern world is
presented simply and without artifice. That in itself captures something which
Lynch has only briefly pinpointed in the past - a heartland of emotions and
embraceable humanity. The reason may be that the screenplay is written by Mary
Sweeney, Lynch's long-time skillful editor, who once read an article about
Straight's long journey in Time magazine, and ever since wanted to make a film
about it. Smart move 
"Straight Story's" humanity comes from the strength and vigor of Richard
Farnsworth, a veteran stuntman who has also given fine performances in "Comes a
Horseman" and "The Grey Fox," and here gives a performance of rare dignity. He
is essentially a face wrinkled with memories of times past, as when he recounts
the horrors of World War II as a sniper, or when he relays the importance of
family as a bundle of twigs. Moments like this are priceless, especially for
Farnsworth, and he embodies the film with quiet grace and panache. The Academy
Awards should recognize this man, as did the Cannes Film Festival with a
standing ovation.
David Lynch also gives the film the needed pace and style to match a simple
slice of Americana. There are numerous high-angle shots of the farm fields, and
the grain elevators working its way through them. These shots are repeated by
Lynch to emphasize that life in these parts moves slowly because that is the
way of life - there is no need to hurry. In a scene of extraordinary calmness
and solitude, Lynch shows Alvin on his lawnmower traveling at 5 miles per hour,
and then he pans to the sky followed by a mini dissolve as he pans down and
shows that the vehicle has only moved a few feet ahead. This journey may take a
while, but Lynch understands that these people can appreciate a good sunset and
the aesthetic beauty of the farmlands, or to have a campfire without rushing
through deadlines or last-minute events. 
Is "Straight Story" such a departure for Lynch overall? Well, a G rating and
the fact that it is a Disney picture may put off those accustomed to mutant
babies and car accident victims. Don't fret over the choice of material because
Lynch certainly has an affinity for these people in the Midwest - the opening
scenes unravel much in the way as they did in the famous opening moments of
"Blue Velvet." The buildings, the hardware stores, the empty streets, and the
woman lying on her lawn chair next to Alvin's house - all beautifully framed
and composed by cinematographer Freddie Francis. The lingering shots of Alvin's
lawnmower against a desolate landscape will resonate long after the film is
over.
1999 has produced more end-of-the-world, milennium thrillers than one cares to
count. It is suitably ironic that the Master of Weirdness produced one of the
gentlest, most humane films of the 1990's, and Farnsworth's performance
beautifully manifests in this world of Midwestern calmness and sincerity. "The
Straight Story" is a haunting, touching, poetic film - unforgettable in its
sincere attitudes towards the simple aspects of life.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with questions, concerns or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Lola rennt (1998)
German director Tom Tykwer's "Run Lola Run" is the first truly great pop
fantasy since Tarantino's "Pulp Fiction," a high-octane, bizarrely moving,
sensual, energetic film of such distinct purity that it is impossible to put it
out of your mind.
The film stars Franka Potente as Lola, a flaming red-haired drug dealer's
girlfriend whose life always seems to be on the go. Within the first couple of
minutes, Lola is engaged in a frantic search for 100,000 marks to save her
boyfriend, Manni (Moritz Bleibtreu) from getting killed by gangsters. It is
money that Manni owes to a gangster but he inadvertenly left it in a subway,
where it might have gotten in the hands of a homeless person! Lola has
precisely twenty minutes to come up with the money. She tries to consult her
father, who works as an executive at a bank, and he may or may not be of any
help to her. In the meantime, Manni considers robbing a supermarket, which is a
post-Tarantino cliche to be sure ...but writer-director Tykwer has some sly
tricks up his sleeve.
"Run Lola Run" is not content with all things formal and conventional, and so
in a shrewd move, the 20-minute event is repeated twice. What? How can this be
interesting? Well, instead of just merely repeating the timely events at random
as "Pulp Fiction," "Go" and the noir classic "The Killing" did, we get
different outcomes, realizations, and coincidences with each interval. Tykwer
operates under the theory that Lola imagines there are alternating time lines,
and likewise, so does Manni. In a sense, it closely resembles "Groundhog
Day"...avoiding the same problems and sidestepping others each time the
desperate Lola runs trying to find the inordinate sum of money.
"Run Lola Run" has plenty of visual tricks and superbly crafted camera moves in
every frame, and plenty of surprises along its festive way. We get the homeless
man who becomes a major character in one event, Lola (who does enough running
to qualify for the Olympics) always managing to run past a group of nuns, and
there are the people on the street she almost runs into. Each time Lola marches
past them, a different life is mapped out shown in unobtrusive flash cuts.
There is Manni's decision to rob a supermarket if Lola does not make it on
time, though something always manages to occur to intrude upon that
possibility. So we get car accidents, animated intervals of Lola running, banks
held up, fierce dogs, astonished casino gamblers, shootings, lifelong decisions
involving parentage, bicyclists trying to pitch bike sales, and plenty of
heart-pumping songs and sounds to emphasize Lola's fervent task at hand. Each
timely event is played out with unpredictable twists and at the end, there is a
greater sense of optimism that supersedes that of "Go."  
Franka Ponette is a startlingly alive newcomer, brimming with a substance and
energy unseen in cinema screens this year. Her flame-red hairdo has already
inspired may German girls - even the title has proved inspiring for Hillary
Clinton's race for senator. She has sweet, delectable chemistry with the
soft-spoken Moritz Bleibtreu - their bedroom chats highlighted by bright red
hues is as touching and heartrending as any Julia Roberts romance. Those scenes
comfortably reminded me of some of the flashing red color flashes at the
beginning of Bertolucci's "The Conformist." 
>From the incredible overhead shot where a crowd forms the title of the film,
"Run Lola Run" is a masterpiece of cinematic invention and circumstance -
actively playing the audience like a piano. It is indeed the most pleasurable
pop film of the year. And Ponette is the shining moral force of the film - in
her desperation and her surefire confidence, she makes us believe there are
alternatives to any life-threatening event. Bravo, Lola, Bravo!
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or
Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Scream 3 (2000)
I know of very few horror trilogies. The "Evil Dead" is the only example I can
think of, though the last entry, "Army of Darkness," was less than stellar. The
nearly parodic original "Scream" certainly never gave the impression that a
sequel was necessary, or a trilogy. Yet "Scream 3" is here, and the surprise is
that it is not bad - a decent if pale reminder of the previous two entries. 
This time, the nearly traumatized heroine Sidney Prescott (Neve Campbell) is
living in a secluded area outside L.A., which makes sense considering she has
escaped the wrath of a ghostface killer in two movies. She has now changed her
name, and works as a woman's crisis operator! She also has visions of her dead
mother walking in the wooded area outside her house (if you recall, Sidney's
mother was killed by her boyfriend in the original). 
But the nightmare is not over as we witness the making of "Stab 3: Return to
Woodsboro," a Hollywood production with a novice film director Roman Bridger
(Scott Foley) at the helm. The ingratiating Parker Posey plays Gale Weathers,
the bitchy reporter. Courteney Cox Arquette returns of course as the real Gale,
seeing her life once again depicted in a movie (as evidenced by the outstanding
success of the first "Stab" film shown in "Scream 2.") I hope this all makes
sense. But somebody is offing all the cast members of the latest production,
and it is up to Gale and witty returnee David Arquette as the bumbling former
cop Dewey, now technical advisor for "Stab 3", to solve the crime and determine
who is the new killer with the cape and Edward Munch mask. Whoever it is has a
fixation on poor Sidney and her dead mother. 
"Scream 3" is the sequel-within-the-sequel parody that almost takes its idea
and turns it on its head, as "Scream 2" did. Unfortunately, the script by
writer Ehren Kruger ("Arlington Road") eschews some of the clever wit and puns
of the first two films, concentrating instead on slicing and dicing methods of
cruelty. In other words, "Scream 3" almost becomes the generic slasher movie
that these movies made a mockery out of in the first place. Frankly, Sidney and
their pals have forgotten how to play by the rules they were so proudly an
authority on. Never run up the stairs as opposed to outside the house and never
say the name of the person you are looking for since they are most likely dead.
Oh, and please never go inside a dark basement and for God's sakes, use a cell
phone when you really need it in a moment of crisis. 
Despite a number of false scares (some did make me jump) and red herrings,
"Scream 3" is fairly okay, at least far superior to "Urban Legend" or "I Know
What You Did Last Summer." There is enough tension throughout and some good
performances, particularly Neve Campbell. She has matured since the original
film, and shows ample strength and humanity - never has a heroine seemed so
sympathetic in any of these slasher flicks. I also enjoyed watching the
Arquettes mingle and throw verbal asides - my favorite is when Gale asks Dewey
about Sidney's phone number and if he has it in his memory. He thinks for a
moment, and then she shouts, "Phone memory!" Independent film starlet Parker
Posey is the big star of the film and she is tremendously fun to watch,
delivering all her lines with ironic gusto. I also enjoyed the scenes where she
spars with Courteney Cox as they investigate the murders and question various
suspects. I did not enjoy the unimaginative, by-the-numbers scenes with Jenny
McCarthy as an actress (are we cringing yet?), Patrick Dempsey as a cop (!) and
Lance Henriksen as a Roger Corman-type producer. The supporting actors playing
the supporting actors of the sequel-within-the-sequel are bland and
forgettable. 
"Scream 3" is a fitting conclusion to a popular movie series that spawned so
many horrible copycats in its wake. From director Wes Craven, who can make
these movies in his sleep, it is markedly better than most other rip-offs. If
only screenwriter Kevin Williamson returned to write this one, it would have
been a real scream, baby.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at faustus_08520@yahoo.com
or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Scary Movie (2000)
"Scary Movie" was the original title for Wes Craven's ultra-popular "Scream." That is probably the best thing I can say in favor of this slapdash, lackadaisical spoof of the "Scream" movies and the slasher film genre in general. As with most spoofs, there are far too many desperate gags to inspire much laughter in the audience. 
Anna Frais deftly plays the Neve Campbell role (she even mimics shrinking her eyes as Campbell did in the original "Scream"), the virginal dimwit whose father is a drug runner with the Colombians. Enter the pot-smoking teen (Marlon Wayans), the jock superstud who has homosexual tendencies (one of the other Wayan brothers, I forget which), the mentally challenged (or "retarted retard" as he is referred to) police deputy (Dave Sheridan aping David Arquette), the opening "death" cameo by Carmen Electra as Drew, and so on. Oh, and the killer wears the same Edvard Munch mask with a glinting knife and hook! 
Most of the cast act like gaping idiots seeking attention, and none exude the charm or straight-as-an-arrow acting style (central to spoofs as a rule) of Leslie Nielsen in "The Naked Gun" or for that matter, Val Kilmer in the superbly hilarious "Top Secret." The trick is to play it straight, not to act like a total buffoon otherwise, you are letting people know you are in on the joke as well. 
The central problem with "Scary Movie" is that the script does not skewer the slasher genre as much as pop culture hits like "The Matrix" (which actually works), "The Blair Witch Project," "Amistad," and "The Usual Suspects." When it does spoof the slasher films, as in the obvious "Scream," it fails miserably mainly because the "Scream" movies were already poking fun at themselves. They were postmodernist jokes on the rules and do's and don'ts of the slasher film genre - how can you spoof what was essentially a spoof? This shows a real dearth in imagination, which as far as I am concerned, the Wayans (Shawn and Marlon co-wrote the screenplay) do not possess a lick of. 
"In Living Color" at least showed some talent from the Wayans brothers, as did the underappreciated "I'm Gonna Git You Sucka." Here genuine laughs come in extremely short supply (though Electra's cameo is quite good), and there are far too many gross-out gags, homosexual locker-room humor and exaggerated bodily fluid jokes that went out of style shortly after "Porky's" and its slew of rip-offs a decade ago. 
In its 90 minute running time, I chuckled four times and only let out one big laugh for "Scary Movie." It is a roller coaster ride of missed opportunities - where are the Zucker brothers when you need them? By comparison, "Scream 3" was a lot funnier. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Age of Innocence, The (1993)
Martin Scorsese's "The Age of Innocence" did not sweep at the Oscars
back in 1994 as I had expected. "Schindler's List" and "The Piano"
stole some of its thunder, not to mention the similar tale of
repression, "The Remains of the Day." This film was also a major
departure for Scorsese, who is known mostly for the whirling intensity
of "Mean Streets" and "GoodFellas." What the hell is this raging bull
doing making a film about the social class structure of the 1870's by
way of Edith Wharton? Good question, yet Scorsese has proven to be
diverse in the past, from filming concert footage of the Band to
dealing with a feminist heroine like Alice from "Alice Doesn't Live
Here Anymore." "The Age of Innocence" is ironically among Scorsese's
greatest films, a sumptuous, delicate tale of repression and repressed
emotional violence.
Daniel Day-Lewis stars as a New York lawyer, Newland Archer, who
romantically yearns for the sexy, open-hearted Countess Olenska
(Michelle Pfeiffer) despite his plans to marry her cousin, the
childlike, innocent May Welland (Winona Ryder). But problems arise
such as Olenska's unsettled scandalous divorce, and Newland's
inability to cope with his deep feelings because of the strict class
order of practically all of New York. People seem to repress their
feelings because of fear of being ousted from family and friends -
Olenska comes dangerously close to being one of these people. As a
tearful Olenska says in one scene, "Does nobody want to hear the truth
Mr. Archer? Everyone asks you to pretend." She then follows that line
with: "Does nobody cry in New York? I suppose there is no need to."
I wasn't sure how Scorsese would direct this tale, or why he wanted to
do it. This is a director who seems to deal with characters that let
go of their emotions rather than keeping them bottled up. A tale of
this kind is often handled by the Merchant Ivory production team or
David Lean. I think it is finally the elements of tragic love,
repressed feelings, and internal emotional violence that attracted
Scorsese to the project, and he fuses these elements flawlessly. There
are the minute, carefully chosen details such as the three-course
dinners, manners of etiquette, and paintings that illustrate the
bravado of certain characters, such as Beaufort (Stuart Wilson), a
playboy that shames the family - his selection of nude paintings
directly reflects his character. Not to mention the grandly
ostentatious gossip-mongerer Mrs. Mingott (Miriam Margoyles), and her
plethora of paintings of dogs and a savage "Last of the Mohicans"
painting.
Scorsese brings this world alive as he did with the world of gangsters
in "GoodFellas" - you almost feel as if you went back in time to a
more innocent era. The cinematography by Michael Ballahaus captures
every single nuance and is particularly attentive to subtle details,
even in human behavior. There are throwaway moments that capture
glimpses of character, such as May Welland making a quick glance at
Newland when he says his goodbyes to Countess Olenska at
Mrs. Mingott's house. There is also the tender, touching, underplayed
scene where Newland is told by his son that May knew all along about
his love for the Countess. Any other director might have played up the
symphonic score or used distracting close-ups, but instead Scorsese
films it in one long take and as a two-shot. Less is definitely more
in terms of finding the right visual cues for this story.
The actors are all perfect and understated, probably more than they
ever will be. Daniel Day-Lewis astutely captures Newland's longing and
growing sense of desperation for what he cannot have. Michelle
Pfeiffer is both sensual and far more pragmatic than at the onset -
she magnificently captures Olenska's frail side and her need to be
accepted, though her behavior is unconventional. But the biggest
surprise is Winona Ryder, capturing the innocence of the title - the
seemingly naive May Welland who provides the emotional center. Her
frozen smile of recognition is haunting in the film, suggesting that
she is far more knowledgeable of her surroundings than she lets
on. There are also colorful supporting turns by the aforementioned
Miriam Margoyles, Richard E. Grant as the sarcastic Larry Lefferts,
Alec McGowen as the expert on gossip regarding all the families, and
Michael Gough as the important head of the van der Luyden family, who
orchestrate a formal dinner to matriculate Ole!  nska into society.
There is so much to love and take in from this film that you have to
see it more than once. See it once for the beautiful settings and the
extraordinary camerawork, and the second time for the finely tuned
acting and the emotions that threaten to explode in every one of the
characters. A brilliant tragedy in the style of Orson Welles's "The
Magnificent Ambersons," "Age of Innocence" will sweep you off your
feet and it will stay with you.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Jurassic Park (1993)
Steven Spielberg is one of the few directors that can produce real movie 
magic on screen. Consider the magic wand he waved in such classics as 
"Raiders of the Lost Ark", "E.T.", "Jaws" and "Close Encounters of the Third 
Kind." "Jurassic Park" is no exception and though it is no classic by any 
means, it is a thrill-happy, terrifically exciting action picture bringing 
back Spielberg's whiz-bang intensity that the otherwise middling "Always" and 
the overblown "Hook" lacked. 
Based loosely on Michael Crichton's novel, "Jurassic Park" focuses on a group 
of scientists (Sam Neill, Jeff Goldblum and Laura Dern) visiting a 
fantastical park in a South American island populated by live-breathing 
dinosaurs, including a vicious Tyrannosaurus Rex, quick-tempered, meat-eating 
velociraptors, and cuddly Brontosaurus specimens. According to John Hammond 
(Richard Attenborough), the owner of the park, the dinosaurs were genetically 
engineered by dinosaur blood found in mosquitoes, which were preserved in 
amber! Essentially, Hammond is like Frankenstein, bringing back dinosaurs 
from the dead!
"Jurassic Park" is a thrill ride from start to finish. Spielberg and writers 
Michael Crichton and David Koepp are not interested in character development 
- they simply know that audiences are too interested in seeing dinosaurs. You 
have to remember that the year 1993 was a revolutionary year for cinema - the 
term CGI was born. This  meant that creating believable creatures and 
landscapes with the use of computer-generated images was a true possibility. 
Thus, this film was the first to ever show the most realistic dinosaurs ever 
seen in film history and that was the draw for audiences. Today, CGI seems 
like an afterthought but back then, it was an astounding achievement. 
Spielberg uses CGI to his advantage. There are two exceptional Spielberg 
sequences: one is a scary, horrifying sequence in which the T-Rex attacks two 
kids trapped in a car, and the other is when the velociraptors trap the same 
kids in a kitchen. There are lots of dino chomping scenes but then there are 
some purely amazing moments that evoke a sense of wonder and joy. The first 
glimpse of a dinosaur is the brontosaurus as it tries to reach a tree branch 
- Spielberg shoots the scene from a low-angle so that we get the feeling we 
are witnessing a majestic, prehistoric creature too grand and mysterious for 
our eye level. The T-Rex itself is astounding, and the impressive soundtrack 
(recorded in DTS, digital sound, for the first time ever) enhances the 
credibility and realism of these creatures. 
So much talk about the dinos, what about the humans? Well, they recede in the 
background because any movie with creatures, especially dinos, will steal 
scenes from others, no holds barred. Still, this is a helluva good cast. 
Attenborough is appropriately and equally gleeful and stubborn as the 
gullible owner, unaware of what he has created. Sam Neill, an actor I 
dislike, gives a pleasing performance as Dr. Grant who seems to have a 
dislike for children. Laura Dern is wasted as Grant's wife, capable of much 
more than screaming fits. The actor who upstages them all is Jeff Goldblum as 
Ian Malcolm, a chaos theorist and mathematician who wears funny sunglasses 
and a rock n'roll leather jacket - he seems to have stepped out of "American 
Graffiti." His one-liners and his ridicule of this dangerous theme park bring 
a level of irony that Spielberg could have carried further than he does. 
As a story, "Jurassic Park" lacks much thrust or significance, though it can 
be construed as a modern-day Frankenstein tale where the act of creating 
rests solely on whether something should be created, particularly when you 
meddle with nature. The characters are thin but they remain watchable 
personalities (including Samuel L. Jackson in a small role as a computer 
expert and Wayne Knight as another computer expert who decides to steal some 
specimens). But for undeniable thrills and escapist entertainment, nothing 
can beat Spielberg's exciting dinos and kinetic action sequences. As Pauline 
Kael once remarked, Spielberg doesn't just thrill you, he spooks you with 
giddiness and exhilaration. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Almost Famous (2000)
Cameron Crowe is the Stanley Kubrick of rock n' roll cinema. Here is a man 
who takes his time to develop his stories before unveiling them to the 
public. Consider "Say Anything" in 1989, followed by "Singles" (his best 
film) in 1992, to the classic Tom Cruise comedy-drama "Jerry Maguire" in 
1996. Four years later, Crowe has created his most personal film by far, and 
certainly one of his most insightful. "Almost Famous" is an autobiographical 
look at an ambitious reporter who loves rock n' roll music, and decides to 
interview a reluctant band. The only catch is that the reporter is 15 years 
old!
Newcomer Patrick Fugit plays overachiever William Miller (based on Crowe's 
own days as a teen reporter), who lands an unusual assigment - Rolling Stone 
has asked him to cover a story on the up-and-coming fictional band 
Stillwater. Apparently, Rolling Stone is astounded by his in-depth story of 
the band in the magazine "Creem." Low and behold, the youthful, naive William 
now travels with Stillwater, on the road across the United States. He stays 
in hotels, loses his virginity to a few groupies, develops a crush on Penny 
Lane (Kate Hudson), a groupie who is in love with the band's lead guitarist, 
Russell (Billy Crudup), and in short soaks up their grungy atmosphere while 
trying to record their thoughts on fame and their band's future on tape. As 
Penny grows charmed by the young man, she lets him know that he is "too sweet 
for rock n' roll." And so he is, to the point where William is continuously 
called by his overprotective mother, a college professor (Frances McDormand), 
who warns him "Don't do drugs." 
There are many people that dominate William's life. The most significant is 
Russell, whom he develops a strong friendship with based on mutual respect. 
Penny is an even stronger friend who helps to get William laid, but she is so 
obsessed over her relationship with Russell that she forgets he may not love 
her. There is also the "uncool" rock journalist Lester Bangs (Philip Seymour 
Hoffman), who warns William that rock music's genesis, the need to lose 
control, is losing its potency and to be wary of rock musicians who will only 
use him to get a nice cover story. The last thing a band needs is negative 
press. 
"Almost Famous" floats by on Patrick Fugit's charm and elfish eyes - he has 
the sympathetic ooze and trustworthiness of Tobey Maguire. He is so enamored 
by this band that he is willing to take risks along with them. This also 
means that William has to abandon his school career and pending graduation. 
But who cares when you have sex, drugs and rock n' roll! Fugit is so damn 
lovable and likable that it is impossible to hate the film for having such a 
warm, fuzzy character at its center. 
Also worth mentioning is the up-and-coming actor Billy Crudup ("Jesus's Son") 
who shows a tempermental nature in Russell, particularly at a party where he 
does acid and begins to badger the kid.  Russell is also changed by William, 
and realizes his mistakes in his affairs. Kate Hudson, Goldie Hawn's 
daughter, is also quite good as the emotionally fraught Penny, affected by 
William's puppy-dog eyes and sweetness - her near-overdose scene is also 
effective as William tries to get help and admits his love for her. Philip 
Seymour Hoffman is delightfully witty and on-target as Lester Bangs - he has 
the best one-liners in the film and should get a deserved Best Supporting 
Actor nomination. Frances McDormand offers fine support as William's mother 
who has a disdain for rock music on purely immoral grounds. Also memorable 
are Jason Lee as the group's loud lead singer who considers William the 
"enemy", and Fairuza Balk and Anna Paquin as groupies who are there for the 
music. 
I could have lived without the tumultuous scene in a plane where everyone 
feels the need to confess to their sins or the far too tidy final scene, and 
yet there is nothing in "Almost Famous" that does not work. Every scene feels 
honest and truthful, and Cameron Crowe's gift is in keeping the camera static 
and observational. He has a gift for colorful dialogue and situations, and 
for bringing the appropriate mix of pathos and realism from his actors. My 
favorite scene is when the band is on a bus tour and they sing-along to Elton 
John's "Tiny Dancer." A scene like that might have been laughable or 
contrived under lesser hands, but Crowe manages to find a family connection 
between the members of the band and it pays off with poignance. Maybe someone 
like Paul Thomas Anderson might have shown the grittier, soulless side of the 
70's rock music era whereas Crowe's affection for his characters and his own 
tumultuous, personal connection to them does not allow for it. By refusing to 
be sentimental, Crowe has made o
ne of the livelier, soulful films about the 1970's that I've seen in quite a 
long time.   
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
Faust667@aol.com or at jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Vampire in Brooklyn (1995)
Eddie Murphy is pretty much on the same wavelength as Whoopi Goldberg: they are
both big, audacious comic stars who don't easily fit into any of the countless
tired Hollywood formulas written for them. Whoopi has had a little more success
than Eddie in the 90's, prior to Eddie's "The Nutty Professor." As a result,
Eddie has not had a major comedy hit since 1988's "Coming to America," arguably
his best picture. The new Eddie Murphy played a vampire in a film by Wes Craven
back in 1995, a role you'd never expect the old Eddie from "Beverly Hills Cop"
to play. 
Murphy plays an African vampire with a goatee named Max who travels to Brooklyn
to find his soul mate. His soul mate turns out to be a frustrated, edgy cop
played by the lovely Angela Bassett ("What's Love Got To Do With It"). Max bites
a few necks along the way to get to her but he can't do it all himself. He
enlists the help of a young thief who becomes a sort of deteriorating,
latter-day Renfield. We've seen this type of story countless times before, and
there is no reason any of this should really work. Murphy as a vampire in a Wes
Craven flick? Is this comedy-horror or a horror-comedy? 
The surprise is that "Vampire in Brooklyn" is not half-bad at all, a minor
guilty pleasure. There are plenty of good laughs, dozens of one-liners, frenetic
camerawork from Max's point-of-view as he soars across Brooklyn, nasty dream
sequences, and Murphy shows ample skill as a vampire who can shape-shift into a
holier-than-thou, Alan Sharpton-type Reverend or a thick-accented Italian
gangster named Guido. The photography is appropriately dark and damp considering
most of the story takes place at night. There are some nice, subtle touches such
as the flickering candlelights that surround Murphy and Bassett's erotic dance
and arm lanterns that extend from the wall, all lifted from Cocteau's "Beauty
and the Beast" and Coppola's "Dracula." 
I also found there to be pleasant chemistry between Murphy and Bassett - it
would be nice to see them in more romantic pairings in the future. The scenes of
Murphy inviting Bassett to dine with him ("I would like to have you...for
dinner") are priceless and fitfully funny. The other plus is Murphy's impeccable
impersonations and marvelous make-up jobs that show him off as the talent he
always was - still, these scenes have little to do with the story at hand. Often
such comedic highlights, which are precious few, interfere with the ghastly
blood and gore. 
"Vampire in Brooklyn" is packed with gross gags galore and unnecessary gore. A
horror-comedy should balance both horror and blood equally rather than going
overkill on the gore, as witnessed by John Landis's excruciating "Innocent
Blood." The ending is also strangely unfinished - I would love to have seen a
more imaginative killing method rather than the traditional stake-in-the-heart.
A little originality would not hurt - who can ever forget Christopher Lee's
Dracula killed by both a cross and the rays of sunlight? 
"Vampire in Brooklyn" proved to be a failure as Murphy's comeback - a year
later, he wowed audiences and made a major comeback with "The Nutty Professor."
This film certainly beats the last dreary "Beverly Hills Cop" picture he did and
the tired, laughless "The Distinguished Gentleman." It is a hoot and a half and
sporadically funny but not enough of a challenge for dear old Eddie. My advice
to Eddie Murphy is to steer clear of family comedies, like "Dr. Doolitle," and
return to his raw, politically incorrect roots, as it were. He was funnier and
more outrageous when you did not know what to expect. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Godzilla (1998)
Writer-director Roland Emmerich has produced some of the biggest box-office
champs in history, particularly the grossly silly though often fun "Independence
Day." Back in 1998, he produced and directed the most overhyped movie event of
all time, "Godzilla." "Godzilla" was so overhyped in its marketing campaign
(which started a year earlier) that there was no point in seeing the movie at
all - you already had. In the previews, there were glimpses of Godzilla's
enormous foot destroying half of New York City's streets and close-ups of its
reptilian eye, and that's about all you see in the movie, folks. After Godzilla
invades New York, he inexplicably and implausibly hides in the sewer and plays
hide-and-seek with army helicopters. The footage is shot at night, and it is so
poorly photographed that you can barely see the huge lizard at all, only a big,
blurry shadow. And then there are Godzilla's numerous babies on the loose in
typical velociraptor/"Jurassic Park" fashion. 
For such a lavishly expensive production with state-of-the-art special effects,
you would think we would at least see this creature. Godzilla stampeding through
the city of New York is a great, wondrous and scary idea but the movie never
follows suit. His foot is seen crushing cars, potholes, etc. How about Godzilla
knocking over the Statue of Liberty or climbing the Twin Towers on Wall Street
or lashing his tail against Times Square billboards? Nope, the filmmakers never
use their imagination in conveying the destructive nature of the beast. He
mostly runs through the city and often yells, and that is about it. How does
this creature hide though? How does it change size and shape throughout? And how
dare they allow us to develop sympathy for the monster only to then ask us to
hate it at the end when all you hear is its heart beating (a lift from 1976's
"King Kong")? 
Another fact lost by the filmmakers is the genesis of this creature. Godzilla
was a Japanese creation, a symbol of America coming on their fort and starting a
war, namely World War II and the counterattack on Pearl Harbor. This new
Godzilla is simply a special-effects blur with no personality and no purporse.
This is Godzilla for the 90's with anemic co-stars such as Matthew Broderick,
Hank Azaria and the shrill-voiced Maria Pitillo to boot? I'll stick with the
original 1955 black-and-white version with Raymond Burr, thank you. At least the
fire-breathing monster of that film was destructive. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Snatch. (2000)
Director Guy Ritchie is now best known as Madonna's husband, and that can 
either be a help or a hindrance to his career. His new film, "Snatch," is 
being advertised as such or as the ads proclaim, "check out Madonna's 
husband's new movie!" In truth, "Snatch" is a fun waste of time, a loud, 
obnoxious, jump-cut laden comic book of a movie. Though not nearly as good as 
Ritchie's debut, "Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels," it is fitfully good 
enough. 
The incomprehensible plot has to do with an eighty-six carat diamond stolen 
by jewel thief Franky Four Fingers (Benicio Del Toro), who has to deliver it 
to Avi (Dennis Farina), his boss in New York. The problem is that Franky has 
bets on a boxing match at a London bookie joint run by the wonderfully 
witty-mixed-with-toughness charm of a Russian gangster (Rade Serbedzija). 
Suddenly, a series of double crosses and frantic coincidences take place, 
involving some pawnbrokers, an excitable dog who swallows the sought-after 
diamond and a stuffed pig, a realistically brutal crime kingpin (Alan Ford), 
two boxing promoters (Jason Statham and Stephen Graham) and "Lock, Stock" 
returnee Vinny Jones as the appropriately named Bullet Tooth Tony. And there 
is the comedically engaging Brad Pitt as an Irish gypsy with an accent so 
indiscernible that his own friends have to repeat his words so everyone can 
understand him. Obviously Pitt is doing riffs on his own questionable Irish 
accent in "The Devil's Own." 
"Lock, Stock, and Two Smoking Barrels" was a frenzied cartoon yet "Snatch" is 
even more frenzied. It is fraught with jump cuts, loud music, shotgun blasts 
galore, heavy British accents, graphic violence, Jewish v.s. African-American 
racist slurs, and just about everything else you think would offend and shock 
the arthouse crowd of safe, risk-free cinema. Not that "Snatch" is anything 
new or that it takes any real risks, but it sure will cause revulsion for 
people who support Sir Richard Attenborough. 
There are plenty of laughs and enough wicked black humor to make "Snatch" a 
decent evening out at the movies. Just do not expect coherence, only wild 
visual pyrotechnics and a helluva a good performance by Mr. Pitt.  
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 

Title
Review for New Rose Hotel (1998)
Although I am a big fan of labyrinthian, inconclusive puzzles, I was completely
confounded by Abel Ferrara's barely released bore "New Rose Hotel," a silly,
counterproductive no-brainer that barely makes a lick of sense. A thrilling
start is undone by an artless camouflage over its thin premise. 
Based on a short story by William Gibson ("Necromancer") that was published in
Omni magazine a few years back, the film stars Christopher Walken as Fox and
Willem Dafoe as X, two industrial spies who specialize in industrial espionage.
Their newest target is a millionaire geneticist named Hiroshi whose research
has yielded some outstanding breakthroughs in the field. This new
groundbreaking project, known as AMAAS, has something to do with the defection
of research scientists from one Japanese mega corporation to another, and I am
assuming that Fox and X are trying to prevent this defection from happening. So
they hire a prostitute named Sandii (Asia Argento) to seduce Hiroshi and, in
short, deviate his attention from his work and his family. The only problem is
that X is in love with Sandii, especially when they play act their roles where
X pretends to be Hiroshi. X teaches Sandii how to make love to Hiroshi, and so
on. Naturally, X threatens the whole operation and Fox, for one reason or
another, feels compelled to make Hiroshi's life insufferable, even after the
seduction works. 
In another director's hands, such as Peter Greenaway or David Lynch, this might
have been at least an extraordinarily visual film, showing parallels between
digital video technology and alternate realities where one can't decipher what
is real and what is not (hence, there are numerous grainy video shots of
Hiroshi's activities, though we never actually see the central seduction). But
under the gritty ruling hand of Abel Ferrara, this is dreary filmmaking, often
badly photographed to the point where we can't fathom what is happening on
screen (especially the noirish club scenes). Ferrara is at his best showing the
streets of New York where he deals with soulful, spiritual protagonists
questioning their spiritual existence as in "Bad Lieutenant" (his finest film)
and "The Addiction." Here, he is left languishing with nary a script or a theme
- it is all style with no substance. And to make matters worse, the final
half-hour is a virtual recap of the first forty minutes, thereby reinforcing
the preceding events from Dafoe's recollection. But it tells us...nothing, and
there are simply no revelations or clues. 
To be fair, I enjoyed Walken's performance as always, walking with a cane and
ruminating on his thoughts regarding Hiroshi and his research. I even like his
brief tap dances and flirtations with Sandii. There are also some choice cameos
by Gretchen Mol and Anabella Sciorra. But these minute virtues hardly make for
a suitable recommendation to this endlessly repetitive film. It is a trip to
nowheresville, where nothing of consequence or significance occurs. Do not
visit this hotel.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Paths of Glory (1957)
"Paths of Glory" is one of the greatest war films ever made, an indictment on 
war and the complex morality behind the decisions made in trench warfare. 
What helps make it so complex and involving in every scene is the direction 
by Stanley Kubrick and the exquisitely precise and multilayered screenplay by 
Kubrick, Calder Willingham and Jim Thompson. 
Set in France in 1916, the film begins with the arrival of General Broulard 
(Adolphe Menjou) at a French chateau where he meets with General Mireau 
(George Macready) to discuss the golden opportunity of taking the "Ant Hill," 
a no man's land held by the Germans. The notion is that if Mireau takes the 
command, he may be promoted and it is also an event for the media to focus 
on. Mireau, the determined optimist, immediately tells Colonel Dax (Kirk 
Douglas) of the news, much to Dax's dismay. Dax defends his position by 
quoting from Samuel Johnson ("patriotism is the last refuge of a scoundrel") 
and feeling his men are not up to the task so soon. Accompanying Broulard is 
Major Saint-Auban (Richard Anderson, best known for his role in "The Six 
Million Dollar Man" TV show) who refers to the soldiers as having a herd 
instinct, or stated as "an animal sort of thing." Dax corrects the major, 
reminding him they are human after all. Nevertheless, Dax is convinced of 
taking the "Ant Hill," perhaps in fear he will be rep
laced by someone who will not take proper care of his men. Thus the colonel 
tells his men that they must be prepared to attack, though the fact that the 
weather will be clear and sunny as opposed to foggy and cloudy establishes 
this battle as a losing proposition. 
"Paths of Glory" has two scenes of battle, one quiet and serene and the other 
noisy and confusing. The first scene is of a patrol organized to navigate no 
man's land. They include the alcoholic Lieutenant Roget (Wayne Morris), 
Corporal Paris (Ralph Meeker) and Private Lejeune (Ken Dibbs). The area is 
already littered with shell holes, corpses, lots of wire and rubble. Lejeune 
is inadvertently killed by Lieutenant Roget, the first accused of "cowardice 
in the face of the enemy" by Corporal Paris. 
The other battle is of course the taking of Ant Hill, which becomes a 
haelstorm of explosions and bullets in and around the trenches. The men fear 
getting too close to the German wire because of the intensity of the 
explosions, and are almost killed by General Mireau who is infuriated that 
they would stay in the trenches to avoid enemy fire. Three soldiers under 
Dax's command are arbitrarily chosen to be court-martialed and face execution 
for "cowardice in the face of the enemy." One of them is Corporal Paris, who 
is ironically picked by Lieutenant Roget.
"Paths of Glory" follows the trial leading to the execution, seen as justice 
for men who refused to fight, and Kubrick and the writers Willingham and 
Thompson ask tough questions with little in the way of a clear-cut 
resolution. Should these men be executed for acting cowardly and not 
advancing in no man's land? Is General Mireau any less guilty for almost 
having his men killed by their own troops for not advancing? At one point, 
Colonel Dax even asks to be set as an example for his men by being executed, 
but is instead left as a defense lawyer for the three charged men in the 
court martial proceedings. What Kubrick shows, and what has become a staple 
of his later work, is that the powerful men at the top, namely General 
Broulard and General Mireau, see these soldiers as nothing more than animals 
and treat them as such, stating that if the enemy fire was so intense, the 
result would have been corpses littered around the trenches, not cowards. 
Ironically, during the penultimate final scene in the chateau, Gen
eral Mireau reminds Broulard that the man he stabs in the back is a soldier. 
The inhumanity and lack of sympathy is powerfully shown in Kubrick's treatise 
on war, and lead the way to many more ambiguous moral lessons in human 
behavior in films such as "Dr. Strangelove" and especially "A Clockwork 
Orange." 
Based on the 1935 World War I novel by Humphrey Cobb, "Paths of Glory" is 
emotionally wrenching and thrillingly realized. Every sequence is masterfully 
composed and framed, including the dolly shots through the trenches where Dax 
and General Broulard frequently travel while explosions are heard in the 
background. The court martial sequence in the chateau is as tense and 
nail-biting as the execution itself.
The dialogue is also crisp and direct. I loved the conversations between 
Broulard, Mireau and Dax in the chateau, a setting for a different kind of 
battleground where words and strategies are exchanged in reference to the 
lives of the soldiers. Backstabbing and political ambition are primary goals, 
though Dax is an idealist - he cares for his men and says or does nothing as 
a means of promotion from his rank. The higher-ups are of different mindsets, 
and it is extraordinary to watch Kirk Douglas's blunt, sympathetic Dax, 
Adolphe Menjou's arrogant, pitiless General Broulard, and the cold, 
remorseless General Mireau brilliantly portrayed by George Macready commingle 
and argue over the reality of war's traumas and heartaches. 
"Paths of Glory" is a tough, demanding work that generated a lot of 
controversy over its cynical presentation of how men of power handle their 
own men in the face of war. But there is beauty too, as evidently shown in 
the final shot where a German farm girl (Suzanne Christian, who became Mrs. 
Kubrick at that time) sings a sentimental song from the "Musical Memories of 
Germany" and causes the audience of soldiers to weep when they were initially 
jeering her. I also like what could be a throwaway moment where Private 
Arnaud (Joseph Turkel, who later appeared in "The Shining") describes how 
being shot down and killed instantly is preferable to being wounded. There is 
humanity in these men, these soldiers who fight in the trenches for the 
benefit of pleasing some higher-ranking officials and, of course, to win the 
war. Here is an anti-war film that sticks to its guns and shows, in the words 
of Ernest Hemingway, that war is a crime no matter how justified. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Pleasantville (1998)

The 1950's is a period of innocence that remains as much a memory as anyone
who lived through it. The 1990's is a harmful, jaded era that does not accord
to the values and customs of yesteryear. Fat chance that we'll ever adapt to
such an innocence again. "Pleasantville" is one of the most ironic, original
movies of the year that touches on what separates the 50's from the 90's. Is it
moral decay, or is it something fundamentally deeper about ourselves? 
The film begins with a television ad for the 50's show, "Pleasantville," with
a spirit reminiscent of the nostalgic sitcoms shown on Nick at Nite. A smiling
David (Tobey Maguire) is watching the show - he's a huge fan of the show and
knows all the episodes by heart. He lives in the real world of the 90's
complete with a divorced working mother and an oversexed sister, Jennifer
(Reese Witherspoon). The girls at school pay him no mind, and how can they if
his normal topic of conversation is about the minutiae in "Pleasantville."
One evening while his mother is away on a trip, he watches the show and fights
with his sister over the remote control. As they are fighting, they are zapped
away into their TV to the placid existence of Pleasantville! David and Jennifer
are now Bud and Mary Sue Parker! Their parents are the goody-good Parkers
(flawlessly played by William H. Macy and Joan Allen) who offer a high-calorie
breakfast, including a plate full of fat pancakes and lots of syrup. 
The world of Pleasantville is a sight unlike anything in the 90's mainly
because it is not a real place. The local fireman only saves cats. The
high-school boys never miss the rim shot when playing basketball. The
high-school kids say "swell," as opposed to "cool." There is no existence
beyond this town and, worse yet, they are all in black-and-white! "We're
supposed to be in color," says Jennifer, assured that they are in Nerdville. 
David doesn't react with any hostility to the town he knows so well. He works
at the local soda shop along with the bland Mr. Johnson (Jeff Daniels), who
doesn't know what to do when David switches chores at closing time. Of course,
the one who starts trouble in this harmless town is Jennifer. She tells her
pseudo mother, Betty Parker, that masturbation, and sex at Lover's Lane (where
couples mostly hold hands), is worth trying. Betty goes to take a bath, excites
herself, and the tree next their house goes up in colored flames - something
this town has never seen. 
It wouldn't be fair to give away any of the other surprises that
"Pleasantville" has in store because the surprises are not the main thrill -
the movie is a rich, human drama with touches of humor. The combination of
black-and-white and color cinematography within the same shot is astoundingly
good, yet the movie isn't just decorated with effects. The effects are used
only as part of fundamental thematic concerns. In essence, the deeper message
in "Pleasantville" isn't that we should let go of our inhibitions about sex,
but that we shouldn't resist taking that step to wherever our destiny leads us.
The performances are right on target and make the themes resonate long after
the film is over. Not enough can be raved about William H. Macy as the
straight-arrow George Parker - an actor who surprises me in every film he's
appeared in. He's perfectly cast and his ironic tone, when shouting 'Honey, I'm
home!', is poignant and regaling. Joan Allen, one of the best actresses working
right now, delivers another nuanced, heartbreaking performance as the
always-smiling Betty Parker, whose own life is awakened by sexual
possibilities, like having an affair with Mr. Johnson. What's most refreshing
is that these two amazing actors slowly strip away any shred of stereotyping
and reveal genuine human characters.
Tobey Maguire is one of those rare pleasures in the movies, a grown-up version
of Kevin Kline (both appeared in "The Ice Storm" along with Allen). He has an
ability to make us aware of what he's thinking all the time. His best scenes
are when he applies black-and-white makeup to Betty's colored face, and when he
tells stories to an avid crowd about places existing beyond their quaint little
town while the music from Dave Brubeck's "Take Five" slips in quietly in the
soundtrack. 
Reese Witherspoon is also a rare delight (even in slipshod material like
"Freeway"), and she nicely conveys a human soul in the very nineties, soulless
Jennifer. It is also gratifying to witness her gradual transformation from
vixen to intellectual.
"Pleasantville" is purely a pop extravaganza written and directed by Gary Ross
("Big"). The movie does not have the thrust or the verve of "Back to the
Future," a similar 50's fantasy parable that depended more on irony through
humor. It also ends on an unsatisfying note whereas some real imagination would
have given it the necessary thematic conclusion. 
The merits supersede the flaws, however, and a super script and an excellent
ensemble cast make "Pleasantville" as joyous and human a film as we're likely
to see from Hollywood this year. Its morals about thinking for yourself and
appreciating beauty through love and knowledge may be simplistic, but they are
thought-provoking and pleasant, indeed. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 

Title
Review for Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas (1998)
I have always wondered what it would be like to make a film about two drug
addicts who do nothing more than consume drugs through an entire movie. Okay,
that would be Cheech and Chong's "Up in Smoke," but that was a comedy. "The
Doors" was about an unlikable, boorish addict who got high on the idea of
death. You might also think of the superbly giddy "Boogie Nights," which showed
more scenes of drug use than any movie ever made. That is until I saw the
wildly off-balance spectacle of Terry Gilliam's "Fear and Loathing in Las
Vegas," a putrid, excessive assault on the senses. Excess doesn't even begin to
describe this odyssey. This is more like enduring a bad road trip while stuck
in New York City traffic. The scenery may be nice, but it's hell to sit
through.
On the basis of Hunter S. Thompson's cult novel, the adventurous Johnny Depp
plays the bald-headed journalist (known here as Raoul Duke) who goes to Las
Vegas to cover a story on the Mint 400, a desert motorcycle race. Thompson
brings his Samoan attorney, Lazlo, also known as Dr. Gonzo, to Vegas. Duke is
less interested in the race, though, than in smashing up hotel rooms - an eerie
reminder of Depp's own real-life tabloid tales. In the trunk of their car, they
carry every drug known to man, including uppers, downers, laughers, acid,
mescaline - you name it, they got it. They start seeing visions of reptiles,
giant bats, faces morphing into weird shapes, raging demons and other grotesque
hallucinations. And it was around this point that I started to lose interest in
the movie. 
Don't get me wrong. I have no problem with films showing the abuse of drugs and
the effects of excessive consumption. "Trainspotting" was one film that showed
the pleasure and the danger of heroin addiction yet it was instilled with a
sense of purpose and a sense of humanity. "Fear and Loathing..." is basically
about addiction, but it does not reveal much about the addicts. To put it
another way, the depiction of drug use is all on the surface, and there's no
theme underneath to support it. The histrionic performances do not help the
one-sided material. 
Depp is a gifted, talented actor but his interpretation of Duke is reduced to a
series of tics, double-takes and wild-eyed nausea. He doesn't even seem to be a
journalist, and comes across more as a caricature (occasionally depicted in the
Doonesbury comics) with no inner surface or humanity. He's a drug freak,
nothing more. 
The same can be said for Benicio Del Toro as the extremely wasted Dr. Gonzo (a
name more applicable to Thompson) who doesn't do much with his role except yell
countless obscenities while emoting a singularly angry expression throughout.
Another detriment to this actor is his constant muttering - I couldn't grasp
one syllable of what he said. Clarity and nuance are not exactly in Del Toro's
vocabulary.
The best moments in "Fear and Loathing..." are the comic set pieces, such as
Duke's inability to avoid paying for his hotel room; Gonzo's hilarious attempt
to convince an underage girl (Christina Ricci) that he's being watched by the
FBI; a scared blond hitchhiker (Tobey Maguire) who runs away from the duo; and
the pice de rsistance: a drug enforcement conference where the Duke is
ingesting LSD instead of covering the event for his paper.
One of the quietest scenes in the film featuring a dour Ellen Barkin as a diner
waitress who harbors a certain contempt towards customers, including the
leering Dr. Gonzo. It's a terrific scene, flawlessly timed and edited, but what
does it have to do with the rest of the movie? 
There are some clever cameos by other actors including James Woods, Mark
Harmon, Lyle Lovett and, best of all, Gary Busey as a lonely highway cop who
asks Duke for a kiss. In the end, they are part of a menagerie of trivial,
witless sequences with no structure or meaning. Somehow, none of this resembles
Thompson's prose. 
"Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas" is directed by Terry Gilliam (Twelve Monkeys),
a former Monty Python comic, who is best known for his bizarre, overrated film,
"Brazil." Gilliam's main problem in past directorial efforts was his tendency
to waver from one extreme visual cue to another. It worked for "Twelve Monkeys"
but it was detrimental in "Time Bandits." Perhaps, he is the perfect director
for Thompson's surreal novel - the film is shot with extreme wide-angle lenses
that greatly distort the reality on screen. Thompson, however, didn't just
emphasize distorting reality. He also wanted us to see the world through his
eyes, including the "fear and loathing" of living and searching for something
in the 1970's. All we really get in this film is the distortion.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with questions, comments or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for RKO 281 (1999) (TV)
It is suitably ironic that Orson Welles was largely ignored by Hollywood after
"Citizen Kane" and "Touch of Evil" - they wanted no part of him. Now, Welles is
afforded more unauthorized biographies and film books than probably any other
director. His film noir classic "Touch of Evil" was recently restored to the
director's original specifications and editing strategies, forty years after
the fact. His reigning "Kane" won its place in the AFI list in 1998 as the
greatest American film ever made. His rejected screenplay for "The Cradle Will
Rock" has been made into a film by director Tim Robbins. Now we have the story
of Welles' s battle over "Citizen Kane" called "RKO 281," a supremely
entertaining film with ball-of-fire performances and authentic period detail. 
This lush biography stars the well-cast Liev Schreiber as the 25-year-old boy
wonder who took Broadway by storm, and conquered the airwaves with his infamous
"War of the Worlds" broadcast. He is given the opportunity to make a film about
"War of the Worlds" but convinces a studio boss (Roy Scheider) to give him
support to make a film called "Citizen Kane." "Kane" is of course based on the
pioneering news tycoon William Randolph Hearst (grandly played by James
Cromwell), and once the insiders in Hollywood catch wind of this, all hell
breaks loose. "Kane" is of course Welles's first attempt to act and direct a
film, and this causes pressure for him and his crew, including telling his
cinematographer to make holes in the floorboards so he can get a real low-angle
shot! But once Hearst and his young wife (Melanie Griffith) hear that their
life story will be a Hollywood movie, he makes demands on all the studios to
burn all existing prints of the film. 
"RKO 281" maintains a tight focus on Welles and his battle over having complete
control over his project - this was of course his own downfall since he was
never afforded that control again in Hollywood. The film shows him to be a
genius and a manipulator, and there are the highs and lows of his relationship
with screenwriter Herman J. Mankiewicz (John Malkovich) - the controversy
existed about how much of Welles's input ended up in the screenplay. 
Schreiber is perfect for the role, and even looks a little bit like Welles -
his intense outbursts are particularly good. His relationship with Malkovich is
also well-presented, and through them we see that making a film, no matter how
passionate or personal it is, is an arduous chore - what collaborations aren't?
"RKO 281" has many extraordinarily shot sequences, such as Hearst's dinner
party or the behind-the-scenes filming of "Kane" - at one point, a camera falls
off a crane as it is tracking in for a close-up! I also like the moment when
Welles is inspired by Hearst's house or the puzzle pieces on the floor. If
nothing else, "RKO 281" could have been longer. There are no references to the
actors who worked on "Kane" (except for Joseph Cotten) - where's Ruth Warrick
or Agnes Moorehead or Ray Collins in all this? How about the specific lighting
design of "Kane" with all those memorable shafts of light? 
Minor carps overall, "RKO 281" is a splendid recreation of an era in Hollywood
not so different from today's - when big bucks and box-office revenues
accounted for more than artistic integrity. Thank God that Orson Welles proved
them wrong. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or
at Faust667@aol.com 

Title
Review for Face/Off (1997)
After seeing the implausible "Air Force One," I thought to myself - the action
genre is dead and buried. Then comes "Face/Off," which is superior in every way,
despite having an even more ludicrous storyline. 
The vibrant John Travolta plays an FBI agent, Sam Archer, whose son was killed
by a colorful, psychopathic terrorist named Castor Troy (Nicolas Cage). Sam has
a vendetta and wants to capture Castor. Castor is caught and wounded, and placed
in a coma. Sam has a problem, though: he needs to find a bomb that is planted
somewhere in the vast metropolis of Los Angeles. Despite some objections, Sam
has his face surgically removed and implanted with the comatose Castor's! This
way, Sam can pretend to be Castor making it easier to find where the bomb is
hidden. Problem is the real Castor has awakened from his coma, and has had his
face surgically implanted with Sam's! Farfetched? You bet.   
The difference between "Face/Off" and "Air Force One" is that "Face/Off" is
actually great fun and it's also wickedly entertaining: it takes its inventive
premise and brings it to life with imagination and fire. The tour-de-force is
John Travolta and Nicolas Cage who each cleverly play two roles: Travolta is the
obsessed, quiet, compassionate Sam, and also plays the devious, evil Castor
unbeknownst to Sam's family (they include Joan Allen as Sam's wife, Dominique
Swain as his daughter). There's one priceless moment where Travolta as Castor
gleefully announces, "Things are going to change around here." 
Cage naturally plays the grandiose Castor who walks around in red and black
attire complete with two gold-plated guns, and he also convincingly adopts Sam's
placid nature while trying to prove to Castor's foes that he is the brutal
Castor, and simultaneously tries to prove to his wife that he is the real Sam!
Both actors pull this off brilliantly (and they should be nominated for Oscars).
Travolta had the best role (or roles) of his career since "Pulp Fiction," and
Nicolas Cage proves that he hasn't lost his offbeat nature (look at the
hilarious scene where he dons priestly robes and sings "Hallelujah!").    
"Face/Off" is that rarity: a smart, complex, humanistic, fast-moving character
study draped with director John Woo's trademark slo-mo, close-up visuals, and
outrageous, explosive action. It's like watching a live-action comic book. The
film may have too high a body count and seem somewhat relentless, but it's
always top-notch in every other department. "Air Force One" is the mediocre,
senseless, exploitative action picture with little to remind us of the great
Harrison Ford films of the past. "Face/Off" shows that some imagination can
still spill into your local multiplex from an accomplished director. The choice
is ultimately yours. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Good Will Hunting (1997)
Films about child prodigies or twentysomething geniuses rarely get inside their
heads and ask: "What makes you tick?" An even tougher question rarely posed is:
"How do you deal with who you are?" Slight films in this category that could
have been great include Jodie Foster's "Little Man Tate," and the predictable
Rocky-crossed-with-chess-playing tale "Searching For Bobby Fischer." There's
also the finely acted "Stand and Deliver" that dealt with inner-city kids who
miraculously performed better in A.P. Calculus exams than anyone else, but they
didn't exist as anything more than ciphers. One film that broke through that
barrier was the marvelous "Amadeus," which depicted the rare talents of the
wonderful composer Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart in blazing glory with, naturally,
great music to alleviate the senses. The Oscar-winning film was a
three-dimensional portrait of Mozart presenting him as a buffoonish clown who
didn't seem arrogant, but knew how good a composer he was. Now there is also
"Good Will Hunting," a finely acted, well-written drama about a math genius who
is too good to be true, and that is part of the film's problem. 
The charismatic Matt Damon stars as the conceited orphan Will Hunting; a South
Bostonian hooligan who drinks, fights, and generally fools around with his
buddies. He works as a janitor at MIT and, once in a while, he solves complex
math problems posed by an MIT professor (Stellan Skarsgard) on a hallway
blackboard. When the professor finally spots him solving a problem, he decides
to use Will as a math instructor to solve all kinds of difficult math theorems
that had conflicted scientists for centuries. Will is reluctant at first, but
he decides to go along with it since it is way of avoiding jail time. It also
means that he has to see a brilliant therapist (Robin Williams) twice a week -
a former child prodigy who will try to uncover what makes this troubled kid
tick. 
Will has the ability to see through people - he can make Harvard students
envious with his textbook knowledge of politics, and he can drive people mad
with aggravation, including the therapist who Will discovers is a widower. Lest
anyone think that he's just a brainiac, Will also has the ability to love,
especially a British Harvard student (Minnie Driver) who wants to help him
grapple with his emotions. There's a priceless scene where he picks up Minnie
at a bar. She asks if they could get together for coffee. He suggests caramels:
"When you think about it, it is as arbitrary as drinking coffee." 
"Good Will Hunting" has a terrific premise - a troubled genius who suppresses
his past - and although the film deals with his abusive past, it never confirms
or explains Will's genius. Where does it stem from and, more importantly, how
does Will feel about his own intelligence? The movie treats Will as a
misunderstood genius rather than allowing Will to see how he mistreats and
misunderstands himself. That's probably too much to expect from a film, but I
wouldn't have minded to see Will's brain at work - how about a scene where we
see the mental process by which Will solves a math problem? There are some
instances where we see Will's genius at work (the courtroom scenes where Will
avoids misdemeanor jail sentences by quoting legal cases from the 19th century
is a good example) but they are not enough to show how Will's mind unravels.
Mostly, we see the selfish MIT professor trying to use Will's mind as an
experiment for his own ambitions, and there's the therapist who is trying to
get Will to confront his past - yes, you've seen these subplots before. 
"Good Will Hunting" has plenty of expert performances from the cast, including
Matt Damon ("Courage Under Fire") as the fast-talking Will; Ben Affleck
("Chasing Amy") as Will's beer-drinking buddy who has a pivotal moment where he
tries to convince Will to take advantage of his talents; the luscious Minnie
Driver as Will's girlfriend who loves him; and the grand Robin Williams as the
hip therapist who has been down the same road as Will. Williams, in his
Awakenings mode, is brilliantly understated and a joy to watch as we see him
gradually trying to get Will to open his heart. His final scene, where he
repeatedly acknowledges to Will that it is "not your fault," is emotionally
powerful and heartbreaking. 
"Good Will Hunting" is competently directed by Gus Van Sant ("Drugstore
Cowboy"), but he never gets as close to Will's nature as he did to River
Phoenix's in "My Own Private Idaho." The first-time screenplay by co-stars Ben
Affleck and Matt Damon is often smartly funny, manipulative and
quasi-sentimental but not as freshly developed as I might have hoped. By the
end of the film, you feel that Will Hunting is more like an unreal movie
character than a genuine, three-dimensional human being. 
For more review, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me at jerry@movieluver.com or Faust667@aol.com for any suggestions,
comments or complaints. 

Title
Review for L.A. Confidential (1997)
"L.A. Confidential" is the densest and most complex crime film since
"Chinatown." It is richly satisfying, brutally compelling and slickly acted and
directed, and one of the best films of the year. 
Based on James Ellroy's novel, "L.A. Confidential" is set during the early
1950's when L.A. was the mythical "city of angels" where nuclear families
existed, orange groves filled the countryside, and movie stars and celebrities
were in the spotlight. It was also a time when police corruption was rampant
and racism was beginning to boil over everywhere. Guy Pearce stars as a young
cop, Exley, who is eager to become a detective in the very corrupt police
system because he believes that a cop should have strong morals and values and
follow rules by-the-book - he doesn't believe in beating a confession out of a
suspect. Russell Crowe stars as the tough detective White who is just the
opposite - he beats confessions out of suspects, he beats up abusive men
involved in drunken domestic violence cases, etc. The unlikely pair become
embroiled in a murder case at an all-night diner where a cop was killed - a
group of inner-city blacks may have been responsible. It turns out they may
have been set up by someone in the police force, but who? The brutal Irish
police captain (James Cromwell) is unsure of Exley's capacity as a detective
especially since he's ratted out all the cops who beat up a few illegal Mexican
immigrants. Exley is hated by everyone in the force but does he have the guts
to deal with everyday brutality like White has? 
Then there's Det. Jack Vincennes (Kevin Spacey), a charming, impish cop who
takes extra cash on the side whenever he provides tip-offs or juicy details
within the department to the unctuous Sid Huggens (Danny DeVito), a reporter
who writes for "Hush, Hush," a scandal magazine that offers gossip and crimes
sold to the public for thrills, like today's tabloid shows. Vincennes also
moonlights as a technical adviser for a TV show called "Badge of Honor" (a nod
to "Dragnet").        Meanwhile as the murder case unfolds, White discovers a
connection to a sultry call girl, Lynn Bracken (the better-than-ever Kim
Basinger) who works for a prosperous pimp (David Strathairn) - he provides a
very kinky service where women are "cut" to resemble movie stars such as
Veronica Lake. White interrogates Lynn and falls in love with her, but is Exley
interested in her too? 
"L.A. Confidential" is an amazing movie full of plot twists, dozens of
subplots, and numerous vignettes. Director Curtis Hanson (who co-wrote the
script with Brian Helgeland) provides a dazzling ride making us feel as if we
have been transported back into the 1950's as he unravels the web of corruption
that leads from the police department to politicians, criminals, pimps,
mobsters and the traditional femme fatale. Still, this movie is not quite film
noir because we have two traditional heroes, the handsome Exley and the rugged
White, who overcome all odds and, to no one's surprise, find the killers (I
just won't tell you who the culprit is). The film is not quite on the level of
"Chinatown" but it is a more vivid experience than the fatuous "Cop Land."
"L.A. Confidential" has one of the best ensemble casts of the year: we have
the witty, reliable Danny DeVito and Kevin Spacey; the effervescent cool of Guy
Pearce as Exley who undergoes a transformation in the movie that is thrilling
to watch, and the contemplative, explosive nature of White as played by the
magnetic Russell Crowe (both are Australian actors). Kim Basinger is at her
best here since "Batman" with an alluring and sensitive side that brings
enormous pathos to her character. 
"L.A. Confidential" is a fast-paced, cynical, dirty, violent, mean and
thoroughly entertaining tapestry of a different period where innocence was more
prevalent but underneath, corruption and evil still roamed the streets. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with comments, suggestions or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or
jerry@movieluver.com 

Title
Review for Last House on the Left (1972)
As pure, unmitigated horror, "Last House on the Left" often succeeds, but it is
lacking a central aspect in any horror film - sympathy for the victims
tormented by the evil. In this case, the victims are two, giggling,
marihuana-stoked teenage girls (Sandra Cassel, Lucy Grantham) who are on their
way to New York City to see the band, Blood Lust ("They dismember chickens".)
They stop in the city looking to score some pot when they inadvertently hook up
with three psychos, the oily Krug (David Hess), the bland Weasel (Fred J.
Lincoln), the scared Junior Stillo (Marc Sheffler) and the potty-mouthed Sadie
(Jeramie Stillo).  
"Last House on the Left" starts off badly for the first hour with horrendous
acting and even worse cinematography making it appear as if it were an
Afterschool Special. The film improves when the victims are forced to have
sexual intercourse, bludgeoned, and then stabbed out in the woods where nobody
can hear them. The actual process by which the  psychotic group makes these
victims suffer is unsettling and reinforces, I think, Wes Craven's initial
theme - to make us act with revulsion at the violence taking place from
real-life murderers, not bogeymen. There is even a moment when the killers look
at themselves with disgust after stabbing one girl who attempted to run away.
Unfortunately, Craven hardly makes us care for either of the victims, and so it
makes it harder to have any sympathy. 
Then the film takes a curious turn and, by sheer coincidence, there is a spin
of events involving one girl's parents who happen to live near the woodsy area
where the crimes took place. The killers pretend to be religious students whose
car broke down. The parents take them in, before realizing who they are. All of
this is very loosely based on Ingmar Bergman's fabulously beautiful
masterpiece, "The Virgin Spring," which at least developed its characters
amidst a powerful theme involving God and why He lets these things happen.
Craven's film hardly merits that much scrutiny. 
"Last House on the Left" was released back in 1972, and was considered so
intense that they almost did not release it. Craven found some leader with an R
rating on it and released the film. It is still banned in the UK, Australia,
and New Zealand. Although it has some intense moments, it is not nearly as good
as "The Hills Have Eyes" or any of the director's later films. Its revenge plot
lacks thrust and significance and is handled all too crudely and quickly (there
is a chainsaw fight, an oral sex act that goes horribly wrong, and so on). The
songs played on the soundtrack are played at the most inappropriate moments and
detract from whatever tension there is. And some silly slapstick involving two
bumbling cops does not help matters either (one of them is Martin Kove, later
the memorable villain in "Rambo: First Blood II" and "The Karate Kid"). An
interesting debut from horrormeister Wes and its supposed intentions and form
of inspiration are admirable, but there is precious little to recommend. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or complaints at faustus_08520@yahoo.com
or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Shadow of the Vampire (2000)
"Shadow of the Vampire" has such an inventive, original idea that I am almost 
willing to recommend it based on its premise. Unfortunately, like most great 
ideas, it does not fully exploit it for all its worth, and seems to skim past 
some missed opportunities resulting in a fairly bland movie that may please 
some movie buffs, yet will mostly annoy everyone else. 
"Shadow of the Vampire" is a fictional behind-the-scenes look at the making 
of one of the greatest, most realistic vampire films ever made, "Nosferatu," 
which was released back in 1922. John Malkovich stars as F.W. Murnau, the 
madly eccentric, madly obsessed film director of "Nosferatu," itself based on 
the famed Bram Stoker novel though changes were made to avoid being sued by 
Stoker's widow. As the film begins, Murnau has just completed studio shots 
for his latest endeavor ("Thank God, an end to this artifice!"), and is ready 
to shoot outdoor night shots in the countryside and on an island to capture 
the necessary realism for the tale. All they need is a vampire and Murnau has 
found one, an actor named Max Schreck (Willem Dafoe) who lives in an 
abandoned monastery. Murnau claims the actor studied under Stanislavsky from 
the Max Reindhardt troupe. The crew is afraid of this gauntlike, bald 
creature who fits the role all too well, and needs no makeup! Gradually, we 
discover that Schreck is not an actor at all, he is a real vampire and has 
his eye on the lead actress Greta Schroeder (Catherine McCormack), who will 
have herself sacrificed to the vampire in the final scene of the script!
Murnau knows Schreck is a vampire and their unusual contract stipulates that 
Schreck continue his feeding habits until after the shoot (a bottle of blood 
and small animals are used as alternative food items). Naturally, Schreck is 
too hungry for blood and ends up devouring not only bats but the neck of a 
cinematographer. He also has the desperate need to acquire the neck of Greta. 
The contract is unheeded but it doesn't seem to matter - Murnau has become so 
obsessed with his opus that he hardly cares about anyone and appears as 
monstrous as the creature himself. 
The pacing is off in "Shadow of the Vampire" as the transitions between 
scenes seem choppy at best. This makes the overall film rather monotonous 
until Dafoe shows up, and he brings the film out of its drunken stupor with 
his vibrantly alive performance. It is still not enough as the visual style 
of the film seems unimaginative with grainy colors and several darkly lit 
scenes. Some of the black-and-white scenes of the actual filming of the 
film-within-the-film are wonderful yet brief. 
As written by newcomer Steven Katz, "Shadow of the Vampire" has scant 
evidence of insight into Murnau's crew members and Murnau's private life - we 
just see that he is a morphine addict who envisions cinema as "everlasting 
life." Malkovich mostly yells  but there is not much more to his performance 
(his intoxicatingly emotional final scene is exceptionally well done). It 
also doesn't help that the film makes a case for the similarity between 
vampires and filmmakers - they are out to sell their souls to bring life into 
their own encapsulated world, or as Murnau exclaims, "It does not exist 
unless it is in the lens." I just don't see the overall connection as being 
fully realized as it should have been. 
The rest of the cast is perfunctory at best. Eddie Izzard as the Jonathan 
Harker character barely has much screen time and mysteriously disappears from 
the film. Catherine McCormack has a few breathtaking moments as Greta and we 
understand that her character chooses the theatre over cinema, but that is 
it. Cary Elwes is unmemorable as the substitute cinematographer (he also 
appeared in Coppola's "Dracula"), and Udo Kier (a former Warhol regular) 
merely glides by the screen as the financially obsessed producer. Kier does 
have a funny scene where he describes having once seen someone pull ectoplasm 
out of their mouth. 
That leaves Dafoe who gives a tour-de-force performance as the enigmatic 
Schreck. He gyrates, frowns, smiles, has arch-like eyebrows, long 
fingernails, and a general frailty that lends sympathy to the "rat-like 
bastard," as Murnau excitedly claims while shooting a scene. Dafoe projects 
such a chilling, eerie demeanor that you can't help but be both frightened 
and fascinated by him. It is such a superb performance that one must see it 
just to believe it. The film, though, is a mere shadowy reflection of what 
made "Nosferatu" the silent classic it is today.  
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Steal This Movie (2000)
I do not know much about Abbie Hoffman or his Yippie days back in the 
counterculture era of the 1960's but I know they must have been far more 
troubling and chaotic than the simplistic treatment provided in this film. If 
it were not for two key performances by Vincent D'Onofrio and Janeane 
Garofalo, I would have dismissed "Steal this Movie" as a foolhardy and empty 
film biography. 
D'Onofrio is Abbie Hoffman, the imaginative, creative political force of the 
60's who began as a civil rights activist in the South and worked his way 
into the anti-war movement, with particular attention paid to the Vietnam War 
and his staunch defense against it displayed in front of the Washington 
Monument. He made headlines for conjuring up absurd events such as the 
levitation of the Pentagon or his throwing dollar bills at New York Stock 
Exchange workers. It was performance theatre designed to provoke a response 
in the population about America's capitalist system. 
None of this would mean much unless we saw the man behind the imagination. 
Hoffman robs a bus in ridiculous Western attire and meets Anita (Janeane 
Garofalo), who comes to his "Free Store" to get back her stolen jacket. She 
is intrigued and fascinated by him, and they eventually get married and have 
a son. However, J. Edgar Hoover and Richard Nixon are after Hoffman and 
invade his privacy with FBI surveillance. It gets so hot that Hoffman leaves 
his family and goes underground, finally giving an interview in the late 
1970's and exhibiting a bipolar disorder. He also meets and falls in love 
with Johanna Lawrenson (Jeanne Tripplehorn), and Anita eventually grows to 
accept the double life Abbie has lead. 
"Steal This Movie" has a fragmented narrative and visual style, thanks to the 
tired cliche of the reporter interviewing the subject about his past 
victories and losses. This cliche began with "Citizen Kane" and has been used 
in everything from "Lenny" to "Chaplin" and beyond. It may allow for some 
experimentation with narrative but it can also give the idea that we are 
merely watching glimpses of the biographical subject without getting too 
close. That is what happens with "Steal This Movie," which glides from one 
event to the other giving it a disconnected flow - it is like watching a 
"Biography" segment complete with badly used, pseudo voice-overs from Nixon 
and Hoover.  
D'Onofrio is a revelation as he gives a beautifully modulated performance of 
extreme highs and lows, showcasing Hoffman's improvisational delivery in 
nearly everything he does yet also showing a man living in paranoia and fear 
about his family, friends and foes and his insular life. Janeane Garofalo 
also gets a chance to develop an empathetic and compassionate side to Anita, 
who also has her doubts about Hoffman's other lover and his insularity yet 
she deeply loves him. 
"Steal This Movie" is nothing extraordinary and the film limits Hoffman's 
struggle and paranoia to that of a mere outcast, a shadow of the man who made 
people listen to his view on the world. Still, the 60's scene is thrillingly 
depicted (complete with typical tunes in the soundtrack) and there are shades 
throughout of Oliver Stone's "Born on the Fourth of July" in its view of how 
of the young revolutionaries were not always taken seriously by the 
conservatives. The only difference is that everyone paid attention to Abbie 
Hoffman. 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Gothic (1986)
Ken Russell's "Gothic" is one of the crudest, most excessively
overwrought, unimaginably worst films ever made - a travesty of the
memory of Percy Shelley, Mary Shelley, Lord Byron and anyone else
involved in that hallucinatory evening back in the summer of the early
1800's. Yes, the film purports to be about that evening but I am sure
it was a lot classier and civilized than Russell's version of it.
Not to say that it was not a sexual, druggy romp for all involved, as
I am sure it was, but this often looks like wild outtakes from
"Woodstock" crossed with "Caligula." Natasha Richardson is the
tranquil Mary Shelley, Julian Sands is the laudanum addict Percy
Shelley, and Gabriel Byrne is the laughably miscast, brutish, devilish
Lord Byron, in exile at the Villa Diodati where all the hanky-panky
takes place. Also on hand is the highly loony Dr. Polidori (Timothy
Spall) and Mary's stepsister (Miriam Cyr), who all indulge in
debauchery (free love as Percy calls it), and hallucinatory fever
dreams where reality and fiction sort of cross over. There are snakes
(a typical Russell visual), corpses, stillborn babies, hands
puncturing nails, abortions and lots of sex. The question is that in
all of Russell's mishmash of fiery, bloody images, when did Mary
creatively think of her idea for "Frankenstein" or Polidori think of
his "Vampyre" story? The film only shows the hallucinations b!  ut
precious little time is invested in any of the characters. They are
vapid, one-dimensional cartoons in Russell's universe, and the fact
that these literate minds read horror stories to each other during a
brutal thunderstorm is only barely hinted at. It's all fire and
brimstone played to the hilt, and likely to bore anyone to tears who
is not interested in a Heavy Metal music video with Thomas Dolby's
overused electronic score groping for our attention.
"Gothic" has the stylish look of a rock video but none of the
atmosphere or subtlety of a Universal horror flick. It sputters, spits
itself out in stylistic strokes and tries to thrill us with
nightmarish overkill, but it ultimately fails to enlighten. I admired
some of Russell's other visionary trips but "Gothic" is strictly
subterranean junk.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Gone with the Wind (1939)
"Gone With the Wind" is the grand, majestic love story of the last 60 years that has not dated in any respect. Yes, it's an old film from 1939 that had the stature of "Titanic" in its day (though far more adult than Cameron's film), but you are not likely to see a more potent example of cinema from that period. "Gone With The Wind" celebrated its 60th anniversary celebration last year and in cinemas during the summer of 1998, and it's been restored to its original, beautiful Technicolor treatment and presented in its square box format ratio. 
"Gone With The Wind" has one of the saddest love stories ever created for the movies, namely between the passionate, shrewd Scarlett O'Hara (Vivien Leigh) and the stalwart, charming alcoholic Rhett Butler (Clark Gable). Their topsy-turvy romance takes place in the red skies of sunlit Georgia during the Civil War. There is action, romance, jealousy, betrayal, and a sweeping four hour-plus screen time that even today pushes the limits of what audiences can take while sitting in a theatre. There is even an intermission so as to give the audience a chance to collect its thoughts. 
There is one superb classic scene after another. They include Scarlett's initial appearance slowly revealed by two courtly gentlemen (one of them played by George Reeves!); the moment when Scarlett sees Rhett for the first time; the silence between Olivia de Havilland and Vivien Leigh while they are waiting for their husbands to return; an elaborate high-angle crane shot of Scarlett standing by train tracks where hundreds of wounded soldiers are being nursed only to slowly reveal the Confederate flag; and, of course, the famous "Frankly, my dear, I don't give a damn" line uttered by Rhett during the conclusion. The burning of Atlanta is also quite vivid, not to mention the exquisite landscapes showing the mansion Tara - never has a mansion been such a vivid character as well. 
"Gone With The Wind" had a limited release two years ago (along with a restored version of "The Wizard of Oz," also from 1939) but if you ever have the opportunity to see one of the great, visually elegant films of all time on the big screen, then by all means go. It blows most of the current, bloated Hollywood offerings right out of the water. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Road Trip (2000)
Sex has become so mainstream in its explicitness that it has lost all its
mystery. 1999's "American Pie" proved that sex sells, particularly in teen sex
comedies. Today's teenagers need not worry about school or their prospective
futures. All they apparently think about is sex, and nothing else. Dating is a
thing of the past, just get down and dirty on the first date and worry about
relationships later (there was the phenomenon of date rape, still a possibility
but now it is mulled over in favor of getting down and dirty). "Road Trip" is
simply a sex comedy, and the emphasis is clearly sexual with comedic overtones.
Breckin Meyer, who has played his share of stoners, is the sweet, clean-cut guy
named Josh this time. Gasp! He now attends a university in Ithaca where he is
failing a course that could get him in serious academic trouble. But a passing
grade is the least of his worries - he is too wrapped in a long-distance
relationship. His childhood sweetheart is attending the University of Austin and
Josh misses her greatly. What is Josh going to do, and how can he prevent
himself from meeting other sexy chicks, including the luscious Beth (Amy Smart)?
Needless to say, Josh and Beth end up between the sheets and record the event
with a trusty camcorder (You know it is the 21st century when all private
activities are recorded with a camcorder).  Josh is no longer sullen and
inhibited, though the taped event is now lost! Apparently, one of his buddies
mailed the wrong tape to Josh's girlfriend (initially, Josh just recorded a
taped message to her). Josh enlists the help of his buddies to go on a road trip
to Austin to prevent Tiffany from receiving the tape. Josh's buddies include
Kyle (DJ Qualls), a nerd who masturbates endlessly, Rubin (Paulo Costanzo), an
intellectual pot-smoker and E.L. (Seann William Scott), the pseudo-cool guy who
doesn't like the concept of learning. Together they endure one mishap after
another, including car explosions, hot babes, blind women, irate pistol-packing
fathers, an African-American fraternity, and more hot babes. 
"Road Trip" starts with the time-honored tradition of the road picture though we
barely get much of a glimpse of America - an 1,800 mile trip from Ithaca, New
York to Austin, Texas must have some locations of interest. No matter, this
movie is all about sex, sex and more sex - oh, and there is a package to
intercept. What we merely get in "Road Trip" is a host of comic situations. At
the sorority, Kyle gets his chance for a real romp in the hay with a sensual
BBW. E.L. and Josh go to a sperm clinic where E.L. receives unlikely
professional help. Rubin merely smokes weed and thinks too much to worry about
sex. Meanwhile, the buddy who decided to stay in Ithaca, Barry (Tom Green), an
eight-year resident of the university, spends his time trying to get a mouse
eaten by a snake. Considering Green's shenanigans of late, this whole subplot
should come as no surprise. 
"Road Trip" is fitfully funny and at times, surprisingly sweet-tempered. I like
the idea that the film does not aim for the gross-out gags of "American Pie" or
other teen flicks. Director Todd Phillips ("Hated: The G.G. Allin Story")
decides to cut back from the gross level, playing it safer than usual. This
results in numerous gags that often work, and some that are recycled from
"Ferris Bueller's Day Off" (the car bit is an obvious lift). The blind woman
scene works because she sees more than she lets on when confronted by E.L. The
restaurant scene is a let-down but some gags and situational humor work in spite
of themselves. I was surprised how much I laughed during the film, particularly
at Tom Green who serves as the film's narrator (his university tour guide scenes
are hilarious). The actors are all appealing and fun personalities to watch and
the humor never sinks lower than a toilet bowl. But I must ask again as I did
when I saw "American Pie" - do freshman college students have anything else on
their minds besides sex? Apparently not.
Footnote: The video camcorder incident is in question over authenticity. There
is a scene where Beth tapes an interview with Josh before getting hot and heavy
with him while the camera records the whole event. The camcorder used is a
digital Sony DV camera. In order to record anything, the camera must have a
mini-DV tape in it, otherwise recording is impossible (as with all camcorders).
It is clear that the DV camera is recording because the red light indicator is
on. Therefore, a mini-DV tape must be in the camera. Later on, Josh reluctantly
shows his buddies the taped event. Only the tape is now full-size, 1/2 inch VHS
tape. This can only mean that Josh either simultaneously recorded the event on
DV and VHS or dubbed the mini-DV tape to VHS. No actual scene shows this, and it
is also clear that Beth set the recording on for the camcorder only (despite it
being viewed on Josh's TV monitor). Since he shows his buddies the wrong tape,
one can assume that  the DV tape was mailed to Tiffany. Since a later scene
shows Tiffany viewing a VHS tape, then it is clear the filmmakers are unaware of
how DV cameras work, or Josh taped his interview on DV and then transferred it
to VHS so Tiffany could view it on her TV. Either way, a transitional scene is
missing. Oh, the details we video nuts must worry about.  
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Halloween (1978)
Just as the original "Psycho" sired the slasher genre, John Carpenter's
"Halloween" solidified the genre that became more shock for your buck than
genuine scares. Amazing that so few directors followed Carpenter's model -
atmosphere to spare and a chilling sense of doom that none of the sequels or
"Friday the 13th" films ever came close to capture. "Halloween" has its flaws,
but it is a superb scare show - a triumphant exercise in style that dictates
its substance.
"Halloween" begins with a young kid walking around the outside of his house,
looking for his sister. He grabs a mask and a kitchen knife, approaches his
sister's bedroom by walking up the stairs and finally stabs her. All this time,
Carpenter shows us what this kid does from his point-of-view - a very
subjective stance that comes from Hitchcock and, of course, the notorious
"Peeping Tom," which showed the killer filming his subjects as he killed them.
The kid is Michael Myers, who is admitted to a mental institution. Nearly a
decade later, Michael is still in a institution, and his psychiatrist, Dr. Sam
Loomis (Donald Pleasance), is checking on him obsessively, aware that he is
pure evil. During a rainy night, Michael escapes and drives away and now Loomis
is in hot pursuit of someone he calls "inhumanly patient." 
The story then shifts to October 31st, the celebrated day of Halloween, at the
calm, homely town of Haddonfield, Illinois. We see a teenage woman named Laurie
Strode (Jamie Lee Curtis) walking to school with a young kid who believes in
bogeymen. They make plans for the evening since Laurie will be babysitting him
(the title of the film was originally "The Babysitter Murders."). Then we meet
some of Laurie's friends, who are actively dating and dreaming of sexual
escapades, yet Laurie is the lonely, straight girl of the trio. There is the
brunette-haired Annie (Nancy Kyes), whose father (Leigh Brackett) is a local
cop, and Lynda (P.J. Soles), the ditzy blonde who ends every sentence with the
word "totally." They all make plans for the evening since Annie and Laurie are
babysitting, and Lynda wants to bring her boyfriend over at one house. And in
this town, terror awaits - Michael Myers is paying a visit to wreak havoc. 
"Halloween" is almost monochromatic in its look - the scenes during the day are
overcast and the nights are truly dark where silhouettes and shadows exist -
perfect time for Michael to attack (in one scene, Michael kills a dog and
offscreen, we hear it whimper). Carpenter uses the hand-held camera effectively
to build the tension by choosing to follow the subjective nature of its
characters. Examples of such moments are when Annie hears noises outside her
house as she prepares to do laundry, the car that comes to a screeching halt
when Annie shouts, "Speed kills," the discovery of the dead bodies by Laurie,
and so on. Subjectivity is especially well-handled when Laurie walks across the
street to the house where Lynda and Annie are supposedly, and this scene,
accompanied by Carpenter's famously eerie electronic score, is a hark back to
Vera Miles' similar walk to the Bates House in "Psycho." 
What is particularly arresting about "Halloween" is that the characters are not
killed immediately - Carpenter lets us observe these teenagers and who they
are. The long takes of Laurie, Annie and Lynda walking home from school show us
the daily activities and thoughts of teenage girls, oblivious to the unseen
terror about to take place. Laurie is not as oblivious, and conveniently sees
Michael Myers hiding in bushes, driving by, or standing by his car while she
looks from behind windows. Lots of subjective shots throughout, and the
suspense builds with a real pulse eschewing any of the gore or blood that would
have diminished its overall power. These tree-lined avenues of Middle America
hide something inexplicable and without emotion, and all Laurie can do is run
and cry when she finds that this killer is after her (in a way, Laurie's escape
from an unstoppable killer led the way to Linda Hamilton's escape from the
unstoppable Schwarzeneger in "The Terminator") There's a terrifying moment
where Laurie begs for help from a neighbor, and the neighbor observes and
closes her shades, thinking it is a Halloween prank.. "Oh, my God! Help,"
shouts the helpless Laurie. 
There is a stretch of Catholicism in "Halloween" emanating from its
semi-Production Code morals (though the Production Code was eliminated back in
the late 50's). The idea is that any teenager girl or boy who has sex or
lustful thoughts is killed by Michael Myers. Laurie is the only survivor
because she is still a virgin, though she may have lustful thoughts about a guy
in her class. "So. You do think about things like that, don't you Laurie," says
Annie at one point. The only thing Laurie does that may make her a member of
this triad is that she smokes marihuana, yet has more interest in chemistry and
studying than any of her friends do. Since this premarital sex-is-a-sin complex
began in "Halloween," it became a mode for all rip-offs to follow. You have
sex, and you will die, as indicated in the post-modern "Scream." 
Back in 1978, "Halloween" was made for a low-budget and went on to gross
millions of dollars making it the biggest independent film ever (initial
reviewers panned it until someone from Variety spoke highly of it).  It is a
superb motion picture, reveling in its atmospheric, nocturnal pull guaranteed
to give you some major shivers. Precisely, what makes this horror film so
central to the genre is acknowledging that it is what you don't see that can
kill you in the dark. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with questions, concerns or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at
Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Patriot, The (2000)
The Revolutionary War has barely made much of an impression in cinema
history, especially with the forgettable "Revolution" by director Hugh Hudson
that was a huge flop back in 1985. It only takes someone like Mel Gibson to
give the audience what they want: a feverish action picture using history as
an excuse for gangland warfare, which is what makes "The Patriot" a success.
No quill pens, no rousing speeches, only an abundant supply of blood and
guts. "The Patriot" is not much more but it has the potential to be more than
it is. 
Ponytailed Gibson plays the fictional Benjamin Martin (based on the real-life
"Swamp Fox" Francis Marion), a widowed father of seven kids living in South
Carolina during the turbulent times of 1776, just after the Revolutionary War
had started. Martin is opposed to the war, and is against his older son
(Heath Ledger) from joining to fight the fight, namely against the British
Redcoats. In one crucial scene, Gibson tells the people at a convention that
why fight a war where there is one tyrant thousands of miles away when there
are three hundred one mile away, or something to that effect. That scene
resonates strongly but is soon forgotten in the way of grisly, gory violence.
Martin faces an ordeal of his own when the redcoats come to his home where he
is caring for the wounded soldiers, and a sadistic, volatile British leader,
Colonel Tavington (Jason Issacs), murders one of Martin's sons and all the
wounded in cold blood. Now Martin is mad as hell, and is in full-killing mode
as he takes his family out of his home, now burned to the ground, and brings
his sons with rifles in hand to take out twenty redcoats. The scene is
intense and bloody as Martin, armed with a musket and a tomahawk, slices and
decapitates with nary a trace of respite - he is Mad Max bent on an unending
ode of vengeance. He also forms a militia, bent on destruction and murder all
in the name of freedom from the British.
"The Patriot" is a revenge tale,  as packed with thrills and action as one
can expect. Gibson does this kind of role perfectly, and he exudes the humor
and pathos of a warrior with a dark past as he did in "Braveheart." But I was
somewhat bothered by the characterization, notably when reference is made by
other members of the militia about Benjamin's days fighting the French and
Indian War (he finally explains all to his son about his beastly, brutal
methods). If Martin is such a ferocious, animalistic warrior, why is he so
opposed to the war? Sure, he does not want his sons to join but why is he so
unwilling to fight the fight? It only takes having one of his own family
members killed for Benjamin to change his mind, but the one brutal scene
where he tomahawks a redcoat repeatedly hints at other aspects of the
character that the writer, Robert Rodat, and the director, Roland Emmerich,
are unwilling to explore. There is a crucial line of dialogue, spoken in
voice-over at the beginning, that suggest more levels to Martin's
personality: "I have long feared that my sins would return to visit me." They
have, but "The Patriot" does not cut it as a character study, it is pure
action targeted to entice viewers, not to make them think about what war does
to men. A shame coming from Rodat who explored this theme ever so briefly
with "Saving Private Ryan." 
As an action picture, "The Patriot" delivers in more ways than one. The
performances also hit the right notes, including Tom Wilkinson as Lord
General Cornwallis, who leads the British troops in the South - his battle
strategies have always been exceptional but he has underestimated Martin's
militia. I also like Heath Ledger, a strong young actor who holds his own
with Gibson and does a fine job playing his son. There is also a nice
throwaway role by Rene Auberjonois as the courageous pastor who joins the
militia (as pastors did in those days) - if only there was more screen time
devoted to him. The rest of the militia are depicted as stereotypical
one-dimensional grunts. And Tavington, as played by Issacs, is so
unredeemingly evil that I only wish some hint of humanity was placed there.
He is also given the benefit of the old "the killer is never really dead"
syndrome. Please, those idiotic syndromes have no place in cinema anymore,
especially an ambitious action picture like this one. 
"The Patriot" is fine entertainment, dazzling, humorous and exciting (watch
out for that cannonball that aims directly at the audience at one point).
There is an instant visceral charge to it, but there is no intellectual
weight, and no true moral resonance. In its fervent patriotic spirit, it says
that it was the right thing to fight the war and to die for your country to
acquire independence. It just doesn't tell us why. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Happiness (1998)
"Happiness" is one of the richest, darkly complex, and ironically funniest
portraits of American life since "Short Cuts." It is tinged with irony, deadpan
humor, and some severely unpleasant subject matter, though always treated in a
respectful, artful manner by a promising writer-director, Todd Solondz. Solondz
previously directed "Welcome to the Dollhouse," a provocative statement about
growing up in Jersey, but who would have thought he would helm a multi-layered,
disturbing portrait of Jersey like this one.
The film begins with a date at a restaurant. The curly-haired brunette Joy (Jane
Adams) is sitting at a table with a man (John Lovitz) whom she has just dumped.
He questions her, trying to discover why the relationship is over. He shows her
an engraved ashtray, and tells her it's for the person who will love him for who
he is. 
Afterwards, we meet the orange-haired Allen (the great Philip Seymour Hoffman),
a guy who masturbates on the phone while arbitrarily picking names off the phone
book and asking the women what they are wearing. Not only does he stalk people
on the phone at home, but also at his office where he works. When he confesses
his explicit sexual fantasies to a therapist, Bill (Dylan Baker), we recognize
boredom is settling on the therapist's face. We hear his thoughts in voice-over.
We see a strange dream where he kills everyone in a playground with a machine
gun. Then he masturbates while looking at teen magazines, and we realize his
true nature: he's a pedophile.
Then we are introduced to Joy's sisters, which include Trish (Cynthia
Stevenson), a bland, perfect housewife unaware of her husband's (Bill's)
clandestine sexual nature, and Helen (Lara Flynn Boyle), a poet who writes about
rapes, and finds that New Jersey is the ideal place to live to prove you're not
a showy writer. 
There is also Joy's unhappy parents, Lenny (Ben Gazzara) and Mona (Louise
Lasser, a long way from "Bananas"). Lenny wants out of the marriage so he can
live his life, yet Mona understandably thinks that it is because of her and that
she's too fat and needs a facelift. When Mona asks for advice from a real-estate
dealer (amusingly played by Marla Maples) about her marriage, the dealer
responds: "Divorce is the best thing that ever happened to me." 
Joy needs and wants love desperately, but doesn't know what love is. Her sisters
berate her about their perfect, exciting lives yet she feels cast out of the
family. When not being sexually harassed on the phone (by Allen), she confides
in a thick-accented Russian taxi driver (Jared Harris), who has sex with her and
patiently listens to one of her guitar-playing songs. Of course, he turns out to
be a thief, and is married! 
Everyone in "Happiness" has difficulty adapting to their lifestyles, and they
are all inadequate about their loved ones. Interestingly, they all feel a brink
of happiness when they are alone. Allen lives by himself in a bland apartment
and is giddy when making anonymous calls; Joy feels better when playing the
guitar to herself; Lenny can't bring himself to have an affair and chooses to be
left alone; and Bill wants to be left alone with his son's male friends by
drugging everyone with sleeping pills. Only a secondary character named Kristina
(Camryn Manheim), Allen's neighbor, needs solace when she admits her own secrets
to Allen. 
"Happiness" is an exemplary combination of flawless writing, directing and
acting. It is shrewdly written by Solondz, and he never makes it easy for the
audience when he wavers between drama and comedy with unusual results. At times,
you don't know whether to laugh, cringe, or both. The most obvious example is
when Bill admits his secret sexual desires to his son - it is so painful to
watch that we are not sure how to respond to it. This is true of Kristina's
secret, which causes one to laugh because it is so unexpected.
The performances are so adeptly attuned to the material that you can't separate
one actor from the other - they fit the roles perfectly. One lasting impression
is left by character actor Dylan Baker (who should be remembered at Oscar time)
as the disturbed pedophile. His face is so haunting and etched with so much pain
that he becomes unforgettable - he also brings a sense of humanity to Bill that
makes it harder to judge him as a person. He tries, in one scene, to tell his
wife that he is sick, yet he can't help his nature. 
Solondz has not crafted an exploitative fantasy where the freaks are on display
for everyone to identify - a modern-day Jerry Springer-like movie where the
audience can boo the loveless characters off the screen. Instead, he addresses
these characters as normal, everyday people facing their own crisis, their own
lack of understanding, and their own inability to love. He looks at everyone
with a sympathetic eye, including the pedophile, and cuts deeply into our
consciousness about our human needs. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Bride of Chucky (1998)
"Bride of Chucky" is another one of those guilty pleasures - you know, a movie
that you're ashamed for having liked because everyone else hates it. This
latest sequel is campy, dumb, unscary, but always teeming with a
tongue-in-cheek attitude that is refreshing to watch in these days of
homogenized horror movies. 
This time, Chucky (voiced by the ever-reliable Brad Dourif) is assembled out of
broken doll parts by his girlfriend Meg (the big-breasted Jennifer Tilly). She
reads a book called "Voodoo for Dummies" and presto, Chucky is back with
several scars running through his once cute Good Guys Doll appearance. No
matter, he's back in business and kills Meg and then transfers her spirit into
a female doll named Tiffany! Why? I wish I knew, but this isn't the kind of
movie that thrives on logic. 
The plot has to do with two teenagers in love who run away to Niagara Falls to
get married for two reasons - to escape the girl's domineering father (John
Ritter), the Chief of Police of a small town; and because her beau is about to
collect a reward at a New Jersey cemetery (!) by bringing two dolls courtesy of
Meg. Guess who the two dolls are? 
"Bride of Chucky" is certainly original and miles ahead of the last two Chucky
fests, which helped destroy the horror genre before "Scream" came along. This
is due partly to series creator and writer Don Mancini, who brings a level of
wit and satire to the proceedings. The dialogue is chock full of references to
"Natural Born Killers," Martha Stewart, "Boogie Nights," "Bride of
Frankenstein," and several infamous horror icons. 
The performances are crude but always riotous, including scene-stealing
Jennifer Tilly and her whiny voice that carries the day, and a Marilyn Manson
look alike that is hilariously played by Alexis Arquette. Brad Dourif's
high-pitched laugh and various asides redeem what could have been schlocky
junk. The teenagers are throwaway roles that could have been slipped in by any
number of anonymous teenage actors from the "Dawson's Creek" variety. 
"Bride of Chucky" is campy, outrageous fun that keeps moving at a fast clip and
is the latest in a string of postmodernist takes on horror movies. Now, if they
would only bring back the horror...
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com

Title
Review for Me, Myself & Irene (2000)
Jim Carrey can be as funny as anyone on screen with the right screenplay and 
the right director. He also proved to be humane and soulful in films such as 
"The Truman Show" and "Man on the Moon." The Farrely Brothers proved their 
comic worth in Carrey's "Dumb and Dumber" and the obscenely hilarious 
"There's Something About Mary." Both Carrey and the Farrelys reunite in one 
obscenely unfunny and desperate film called "Me, Myself and Irene," which has 
a great comic premise that is hardly milked for all its worth. 
Carrey plays a Rhode Island police officer named Charlie who is seen as a 
joke in his community. His wife has left him with three black kids, fathered 
by a snipy, black limousine driver who happens to be a Mensa member! They run 
off together while Charlie is left to raise the kids. Years pass and the 
community sees him less as an authority figure and more as a hapless fool. 
But Charlie is repressing his rage at people and it finally comes out in the 
form of Hank, complete with an attitude and a Clint Eastwood accent. Now the 
little girl who plays hopscotch on the street despite Charlie's warnings is 
practically drowned by Hank! Not funny. The woman who buys a vaginal product 
at the supermarket and walks ahead of Charlie on line with tons of groceries 
is now embarrased by Hank who gives a full description of the product on the 
speaker system. Not funny. 
Still, give the Farrelys credit for trying since I thought that eventually 
the film would find its comic rhythm and exploit the schizophrenic angle of 
Charlie. Not so. We are left with a plot involving Rene Zellweger as a woman 
on the run from some crooked cops and a crooked ex-boyfriend involving golf 
clubs and some other assorted business, none of which merits as much as a 
chuckle. Then there is some more business involving an albino waiter who may 
be a family murderer and tags along with Charlie and the girl, but again, no 
major laughs to be found. So what we are left with are countless sexually 
scatalogical jokes involving dildos, an actually funny scene involving a cow, 
a scene involving a chicken placed in an unlikely orifice, and so on. When a 
nearly dead cow gets the only major laugh in a Jim Carrey movie, you know you 
are in trouble. 
I never liked "Ace Ventura" but I've admired Carrey in it, as I have in most 
of his films including the often riotous "Dumb and Dumber." For the first 
tim, however, I actually found Carrey excruciatingly boring in this film, 
exuding little of his genuine comic talent or gift for mimicry. In fact, I am 
also a firm believer that Carrey can act and he has a mental breakdown scene 
that is relatively touching to watch. Outside of that, if the Farrelys paid 
more attention to Charlie's character than Hank's and if they made Zellweger 
exploit her comic zest (shown to far greater effect in "Nurse Betty"), then 
this might have been a real winner. Instead, it is the Farrelys merely 
coasting on sexual jokes and innuendoes galore with Carrey merely playing 
with a dildo or himself. Embarrasing is the word. 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
Faust667@aol.com or at jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Killer's Kiss (1955)
Stanley Kubrick's first foray into film noir, "Killer's Kiss," is acceptable 
and often crude but certainly an interesting experiment for the late master. 
Released in 1955, it did not cause much of a stir but it has an almost 
dreamlike vision of noir in its documentary-like staginess. 
The film begins with voice-over narration by a Davy Gordon (Jamie Smith), a 
lonely New York boxer who seems rather unenthusiastic about his profession. 
Essentially, he seems tired of fighting, living an isolated existence in a 
low-rent, bland apartment. He is ready to leave for the farmlands of Seattle 
with his Uncle George. Across from his bedroom, he can see his neighbor 
Gloria (Irene Kane), a hostess for Pleasureland, a shabby dance hall that 
only seems to play the instrumental song "Once." Gloria's boss is Vincent 
Rapallo (Frank Silvera), a beastly, sad man who is also lonely and insecure. 
He sees himself as "low and worthless," and is unable to hold on to to the 
things he loves, including Gloria. 
One night, a scream is heard in Gloria's apartment, and Davy comes to the 
rescue. She was apparently attacked by Vincent, whom she wants out of her 
life. Naturally, Davy and Gloria get intimate and fall in love (rather 
abruptly, even for a noir tale like this one). Gloria wants to leave Rapallo 
and the dance hall but Rapallo's rage and jealousy grow stronger, resulting 
in an accidental murder and the kidnapping of Gloria. 
This kind of tale has been told countless times before, and if you have seen 
"Double Indemnity," you'll have some idea of where the story is headed. 
Fortunately, Kubrick is a master stylist and employs effective use of 
shadows, and his screenplay evokes ironic twists of fate. The accidental 
murder is one brilliantly shot example where two henchmen walk through the 
inside staircase of the Pleasureland dance hall, ready to kill the man 
waiting outside the door while the sign "Watch Your Step" is seen overhead. 
There is also the voyeuristic use of mirrors, particularly Davy's apartment 
where the reflection in his mirror shows Gloria's nocturnal activities of 
undressing before her bedroom light is turned off. For Kubrick to show the 
drab surroundings of these three lead characters, including Rappalo, makes 
quite a statement about the post-war 1950's where farmlands were a dream to 
be pursued in lieu of the big city life. 
"Killer's Kiss" is often awkwardly edited, with the exception of the climax 
set on the rooftops of loft buildings, and a room full of mannequins. But 
there are also some terrific visceral moments backed by a tense jazz score, 
often the counterpoint of any scene involving the Pleasureland setting. One 
scene, quite avante-garde for its time, is shot as a negative, leading to the 
aforementioned attack on Gloria.
Jamie Smith and Irene Kane are somewhat weak in their acting skills, but the 
two argument scenes between Irene and Silvera are marvelously dramatic and 
ironically funny. My favorite line is when Silvera says: "Like the man says, 
can happiness buy money?" Her response is: "Oh, and you are a comedian too. 
See what I am missing." There is no question that the best performance is by 
Silvera as Rapallo, showing a side of pathetic weakness crossed with rage and 
contempt for his persona. When Gloria refers to him as "an old man who smells 
bad," you can almost feel his temperature rising. 
If nothing else, at a breezy 67 minutes, "Killer's Kiss" is required viewing 
for anyone who is a Kubrick fan or interested in film noir. It is heavily 
flawed but often entertaining enough to warrant a viewing. It became the 
stepping stone to Kubrick's greatness as seen in the far superior "The 
Killing" (released the following year) and, well, the rest is history.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
Faust667@aol.com or at jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Nightmare on Elm Street 5: The Dream Child, A (1989)
Just when Alice thought that she had destroyed Freddy Krueger forever (in one of his best screen deaths ever), Mr. Pizza Face comes back with a vengeance. "Nightmare on Elm Street 5: The Dream Child" is a weak, patched-together effort by director Stephen Hopkins, but it is also the most interesting of the Elm Street efforts. 
The powerful protagonist who gave Freddy a good fight in "The Dream Master," Alice (played by Lisa Wilcox), is now graduating from high school. She is dealing with a typical reality in any teenage girl's life: she's pregnant by her boyfriend, Danny (Danny Hassel). Of course, she doesn't realize this until she unsuspectingly resurrects Freddy by dreaming of his mother being raped by a thousand mental patients (including one played by Robert Englund!). In one heart stopping moment, we see the burned Freddy fetus emerging from his mother's bloody womb, proclaiming in typical jokey fashion, "It's a boy!" 
The rest of the movie consists of Alice fending off Freddy's invasion of her unborn baby, and there are some brief, hilarious nightmares involving three of Alice's friends. The best one involves a comic book artist who enters one of his own comic book worlds, where he fights Super Freddy!
Despite its flaws and its apparent rushed, disorganized look, "A Nightmare on Elm Street 5" does concern itself with certain teenage problems, such as pregnancy and abortion - unusual for what's essentially a slasher film. There is also a lot less of the jocose Freddy, and more of a nicely modulated performance by Lisa Wilcox; she restores whatever dignity the series warrants. "A Nightmare on Elm Street 5" is mediocre in many ways, but it is has some fun and thrilling moments. There are some bizarre, Lynchian special-effects.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for From Dusk Till Dawn (1996)
After Tarantino's post-"Pulp Fiction" success in 1994, his future remained 
questionable. Here was a man who reinvented and rewrote the rules of gangster 
flicks forever - in retrospect, not so new were his rules or inventions as 
much as the energy he brought to them - and the question remained if he ever 
could top his crowning "Pulp" jewel. Tarantino didn't try to prove anything 
as he largely acted in some rotten films like "Destiny Turns on the Radio" 
and his own horrendous short film in a collection of bad ones called "Four 
Rooms." It wasn't until 1997 that Tarantino showed why he was a success in 
the first place. It was not the gore or violence as much as his sharp, clever 
writing and the introduction of the gangster as an ironic antihero. "From 
Dusk Till Dawn" was an early script by Quentin from long before "Reservoir 
Dogs," and it is actually two movies rolled into one. It is a silly, jagged 
and overlong pulp carnival that at times is entertaining and funny. From 
behind the cameras is Robert Rodriguez of "Desperado" fame, and you can 
clearly see where Tarantino's movie ends and Rodriguez's begins. 
The opening scene is reminiscent of "Natural Born Killers" with George 
Clooney and Quentin Tarantino playing two brothers, Seth and Richard Gecko, 
who rob a convenience store and murder the owner and the police officer all 
in the space of less than ten minutes of screen time. The two antiheroes are 
two bumbling thieves wearing black suits with no particular direction in life 
other than robbing convenience stores. Seth is the calm, resourceful crook 
whereas Richard is a stupid, raging psychopath. 
After the murderous robbery, the pair take a hostage from an earlier bank 
robbery to a run-down motel. Richard disposes of the hostage, and the twosome 
end up kidnapping a grizzled preacher, Jacob Fuller (Harvey Keitel), and his 
two kids, the teenage Kate (Juliette Lewis) and her adopted Chinese brother, 
Scott (Ernest Liu). Seth needs them as bait to cross the border to Mexico 
where he's supposed to rendezvous with his employer. At this point, the movie 
takes on an odd route and becomes a cartoonish "Evil Dead" flick when the 
incongruous group go to a bar named the Titty Twister run by vicious, 
grotesque, constantly morphing vampires! This is where the over-the-top 
histrionics of Rodriguez begins. 
As enjoyable as "From Dusk Till Dawn" frequently is, it is disappointing. The 
first half of the film is terrific stuff, mixing in laughs, tension and 
surprises with ease, and all superbly written by Quentin Tarantino. Once the 
movie settles in for the horror aspect, it becomes slightly repetitive and 
mindless. The movie spends an eternity showing our heroes and anti-heroes 
shoving stakes into vampires' hearts, as well as chopping off their heads and 
limbs with an arsenal that includes chairs, beer glasses, crossbows and 
crosses. There is so much vampiric carnage that Rodriguez doesn't allow much 
room for Tarantino's trademark wordplay and that is a shame. 
There are, however, some hilarious performances and understated acting to 
compensate. There's the 70's blaxploitation star Fred Williamson as a Vietnam 
Vet; Tom Savini (former make-up artist of "Dawn of the Dead" fame) as a 
leather-jacketed punk named Sex Machine; and Cheech Marin in three roles - 
the best is as the Titty Twister host who invites all the truckers and bikers 
to join in the fun of watching the sexy strippers do their snake striptease 
dances!
George Clooney made a successful transition here from television's "E.R." to 
the big screen, as evidenced by some of his later work post-"Batman and 
Robin." Here he projects a calm, relaxed personality as Seth, and makes a 
convincing, charismatic action star. Surprisingly, Tarantino does his best 
work here as the psychopathic, horny Richard who has the hots for Kate, the 
preacher's daughter. Harvey Keitel brings a level of humanity and quiet 
authority as the preacher who has lost his faith since his wife died in a car 
crash. Juliette Lewis is at her most restrained here and brings a sensual, 
sweetly innocent side that makes us care for her amidst all the flying 
vampire body parts. 
In short, "From Dusk Till Dawn" is a rollercoaster ride of thrills and laughs 
that throws in everything from bits of "Pulp Fiction" and the Indiana Jones 
series to all those grade Z zombie/vampire thrillers. The special-effects are 
enthralling yet exhausting, and Rodriguez has still not learned what balanced 
rhythm is. With some spectacularly edited sequences and better-than-average 
performances, this is junky, fast-paced filmmaking at its best. Now if only 
Tarantino would direct his own screenplays more often. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
Faust668@aol.com or at faustus_08520@yahoo.com

Title
Review for Goodbye Lover (1999)
Roger Ebert devised a term for film noir that is jokey, sanitized and lacking
that air of desperation so central to the genre. He called it "deadpan noir",
which is precisely what "Destiny Turns on the Radio" was, and what Rolland
Joffe's execrable new film "Goodbye, Lover" is. It is so groundless and putrid
that you'll leave the theater in disgust for all the wrong reasons. 
Patricia Arquette stars as Sandra, a real-estate dealer who is having an affair
with a PR executive (Don Johnson), who is also an organist at the local church.
Their frequent trysts occur at the houses she plans to sell to prospective
buyers. 
Johnson wants to quit the affair, though, because Sandra's alcoholic husband
(the always unconvincing Dermot Mulroney) is suspicious and poised to kill her
lover. What makes things even worse is that the two men involved are brothers.
And Johnson, you see, is beginning an affair with his secretary, the underused
Mary-Louise Parker. Yes, I could feel the puzzle pieces of noir start to fit
neatly with aplomb and true danger. And it is around this time that the movie
comes tumbling down like the Berlin Wall. 
Without giving too much of the plot away, I can safely add that the movie's
twists and turns are predictable to the core, and that the motive behind a
murder in the film is so that the protagonists can collect a tidy insurance
settlement. We have heard that plot idea before - it goes back as far as the
classic Double Indemnity, along with a million other films. But "Goodbye,
Lover" does a curious thing - it becomes a sitcomish noir tale. 
In other words, the perilous machinations of noir becomes a set-up for an
elongated joke, a put-on, especially when Ellen DeGeneres turns up as a cynical
detective. Her comic timing is flawless and she is fun to watch...but what is
she doing in this movie? It seems as if we are in the latest "Ellen" episode
with a colorful cast of characters behaving like buffoons. 
"Goodbye, Lover" is an unredeeming piece of junk with no trace of humanity or
purpose. Arquette hardly dazzles as a siren with a fetish for "The Sound of
Music," unlike the alluring quality she displays in the underrated "Lost
Highway." Only Johnson seems to invest some interest and charisma in his
shopworn role, but it is short-lived. Roland Joffe's direction is surefooted,
but all the superb camerawork and canted angles can't do justice to an absurdly
uneven, rottenly scripted film. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with questions, concerns or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at
Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Joy Ride (2001/I)
I walked out of "Joyride" a little dazed and unsure of what I had just seen. My
uncertainty was because I thought I had seen a great film but in reality, upon
closer inspection, "Joyride" is not great but it is a damn good scary ride. 
"Joyride" begins with Lewis Thomas (Paul Walker) at college talking to his best
friend Venna (Leelee Sobieski) on the phone. He plans to pick her up at Colorado
and take her to back on a trip to New Jersey. On the way, Louis hears that his
brother, Fuller (Steve Zahn), has been arrested for being drunk and disorderly
in Utah. Louis picks him up on his detour and then proceeds to pick up Venna.
Before you can say "Road Trip," Fuller decides to buy a CB radio for forty
dollars ("a prehistoric Internet"). Before arriving in Colorado, they play
around with the CB and find one trucker on their frequency by the name of Rusty
Nail. Fuller convinces Louis to play a prank and pretend to be a woman named
"Candy Cane" and to meet Rusty Nail at a motel. Big mistakes are always made but
that is one mistake that should not have been made. Let's say all hell breaks
loose once they get to the motel as this truck driver turns out to be a raging
psychopath with a road rage complex. 
There is nothing astounding or inspring about "Joyride" but it does have great
intensity. As directed by John Dahl ("Red Rock West"), it is so intense that you
will often be left gasping for air. It also helps that three terrific actors
have been cast who are likable enough to keep us scared for them. Paul Walker
("Pleasantville") is both sympathetic and innocuous as Lewis, a kid that looks
like a jock who wishes he were somewhere else. Steve Zahn is simply a great
comic live wire as Lewis's jailbird brother, completely funny and convincingly
scared throughout. He has one great moment where he saves Venna from some
rednecks in a bar by pretending to be as manly as possible. Kudos must also go
to Leelee Sobieski's thankless role as Venna where she has enough serene beauty
to keep her watchable in all the chaos. She has one great line when she
discovers who is chasing them: "I am not going to be scared of a radio."
As for the killer Rusty Nail, well, we never actually see him - only hear his
menacing, malicious voice. Someone said that it reminded them too much of the
killer's phone voice from "Scream." But this is not a clever pun on slasher
flicks - "Joyride" puts "Scream" and most other thrillers of late to shame. It
is a latter-day update on "Duel" and it keeps you on edge and makes you bounce
and scream. In other words, a real thriller that thrills and intensifies the
nerves. Don't say I didn't warn you.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Moulin Rouge! (2001)
The beauty, flash, energy and movement of "Moulin Rouge" is astounding. It is not just a film, it is a kinetic, visual barrage of richly colored images and upbeat music that thrill and dazzle the mind and enrich the heart. It is also the most tantalizing love story of the year by far. 
Ewan McGregor is Christian, a young writer who holds certain ideals in mind, namely the pursuit of "truth, beauty, and love." As soon as he arrives in Paris, he is thrown into the world of the Moulin Rouge, which holds all his ideals and more. The Moulin Rouge shown in this film is less the actual nightclub of 1900 and  more like a sinful, panoramic display of decadence gone wild. It is so wild and hyperkinetic that director Baz Luhrmann makes us feel we are inside a demented madhouse where anything can happen - we feel we are at the Moulin Rouge firsthand enjoying the party of our lives. 
Before embarking at the Moulin Rouge, Christian is introduced to the dwarf artist Toulouse-Lautrec (John Leguizamo) who lives above Christian's tenement. Lautrec comes crashing through Christian's roof one day and, after some initial patter, discovers he can use Christian's creative mindset for a show called "Spectacular Spectacular." The show could prove fruitful for the Moulin Rouge and for introducing the star dancer Satine (Nicole Kidman) - as well as provide income for Lautrec and his merry band of artists and dancers.  In order to get backing, they must persuade the snooty Duke of Worcester (Richard Roxburgh) to finance it. In one startlingly funny scene, the group improvise the entire show to the Duke - a sort of rambunctious version of a Hollywood pitch meeting. The Duke is overwhelmed and yet sold to the idea. There is only one hitch - the Duke must also have Satine as his bed mate and possible wife.  
The character of Satine is the one that shines the most in "Moulin Rouge." She is a prostitute and flashy dancer but underneath her exterior lies a deathly ill woman whose heart sings whenever she sees Christian. Christian adores Satine and is inspired by her. Satine is pleased by the attention and loves Christian but she is also aware of her duties, to please the sneering Duke who is after all financing the play. One character in the film even sings the famous phrase, "And the show must go on." 
"Moulin Rouge" has an old-fashioned romance that is as old as the Ten Commandments. Writer seeks and receives inspiration from prostitute who has a heart of gold. My, my, what an innovative idea! The difference is in the execution. Ewan McGregor and Nicole Kidman set the night sky sparkling with fireworks thanks to their charisma and credible romantic longing. All it takes is for McGregor to sing "All You Need is Love" against a starry nightscape and you know he sincerely means every word he utters. 
Nicole Kidman continues to surprise me in every film she is in. From her cold-hearted murderess in Gus Van Sant's "To Die For" to her heartfelt performance in Stanley Kubrick's "Eyes Wide Shut," Kidman breathes life on screen with her radiance, beauty and intelligence. In many ways, she is as enigmatic as the late Greta Garbo, and her Satine masks her pain as well as her happiness. Kidman is the rare actress who makes you stare at her, as watchable as anyone else right now, and she had me swooning long after the film was over. 
The film itself throws all kinds of visual razzle-dazzle pyrotechnics at us, including a constantly roving camera, very fast, precise cutting, lots of dancing, vibrant Technicolor colors, bodies swarming the compositions in such a way as to make Merce Cunningham blush, and so on. "Moulin Rouge" is not just a film, it is the "Natural Born Killers" of musicals - frenzied and high-pitched as hell. Director Luhrman is practically teasing you, testing your stamina while you watch the fantastic, rapid images unfold on screen. Boredom is not an expected reaction while watching this Moulin Rouge kick. There is even a justifiably trippy montage where the dance group take some absinthe and start to see images of multiple fairies singing and dancing. There is also a bravura tango number using Sting's "Roxanne" that is as marvelous and powerful a production number as any I've seen of late. And, if that is not enough, Madonna's "Like a Virgin" is used ever so briefly to comedic effect.
Despite the cartoonish casting of Richard Roxburgh as the Duke and a few lulls towards the end, "Moulin Rouge" is a fascinating, exhilarating, exhausting and vastly entertaining kaleidoscope of the famous nightclub itself. It's a postmodern pop musical guaranteed to leave you in a giddy high after it is all over.        
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at Faust668@aol.com or at faustus_08520@yahoo.com

Title
Review for Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)
I confess I have not see the original "Austin Powers" film and after seeing
this monotonous, joyless sequel, I can't say I am overjoyed at the prospect.
That is not to say that this is a bad film - there are moments of great black
humor - but it is too long, disjointed, gross, and silly to make me want to get
involved in any future Austin Powers adventures.
The film starts off well with hairy-chested, 60's reject Austin (Mike Myers)
having a romp in the hay with a beautiful Elizabeth Hurley. It turns out she is
a Fem-Robot and fires bullets from her nipples!!! Then we are treated to a
hysterical, off-the-wall dance number with Austin's derriere serving as the
butt of jokes, no pun intended. Then there is the mysterious Dr. Evil (Mike
Myers, again) who is soft-spoken and fights with a Klu-Klux Klan member at a
Jerry Springer show. His dastardly plans are to go back in time to the 1960's
and steal Austin's mojo - his forceful sexual prowess in liquid form! Why Dr.
Evil wants it, and plans on destroying Washington, D.C. with a death ray from a
"Death Star," I am not sure.    
Austin's shenanigans with the beautiful and sexy spy Felicity Shagwell (Heather
Graham) make up for some of the film's dead spots. There is an uncomfortably
unfunny Scottish henchman named Fat Bastard (an unrecognizable Mike Myers) who
smells and humps and thumps like a Tyrannosaurus Rex. The joke involving his
feces is as grossly underimagined as you might think, but this character
quickly grows tiresome and has none of the spark of Myer's Scottish father in
the underrated "So I Married an Axe Murderer." 
Heather Graham seems to have been on a slump since her success with "Boogie
Nights," and here she is bland and seemingly unfit for the crazy universe she
is in. She looks bored each time she shares a scene with Austin. When Graham
dulls my senses in a movie, you know you are in cinematic trouble. 
"Austin Powers" works best when Dr. Evil appears and his counterpart, Mini-Me,
and thus I enjoyed their conference scenes. I also liked Seth Green as Dr.
Evil's spoiled son, and it is a pleasure to see a cameo of Tim Robbins as the
President of the United States. But Myers unfolds his bag of tricks and jokes
prematurely and his one-note persona ("Crazy, baby, yeah" or "Shall we shag?")
grows repetitious. I was ready to say to Austin, "Zip it." Save for some
brilliantly funny gags and one-liners, "Austin Powers" is too dependable on his
mojo to really work. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or
Faust667@aol.com 

Title
Review for Celebrity (1998)
Woody Allen's "Celebrity" reminded me a little too much of his soporific
"Stardust Memories," which was also filmed in black-and-white and concentrated
on the nature of celebrities. This film is superior but suffers from the same
lack of comic energy and enthusiasm. For the first time since his overrated
comic segment in "New York Stories," I felt Woody's heart was not in the right
place for this material. 
"Celebrity" stars Kenneth Branagh as celebrity hound and interviewer Lee Simon,
who drives an Astor Martin to attract and have sex with all the female
celebrities, while getting the scoop on their precious moments of fame and
recognition. He gets oral pleasure from a famous actress (Melanie Griffith -
less annoying than usual), and he gives a brief moment of orgasmic pleasure to
a model (thrillingly played by Charlize Theron). What he really wants to do is
write a novel about celebrities, but he lacks the self-confidence to finish it,
even with the help of a sexy book editor (Famke Janssen). 
Lee is not a happy person, though, and lacks self-control. He regretfully
divorced the shrilly Robin (Judy Davis), a schoolteacher who is afraid to deal
with life after divorce. She resorts to religious retreats and superstar
plastic surgeons, yet the answer may lie with a TV producer, Tony Gardella (Joe
Mantegna). Robin decides to work for him at a busy TV station where she meets
an assortment of talk show guests, including skinheads, overweight people,
Hasidic jews, and a prostitute (Bebe Newirth). The latter shows her how to
perform oral sex by using a banana (a witty take-off on Madonna's famously
similar oral display in "Truth or Dare"). In the process, Robin becomes a TV
celebrity host. 
There are many good jokes in Woody's latest opus. My favorite is Charlize
Theron's sleepy, sexually polymorphous model (a bit cribbed from "Annie Hall")
who brings everythingto a halt when she appears- she could be the next Sharon
Stone (who appeared in "Stardust Memories"). I also loved the gala movie
opening where Lee sees a famous director (Andre Gregory) who makes "arty,
pretentious movies in black-and-white". There's also a vivid sequence involving
Leonardo DiCaprio as a superstar actor who trashes hotel rooms and beats up his
girlfriend (Gretchen Mol) - he makes such a startlingly violent 10-minute
entrance that it is a real shame when he exits. And there are several quips
about novelists, particularly one moment where Lee sleeps with one of
DiCaprio's escorts, who insists that she writes `like Chekov'. 
The central figure in "Celebrity" is the nervous chatterer Robin Simon, played
with pitch-perfect precision by the indomitable Judy Davis. Her character is a
wounded soul searching for meaning in her universe, and she has her
reservations about getting married again. Her character is so real, so vivid,
so humane that it is a shame Woody didn't invest the same interest in the other
characters. 
For example, there is the crucial Lee Simon role (played by Kenneth Branagh),
who is miscast and obviously uncomfortable with mimicking Woody's famous tics
and neurotic stutters. His role is severely underwritten, lacking any of the
pathos or charm that Woody would have brought to it. Branagh is better off in
Shakespeare country, or when he commands an American accent in his own work,
such as "Dead Again." The aforementioned Charlize Theron disappears too soon,
as well as the comic fury of DiCaprio. 
Still, there's an element of bewitching attitude and class to Winona Ryder as
Lee's girlfriend, a promiscuous actress who can't commit to one man. The
virtually unrecognizable Bebe Newirth is also exceedingly good as the
soft-spoken prostitute. Joe Mantegna brings back the suave coolness that he
brought to Allen's thoughtful Alice, which also starred Judy Davis. 
"Celebrity" is a good film, but it doesn't have the manic, furious energy of
"Deconstructing Harry" or "Husbands and Wives," one of his greatest films. It
is surprisingly chaste and unscrupulous in its attack and commentary on
modern-day celebrities. With its abrupt ending and uneven characterizations,
"Celebrity" is simply filler until the next great Woody Allen film. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with questions, concerns or comments at jerry@movieluver.com or at
Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Psycho (1960)
Alfred Hitchcock's "Psycho" is the grandaddy of all horror thrillers - the
penultimate textbook statement on thrills and suspense. There has never been a
greater Master of Suspense, and this is surely Hitch's greatest suspense
thriller. Even after 40 years, it has not lost the power to shock or surprise. 
"Psycho" changed movie history forever after its release in 1960 - in a sense,
the innocence of the 1950's was forever crushed by Hitchcock's atmospheric pull
and sinful characters. Here we had Janet Leigh as Marion Crane, the bank clerk
who has embezzled 40,000 dollars and leaves the town of Phoenix, Arizona in the
hopes of starting a new life with her beau, Sam Loomis (John Gavin). Along the
way, she runs into ominous policemen, suspicious used car dealers, and a nice,
callow motel owner, Norman Bates (Anthony Perkins) who rents a room to her, and
offers a meal ("just sandwiches and milk") in his parlor. We are itching for
Marion to get away, but she decides to go back to Phoenix - her "private trap"
as she calls it. Her conversation with Norman almost turns awry as she suggests
keeping his invalid mother in a home. "In an institution," asks Norman, while
in the background we see stuffed birds. We begin to think that Marion will get
away the next day, and hope that Norman will not get in the way. She calmly
takes a shower, and suddenly a silhouetted figure opens the shower curtain and
kills her! A major shock to the senses in one of the infamous montage sequences
in film history. This is the section that most people recall when "Psycho" is
brought up. It is also the most misunderstood. 
The shower sequence occurs barely halfway through "Psycho" and Hitchcock still
has a lot of tricks up his sleeve. The trick is that we were following Marion
Crane all through the story, assuming all along that the film is about Marion
and the money she stole. Hitchcock makes it very subjective, we see this story
through her eyes. Credit Janet Leigh for making Marion into one of the most
sympathetic, humane female protagonists of all time. It is precisely for this
reason why we are so shocked by her murder - a life has been taking away from
us and we are left helpless like those stuffed birds in Norman's parlor. It is
not a matter of punishment considering that Mother does not kill Marion for her
money - we, the audience, only see it as punishment. Suddenly, the subjectivity
shifts to poor Norman Bates since we assume that his mother killed Marion
because he was attracted to her, and perhaps wanted her sexually. 
This is the second act of the film, now focusing on Norman and Marion's
tempermental sister, Lila Crane (Vera Miles). She comes to Sam Loomis asking
where Marion might be, and there is also a private investigator, Arbogast
(Martin Balsam), making inquiries. Arbogast eventually discovers that Marion
(having used her alias Marie Samuels) had stayed at the Bates Motel. This sets
up a brilliantly tense and comical scene where Arbogast asks Norman questions,
realizing Norman is lying about the situation, and is curious about his mother
sitting in the upstairs window of the house next door. 
"Psycho" has one clever sequence after another, building its tension through
surprises and mounting suspense. Who is Mother anyway? How come she has to be
carried out of the house by Norman yet somehow moves at lightning speed when
she attacks with the kitchen knife? The secret to the tension is in how Hitch
switches from subjectivity to objectivity. For example, the Arbogast murder
starst subjectively as he walks up to the house and enters through the front
door - every shot is seen from his point-of-view. Then he walks up the stairs,
and Hitchcock cuts to a shot of a door opening. Who is it? Could it be Mother?
We are aware someone is up there but Arbogast does not know, thus the tension
builds with acute dexterity. Low-angle shots to a high-angle shot of Mother
steadfastly attacking Arbogast. 
Subjectivity has always been Hitchcock's secret to suspense and unparalleled
tension, and never before did it make such an impression as in "Psycho." It is
a film that changed our perceptions of what a film could be, and it sired a
genre rooted in gratuitous gore and cheap shocks - the slasher genre. The
countless rip-offs and remakes never did any justice to "Psycho," with the
exception of the cleverly Hitchcockian suspense thriller, "The Stepfather," and
Scorsese's lone thriller, "Cape Fear." In terms of slasher fare, there is John
Carpenter's influential "Halloween," which borrows from Hitch freely as well as
Brian De Palma's early thrillers. 
What most slasher films forget is that Hitchcock never intended on featuring
the sole two murders in "Psycho" without any rhyme or reason - his sole purpose
was not just to shock or titillate. The justification comes from the screenplay
by Joseph Stephano, who wisely spent time investing humanity and dimension in
these characters. Most of today's thrillers or slasher films spend an
inordinate amount of time lopping off characters whom we could care less about
- witness the execrable "I Know What You Did Last Summer." The latter cared
more about the killing methods than about the thin characters. 
"Psycho" is nearly a perfect thriller, though the ending where a psychiatrist
(Simon Oakland) explains Norman's condition is still trite and unnecessary -
sometimes nobody can acutely pinpoint a murderer's motives. But then Hitchcock
has a brilliant finish where Norman is in his cell and we hear Mother in a
voice-over spreading a sense of optimism about her confinement - "Why she would
never harm a fly!" says Norman. The final shot is a superimposition of Mother's
skull over Norman's smiling face while there is yet another superimposition of
a car being drained from a swamp containing Marion's body. 
"Psycho" is dated in certain respects, but it retains the potency it has in its
thrills and excitement. A visceral experience like no other, it shows Hitchcock
at the height of his powers. The late Anthony Perkins might have become
miscast, but his empathetic, almost too human look at Norman Bates will always
enthrall precisely because he does not seem so evil. "Psycho" will never be
forgotten, and stands as the standard thriller by which all others thrillers
have and will be measured. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or
at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Sleepy Hollow (1999)
An elderly man sits in a carriage at night, watching the silhouetted trees in
the darkness and hearing strange noises. Suddenly, something dashes through his
carriage and the driver's head is gone. The man is scared and leaps out of the
carriage. He walks up to a scarecrow with an ominous, eerie pumpkin for a head.
He hears a noise, turns around and his head is lopped off too. A nice start,
but what a shame that the whole movie is like that - it makes decapitation seem
as matter-of-factly as those "Friday the 13th" movies. We have come a long way
since Disney's scarily amusing classic short, "The Legend of Sleepy Hollow."
Back at Sleepy Hollow, a dreary town saturated in fog, the bland, easily
bewitched constable Ichabod Crane (Johnny Depp) arrives from New York City to
investigate a series of puzzling decapitations. Puzzling to Ichabod, but not to
the townspeople who are certain that a supernatural figure on a horse, known as
the Headless Horseman, is responsible for the murders. "We have murders in New
York without benefit of ghouls or goblins," mutters Ichabod, in one of the
movie's few clever lines. Eventually, Ichabod discovers that this superstition
is fact, but the reasons for the Headless Horseman's rampage may leave viewers
wishing that director Tim Burton would have had the demonic imagination to
reinvent this fable with more juice than is allowed. 
"Sleepy Hollow's" ad campaign is absolutely correct - heads do roll but with
little pretense or justification. We see the nocturnal horseman galloping
through the narrow roads raising his sword and axe with all his might and
severing each and every head (he even battles Ichabod in a duel that had me
laughing unintentionally). You see a decapitation once and it is threatening,
albeit somewhat scary. Second time is still thrilling with the music score by
Danny Elfman pumping through the speakers even louder. The third and fourth
time, you are left wondering if Tim Burton did nothing more than create a
big-budget slasher film with a headless Jason Voorhees! 
Mr. Burton leaves little to the imagination, an ironic gesture on his part
since he is a man borne of vivid imaginings. Remember the wonderful creation of
Johnny Depp's sad-eyed, clownish, fragile  Edward Scissorhands! The wondrous
surrealism of "Pee Wee's Big Adventure"! The comical belching of Michael
Keaton's Beetlejuice! And what do we have in "Sleepy Hollow"? An angry,
elliptical horseman who huffs and puffs and not much else (oh, yes, he loves to
steal heads). This may be because the monster is from Washington Irving's
novella, not an original creation of Burton's. 
The other characters are barely magnified beyond paper-thin caricature types.
Johnny Depp is not as wild-eyed as he was in "Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas,"
but his Ichabod is too bland and not eccentric enough to stimulate interest.
Christina Ricci is the blonde-curled Katrina whom Ichabod falls in love with
(Winona Ryder was also mistakenly blonde in "Edward Scissorhands"), but they
don't have an iota of chemistry. Ricci is supposed to be some kind of witch but
the script glosses over this characteristic in favor of more beheadings. The
other actors show up merely as window dressing - Michael Gambon, Miranda
Richardson and Michael Gough appear like blocks of wood in Burton's world with
no sense of urgency. In fact, if this horseman is so dangerous and people are
so afraid of him, why don't they all move to another town? Or is there a
conspiracy involving an inheritance and doomed love? We can never be sure. 
"Sleepy Hollow" is both sleep-inducing and hollow, showing us nothing more than
numerous beheadings and bleeding tree trunks. Save for Christopher Walken's
frightening cameo, beautifully captivating cinematography, and a couple of
dazzling dream sequences, this Gothic wannabe fable is charmless, joyless,
frenetic junk. It is time Burton sets his eyes on the vivid, imaginative power
of his own creations. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or
at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Swinger, The (1966)
Ann-Margret remains one of the most vivacious, electric screen presences of 
the 60's and beyond. Her star turn in "Bye-Bye Birdie" lead to more serious 
acting roles in films such as "Carnal Knowledge." What I can't quite fathom 
is her role in this forgotten 1966 picture called "The Swinger," which is as 
pointless and boring as one can imagine. It is essentially a promo for 
Ann-Margret as a physical, sexy presence, nothing more. 
Ann plays an ambitious writer named Kelly Ollson who is seeking to publish a 
profile on swingers in a Playboy-type magazine headed by the handsomely rich 
Ric Colby (Tony Franciosa). Of course, she is rejected by Ric since she is 
too innocent to be a swinger herself. At this point, I found it silly to 
believe that Ann-Margret would be considered remotely innocent by anyone but 
never mind. Kelly decides to prove she is a swinger to get the job, or so I 
figured. She has her body painted in an outrageous pseudo orgy and does a 
photo montage in various styles of dress, though there is barely any nudity 
to be found. She also proves to be an amoral drunk just to convince him she 
is a swinger! Ric is mesmerized by her and falls in love, seeing that she is 
sweetly innocent after all. 
"The Swinger" is purpotedly a romantic sex farce but we mostly get older men 
chasing women in offices, endless, unfunny sexist jokes, and Ann posing 
lovingly before the camera not to mention acting like a complete fool when 
the screenplay requires her to. Oh, and there is a teaser ending that is as 
stupidly unconvicing as they come, and some fast-motion shots of Ann riding a 
motorcycle sans a helmet.
"The Swinger" is excruciating to watch from beginning to end, serving as 
neither entertainment nor as a pop culture curio. Directed by George Sidney 
who helmed the similarly awful "Viva Las Vegas," this is as empty-headed and 
clueless as they come bearing little charisma and zero laughs. At least, the 
stunning opening sequence is a keeper in the pop culture time capsule as we 
see Ann singing the title song in a tight black jumpsuit while sitting on a 
trampoline. The brief title sequence offers more pizazz and sexual energy 
than the rest of this lifeless film can possibly muster.  
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
Faust667@aol.com or at jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for True Romance (1993)
After admiring "Pulp Fiction" as the classic, revisionist pulp noir story that it was, I looked back at "Reservoir Dogs," which I had initially panned, and found it to be profane but also blackly comical and superbly tantalizing. Having said that, I still find "True Romance" to be hackneyed at best, a production written by Tarantino and directed with a bulldozer by Tony Scott. This is yet another example of a parable about crooked, one-dimensional drug dealers, pimps and cops but done with nary the style or witty dialogue that later became a trademark of Tarantino's after "Pulp Fiction." 
"True Romance" stars Christian Slater as greasy-haired Clarence, a comic-book, kung-fu aficionado who one day meets a sweet-tempered hooker (played by the fabulous Patricia Arquette). When Clarence falls in love with her (after making love in his comic-book store), he decides to take her away from her Rastafarian-wannabe pimp (played by Gary Oldman), and all ends in a killing spree that leaves these two unlikely lovers on the run. The cops and the mob are now after this "Bonnie and Clyde" twosome now that they inadvertently stole a briefcase of cocaine worth a half-million dollars and killed Oldman's pimp. 
"True Romance" is well-directed by Tony Scott ("Top Gun"), but the whole affair rings as hollow, meaningless and stupid. I do not object to four-letter words but Tarantino uses them without the punch and jab of truth as he has shown later on - these lowlifes just merely curse their heads off. The violence is overdone and far too cartoonish with the exception of one harrowing scene - the vicious, bloody beating of Arquette - that is as realistic and titillating as they come. This one scene shows the promise that Tarantino had in mind. 
There are some fun character bits by Brad Pitt as a dopehead, Michael Rapaport as an actor who claims to have worked on the set of "T.J. Hooker," and the respectable work of reliable pros like Tom Sizemore and James Gandolfini. The best scene in "True Romance" is between Actor's Studio pros Dennis Hopper and Christopher Walken. Hopper plays Clarence's father, an ex-cop, who is about to die at the hands of Walken's mob chieftain. Hopper explains the ancestral lineage of Italian gangsters that goes as far back as the blacks in Africa, and it is such a tense, electrifying scene that it remains a classic of its own in true Tarantino fashion. 
"True Romance" has some fine moments, but its overall effect is numbing and cold-blooded to the core. As well-made as it may be, it manages to leave out the humanity that was so central to Tarantino's "Pulp Fiction" and "Jackie Brown." Not a boring film overall but never truly enticing either.  
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at jery@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Child's Play (1988)
Let's begin by saying that I am heartily sick and tired of post-modern,
cleverly designed horror/slasher flicks which try to comment on the whole
slasher genre, only to end up becoming what it is that they are pretending to
satirize. The year 1998 had the following in store: "Urban Legend," "I Still
Know What You Did Last Summer," "Halloween H20," and "Bride of Chucky." The
latter has the same degree of self-awareness, considering there's one shot of
someone watching a clip from "The Bride of Frankenstein." 
"Child's Play" is one of the better horror films at around the time of
"Halloween 4" and "Monkey Shines." It unfolds at a quick pace with some tense,
scary scenes. The best scene is when the mother picks up the package that the
doll came in, and the batteries fall on the floor! Oops! How can the doll speak
without batteries? When she threatens to throw the doll into the fireplace, the
doll's face contorts into the angry, evil Charles and emits some Exorcist-like
obscenities: "You filthy slut!", and so on, and so forth. 
"Child's Play," however, has some unbelievable moments that hinder the tension
towards the end. For example, the suave cop who shot Charles Lee Ray
disbelieves the kids stories about the doll speaking and giving orders, and he
disbelieves the mother after she's obviously been attacked (she's bitten on the
arm). Then the cop is attacked by Chucky, and curiously, when he sees the kids
mother afterwards, he doesn't even tell her that he was attacked! Why not?
That's hard to swallow, and it is unlikely that such a doll would travel
through the cold city of Chicago unnoticed, but that's a trivial complaint. The
ending, as effective as it is, is a cross between "Terminator" and "Halloween,"
where the killer just keeps rising back from supposed death. They could have
easily blown the doll to kingdom come, so you can see why it was stupid to make
two inferior sequels about the same damn Chucky doll. 
"Child's Play" is done the old-fashioned way (even for an 80's horror movie) by
not including a high body count or any needless gore- the movie builds its
suspense with thrills and chills. The performances are decent and most
importantly, we care about the characters' plight. Although it doesn't come
close to the unrelenting terror of the voodoo doll episode in "Trilogy of
Terror," "Child's Play" is still better than most recent horror flicks. Oh
yeah, and there are no clever post-modernist jokes. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com

Title
Review for Wo hu cang long (2000)
Author: Faust667@aol.com (Jerry Saravia)
Subject: Review: Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon (2000)
Approved: graham@ee.washington.edu
Newsgroups: rec.arts.movies.reviews
Organization: None
X-Questions-to: graham@jetcity.com
X-Submissions-to: graham@ee.washington.edu
Followup-To: rec.arts.movies.current-films
Summary: r.a.m.r. #28088
Keywords: author=saravia
The title of director Ang Lee's latest was a turn-off to me. I suppose 
Chinese titles turn me off in general, but something like "A Chinese Ghost 
Story" made me swoon. Nonetheless, though I can't exactly explain the 
significance of the title, "Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon" is one of the 
most exciting martial-arts films ever made - a glorious, magical thrill ride 
that Hollywood can only think of aspiring to. 
Set in ancient imperial China, we are introduced to the magnetic Yu Shu Lien 
(Michelle Yeoh), a skillful, graceful warrior who learns that a legendary, 
powerful sword has been stolen from its owner, Lee Mu Bai (Chow Yun-Fat), 
another highly skilled warrior and good friend of Yu Shu's. They both try to 
track down a masked thief, who is almost as graceful as both of them 
combined. This masterfully trained thief can scale walls and fly with such 
ease that Yu Shu and Lee Mu are determined to uncover his/her identity. It 
turns out that the culprit is Jen (Zhang Ziyi), a guest at the home of the 
respected Sir Te (Lung Sihung). Jen has her emotional problems and pines for 
a warrior who lives out in the desert netheregions. She is also fierce and 
hardly tactful - when she gets angry, she is likely to make Robert De Niro 
shudder with fright. I am not sure anyone would want to be within ten yards 
of this soaring, sweep-of-of-your-feet presence. Looks like an angel but she 
is as fierce as a tiger. 
The difference between "Crouching Tiger" and several other hundred 
martial-arts films is in its emotional truths and romantic subplots. We sense 
that Yu Shu loves Lee Mu and wishes some kind of future for the two of them, 
even if they are flying high among treetops and rooftops. Jen is the more 
complicated character of the bunch, she has her questionable loyalty to her 
mother but also a love for the long-haired warrior of the desert, who makes 
her feel love over pain (and sometimes both). This magical sword she has 
stolen gives her a power that she can barely control...and thus, it seems she 
has little control of her own life. 
Yeoh and the often static Chow Yun-Fat (who brims with magnetism in this 
film) bring heart and soul to "Crouching Tiger" but it is the amazing Zhang 
Ziyi who soars above them all. She is quick, smart, clever, passionate, 
tempermental, confident, and genuinely convincing as a warrior with no qualms 
of fighting her respectful elders - we also sense she could fail but it is 
quietly compelling to watch this woman trying to balance her world. 
Every sequence in "Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon" is sheerly amazing and 
wondrous in detail and magnificence. Every fight scene feels honest and 
truthful, no matter how silly it may seem to some that the characters can fly 
with grace and agility (China is used to this sort of thing since it relates 
to their own past legends and numerous other films). Again, it is because of 
how powerful the characters are - they stand for something and represent 
their own people but they also have values and morals. Jen is the rebel ready 
to break down their fortress - she acts out her own feelings rather than 
repressing them. Essentially, Ang Lee ("Sense and Sensibility") has created 
his own "Star Wars" for the new millenium. Spectacularly exciting, tense, 
romantic, dramatic, idiosyncratic at times, "Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon" 
stuns our eyes and engages our hearts. George Lucas can only hope of 
accomplishing this much with his next "Star Wars" opus. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Rage: Carrie 2, The (1999)
Now imagine a teenage story of a goth high-school student unable to connect to
any of her peers - she remains a social outcast. Now imagine that a football
jock is piqued by her beauty, or the beauty he sees in her soul, and asks her
out on a date. Now further imagine how all the jock's friends are going to
react, sensing that a gothic weirdo has no place in their circles. Now sit
down, close your eyes, relax, and consider this plot for a moment. Sure,
cliches abound like fireflies, and yes, it almost sounds like a Molly Ringwald
movie or one of those old girl-from-the-wrong-side-of-the-tracks movies that go
back as far as the 30's, if not further. Ask yourself one question: does this
sound like the plot for a horror movie like "Carrie"? Hmmm...don't think so.
"The Rage: Carrie 2" is a preposterous medley of the teen romance and horror
film genres. What makes it doubly preposterous is that it tries to be a
psychological horror film about an outcast and manages to squander its premise
with a relatively "normal" teenager who would never be confused for a Sissy
Spacek clone.
The goth girl of "Carrie 2" is Rachel (Emily Bergl), a lonely teen student with
a best friend (Mena Sevauri) whose only connection to her seems to be matching
heart tatoos. Rachel's home life is perfunctory at best, living with abusive,
uncaring stepparents. You see Rachel's mother went to a mental institution, for
reasons never made entirely clear, and so Rachel got foster care and adopted an
attitude. Several years later, she attends a high school where the football
season is all that matters, the jocks hate her, the girls are all treated like
sluts, and a suicide is seen so matter-of-factly by the student body that one
of them even takes a picture with the remark, "cool!" Not a fitting environment
for Rachel, who only wishes she could be like them, but resents them all the
same, or so we believe. It turns out one jock (Jeremy London) feels connected
to her in some way, and asks her out much to the chagrin of his fellow buddies.
Rachel now has a boyfriend, but is still saddened by her best friend's suicide.
The guidance counselor, Sue Snell (Amy Irving, returning from the original
"Carrie") tries to help Rachel, fearing that her telekinetic powers (such as
moving Sue's paper weights in the office) may lead to a repeat of Carrie's
actions from the past. And on and on, as we are treated to a lot of male
bonding scenes between football jocks, a dog is nearly run over, Rachel's house
is nearly vandalized, and so on. There is the obligatory set-up of the evil
teens siding with Rachel, making friends with her, until we are treated to a
humiliating, carnage-packed climax with nerves popping out of Rachel's
skin...well, you get the idea.
To be fair, there are some very good scenes in the film revolving around
Rachel's relationship with the "good" jock, who does love her (the cafe scene
and their love scene in the car are effective). I also liked the early, all too
brief scenes with Mena Sevauri as Rachel's sad friend. 
Emily Bergl has charisma to spare, and has some startling, witchlike eyes - it
is hard to take your eyes off her. But why would anyone think she is ugly? She
is not that Gothic anyway, more toned down than say Fairuza Balk's character in
"Urban Legend." Bergl is beautiful and so the basic premise - social outcast
gets revenge on tormenting teens - does not resonate as it did in the original
"Carrie." Carrie White was utterly defenseless and often humiliated - she was
made to feel worthless and her telekinetic prowess was her only salvation. In
this film, Rachel seems to handle herself rather well, and is only humiliated
once prior to the bloody climax. The buildup is not there for us to sympathize
with her need to kill all the jocks and cheerleaders.
"The Rage: Carrie 2" is not really comprised of much rage or fury to speak of.
It is not boring and it is often watchable, but the melding of such genres does
not make for a cohesive whole. It all goes downhill with the unnecessarily gory
and unpleasant climax that will leave you reeling as to why so many teens had
to die (especially the good to merely decent). Bring back Sissy Spacek! 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or comments at jerry@movieluver.com or
at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Ulee's Gold (1997)
        The late 60's and early 70's were arguably the most influential and
revolutionary years of personal filmmaking in history. Therefore, there must be
something said for the long-lost actors of that time who are suddenly popping
out now and reinventing themselves. John Travolta is the most phenomenal of the
70's artifacts because he has come back stronger and better than ever. Peter
Fonda is not really an icon (unless you consider his "Easy Rider" role to be
one) but for the first time in twenty years, he gives a performance of such
subtlety and strength that I became deeply overwhelmed. 
"Ulee's Gold" stars Fonda as Ulee Jackson, a Florida beekeeper who is trying to
hold a dysfunctional family together. He is a Vietnam veteran whose wife died
several years ago, and now he has two granddaughters at home, a son in jail,
and his bees to take care of. Ulee's older granddaughter is a brash teenager
who wants her life to be separate from their supposed family circle - she truly
hates her mother for having left them. Ulee's jailed son begs him to pick up
his sick, drugged wife (Christine Dunford) in Orlando since he's hoping to be
out soon to join his family. Ulee is hesitant at first because she fled from
her kids and has left him to raise them - Ulee is a righteous person who has
shielded himself from others even society (not unlike his daughter-in-law).
Trouble is coming his way, though, when his son's thieving partners are
searching for a stash of money hidden in Ulee's bee farm.
"Ulee's Gold" is written and directed by Victor Nunez ("Ruby in Paradise"), and
as long as he sticks to Ulee's loss of love and mixed feelings about his
family, the film is genuinely heartbreaking. However, when the rotten thieves
show up packing pistols and molesting Ulee's older granddaughter, the film
stops and doesn't quite recover. This whole subplot is meant to show Ulee's
redemption and while it isn't manipulative, sentimental or sensational, it
isn't particularly engaging or interesting either. The screenplay spends too
much time dealing with these lowlifes in a been-there-done-that atmosphere. The
moment where Ulee kicks the thieves' gun into the pond rather than shooting
them with it is a moment of pure humanity but it is too brief to resonate. The
rest of the film teeters on the melodramatic whereas the tightly structured
first half of the film relied on simple human observation as its tactic. 
The best moments in "Ulee's Gold" are the quiet ones: Ulee extracting honey
from the bees in his workshop; his delicate bedtime stories with his innocent
younger granddaughter (Vanessa Zima) who is inquisitive about her mother's
condition; his developing relationship with a caring nurse (Patricia
Richardson); the bitterness between Ulee and his son in the prison scenes; and
even the scenes where Ulee tries to reason with the thieves claiming they've
done him "a world of good."
"Ulee's Gold" is fluidly directed by Nunez, and beautifully performed
especially Fonda who brings a gleam and sense of regret in his eyes that is as
pure as gold (he was nominated for an Oscar). Kudos must also go to Christine
Dunford (should have been nominated) who is riveting to watch as she struggles
through her self-destructive, drug-induced convulsions to becoming a mature
woman and responsible mother who is full of regret as well. The dichotomy
between Ulee and his daughter-in-law unmistakably presents them as people
analogous in their loss of love and emotions. If the film stuck to these vivid,
three-dimensional characters, it would have been a masterpiece. As it is,
"Ulee's Gold" is only half of a great film, and ends abruptly just as the story
starts to get more interesting. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with questions, concerns or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Way of the Gun, The (2000)
Christopher McQuarrie's "The Way of the Gun" is a noirish crime story without 
the post-modern irony of Quentin Tarantino. Although this may be a refreshing 
conceit, the film is nothing more than disposable, mean-spirited, 
one-dimensional hogwash with no redeeming qualities whatsoever.  
The convoluted story deals with two amoral sociopaths, Mr. Parker (Ryan 
Phillippe) and Longbaugh (Benicio Del Toro), who will either resort to petty 
crimes or minimum wage jobs. Thoroughly unsure of themselves, they head to a 
sperm bank where they overhear about a pregnant woman, Robin (Juliette 
Lewis), who has agreed to a $1 million fee to carry the baby of a wealthy oil 
tycoon and his desperate, gold-digging wife. The terminably stupid sociopaths 
decide there is a bargain here if they kidnap the pregnant woman for a 
fifteen million dollar ransom. Problem is they are new at this kind of crime, 
and have no notion on what to do next (heck, Robin is quicker at defending 
herself with a shotgun than they are). 
Naturally, a cleaner or "adjudicator" (essentially a smooth hitman played by 
James Caan) pursues the trio, along with two bodyguards (the appealing 
coolness of Taye Diggs and the tactful Nicky Katt, who played a grimier, 
similar role in "The Limey"). This leads them to the seediest kind of motel 
just south of the Mexican border where Parker and Longbaugh are holding Robin 
hostage. And, to remind some of good old Sam Peckinpah, there is an overlong, 
tedious shootout involving the antiheroes and bag men, culminating in an 
empty fountain with broken shards of glass. 
The film starts well enough, particularly the kidnapping scene amidst lots of 
gunfire where Robin makes the mistake of not following the bodyguards' 
orders. Unfortunately, as written and directed by McQuarrie (who wrote the 
superior "The Usual Suspects"), there is scant character development and the 
personalities of the sociopaths are nonexistent - they are merely cartoonish 
types used as props to advance the plot. There isn't a single character the 
audience could possibly identify with except for Juliette Lewis's humane 
Robin, faced with carrying a baby while evading bullets, and screaming and 
hollering with pain through the whole movie while in labor. Lewis makes her 
character sympathetic but since she is not the main focus of the film, we are 
left with far too many ugly, emotionally corrupted people taking center 
stage. Boy, do I miss Kevin Spacey's Verbal Quint from "Usual Suspects." 
James Caan adds a touch of vulnerability to the proceedings and has some 
clever lines (Examples: "$15 million is not money. It's a motive with a 
universal adaptor on it." "Let's just say I deal in the fine art of 
adjudication.") He also has a touching scene with Geoffrey Lewis, a suicidal 
drinking buddy. In fact, it was nice to see Geoffrey Lewis share one scene 
with his real-life daughter Juliette, though I would have hoped for more than 
seeing them in another typical shootout. As for the leading troublemakers, 
Phillippe hardly has much going for him except for a noticeable accent, and 
Del Toro seems to be in a leftover drug-stoked haze from "Fear and Loathing 
in Las Vegas." You want to see these two murderers rubbed out within the 
first half-hour, and that does not say much for McQuarrie. He makes the 
mistake of not instilling any humanity in these characters, so if he doesn't 
care, why should we?
Conflicted and burdened by repetitive shootouts and silly twists and turns, 
"The Way of the Gun" is an empty void with an ugly, interminable streak of 
meanness. Film noir at its most fatalistic tells us there is no escape from 
the world. Fortunately, you have the option of escaping from this travesty by 
way of the theatre exits.  
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Tango (1998)
Tango is the kind of balletic dance that infuses sex and mystery in equal
parts, and is traditionally performed by a man and a woman. It necessitates
coordination and skill and lots of practice, like any other dance. Carlos
Saura's film, "Tango," is an attempt to understand the history of tango mixed
in with personal relationships and creative talents to produce a film on tango.
It is not a complete success, but it is a visually luscious trip. 
Miguel Angel Sola plays Mario Sanchez, a filmmaker who feels his private life
is in a state of confusion. His former wife, Laura Fuentes (Cecilia Narova), is
living with another man, though Mario still loves her. Laura is also a tango
dancer, and is part of the troupe who will perform in Mario's theatrical
presentation on the history of tango. A rich gangster, Angelo Larroca (Juan
Luis Galiardo), gives Mario a new recruit, an especially attractive dancer,
Elena Flores (Mia Maestro), who eventually has an affair with Mario. Naturally,
Angelo loves Elena and if he discovers she is having an affair, it will result
in death. 
"Tango" is imminently watchable when it shows us the pure tango dances against
creative, color backgrounds. There are silhouettes, flashes of color, and just
about every other camera trick you can imagine from the imaginative
cinematographer Vittorio Storaro, an active collaborator of Bernardo
Bertolucci's. I also love the moments when we witness the preparation of the
production itself, the set design and the choreography of the movements of the
dancers, etc. These are the moments that count, but the human interest level is
at a minimum. 
I wanted to know more about the middle-aged, flamboyant dancer Carlos Nebbia
(well-played by Juan Copes) and his tango desires. I also wanted to know more
about Mario Sanchez and the relationships with these women. There is one
effective scene where he has a dinner date with Elena and he tries to explain
his feelings about men and women, and fails to make sense. There is also a hint
of Mario's imagination unfolding before our eyes, like when we see him
inattentive as a young boy in school or when he envisions a strikingly sexy
dance in silhouette while he blows the fan to create the mood. But these are
all hints of character development and nothing more. 
Perhaps I expected more from director Carlos Saura, who made the flamenco
masterpiece "Carmen," a film of unbridled passions in every sense of the word
and strong characters. If you want tango dancing and colorful, imaginative
landscapes of color and sound, "Tango" is the film for you. If you like some
human involvement and a meatier story, look elsewhere. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or comments at Faust667@aol.com or at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com

Title
Review for General's Daughter, The (1999)

Recent thrillers have become mired in lurid details and overcooked melodrama.
Some manage to be suspenseful ("8mm") and others are just plain flat and dull.
Nothing can be further from the truth than "The General's Daughter," a silly,
humdrum thriller purporting to be more than the sum of its parts. 
The basic premise deals with the titled character, Captain Elisabeth Campbell
(Leslie Stefanson), who is found strangled, naked and spread-eagled openly at
an Army base. John Travolta is the Army cop, Paul Brenner, assigned to the case
to investigate her death - he met her briefly when she fixed his flat tire.
Everyone at the Army is a possible suspect, and the fierce Paul will do
anything he can to uncover the truth. It seems almost every Army official slept
with Elisabeth. And there are the incriminating S&M videotapes found in her
basement. And there is Elisabeth's father, Gen. Joe Campbell (James Cromwell),
who may be a key figure in her torrid past at West Point Academy. 
"The General's Daughter" heads for the low road once the investigation
begins...simply because nothing remotely interesting happens. Once the S&M
tapes appear, they are whisked away violently by someone in the Army and never
mentioned again. The introduction of Elisabeth's mentor, Col. Robert Moore
(James Woods), a supposedly key figure in psychological warfare and alleged
lover of Elisabeth's, is fascinating but is dispatched too early on. 
We are left with many plot holes after every suspect is questioned - there are
no answers and no logical spins. Instead, we get many red herrings, shopworn
characters, and inexplicable motivations. 
Travolta is one of the film's few virtues. He is charismatic, smart,
unrelenting, and vigorous, if only the script was involving enough to lure our
interest. He does have numerous one-liners and his slight tilt of the head and
cocky walk are more than enough compensation for the thin characterization,
just not enough to save the film. 
Still, the central focus of the film should have been the relationship between
General Campbell and his daughter. The West Point flashbacks are visceral and
powerful but the film peters out with a predictable, anticlimactic conclusion.
The theme seems to be that women have no place in an organization like the Army
- they will be abused, mishandled, or worse, murdered. It's unfortunate the
film does not stay true to its original convictions. 
"The General's Daughter" is nasty and tedious, sacrificing illuminating story
potential about sexism, murder, and scandal in the Army with absurd plot twists
and clinical murder investigations. Once it is over, you may ask yourself: who
was the General's Daughter anyway?

Title
Review for Topsy-Turvy (1999)
To be perfectly honest (as I usually am), I was not exactly looking forward to
a film about the musical operetta kings Gilbert and Sullivan. Why you might
ask? Because I am not a big fan of musicals in general, and musicals by any
composer, even Stephen Sondheim, are not exactly my cup of tea. On the other
hand, excluding my naivete for a moment, I was deeply enthralled by Mike
Leigh's new film "Topsy-Turvy." This is a wonderfully illuminating look at the
theatre and the backstage lives of the actors involved in making a musical -
the pains, the tears, the heartbreak, the confusion, the need to express
oneself creatively and personally, etc. 
The film wisely spends more than an hour detailing the lives of Gilbert and
Sullivan, and the status of their new musical, "Princess Ida," which received
mixed reviews and proclaimed Gilbert as the "king of Topsy-Turvydom." The
highly repressed and laconic librettist William Schwenck Gilbert (Jim
Broadbent) seems to have no idea how to react to such news except that the show
must go on. While writing his music, Gilbert mostly ignores his faithful wife,
his seemingly senile father, and his crotchety bedridden mother.
The sickly, charming, luxurious Arthur Sullivan (Allan Corduner) has no
intention of continuing his collaboration with Gilbert if they persist
producing such lightly frolicking musicals dealing with magic potions. He wants
to do more personal work. This almost sounds like the story of those 70's
Hollywood film directors trying to survive in the soulless 90's of commerce and
box-office. One day, however, Gilbert is inspired to write "The Mikado," and
thus the collaboration with Sullivan is renewed. The musical looks like it
might be a disaster considering that it consists of white British actors
playing Japanese denizens wearing silk robes - one of the actors complains
about the indecency of removing their corsets. How would an audience respond to
such a musical? And is disaster imminent when Gilbert consults real Japanese
women to see how they really behave and act?
The unerring delight in "Topsy-Turvy" is in witnessing how the production of
such a comical musical takes shape, and in seeing how the people involved are
affected by it with their own little vignettes taking place. We have the
comical actor (Martin Savage) with a need for morphine; the lead soprano
(Shirley Henderson) who has fits of drinking and is a single mother; and most
importantly, the portly-shaped actor playing the lead role, Richard Temple as
the Mikado (Timothy Spall, a Leigh regular), who is saddened that Gilbert cut
his leading musical number. And of course, we get a view of Gilbert and
Sullivan's complicated lives, including Gilbert's wife's awareness that her
husband is inattentive to her needs in a heartrending scene. 
"Topsy-Turvy" explores every single aspect of theatre you can imagine. There is
the costuming, appropriate line readings at rehearsals, accounting practices,
box-office revenues, heartaches and headaches over casting, makeup sessions
where actors talk about one another, jealousies, etc. Next to Kenneth Branagh's
delectable "A Midwinter's Tale," this is as good as it gets when it comes to
the world of theatre. 
My favorite scenes involve rehearsal and actual musical numbers. I love the
extended scene where Gilbert enunciates every single syllable that is erred
during rehearsal down to the most minute detail - the scene is long but
essential in capturing the nightmare of minutiae and detail in rehearsals. I
also love the musical numbers from "The Mikado" which reverberate with momentum
and high energy - it gives you the feeling that you are near the stage at the
Savoy Theatre watching a live performance. 
"Topsy-Turvy" ranks with Mike Leigh's best work, including the near-brilliant
"Secrets and Lies." This film is one to admire for many generations, showing
the pains and excesses one must endure to create theatre and the rich rewards
one reaps from all the hard work. When the lights go down, the magic begins as
the audience is transported into another world. The process by which this
happens is at the heart of "Topsy-Turvy."                                      
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, complaints or general comments at
Faust667@aol.com or at faustus_08520@yahoo.com

Title
Review for Others, The (2001)
I never thought anyone would care to make a haunted house movie with such
delicacy, vigor and intelligence as "The Others," but here it is and it is a
stunning classic in the tradition of ghost stories. Funny how two years ago we
were bombarded with a remake of "The Haunting" that threw all imagination to the
winds with its countless special-effects and histrionic performances, and now
comes a film of brooding menace and oodles of atmosphere and tension. Yes, it
can still be done with nary a CGI effect. 
The exquisite strength of Nicole Kidman continues with her latest role as a
near-hysterical, icy, religious woman named Grace. Set in 1945 after World War
II, Grace lives with her two children in an isolated mansion located in a foggy
English island known as Jersey (one of the Channel Islands). Grace needs
servants to look after the house and places an ad. Presto! The next day, a triad
of Irish servants arrive at her house and are given a tour of every door and
every room. Grace is adamant about keep each and every door closed and locked at
all times so as to not let the slighest amount of light enter the house. The
reason is because her two children, Anne (Alakina Mann) and Nicholas (James
Bentley), are allergic to the light to the point where it could kill them. The
servants seem to have another agenda though and, as it turns out, they were
formerly servants of the same house and know its deepest secrets that Grace can
hardly prepare for. Yes, indeed, it is haunted, or is it!
? 
"The Others" is in the fine tradition of excellent ghost stories such as the
original "The Haunting" and the nervy "The Changeling," both dealing with
haunted manors or mansions where pianos seem to play by themselves, floors seem
to creak, attics are full of mysterious items, and so on. There is absolutely
nothing in "The Others" that you have not seen before but rarely is it done with
this much skill or panache. Spanish writer-director Alejandro Amenabar ("Open
Your Eyes") understands that subtlety and imagination pay off in this kind of
genre, and he does a superb job of creating an ominous atmospheric pull that
builds the tension incredibly until the surprising ending. 
Kidman helps to build the tension with her shrieking fits and her frequent
hysterical episodes - her Grace is no ordinary heroine. She is fearful but
always in control and it is a delicate balance brought on beautifully by Kidman,
an actress who continues to surprise and engage me in each and every
performance. What is also rendered is Kidman's genuine pathos, uncovering a
gentle, human, loving woman who fights to protect her kids. Just look at her
mania episodes and contrast them with her vulnerable, sunnier side when her
husband (Christopher Eccleston) returns from the war looking like a famished
zombie. It is an amazing performance by Kidman that I hope is remembered at
Oscar time.
Alakina Mann and James Bentley are both excellent as the mature kids who love to
read but are also afraid of the dark - they can't seem to get used to it enough,
particularly the frightened Nicholas. They are kids who seem more mature than
their years, a rare find in this day and age of cute, cuddly tots with no
personality who never seem to mature (Olsen twins, anyone?). 
The enigmatic servants are also well-portrayed. Fionnula Flanagan is the dear
old Mrs. Mills who caters to Grace's needs though she does question Grace's
behavior to her own children (still, Mrs. Mills makes a helluva good cup of
tea). Elaine Cassidy is the mute Lydia, showing more expressions of sadness than
I have seen in some time (she was the fabulous lead in Atom Egoyan's "Felicia's
Journey"). Eric Sykes is Mr. Tuttle, the loyal gardener. 
"The Others" is not per se a scary film (though there are a couple of requisite
shocks) but it is an eerie, often frightening psychological drama, showcasing
Kidman to full effect as a tormented woman who will do anything to protect her
kids from the evils of the sunlit world. As she slowly becomes emotionally
unbalanced in her fears and anxieties, you also sense the house itself has taken
its toll on her.  
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Six Days Seven Nights (1998)
"Six Days, Seven Nights" is the umpteenth version of "The African Queen" crossed
with Lina Wertmuller's "Swept Away," and a dash of Indiana Jones for good
measure. Or you can look at the film as a combination of highlights from
Harrison Ford's most popular movies. Either way, it doesn't work. 
Harrison Ford is a gruffly airline pilot hired to fly a glamorous fashion writer
(Anne Heche) and her fianc (David Schwimmer) to Tahiti. Trouble is she is
called in at the last minute to oversee a photo shoot. Once she's on the mini
cargo plane with Ford, they crash-land on another tropical island with no
inhabitants. But wouldn't you know that some drug lords and pirates are there
and spot the bickering twosome and, wait a minute, I thought this was an update
of "African Queen"? Or are we in Indiana Jones territory? 
Ford exudes charisma and strength, but he doesn't have much in the way of
chemistry with Anne Heche (and no, it has nothing to do with her lesbian nature,
though as of 2001, she is considering marriage with a heterosexual). Heche
overacts to the hilt in a performance that demanded more than desperation, but
both characters never seem undernourished or in fear of never being found in a
deserted island. The just bicker back and forth, but it is the kind of bickering
that might work initially if it went beyond mere bickering. Heche almost made me
wish Melanie Griffith replaced her - Griffith's voice is grating to be sure but
it worked in "Working Girl" opposite Ford. 
David Schwimmer is the sort-of-welcome comic relief, but I never believed for a
second that he was in love with Heche (again, nothing to do with her lesbian
nature). Let's it put this way: for a beautiful, vivacious woman like Heche,
there is no contest between Ford and Schwimmer in the romantic lead department.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Cradle Will Rock (1999)
The Depression era was rife with political turmoil, destitutes, and the Federal
Theatre threatened with  Communist accusations and a significant reduction in
number of employees. "The Cradle Will Rock," the title is from a 1937 political
musical by Marc Blitzstein, examines these trying times but the end result is
relentlessly boring and unengaging. 
There is the opening, unbroken long take of a homeless woman, Olive Stanton
(Emily Watson) waking up in a movie theatre as she leaves hastily, trying to
avoid being seen by the management and walking out of the place while other
characters march past her such as Joan Cusack as a theatre employer. Then the
camera continues to swoop above Watson as it unearths the radical composer
Blitzstein (Hank Azaria), seen playing the piano in his apartment. He is dead
tired and has had sleepless nights trying to compose the definitive musical.
Four years later, the musical is in rehearsals with the director, Orson Welles
(Angus Macfayden), who is also enjoying the run of his famous play "Dr.
Faustus," and he has producer and rival John Houseman (Cary Elwes) in tow.
Emily Watson shows up as the stagehand who hopes to share the limelight with
the cast, and wants a chance to play the prostitute role. 
There are a number of characters and subplots to juggle here, such as John
Cusack as Nelson Rockefeller who is overseeing the mural painted by Diego
Rivera (Ruben Blades), though he questions the need for a portrait of Stalin;
Vanessa Redgrave as the rich socialite, Countess La Grange, who has high hopes
for the musical; Susan Sarandon as the Italian Fascist, who is Mussolini's
ex-lover, and also questions Diego's mural; Bill Murray as a stoic
ventriloquist who reluctantly holds anticommunist ideals; John Turturro as a
loud Italian actor in the musical; the grandly titanic presence of Philip Baker
Hall as Gray Mathers, a steel magnate who objects to the musical; and lastly,
Cherry Jones as Hallie Flanagan of the Federal Theatre, accused of Communist
associations and forced to close down the theatre. 
Tim Robbins, serving as writer and director, has an ambitious project at the
helm, but he fails to make it come alive. The staging and pacing of the film
deadens to a halt - the only time the film breathes is when Cherry Jones
appears - she delivers firepower and authority as the leading player of the
Federal Theatre, defending the right to artistic freedom. The other characters,
with the exception of Blades's witty Rivera, slip in and out of the screen
barely making an impression. There is some humor in seeing Cusack's Rockefeller
arguing with Rivera, or dancing with Frida Kahlo, Rivera's sullen wife, but not
enough to take notice. Bill Murray walks away from the film without registering
half of the charisma he brought to "Rushmore." Emily Watson, a gifted actress,
is dull to watch in this film - the transition from the homeless, sympathetic
Olive Stanton to a whimpering cipher does not make for a full-bodied character.
But the biggest disappointment are the portrayals of Welles and Houseman,
presented as nothing more than two arrogant, one-dimensional boors. Macfayden
rolls his eyes and overdoes Welles's body language - Robbins's interpretation
indicates that Welles was a drunk and uncontrollable. If that is true, Welles
would not have the repertoire he established in the theatre world from the 30's
and onward. Considering this film was originally going to be written and
directed by Welles, this is more than a major offense. 
"The Cradle Will Rock" has some believably overwrought sequences where we see
what it is like to produce a musical play - the pains and frustrations are
there in ample supply. I liked the presentation of this fascinating era in all
its period decor and fashion style (an Academy Award nomination is due). The
final sequence, where we see Blitztein playing the piano and singing all the
roles at the Venice Theatre until each actor performs from their seats in the
audience, is somewhat touching and sentimental. But it is a hopelessly inert
film that caused me to shut my eyes more than once. Instead of rocking us with
excitement and entertainment, this cradle lands with a thud. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general comments at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust667@aol.com 

Title
Review for Arlington Road (1999)
The threat of terrorism is as alive as one can imagine. From the recent
tragedies at Ruby Ridge and Oklahoma to the World Trade Center bombings,
terrorism hangs like a pall of death in our everyday existence. "Arlington
Road" makes claim that terrorists may be our own next-door neighbors, ready to
pounce at any given moment. 
Jeff Bridges stars as a professor of terrorism at George Washington University
who teaches his students that the perpetrators of terrorism are wrongly
personified by the media - they are not acts done by one man but by a group. He
is obsessed by the mere act of terrorism itself, mainly due to his late wife,
an FBI agent, who died at the hands of terrorists. Bridges also thinks that his
next-door neighbor (Tim Robbins with a steely stare) may be a terrorist. At the
beginning of the film, Bridges rescues a child in the streets (played by Mason
Gamble), who is bleeding profusely from what appears to be a firecracker
accident. The child belongs to Robbins and his wife, played by Joan Cusack. 
"Arlington Road" is a strange, sometimes effective film that begins as a
character study and quickly becomes an all too fast-paced thriller dependent on
far too many implausibilities. Once the shocking ending comes into play, we
rethink how the terrorist group managed to fulfill their actions and it becomes
all too neat and tidy to have any credence. 
Jeff Bridges, one of our most unsung and underappreciated actors, gives a fine,
empathetic performance and he gives us a complex view of a man at war with his
inner anxieties who can't separate the obsession from his personal life. It is
Tim Robbins who overacts, simply staring like a wild-eyed fool making offbeat
gestures that undermine any credibility or understanding - what does his
character stand for when he commits these atrocious acts? What is he rebelling
against? At times, Robbins seems to have drifted in from a cartoon. It doesn't
help that his kids appear like aliens from "Village of the Damned." 
The female actors are not any better and are vastly underused. Joan Cusack
appears more suited to a demented "Addams Family" role than the one given here
- her close-ups hinder rather than help. And I am not a big fan of Hope Davis,
who nearly ruined the often funny "The Daytrippers" with her blandness and
forced smile. Here she has not improved much playing a bland housewife with a
forced smile. 
"Arlington Road" has its moments of suspense and tension but not enough to
overcome a wholly implausible scenario dependent on contrivance rather than
plot coherence. The dark ending gives it some weight, but it all rings very
hollow. At the end of the road lies an exploitative and shallowly misconceived
dead end.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or
Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Shakespeare in Love (1998)
William Shakespeare has always been a tortured soul to me - not a helpless
romantic. Still, the vibrantly acted "Shakespeare in Love" makes the case that
the Bard must have been a romantic - how else can one account for his quirky
romantic comedies ("As You Like It") or his morose, romantic tragedies ("Romeo
and Juliet")? He must have been in love with a special, beautiful lady to
inspire such matters of love and death. In truth, he was involved with another
man, but that's another story.
As the film starts, the actor and playwright William Shakespeare (Joseph
Fiennes) is suffering from writer's block - he is unable to devise a story out
of his new play, "Romeo and Ethel, the Pirate's Daughter." Philip Henslowe
(Geoffrey Rush), the owner of the prestigious theatre, the Rose, is threatened
by slimy creditors into bringing in profits, and pleads for William to quickly
deliver his play. William's loss for words miraculously fades once he sets his
eyes on Viola de Lesseps (Gwyneth Paltrow), an heiress who is deeply touched by
his work. His eyes light up once he starts to fall in love with Viola, and the
play Romeo and Ethel slowly becomes the tragic Romeo and Juliet. 
"Shakespeare in Love" is a fine film for what it is, but it is too safe and
sanitized - the film constantly threatens to explode with passion and
fireworks, or at least comically bawdy innuendoes, and it always seems afraid
to cut loose. It holds back too often, and the delightful, on-target screenplay
by Tom Stoppard requires more rhythm cinematically than it offers. 
The actors certainly are up to the task. Joseph Fiennes is like an energetic
puppy dog, leaping around town emitting phrases and remarks with frenetic ease
- he's like a younger Woody Allen without the neurosis. Fiennes also has
workable chemistry with Gwyneth Paltrow, and the movie shines whenever you see
them exchanging glances at each other. Paltrow speaks like a British heiress,
but her smiles and frowns get repetitious after a while - the constant
close-ups indicate that there are only two expressions in her acting
vocabulary. Of course, if you have seen "Hard Eight," you might have seen a
more quixotic version of what is on display here. Ben Affleck brings comic
arrogance to a new level as a boastful actor who slowly forces the Bard to
develop the character of Mercutio. Kudos must also go to Geoffrey Rush
("Shine") as the caricaturized theatre owner who answers nearly every question
with the dainty line, "It is a mystery." The show-stopper in all this is Judi
Dench's remarkably authoritative, ghost-like Queen Elizabeth - it is a cameo,
but when she appears on screen, the movie stops cold with her titanic presence.
"Shakespeare in Love" works because of the acting, and its profound theme
about the love of theatre, summed up brilliantly during the Queen's speech at
the end. Still, the film is static, though never lifeless, and with such an
ambitious premise, it could have been so much more. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 

Title
Review for Bamboozled (2000)
Spike Lee's spectacular new film, "Bamboozled," is likely to cause heaps of 
protest from audience members, particularly blacks. The idea that minstrel 
shows can cause more laughter now than they used to, as long as blacks are 
shown to be buffoons and outright caricatures, shows that America may not 
have changed much since the days of "Amos n' Andy." And Spike Lee knows it 
all too well. 
Pierre Delacroix (Damon Wayans) is the only black executive at a New York 
cable network that needs to save itself from drastically low ratings. One 
day, Delacroix comes up with an outrageous concept - a minstrel show called 
"Mantan the New Millenium Minstrel Show." Basically, the show will focus on 
two dimwitted, nineteenth century cotton plantation workers ("Alabama porch 
monkeys") who joke and dance each week in front of a live studio audience. 
Pierre finds his two lucky actors in the form of a homeless dancer (Savion 
Glover) as the main character Mantan, and the dancer's friend (Tommy 
Davidson) as Sleep N' Eat - these two have been auditioning for Pierre in the 
past in front of his office building and now they have the shot at stardom. 
When Pierre presents his concept to his white boss, Dunwitty (Michael 
Rappaport), the boss becomes overwhelmed with glee. The only one miffed at 
the concept is Pierre's workaholic assistant, Sloan Hopkins (Jada Pinkett 
Smith). 
Naturally, Pierre expects this show to fail miserably (in the real world, it 
would not have gone further than the pitch) and, ironically, it becomes a 
huge controversial success. Think of Mel Brooks' "The Producers" meets 
"Network," with some jarring, uneven jabs at advertising, especially Tommy 
Hilfiger, its most pointed jab. The show becomes such a success that Pierre 
becomes immersed in it himself, keeping grinning, red-lipped, buffoonish 
statues of blacks from the heyday of a forgotten era in his office. But is 
such an era really far behind, or do we still, in effect, have minstrel shows 
today? Are white and black audiences more receptive to African-American 
stereotypes that we can laugh at as in "The Nutty Professor II" (the original 
one, ironically, starred Jada Pinkett) or Martin Lawrence in "Big Momma's 
House" than to films like "Beloved" or "Amistad," which focus on slavery?
When Spike Lee focuses on such issues, it becomes a lacerating, powerful film 
- how do these black actors feel about putting on blackface? Unfortunately, 
as in "Jungle Fever," Lee tends to focus on characters that are less 
remarkable and thus, distract from its intended message. The scenes of the 
rappers, who contemplate on how other rappers are not getting the recognition 
they deserve, recalls similar scenes of the Panthers in "Network" and they do 
not work very well in Lee's context of racial profiling. I was more 
interested in Pierre and Sloan, and how they felt about their guilt in the 
face of success. All this ends rather crudely and abruptly with violence and 
hysteria that, once again, recalls "Network." The difference is that 
"Network" was leading to an inevitable conclusion where violence on 
television would result in higher ratings. Here, it is too tidy a solution, I 
think, whereas a grander subplot about how audiences relate to such material 
would have been preferred, and how these actors feel abou
t their televised act to an audience that even wears blackface to honor the 
show's characters!  
The performances are quixotic, as always in a Lee film. Damon Wayans is 
perfectly restrained as Pierre, using his hands as if they were magic wands - 
his reaction to the madness he has created is clearly felt in the final 
scenes. Jada Pinkett Smith is also alluring, smart, and energetic as Sloan, 
who sees far beyond the show's concept than anyone else in the film. I also 
enjoyed the touching performances by Glover and Davidson, two actors caught 
in the haelstorm of success, the latter more cognizant of the effect it has 
on his own well-being. 
I kept thinking of one film that dealt with similar issues, and that was 
Robert Townshend's smartly satirical "Hollywood Shuffle." Townshend's film 
does it with more grace and style, whereas Lee's film is angry and bites us 
like a junkyard dog. The end of "Bamboozled" features a moving collage of 
cinematic racial stereotypes, from "High Society" to Al Jolson in "The Jazz 
Singer." If Lee inserted clips from the gangsta rappers of today or Eddie 
Murphy, his point would have been made about minstrel shows still existing 
today. "Bamboozled" is too fractured and blunt to really score (and has a 
rather muddy look due to being filmed on digital video), but it does make you 
reflect on how race is portrayed in the media in today's world.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Marvin's Room (1996)
Diane Keaton's portrayal of the frustrated Aunt Bessie is probably her best
role since "Annie Hall." Keaton plays a humane, misunderstood woman who is
trying to come to terms with her estranged sister (Meryl Streep) and her
troubled nephew (Leonard DiCaprio) after discovering she has leukemia. It is a
strong, subtle performance and it deserves to be in a much better movie than
the one provided. 
At the start of the film, we see Bessie's estranged sister (Streep) majoring in
cosmetology, and raising two sons on her own. When her older son (DiCaprio)
burns the house down, he is admitted to a mental institution. Then Streep gets
a call from Bessie revealing her condition and her dire need for a bone marrow
transplant. Streep reluctantly agrees, and brings her two sons to Florida since
they qualify as good candidates for a transplant. 
Bessie lives with her bedridden, senile father (Hume Cronyn) and kooky aunt who
cries while watching soap operas. Predictably, Bessie and her sister do not get
along whereas DiCaprio and Bessie do. I don't need to give away much more of
the tedious plot since you may have guessed the rest by now. 
"Marvin's Room" is basically a TV movie with a better cast and stagy production
values (it is based on a play by Scott Macpherson). As aforementioned, Diane
Keaton is forceful and magnetic to watch - her scenes with Streep are powerful.
Ditto the scintillating DiCaprio who steals the scenes he shares with Streep
and Keaton - the scene with DiCaprio trying to eat chips while Streep insists
on asking permission from Bessie is tense and comical. Meryl Streep is
believably trashy and uptight - a performance that recalls her "Silkwood"
portrayal. There's also the ubiquitous Robert De Niro as an affable doctor who
rides in a bicycle and comes to work wearing a helmet (he's also one of the
producers of the film). De Niro delivers a blast of subtle, comedic touches -
too bad, his role is so short (as in "Sleepers") since he brings the film alive
whenever he's on screen. 
'Somehow, "Marvin's Room" follows a very clear, formulaic path from the
beginning and ends just when things start to get really interesting. Every
scene is predictable, and there isn't a sense of spontaneity as you might
expect from such a great cast. Still, what distinguishes it from the norm is
its refreshing lack of overt sentimentality. That and Diane Keaton's bravura
performance warrants a look at this mild, flawed piece. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Critters (1986)
In the wake of "Gremlins" and its myriad rip-offs came this very funny horror 
comedy, for a lack of a better description. It is quick (at a full-throttle 
86 minutes), clever, self-parodic, and just plain delightful from first frame 
to last. 
The story begins in outer space on some floating prison ship, housing 
fugitives known simply as the Cripes, who are to be transported to some 
asteroid. The Cripes somehow escape on the ship and head for Earth (aliens 
just love our home planet), while two bounty hunters dressed in almost 
Western garb, a combination of long trenchcoats and pointed boots, search for 
them. They also have to change their nondescript appearances to human form. 
Flash forward to the typical American farmlands of Kansas where a nice 
American family live, consisting of the farmer, Jay Brown (Billy Green Bush), 
his housecleaning wife, Helen (Dee Wallace Stone), the presumptious son, Brad 
(Scott Grimes) who loves using his slingshot, and the sister he constantly 
fights with, April (Nadine Van Der Velde), who has the hots for the local 
handsome teen male, played by none other than Billy Zane!  
The town is full of the usual cast of denizens, including the local sheriff 
(the terrific M. Emmet Walsh) and the village idiot (Don Opper), who believes 
aliens will invade Earth (he of course was once attacked by an alien). But an 
invasion is imminent as a spaceship lands in the farmlands, and a host of 
furballs start killing livestock, and basically they try to eat their way 
through dear old Kansas. They are of course the Cripes, a crew of furball 
monsters that have razor sharp teeth and use sleep-inducing (or perhaps 
poisonous) darts that shoot from their heads.  They attack the farmer's 
family, and most of the town itself. Naturally, the bounty hunters finally 
land on Earth and cause their own havoc with their enormous guns blasting 
everything in sight (including churches and bowling alleys) as they search 
for the Cripes.
"Critters" is lots of fun, inducing more laughs than scares but of course, 
this is no serious horror flick. In a comical scene, Brad spots a silhouette 
of a Critter growing to mammoth proportions. I also like how one of the 
Critters utters the F curse, or how one plucks the eyes off of an E.T. doll. 
The scenes at the beginning are the best as we see how this oblivious 
American family lives. I love the moment where Dee Wallace smiles in 
recognition as her daughter speaks to her boyfriend, which leads to a dinner 
scene with the family and the boyfriend. As the sweet couple leaves for 
literally a romp in the hay, the patriarch Jay asks his wife: "Have you ever 
told April about...you know?" She responds: "Years ago." Moments like that, 
and there are several featuring the sly Grimes, gives a sense of humanity to 
the characters. They are not cartoonish types, though the movie is one big 
cartoon spectacle. 
It also helps that veteran character actor M. Emmet Walsh (the slimy, corrupt 
detective in "Blood Simple") and Don Opper (memorable as the title character 
in "Android") were cast, lending plenty of humorous asides throughout. 
"Critters" is a guilty pleasure, but full of smiles and knowing references to 
the B-movies of the past. It would make a great double-feature with "Mars 
Attacks!"
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Sweet Hereafter, The (1997)
Canadian director Atom Egoyan is one of the few true visionaries in the film
world today. He consistently deals in themes of forbidden desires, melancholy
loss, murder, and mourning.  "The Adjuster" and the excellent "Exotica" are
rare examples of films that break through the facade of cheap sentimentality
and aim to reveal our innermost secrets and desires. Egoyan's new film "The
Sweet Hereafter," an adaptation of a Russell Banks novel, is a hauntingly
expressive work about a school bus accident that leaves a small town in
despair. 
The brilliant Ian Holm stars as Mitchell Stevens, a forlorn attorney
journeying to a small town in the snowy hills of British Columbia to represent
the parents of children killed in a school bus accident. He wants to represent
their grief, and looks to recompense by filing a class-action suit against the
bus company. "There is no such thing as an accident," declares Mitchell. At
first glance, he might seem like a cold-hearted lawyer in it for the money, but
we start to see a man - tortured by his own suppressed grief - coming to terms
with the tragedy and its aftermath. Mitchell's grief is his loveless junkie
daughter who frequently calls him for money on his cell phone.
 Naturally, the townspeople's grief is of greater consequence. There's the
hippie couple whose adopted son died in the accident; another parent (Bruce
Greenwood) who followed the bus carrying his two children and is the only
witness; the guilt-ridden bus driver (Gabrielle Rose); and, most memorably, a
teenager (Sarah Polley) who survived the accident and is confined to a
wheelchair, and has strong love ties to her father (droopy-eyed Tom McCamus).
The Greenwood character tries to convince Mitchell and the devastated parents
to drop the lawsuit, but the some of the parents need the money if they win the
case. 
All the characters in "The Sweet Hereafter" are flawed and despondent because
of familial relations except for the surviving teenager. In many ways, she is
the most mature character in the film because she sees past the facade of the
lawsuit and doesn't want to be manipulated by anyone, not even her affectionate
father. 
Mitchell sees himself as a grieving parent because he lost his own child. When
Mitchell is on the plane, he sees a former friend of his daughter's and he
confides in her about his daughter's past accidents with clinics and hospitals.
Mitchell is naturally empathetic when interviewing the grieving, guilty parents
about certain details of the accident - he's a guilty parent, too, trying to
erase the memory of his own daughter. 
"The Sweet Hereafter" is an understated, chilling film of great searing power,
and the actors certainly lend it credence. Ian Holm, one of the finest actors
in the world, manages to make Mitchell Stevens a sympathetic character  who's
eagerly trying to erase his suppressed feelings towards his daughter - the
lawsuit makes him start to care deeply about her. It is superb, finely tuned
acting that should have gained him an Oscar nomination. Sarah Polley
("Exotica") is as mysterious and alluring a young actress as any other - she
makes her teen character both ambiguous and benevolent (she reads "The Pied
Piper" to children) allowing us to see a gradual connection between the
relationship with her father and the school bus tragedy. These are characters
whom you will not likely forget.
Director Atom Egoyan and cinematographer Paul Sarossy successfully make the
wintry Canadian landscape as threatening and haunting as possible. The
depiction of the townspeople's dwellings is just as disturbing - we see drab,
candlelit houses; gloomy motel rooms; and pictures of children and families on
walls that take own a life of their own. The actual school bus accident is
ominously presented in one long take as it skids off the road and falls into a
frozen lake - this whole sequence, shown towards the middle of the film, is as
tragic and emotional as anything in "Titanic." 
The writing by Egoyan cleverly and astutely takes us back and forth during the
aftermath of the accident pinpointing minute details about the uneventful day,
and revealing the identities of the townspeople and their fears, desires and
secrets. 
Perhaps "The Sweet Hereafter" is not as enveloping or as rhythmic as
"Exotica," but it is a superbly realized, unsentimental, poetic and important
film of how a tragedy can change a small town. By the end of the film, with its
sense of emotional chaos, you might think, strangely enough, that the
townspeople are responsible for this tragedy. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with comments, suggestions or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or
jerry@movieluver.com 

Title
Review for You've Got Mail (1998)
I have always admired writer-director Nora Ephron's efforts, as mild
as some were, such as "Heartburn" and "This is my Life." "Sleepless in
Seattle" is one of her best, a sophisticated romantic comedy with
allusions to old movie classics such as "An Affair to Remember" and
"The Wild Bunch." It had the innate, likable pairing of Meg Ryan and
Tom Hanks and some delightful zingers courtesy of Rosie O'Donnell. The
surprise is that "You've Got Mail" is even better - as romantically
pure and cleverly funny as you can imagine, and Hanks and Ryan are
back in roles they were born to play.
Hanks stars as the aggressive Joe Fox, the owner of a Borders-type
bookstore called "Fox Books" where they serve cappuccinos and
thousands of books for discount prices. His business is the type to
put any real literary bookstore out of business, including "The Shop
Around the Corner" - a children's bookstore run by Kathleen Kelly (Meg
Ryan). Kathleen holds this precious commodity dearly to her heart, and
it is practically around the corner from Fox Books. Distracting her
from her business is her laptop computer, which she regularly uses to
talk to an anonymous male friend through the wonders of e-mail. She
has a regular rapport with this friend, and patiently waits for her
beloved, a writer for The New York Observer (Greg Kinnear), to leave
for work before she rattles around her computer. Only, she's not aware
that her e-mail buddy is her competitor Joe Fox!
Of course, Joe is unaware of this himself, and regularly waits to go
online until his girlfriend, a book editor (Parker Posey), leaves for
work. The e-mails mount as they both write to each other, seeking help
about their business prospects. And never shall the twain meet, though
we constantly hope that they do.
Nora Ephron is the perfect writer for such lightweight nonsense, but I
was surprised how sophisticated and clever the dialogue was. Joe's
double entendres hit a 10 on the laughometer - the best scene is when
he visits Kathleen's bookstore and tries to prevent his kids from
saying "F-O-X". There are also the witticisms of supporting
characters, such as Joe's philandering father (Dabney Coleman) and his
philandering grandfather (John Randolph), who describes women as being
"enchanting"; his loose, Chris Tucker-ish executive pal (Dave
Chappelle); and Kathleen's old bookkeeper friend (Jean Stapleton), who
remarks that her last boyfriend "ran Spain". These characters are so
joyous and entertaining to watch that they are partly responsible for
making "You've Got Mail" such a success.
Ephron has less success with Joe and Kathleen's better halves. Parker
Posey, one of the ubiquitous queens of independent film, is given
little to do and is too boring and insipid to inspire much interest -
no wonder Joe is less than enthralled by her presence. This is partly
true of Greg Kinnear's character, though he is given a little more
leverage by Ephron and is allowed some sparkling zingers at a cocktail
party scene with Posey.
Another mild flaw in "You've Got Mail" is the relentless number of
oldies playing on the soundtrack - how many times do we need to hear
"Rockin' Robin"? The only reason so many immaterial songs appear on
the soundtrack is so that they can make more sales at record
stores. Only the inclusion of Harry Nilsson's "Over the Rainbow" feels
justified.
The center of "You've Got Mail" is the movie star combo of Tom Hanks
and Meg Ryan, and they are as delightful and adorable a pairing as
James Stewart and Margaret Sullavan were, or Cary Grant and Rosalind
Russell. Hanks is surefooted as he switches subtly from being charming
and likable to mean and comically furious. Ryan is, for once, not too
bubbly or cute and handles her comedic scenes with flair and good
timing. Her last scene, where her eyes fill with understanding, hope
and regret, is stunning to watch. Combine that with Ephron's crisp,
often hilarious dialogue, and "You've Got Mail" makes for one of the
best romantic comedies since "When Harry Met Sally."
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Million Dollar Hotel, The (2000)
"The Million Dollar Hotel" is the kind of film that is suffused with 
fantastic imagery, splendid cinematography, offbeat atmosphere and frankly, 
little else. it's a film to feast the eyes but not the heart. Plainly put, 
Wim Wenders' new film flies off of the handle so often you wonder if it will 
ever sit to ponder. It never does. 
Based on a story idea by good old Bono, "The Million Dollar Hotel" is set in 
the year 2001 in L.A., focusing on a fleabag hotel called The Million Dollar 
Hotel (the site of Bono's music video "Where The Streets Have No Name.") 
Apparently, a peculiar hotel guest named Izzy Goldkiss (Tim Roth) jumped off 
the roof of the hotel, but could he have been murdered or did he commit 
suicide? That is what an unlikable FBI agent (Mel Gibson) is out to discover, 
and not with the help of these hotel misfits. The most notable is a 
slow-witted, naive punk (Jeremy Davies) who is in love with a woman (Milla 
Jovovich) who claims she is not real - she is fiction, a nobody. 
And that may be the problem with "Million Dollar Hotel" overall. These 
characters are shallow misfits with no interesting personalities or 
remarkable insights. Actors such as Jimmy Smits, Gloria Stuart and Peter 
Stormare (as a supposedly fifth Beatle) run through the screen without making 
much of an impression. It is like watching a wax museum of fuzzy, anonymous 
portraits with no pulse. However, it is nice to see Stuart cussing up a storm 
with the film's one memorable line: "We are all f***ed up!" 
What saves the film somewhat is the tender love story between Davies and 
Jovovich, though it does become tedious after a while. I also liked Mad Mel 
who is far more restrained than usual, resembling the Frankenstein monster 
with scars in his back and a neck brace. The slow pacing and long takes are 
often breathtaking (sometimes recalling Wenders' own "Wings of Desire.") The 
songs by Bono are pointed and haunting, and the film does fascinate. It just 
doesn't involve us.  
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, complaints or general comments at 
faustus_08520@yahoo.com

Title
Review for Price of Glory (2000)
PRICE OF GLORY - A Film Review by Jerry Saravia
In the last five years, independent films have become more and more like 
Hollywood films in terms of genre, formulas, and general sappiness. Consider 
"The Tao of Steve," a low-budget film that resembles a corny Hollywood 
romance with a neat and tidy happy ending. "Price of Glory" falls under the 
same category: a boxing film full of cliches and a wishy-washy ending. The 
big difference is that "Price of Glory" aims to be something more, and heads 
for a wrongheaded climax with no payoff. 
Jimmy Smits is Arturo Ortega, a former boxer who wants his children to become 
boxers. He wants them to have the life he never had. In the opening 
black-and-white flashback, we see a young Arturo beaten to a bloody pulp in 
what was ultimately a fixed fight. Since then, he lost the passion and nerve 
to continue boxing - he knew when to quit. 
The problem is that Arturo doesn't know when to quit when it comes to his 
sons. Nevertheless, as the boys grow older, Sonny (Jon Seda), Jimmy (Clifton 
Collins, Jr.) and Johnny (Ernesto Hernandez) become the "Fighting Ortegas" 
yet it is Johnny, the youngest and meanest of the bunch, who becomes the 
likely prizefighter to become heavyweight champion. This means a lot to his 
father, and naturally to the Latino community in their hometown of New 
Mexico. But when opportunity knocks, family squabbles take over. Arturo is 
their trainer and their promoter, but an outside fight promoter, Nick Everson 
(Ron Perlman) wants to represent the promising Johnny and the other boys. 
Will Arturo let go, or will the sons follow the glitz from Nick's promotion? 
"Price of Glory" has one major flaw and that is the character of Arturo - he 
is a man trying to live his dream through his sons. The sons know this but it 
takes Arturo a long time to come to this realization. And when tragedy comes 
between them, Arturo continues to be naive and hurtful. Even his wife, Rita 
(Maria del Mar) can't reason with him. Arturo's personality is enough to 
cause the audience to lose their patience. 
"Price of Glory" benefits from the fine, truthful performance by Jimmy Smits 
but the screenplay avoids dealing with some larger issues. Since Arturo 
refuses to sell out his sons, which is really for their own benefit, and 
since he feels he can redeem himself through their success, then why does he 
feel he can still bond with them and make them forget his harmful emotions 
after the tragedy that takes place prior to the climax? In fact, it is no 
suprise that the climax is headed for a "Rocky" finish, but why deny Smits' 
the expected payoff scene where his character can learn the error of his 
ways? The drama and tension peter out to some heavy melodrama that would seem 
at home in any daytime soap opera than in a real film about real people. Even 
the villainous promoter, Nick, seems more sympathetic and understanding than 
Arturo.
"Price of Glory" has some wonderful flavor to it in its cinematography and 
scenery, and I liked the sporadic depiction of a Latino family trying to come 
to terms with their troubles. The boxing fights are also well-directed but 
they do lack the thrust of "Raging Bull," which set the standard for all 
boxing movies. Still, "Price of Glory" is the kind of film that tastes good 
on the surface yet leaves a bitter after taste once you consider how the 
ingredients were mixed. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
Faust667@aol.com or at jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Rounders (1998)
Back in 1998, I had thought that maybe Matt Damon was getting to a point where
he was just repeating himself - the same path that early Tom Cruise went before
proving what a fine, charismatic actor he really was. "The Talented Mr. Ripley"
has proven to be a major exception. In "Rounders," Damon combines his "Good
Will Hunting's" lead genius character with a cross of the lawyer theatrics in
"The Rainmaker." In other words, you got it, Damon is playing a genius poker
player (not a mathematician but close) who happens to be a law student. Okay,
that's not a fair criticism to make. The question is: is the movie any good?
Yes, but Damon is too good to be true in his first lead role since "Good Will
Hunting." 
"Rounders" stars Damon as Mike McDermott, a clean-cut, high-stakes poker
gambler, who calls it quits after losing $30,000 to a Russian gangster named
Teddy KGB (John Malkovich). Mike chooses to stick to his law books and cavort
with his live-in girlfriend, Jo (Gretchen Mol). No sooner can you predict that
he'll revert to his gambling instincts when his troubled best friend, Worm
(Edward Norton), is released from prison and goes back to gambling with
Russians and other card players. Unsurprisingly, Worm brings the juice back
into Mike's soul to gamble - Mike resists but can't help it and lies to Jo
about his habit. The trouble is that Worm owes money to Teddy KGB and Mike
vouches for Worm's activities - ouch! We're talking the noirish landscape of
"Mean Streets," without the grit. 
Most of "Rounders" is conventionally told, but the difference is in the amount
of attention paid to the details of poker playing. Director John Dahl and
writers David Levien and Brian Koppelman render all the little secrets and
nuances that all poker players adhere to. Since the film is narrated by Mike,
we listen and watch how he studies players, and how he determines an opponent's
cards because of the "tell." In other words, the opponent is telling the player
what cards they are holding through gestures and specific tics. Teddy KGB's
tell is the way he fondles an Oreo cookie. If he splits the cookie in front of
his face, he's cheating. If he splits it by his ear, he's ahead and may be the
winner. 
Several scenes are structured around such moments. For example, there's an
early scene where Mike enters a room where a judge and his cohorts are playing
poker, and he pinpoints each hand the player is holding. It's an absorbing
"movie" scene but unbelievable in context - how the hell can you tell what
cards the players are holding if you just walked in out of nowhere but, then
again, what do I know about poker? The movie's best, tense sequence is when
Mike and Worm are roughed up by some cops after trying to swindle them - the
scene has a noir element since it shows their desperation at trying to win
money so they can pay back the gangsters. 
The problem with "Rounders" is that it is too soft around the edges. It wants
be a noirish Mamet-like parable about gambling and it has the right atmosphere
for it, but the wrong attitude. Matt Damon is too squeaky clean and youthful to
be a professional gambler - he's like the Superboy of poker. He wins at every
hand he plays, but the main thrust of the story should be how you can lose
everything, even your life, when the gambling becomes an addiction. The irony
of its conclusion is that it resorts to a "Rocky" climax, and then it tells you
that gambling is the only solution to life's problems. You can't escape who you
are or what you are. 
"Rounders" does benefit from colorful supporting performances. I loved Martin
Landau's sad-eyed Judge Petrovsky whose sole advice to Mike is that destiny
chooses who we are - a platitude that is not applicable to Mike's situation.
John Turturro is quite restrained, for a change, as Joey Knish, a gambler who
doesn't take risks and plays just to make a living. John Malkovich is
especially good as the thick-Russian-accented Teddy KGB who loves to fondle
Oreo cookies. Also worth noting is the undernourished role of Jo, fetchingly
played by Gretchen Mol, and she is the only reasonable person in the entire
movie! 
Accolades must go to Edward Norton playing the weasel-like loser, appropriately
named Worm, who takes far too many risks. It also seems as if he's not much of
a poker player since Mike comes to his aid and plays at very club and function
to win the money they owe. Norton brings an authenticity to the role - he
appears as a real-life character with flaws. 
"Rounders" is generally well-acted, well-directed and well-shot. The movie is
full of whispers, jazz music, smoky corridors, and pious platitudes about
gambling and poker courtesy of Mike's voice-overs. Still, the movie takes the
easy way out, and lets Mike off the hook. Several poker-playing scenes and
Mike's grand exit at the end reminded me too much of "Good Will Hunting." It
would been a more winning hand if the film was only about Worm. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Prophecy II, The (1998)
Whatever promise the original "The Prophecy" had is lost on the filmmakers with
this cheap. darkly lit, quickly pasted together sequel that will make you wish
the horror genre did not bounce back after the success of "Scream." 
The Second War of the Angels rages on as the angel Danyael (Russell Wong) is
nearly killed in a car accident by an RN named Valerie (Jennifer Beals).
Danyael forgives her by impregnating her with the sole savior to be - the one
who will set right from wrong in the heavens and beyond. Not unless Gabriel
(Christopher Walken) can help it, as he continues his quest of bringing "heaven
back to what it was. When we mattered most." Gabriel is relentless and uses a
human named Izzy (Brittany Murphy from "Clueless") as a "monkey" for his
merciless killings - pulling beating hearts from eyeless angels. Izzy has the
best line as Gabriel is unable to drive a car or operate a PC: "You are keeping
me alive so you can use DOS?" 
Walken keeps things afloat but there is precious little of him. We are
subjected to countless scenes of violent beatings, pumping hearts, car crashes,
and many canted angles inside churches, alleys, and abandoned factories (some
scenes are so dark that it is impossible to discern what is happening). Oh, and
there is one heavy sex scene of course. Did I mention the Garden of Eden is one
of those abandoned factories?
Beals is purely uncharismatic and devoid of energy throughout this whole
affair - she seems unaffected by all the crazy events around her. Murphy as the
frazzled "monkey" has some quirky moments but not to the degree that Adam
Goldberg's "monkey" had in the original. Eric Roberts also grates the nerves as
the angel Michael - what happened to the wonderful actor from" Pope of
Greenwich Village" and "Star 80"? 
The original "Prophecy" had humor and horror in equal spurts and had some
degree of conviction and atmosphere. There was also a level of poignance as I
recall with the possessed Native American child and her relationship with a
good angel. This sequel is in-name only in the most literal sense - there is no
horror, no thrills, no humor, no sympathy and no real stake in anything
concrete. Seen one prophecy, seen them all.
For more reviews check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail with questions, concerns or arguments at   Faust667@aol.com  or  
jerry@movieluver.com 

Title
Review for Space Cowboys (2000)
"Space Cowboys" is the antithesis to "Armageddon." Let me explain. 
"Armageddon" was over-the-top and mechanical, though still a fun trip into 
space, whereas "Space Cowboys" is primarily concerned with leisurely pacing 
and characters of depth and understanding. In the end, these grumpy old 
cowboys are action heroes at heart yet they bear the burden of old age and 
Medicare worries. 
Clint Eastwood (who also wrote and directed) stars as Frank Corvin, a former 
Air Force test pilot who later designed a pragmatic guidance system for a 
satellite. Apparently, such satellite systems that were innovative in 1958 
are no longer used in 1998, though one has apparently found its way into the 
hands of the Soviets. Unfortunately, this satellite is hurling towards the 
Earth's atmosphere and none of the latest whiz technicians know how to 
control it. Frank has an idea how, since he designed it in the first place, 
and he employs the use of his former crew of pilots to go into space and 
retrieve it. The former pilots include James Garner as a Reverend; Donald 
Sutherland as a ladies' man roller coaster expert; and Tommy Lee Jones, a 
hotheaded pilot who still flies planes and bears a grudge towards Frank from 
the old days. 
"Space Cowboys" marches along with a by-the-numbers plotline that includes 
the obligatory training session (including a sneak peek of these geezers's 
butts), the usual shouting matches and confrontations with the reluctant NASA 
officials, such as William Devane as one gum-chewing NASA bureaucrat and 
James Cromwell (the tallest of the whole cast) as another, and, well, you get 
the drill. Once these flyboys enter space, the film picks up with some 
snappy, humorous dialogue and excellent special-effects.  
Eastwood draws suspense in the film's action climax because he brings such 
vulnerability, pathos and dignity to the characters, including Tommy Lee 
Jones as the widower who has a passing romantic interest in a younger woman 
(Marcia Gay Harden). Sutherland is his quick-witted smooth old self, a sight 
unseen since Robert Altman's "MASH" or "Kelly's Heroes" (the latter also 
starred Eastwood). James Garner can draw laughs with the barest of facial 
expressions, though his role often feels truncated. And good old boy Eastwood 
may not be aging like fine wine, but he still has a commanding presence (and 
is far more believable than in "True Crime" as an aging reporter). 
"Space Cowboys" has sparkle and is illuminated by a fine cast. The story is 
old-hat to say the least and far too predictable, but these old pros still 
know how to put on a good show. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for WarGames (1983)
1983 was the year of the computer revolution in the movies. Computers were
ubiquitous, even appearing as a deadly villain against Superman in the dreary
"Superman III." The following year, it became an instrument of jealousy in a
relationship in the sweet "Electric Dreams." "WarGames" is different though,
since it is not really about computers in the general sense - it is about how
much trust we put in computers, and how we may erroneously depend on them when
it comes to the inevitable threat of nuclear war. 
Matthew Broderick, in his pre-Ferris Bueller mode, stars as David Lightman, a
teenage high school student with a fixation for his bedroom computer. His
parents are unaware of his computer hacking methods, but they do know his
school grades are suffering (he breaks into the school's computer and advances
his grades to A's). One day, David unknowingly accesses the WOPR computer at
the NORAD missile-defense system, which makes 24-hour decisions regarding the
plight of a possible World War III. David only he thinks he is playing some
advanced video games. Before you know it, the country is embroiled in a
possible war with the Russians, but it is all orchestrated by the supercomputer
- the question remains: Does the computer know it is only a game? 
"WarGames" starts off with a thrilling prologue where we see the men who pull
the switches for the silos preparing for an unforeseen attack. One of the men
fails to operate the switch to launch the missile, afraid of killing millions
of people. It turns out that the attack was a test but they did not know this -
this sets up the rest of the film's theme about the paranoia centering on the
threat of nuclear war. We also get lots of "Dr. Strangelove" scenes of Barry
Corbin (best known for TV's "Northern Exposure") as General Beringer
commingling with other advisers in front of giant computer screens showing
several Russian missiles destroying U.S. military bases. The coup de resistance
is seeing Dabney Coleman arguing with Beringer while John Wood shows up as
Stephen Falken, a former scientist who created the WOPR, insisting that it is
all a game. 
"WarGames" is skillfully directed by John Badham ("Blue Thunder," "Stakeout")
and the thrills and tension abound with restless unease. The threat of nuclear
war seems real enough because it is all at the mercy of a computer, and that is
what makes the film a thrillingly scary ride. "2001: A Space Odyssey" warned us
of the dangers of computers in 1968 and "WarGames" tells us that it is no
longer a warning - it is a very real possibility. Now in 1999, we are all
dependent on computers for all our daily needs such as the Internet, banking,
shopping, the arts, etc. I am using a computer right now to type this review,
though they say writing improves greatly when first written on paper. The last
straw, though, is to have a computer making life-threatening decisions for us. 
One of the best scenes is when David tries to get the WOPR to play
thermonuclear war. It asks: "Wouldn't you prefer a fine game of chess?" David
says: "No, let's play global thermonuclear war." Its response: "Fine." That
scene still keeps me horrified and tense probably because we also hear the
computer talk with David's use of an electronic transmitter - the voice sounds
properly inhuman and soulless. 
"WarGames" may not be a great thriller nor is there much weight to certain
characters, particularly the  underdeveloped Stephen Falken role played by John
Wood. Still, it has its share of surprises and thrills along the way, and its
relatively simple theme - do not rely on anyone but yourselves in the event of
a crisis - is as resonant today as it was in 1983. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or complaints at faustus_08520@yahoo.com
or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Pearl Harbor (2001)
I recall a short 1995 film by director Arthur Penn made in conjunction with the one-hundred-year anniversary of the Lumiere films. The film focused on a group of Japanese children running through a playground as the camera tracks them and we hear explosions in the soundtrack. The area they played in was a Hiroshima bombing site. The film was a meaningful, poetic way of conveying the message that war can destroy dreams, especially those of innocent Japanese children. Not that I expected Michael Bay's souped-up, more-bang-for-your-buck extravaganza to capture such poetry but it could have at least tried. "Pearl Harbor" is "Armageddon" for people who love revisionist, dumbed-down history for the sake of some special-effects. Considering that "Harbor" and "Armageddon" come from Bay, I should have known better than to expect a serious treatise on one of the more tragic events in American history. 
The bulk of "Pearl Harbor" is a tired, cliche-ridden - not let's rethink that. The bulk of the film is a bland, superfluous romance suffused with enough syrupy music and dull melodrama to make women swoon for all the wrong reasons. Ben Affleck is Rafe McCawley, the flyboy pilot whose aspirations outweigh his romantic charisma. He falls for a nurse (Kate Beckinsale) after being injected with hypodermic needles in his arse. They fall in love too quickly even for standard screen time, and it is no wonder since neither has much inner life or interest beyond blind love. Rafe's childhood buddy, Danny Walker (Josh Hartnett), is also an ambitious pilot. He falls for the nurse exactly three months after Rafe has been premused dead from being shot in the skies by enemy fire. I am sure you'll know what to expect next. I would have thought that a soap-opera plot like this would have died eons ago. Honestly, why would such a simplistic love story interest anyone now in this millenium? 
About one hour and a half later, the film gets to the Pearl Harbor tragedy where over 2,500 people died after being bombed by Japanese fighter planes. The whole frenetic sequence lasts forty minutes. Then we segue back to the love story itself before we get a climax where the U.S. bombs Tokyo in retaliation (the inspiration for the novel and film of the same name, "Thirty Seconds Over Tokyo"). In the meantime, the Japanese commandants are briefly shown to be dubious of their attack strategy, only to be shown as inhuman villains for the sake of some forced heroic chutzpah from the Americans in Tokyo. 
The two attack scenes are full of razzle-dazzle effects and plenty of explosions but something feels off in the execution. The attitude is all wrong and that should come as no surprise for those who enjoyed the popcorn mentality of "Armageddon" (I was among the minority). Director Bay enjoys visual overkill and he loves Dolby-ized explosions but all at the expense of human involvement or human tragedy. He does not present it as a post-"Saving Private Ryan" reality where we feel the loss of innocent lives by unforeseeable forces. Instead, it is an exciting sequence but almost too exciting - the thrill is sickening knowing how many people actually suffered and died (especially those trapped inside the "Arizona" ship). We may as well be watching "Rambo" rather than a serious World War II film.
 If the attack scenes were omitted, we would be left with two hours of an interminable, sappy romance that lacks passion and chemistry. Ben Affleck can't cut it as a romantic leading man. Josh Hartnett is simply fodder for Affleck so he can have at least one bar fight and a final reconciliation that smacks of pure sentimental hogwash. Kate Beckinsale comes off unscathed but compare her thankless role to her work in "Last Days of Disco," and you may be left wondering what a potentially exciting actress is doing in a movie like this. 
With Affleck as a witless flyboy, Jon Voight as former president F.D.R. who seems ready to have a stroke, Alec Baldwin as the pontificating Col. Dolittle and Beckinsale as the love object of the two pilots, not to mention a characterless tragedy portrayed as the latest in flag-waving American propaganda, "Pearl Harbor" manages to sink history down the drain and everyone involved with it. 
Note: I have the feeling that nowadays, people can't handle or admit to certain truths. They rather have their history toned from an R rating so it is more acceptable to the masses, thus causing the least amount of controversy possible. It is disheartening to know that people will see this movie to see the Pearl Harbor fireworks sequence, forgetting that it should be upsetting to watch, not exhilarating.  
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at Faust668@aol.com or at faustus_08520@yahoo.com

Title
Review for Passion de Jeanne d'Arc, La (1928)
Amazingly, there have been a few remakes of Carl Theodor Dreyer's passionate,
powerful film, "The Passion of Joan of Arc." I say amazingly because I am hard
pressed to think anyone could make a superior film or come up with a better
actress than Maria Renee Falconetti as the tortured, wounded, saintly Joan.
Ingrid Bergman was not bad but let's face it: Falconetti is reason enough to
believe that saints do exist.
Dreyer's film begins with the inquisition of Joan at her trial after being
captured. Essentially, she is a farm girl who becomes a warrior. She is
questioned in regards to her faith and where it stems from and if she feels God
put her in her place to save France or if she is the Devil's handiwork. The
inquisitors include mostly judges and orthodox theologians who watch every word
and gesture Joan makes with relish. They try to provoke her, and they foolishly
think that an illiterate nineteen year-old would have little faith or much
understanding of her actions. They are surprised by her responses to say the
least. 
When Joan is asked who taught her the Lord's prayer, she sheds tears at the
remembrance of her mother. When asked the most difficult question, if she is in
a state of grace, she responds that she does not know if she is, but she hopes
God will grant her grace and salvation. This is naturally considered blasphemy
by the judges.
The undying power of "The Passion of Joan of Arc" is Carl Dreyer's attentive
direction and superbly mobile camera, showing endless tracking shots and
exquisite close-ups. There are lots of canted angles and little sense of space,
mainly because it is constricted by the use of several close-ups. Most of these
close-ups are of the judges, often showing them as monstrous and ugly when
questioning or spitting at poor Joan. There are of course many extreme
close-ups of Joan, sometimes allowing for lots of headroom to accentuate the
high ceiling of the cathedrals. This kind of composition is rightfully
disorienting, and it works in conveying Joan's own subjective disorientation.
The visual language is incredible considering the film was made back in 1928,
and it further establishes Dreyer as a principal artist of the silent film era
and beyond with classic films like "Vampyr" and "Day of Wrath."
Of course, the majority of the film's success belongs to Maria Renee Falconetti
as St. Joan, who never made another film since. She invigorates the sympathetic
and pained soul of the martyred Joan as fully as anyone can imagine. Falconetti
shows the enlightenment, the emotional wounds, the startled eyes as if hinting
that she had seen God, the flowing tears, the sly smiles, and the gradual
acceptance of her fate. This Joan suffers greatly as we see her faint while she
stares at a wheel of spikes, and at another point, she is bled with a needle to
cure a fever.
"Passion of Joan of Arc" is one of the greatest films ever made, as passionate
and soulful a portrait of a scorned woman as you can imagine. Falconetti's
performance is one of the most enlightening, on par with Gulietta Massina's
work in "La Strada" - two of the foremost performances of the 20th century.
Having seen the film three times, I confess that the restoration of this print,
which includes illuminating music by Richard Einhorn titled "Voices of Light,"
adds enormously to the crescendo of the tragic finale that seals the fate of
St. Joan. This is as vivid and human as films get.   
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general complaints at
Faust667@aol.com or at jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut (1999)
I am not sure what I expected from this feature-length version of the cult
animated series but certainly not the high-voltage blast of laughs I got from
this "redneck mountain town." South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut is a spry
surprise: a delightful, profane and inventive film guaranteed to offend, upset
and, most significantly, incite laughter from many audience members. 
Our good old cardboard cut-out buddies, Cartman, Kyle, Stan and Kenny are back
- this time, they are giddy trying to get in to see an R-rated film called
"Asses of Fire," which stars two movie stars, Terrance and Phillip. Naturally,
they can't get in so they bribe a homeless man into buying them tickets. After
seeing the profane film, the South Park kids litter their mouths with
four-letter words and objectionable phrases galore. Their parents are outraged
and insist on causing a media stir by claiming that the movie is dangerous, and
this all results in a war with Canada and a face-to-face encounter with Satan
and Saddam Hussein!
"South Park" does not shy away from delivering on its promise as indicated by
the title. The movie is bigger (there's a deliciously hellish Inferno
sequence), longer (a bit too long even at eighty minutes), and uncut (and proud
of it, too). There is enough here to draw ire from all social groups concerned
with demeaning values, deteriorated morals, and bad taste in the cinema
offerings of today. In a sense, the creators Trey Parker and Matt Stone comment
on such issues by making a movie about them (apparently, they fought long and
hard with the MPAA over maintaining an R rating for this movie). This is a
great, postmodernist hook for "South Park," and it is possible that the series
could be enlivened greatly with such inventiveness. 
There are many good jokes concerning Winona Ryder, Bill Gates, the Baldwins,
the Internet and the litter of adult websites, electric-shock V-chips,
abortion, Satan and Hussein's romp in the hay, the question of censorship,
parental responsibility versus the media's towards the young, etc. Is this a
comedy or a political film? Both, and it was smart and timely for the creators
to invest such interest in today's post-Littleton, Colorado issues. Name one
other recent film with this much political commentary.
"South Park" runs out of steam after a while partly due to the numerous
song-and-dance numbers (some are funnier than others). The characters are still
quite engaging (the mortal Kenny is still my favorite) and the situations are
clever and involving (the attempt to save the movie stars from possible
execution is hilarious). I may draw some ire for saying this but "South Park"
should be seen by kids under 18. It is important and addresses many issues with
wit and obscenities galore. It is a film of the times, it is about us, and it
is about how we live now. Whoever thought a cartoon could have this much
potential? 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 

Title
Review for Boiler Room (2000)
Recently on television, I had seen a program on the illegal activities of con artists, particularly those involved in get-rick-quick telephone scams. Some of these people operate inside rented offices or apartments and con people out of their hard-earned money, including retired folks who are depending on their savings to survive. The purpose is to obtain any and all money and the key is persuasion. That is the focus of "Boiler Room," which focuses on such con artists, and how they can persuade anyone to sell on fictitious stock options. 
Seth (Giovanni Ribisi) is one of these guys. A former casino operator in his own apartment, he quits trying to make amends to please his father, who is disconcerted with the life his son lead. Apparently, Seth lied to his family that he was attending college. All along he had been running an illegal casino making wads of cash. Then he catches wind of a Long Island, N.Y. stock company, J.T. Marlin, that can make anyone into a millionaire as long as they have to drive to work their butts off. Seth sees this as an attempt to please his father whom he never seems to please. 
Enter J.T. Marlin where the leader of the pack (Ben Affleck) convinces these new recruits that they can become millionaires and fulfill all their dreams as long as they make money for their firm. It is about persistence to make the sale on stock options ("Anyone who tells you that money is the root of all evil doesn't have it.") The Affleck character and the scene itself is a direct hark back to Alec Baldwin's powerful cameo in "Glengarry Glen Ross" where he tried to persuade the fellow salesmen to sell like if it was dependent on their lives. Only Affleck seems to come up short in the delivery, if only because Baldwin did it better. 
Seth is intrigued by this firm and the prospect of becoming rich, and thus becomes a full-fledged professional stock broker. He becomes so damn good that he no longer needs his resentful boss, Greg (Nicky Katt). Seth also becomes involved with Greg's former flame, Abby (Nia Long), a beautiful secretary who makes $80,000 a year and supports her sick mother. Naturally, after all the success and wealth, things start to go downhill. Seth realizes he may be immersed in a fake firm, a "boiler room" or brokerage chop shop, that sells stock options on nonexistent companies. How will his dad feel about this? 
"Boiler Room" is "Wall Street" with a dash of "Glengarry Glen Ross" thrown into the mix and it has a great cast of up and coming actors, including Ribisi's sad-eyed, clownish-looking Seth and Vin Diesel's hoarse-voiced Chris, one of the big moneymakers for the firm. I think the film tries a little too hard to seem hip, and the references to the aforementioned films by Oliver Stone and David Mamet respectively clue us into how mediocre and cliched the whole franchise is. Every moment can be predicted with precision, and we know Seth will eventually realize his mistakes and seek forgiveness from his dad. Some of these very scenes are extremely well-written, particularly those involving Seth's father (Ron Rifkin - one of my favorite character actors), a judge who doesn't want his career tarnished by his son's foolhardy schemes. Rifkin has a great line: "Relationship? What relationship? Relationships are your mother's shtick. I am your father." 
If "Boiler Room" dealt with Seth's complex relationship with his father and his own inner struggle between deception and truth, we might have had a real winner here. As it is, the film is bogged down with far too many plotholes, including Seth's relationship with Abby that becomes fraught with complications involving the FBI. And there are later scenes between Seth and his father and another potential scheme that stretch credibility. I will say that "Boiler Room" is very entertaining and informative in its first hour, but it is the anticlimactic finish that makes the whole affair seem like a near-miss. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me for any questions, concerns or general complaints you might have at Faust667@aol.com or at jerry@movieluver.com 

Title
Review for East Is East (1999)
There have been countless films about cross-cultural clashes in small villages
or cities. We have seen everything from "La Cage Aux Folles" to just about
every variation on the big city life of Italians mixing with Latinos from "West
Side Story" and onwards. There are, of course, the big city films dealing with
racism and mixed marriages from Spike Lee. "East is East" is one of the rare
few that deals with Pakistanis living in a working class suburb in England.
Although often fascinating and revelatory, the film is so uneven that you are
never sure whether it is meant to be a comedy, a drama or both.
The film stars Om Puri (who has appeared in scores of Indian films, not to
mention Hollywood films such as "Wolf" and "Gandhi") as George Khan, the
Pakistani patriarch in a household that includes seven kids and his
semi-tolerant British wife, Ella (Linda Bassett), in Salford, Manchester. The
house is small yet seems accomodating for such a big family. Some of the more
colorful kids includes Meena (Archie Panjabi), the daughter who has a
predilection for soccer, Saleem (Chris Bisson), an art major masquerading as an
engineering student, Tariq (Jimi Mistry), a disco-loving dancer who has a white
girlfriend (Emma Rydal), the young Sajid (Jordan Rootledge) who is always
wearing a parka and fears circumcisions, and Maneer (Emil Marwa), who is often
serious and silent. 
But there is friction in the house, mostly involving George and his ideals. A
few years earlier, his eldest son, Nazir (Ian Aspinalli), refused to go through
with an arranged marriage and was thus ousted from the family, declared by his
father as "dead." Now the older sons, Tariq and Abdul (Raji James), are about
to undergo a similar fate thanks to George's stubborn upholding of traditions
past. What the father seems to forget is that he has married a white woman for
the past twenty-five years, despite initially being married to a Pakistani
woman. There is also the culture change and how the kids speak in the British
tongue, not their own, and have developed and adapted according to their
environment. But George will not listen to what his kids or his wife want, it
is only what he wants for the family and it finally creates more harm than
good. 
"East is East" starts badly with the kind of heavy, indiscernible British
accents you usually find in Mike Leigh's films, lots of cheaply comical
innuendoes, and some desperate gags. Incredibly, when the film shifts its focus
from the overall ludicrous shenanigans of the family to George, it starts to
have more meaning and depth. It is no secret that Om Puri brings the film its
soul, wavering uneasily between friendliness and seething anger. The transition
is abrupt (as it was in "Not Without My Daughter" with Alfred Molina playing a
comparable patriarch with similar shifting moods) and unshakable - after all,
he is also a hypocrite for thinking that his kids will not see that their
mother is not Pakistani. The fact is that even when Tariq acknowledges this to
him, George still thinks he is right and that creates frustration with his
family, not to mention physical abuse. 
My big complaint with "East is East" is that the film never quite makes up its
mind as to what kind of film it is. When it becomes dramatic and saddening, it
really becomes serious. The comic relief is too reminiscent of low-grade
Hollywood comedies so it certainly detracts from its high-minded darkness
(there is a scene involving the purported Pakistani girl, whom Tariq is chosen
to marry, and her family that involves some crude business with a piece of
sculpture that would have seemed right at home in "American Pie"). This
constant shifting of moods and tone may coincide with George's character but it
does not prove to be as compelling or cohesive a film as it should have been.
Somehow, the comedy and the drama only meet halfway. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or
at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Dr. T & the Women (2000)
The last half-hour of "Dr. T and the Women," Robert Altman's latest film, is 
so cheery, funny and unexpected that it is a temptation to recommend the film 
based solely on its bright finish. Unfortunately, the backbone of the film is 
so pedestrian and thin that you are left wondering if Altman has lost his 
sense of pacing and, dare I say, motivation. 
Dr. T is Dr. "Sully" Travis (Richard Gere), a gynecologist who runs a busy 
office full of patients who stem from the upper-class regions of Dallas. In 
fact, all women in this film are upper-class, as are the men. Dr. T's 
personal life is in complete disarray, which perfectly complements his active 
office life. His wife, Kate (Farrah Fawcet), has been institutionalized as a 
result of dancing naked on a water fountain at the local mall! Her disease is 
a rare ailment known as "Hetsian" disorder, where an upper-class woman blacks 
out from too much love (I wonder if such an ailment exists named after a 
Greek Goddess). Too add insult to injury, Dr. T's cheerleading daughter, Dee 
Dee (Kate Hudson), is about to get married yet she may also have a secret 
admirer. Dr. T discovers this secret through his other daughter, the 
conspiracy nut and tour guide Connie (Tara Reid) who uses her cell phone as 
if it was attached to her ear. 
Wait, there is more. Dr. T's alcoholic sister-in-law, Peggy (Laura Dern), has 
moved in to his house with her three daughters, and also adorns a cell phone. 
At Dr. T's golf club, a golf pro, Bree (Helen Hunt), romances him and teaches 
him a golf swing or two in the process. And finally, there is nurse Carolyn 
(Shelley Long), who wants the good doctor for herself and senses she can 
provide what he is missing in his own life, particularly sex. 
It is clear from the onset that Dr. T loves and cares for women, and he may 
love some of them too much, such as his troubling wife. Altman, however, 
suggests that his wife, Kate, may be unhappy or unfulfilled in her life or 
seeking attention - dancing nude in a public area doesn't necessarily mean 
that you are loved too much. But T is oblivious to all women beyond what he 
thinks they need, namely love and compassion. In the end, he finds that with 
Bree, love and compassion are only temporary. 
There is a potentially winning character study in Dr. T but it is buried, and 
thus burdened, by endless scenes of champage drinking, chats on cell phones, 
anxious women in the waiting room of Dr. T's office, and so on. There is 
little evidence here of Altman's strong character types from films such as 
"Short Cuts" or the recent "Cookie's Fortune" - the upper-class women here 
are depicted as mostly hollow Southern caricatures. Fawcet is mostly left on 
the cutting-room floor, barely alive in any scene she is in - I know she is 
supposed to be disoriented but that is not enough for a robotic performance. 
Laura Dern merely embarrases herself, acting clumsy and disoriented as well. 
At least, Kate Hudson and Tara Reid rise above their thin portrayals with 
some gusto.   
The best performance in the film is Richard Gere's - his effortless charisma 
and good looks do not mask his portrayal of Dr. T as a modest, winsome man, 
trying his best not to be overwhelmed by his family and overzealous patients, 
who demand his attention. Gere's scenes with Helen Hunt are among the most 
alive in the entire film - a winning movie star combo that recalls Hunt's 
radiance when paired with Jack Nicholson in "As Good as it Gets." 
Still, "Dr. T and the Women" starts off with a whimper and never quite 
recovers until the last thirty minutes with a midly comical tone that 
manifests in a truly strange whirlwind of events. It is offputting, however, 
how Altman stages his scenes in the first half of the film without any 
pizzazz or wit to speak of - even his vintage overlapping dialogue grows 
wearisome. "Dr. T and the Women" is bereft of humor, emotion or drama - only 
Gere brings some pathos but for strict Altman fans, that may not be enough.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
Faust667@aol.com or at jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Killer: A Journal of Murder (1996)
"Killer: A Journal of Murder" is a laborious, clear-studied case in excess: it
is relentlessly overdone with bad acting, bad direction, and laughably
pretentious dialogue to boot. All I could keep asking myself was: why did
Oliver Stone serve as one of the executive producers of this junk? 
The "killer" of the title is Leavenworth convict Carl Panzram (James Woods), a
real-life murderer who killed every person or thing that crossed his path
without hesitation. Carl is a thoroughly repellent, remorseless, amoral human
being with no redeeming values or virtues whatsoever, except that he's a
brilliant writer and an intellectual. Oh, really? Apparently, a Jewish prison
guard (Robert Sean Leonard) takes an interest in this killer, and brings him
writing supplies and a notepad so that Carl can write his life, er death,
stories. Harold Gould plays the prison guard as an old man as he narrates the
story of Carl, who in turn tells us his side of the story, the basis for the
"journal," in amateurish flashbacks complete with badly edited newsreel
footage. 
Director Tim Metcalfe has no idea how to steer such unpleasant material so he
takes the Peckinpah approach: he throws everything up in the air without
sorting any of the details or characters (Metcalfe dedicates the film to Sam
Peckinpah). For instance, why would a Jewish prison guard be interested in a
character like Carl? What about the other inmates? And why is Carl depicted as
devoid of human feeling only to turn into a compassionate, saintly figure by
the end of the film? And why is Lili Taylor's cameo so much more effective than
anything else in the movie? 
"Killer" is ambiguous, dull, and uninteresting; the narrative structure is so
sloppily fragmented that it will give you a migraine. The actors give forced,
listless performances, especially the unconvincing Robert Sean Leonard ("Dead
Poets Society"). For a look at Woods's more subtle, less maniacal roles, check
out "True Believer," "Cop" and "The Boost." Anything's better than this tripe.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with questions, concerns, or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com 

Title
Review for Eyes Wide Shut (1999)
A common criticism of Stanley Kubrick's work is that he is cold, calculated,
unfeeling and detached. Most of these charges are unwarranted - he is not aloof
but merely observing events as they unfold and doing so with an intellectually
emotional distance while involving the audience. "Eyes Wide Shut," the late
director's last work, is strangely more emotional and less distant than his
last couple of films, and it is a return to the intimacy between people that he
explored so masterfully in "Barry Lyndon." 
The film opens with a shot of a woman, Alice Hartford (Nicole Kidman), entering
a room and removing her black dress from a distance. The shot is so perfect and
beautiful that it establishes Kubrick's theme immediately - we can observe
sexuality but from a distance. As it turns out, Alice is married to Dr. Bill
Hartford (Tom Cruise) and he will not acknowledge her presence or her looks by
looking at her - his eyes are wide shut. She asks: "How do I look?" He
responds: "You look fine" while adjusting his bow tie. She says: "You are not
even looking." 
A moment later, they are leaving their daughter with a babysitter as they go to
a garish, ostentatious Christmas party given by their good friend, Victor
Ziegler (Sydney Pollack). Bill ends up wooing two women at the party and coming
very close to a threesome affair. Alice drinks and dances with a charming
Hungarian playboy who seduces her with talk about "The Art of Love," galleries
and paintings. Both are interrupted or prevent themselves from indulging in
carnivorous sex. Bill is interrupted by Victor's secretary, and Alice excuses
herself and insists that a wedding ring makes all the difference. 
Bill and Alice arrive home, and she alarmingly senses that Bill may have slept
with the two voluptuous beauties. Bill says he wouldn't and knows she would
never commit adultery. Alice is angry and confesses that she came close to
walking away from her future family life for a sailor. Bill leaves the house,
confused and upset and engages in an evening of missed sexual opportunities -
all the while he fantasizes Alice's supposed infatuation with a sailor. 
"Eyes Wide Shut" may sound like any other sexual mystery potboiler but coming
from Stanley Kubrick, you know it will not be. And it isn't at all, nor should
it be erroneously considered soft-core pornography (similar charges pervaded
Atom Egoyan's "Exotica"). It is about the allure of sex, the possibility of
sexual encounter - in other words, this film is all foreplay and circumstance.
Save for a masked orgy sequence, there are no sex scenes in Kubrick's latest
odyssey. We are briefly shown a sexually charged and erotic scene where Alice
and Bill are kissing and fondling each other while she stares at the mirror
accompanied by Chris Isaak's great song, "Baby Did a Bad, Bad Thing." That's
about as close to eroticism as the film gets. 
It is indeed an odyssey - it is a journey into Bill's fears and insecurities
about Alice's sexual fantasies. During two days and nights, he finds himself in
one sexual encounter after another. From a sweet prostitute named Domino to the
aforementioned masked orgy to a Lolita-like underage girl in bras and panties
(Leelee Sobieski) to a dead patient's daughter who flirts with him to am
excited hotel desk clerk to a homophobic gang, and so on. Meanwhile, we get
black-and-white images of Alice's romp in the hay.
Based on Arthur Schnitzler's "Traumnovelle," "Eyes Wide Shut" is a fascinating
film because it is so voyeuristic - it could easily have been helmed by a
talented artist like Roman Polanski. In fact, there are correlations between
this film and Polanski's superb "Bitter Moon" - the presentation of sex and its
hidden pleasures to the protagonist as played by Hugh Grant mirror Bill's.
There is also a strong similarity to the over-the-top yet frighteningly real
"L'Enfer" by famed director Claude Chabrol which also dealt with jealousy and
sexual frustration. 
>From the opening frame to the last, I was completely mesmerized and involved by
"Eyes Wide Shut." Every shot is beautifully realized, composed and brilliantly
photographed. We see lots of brightly and dimly lit Christmas trees, references
to what lies "where the rainbow ends," sexual mind games and deceit at every
turn of events, nude paintings obscured by characters (echoes of "A Clockwork
Orange"), slightly canted angles to delineate tension and perhaps frustration -
everything in some form or another refers to sex in some way. Kubrick has never
shown sex, and the less we see the more we are compelled by the dreamlike
quality of the film's journey into the heart of darkness - the realization that
jealousy in a marriage is inevitable and perhaps necessary. 
"Eyes Wide Shut" also has a wonderful cast. Tom Cruise eschews his trademark
boyish smile (except for the opening scenes) for long stares usually at a low
angle (A Kubrick motif). His slow descent into anger is thrilling to watch, and
one of his most quixotic moments of his career is when he confronts his friend
Ziegler and discovers the true nature behind his own adventurous and nocturnal
activities. 
Nicole Kidman has become a first-rate actress, and her mood swings are
something to behold. I also liked her laughing fit at Bill's remarks that he
would not sleep with his patients - when was the last time that a character
laughed at Tom Cruise? Her final moment of realization about their marriage is
stunning - this woman should be nominated for an Oscar. 
Also worth mentioning is Sydney Pollack's quietly decadent millionaire
character Ziegler - he is more fierce and yet just as restrained as he was in
"Tootsie" or "Husbands and Wives." Vinessa Shaw displays a sweetness and
sexiness not often seen on the silver screen, and she plays a prostitute! Rade
Serbedzija ("Before the Rain") has one of the sole moments of comic relief as
the owner of the Rainbow, a costume shop, who asks the good doctor for advice
about his balding spot. Todd Field is also engaging as the piano player Nick
Nightingale who plays blindfolded at some musical events. 
If I have one or two gripes about Kubrick's long, difficult and splendid film,
it is the abrupt ending and the inclusion of a character that would have been
better omitted or replaced by another actor. The ending is optimistic (a rarity
in any of his films) but somehow feels rushed. Still, this is among the late
master's finest films, preferable to the pretensions of "The Shining" or "Full
Metal Jacket." "Eyes Wide Shut" easily stands among such giants as "A Clockwork
Orange," "Paths of Glory" or "2001." It is a bizarre, strangely moving and
enlightening film guaranteed to provoke as much controversy as any of his other
works. Stanley, you may be gone, but we are glad you came back with one of the
best films of your career. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with questions, comments, or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or
Faust667@aol.com 

Title
Review for Frequency (2000)
Time-travel can be an exciting arena for the cinema because it defies all logic
and pretense. After all, it does not seem feasible that we can travel backwards
in time, but the very notion does bring up all kinds of strange paradoxes, as
does traveling forward into the future. But then you have a film like
"Frequency" which asks not so much to defy logic but to defy reason. 
Consider the premise of the film. You have a sullen cop named John Sullivan (Jim
Caveziel) who removes an old ham radio from his closet. He plays with it and
discovers one night that he can communicate with his father (Dennis Quaid). Here
is the catch: John's father, a dedicated firefighter, died in a horrific blazing
fire while in the line of duty. So it is John in 1999 having conversations with
his dad who is alive and well in 1969! How can this be? Can it be the strange
forms of lights in the night sky that are causing a break in the space-time
continuum? Or, to be more radical, could it be that it is all in John's mind?
Nevertheless, we are left with suspending logic temporarily since John realizes
his father will die in that fire within a few days in 1969, just before the Mets
play their first game in the World Series! Can John prevent his father from
dying in the past? And wouldn't that rupture the space-time continuum? 
I am willing to suspend disbelief at the cinemas as much as everyone else, but
there is something horribly wrong from the get-go. Though the story is not
possible by any stretch of the imagination, in terms of just pure scientific
reasoning, how could John be talking to his father from the past? Would that not
be changing the future at all just based solely on that premise alone? And how
can John only feel that the future has changed until his father changes the past
at the approximate time that coincides with the time in the future? Why should
that matter? And if everything can be erased as it is with (*SPOILER*) John's
father surviving the fire, then how can John feel an alternate time line
existing when no one else can? Just a matter of logic and reasoning based on the
filmmaker's rules. Stephen Hawking would have a field day with all this. 
All paradoxes aside, the basic problem with "Frequency" is that I never believed
the relationship between John and his father. Simply put, there is no chemistry
between Dennis Quaid and Jim Caveziel - they do not make a fitting father-son
combo. And frankly all the time paradoxes, and an implausible serial-killer plot
to boot, distract from the emotional connection to the story which is simply
about a father and son trying to communicate. Added to that is the lack of an
explanation about Jim's girlfriend, who leaves him at the beginning, and then
does not recognize him later after the past had been changed. A little nod to
"It's A Wonderful Life" to be sure, but the subplot is left dangling like an
unexposed wire in a time machine, and thus she is never seen or heard from
again.
If nothing else, it is a pleasure seeing Dennis Quaid back to his clever, sly,
cocky self - sort of a grown-up version of his character in "Dreamscape." He is
often like a live wire, ready to explode at any moment (the opening sequence
where he survives a fire is followed by Martha Reeves' "Heatwave.") "Frequency"
is too just too low on the voltage meter to follow Quaid's live-wire act. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Boogie Nights (1997)
Don't be put off by the title: "Boogie Nights" is one of the most vivid,
tantalizing and unconventional American films of the past few years. It is
intense, dazzling filmmaking by 26-year-old director Paul Thomas Anderson
("Hard Eight") and it is guaranteed to give him a major boost in the world of
film and in his career. Yes, folks, he's that good. 
"Boogie Nights" is an epic tale of the porno industry in the 1970's and early
1980's, and how it affected the lives of the actors, directors and everyone
else involved in the making and production of what is now a billion dollar
industry. Burt Reynolds, in what may be his finest role since Deliverance, is
surprisingly credible and understated as a porn director named Jack Horner who
yearns to make this industry respectable. One night at a disco, he discovers a
potentially hot star in the form of a waiter, Eddie Adams (the extraordinary
Mark Wahlberg). Jack talks to Eddie and tries to entice him into becoming one
of his actors. Eddie is reluctant but decides it may not be such a bad idea.
 The naive Eddie is nineteen years old and lives at home with his domineering
parents who pressure him into going to school. Every night he practices some
kung-fu moves in front of his mirror and his Bruce Lee and Cheryl Tiegs posters
- Eddie aspires to be one of them. He gets the chance with Jack, and shortly
becomes an overnight success. He becomes Dirk Diggler, the biggest porn star in
the business. "That's a catchy name," says Jack.
After a while, Eddie moves into Jack's home and becomes part of his unusual
"family," which includes Jack's leading lady star Amber Waves (the always great
Julianne Moore) who will gradually become Eddie's maternal co-star, and an
energetic blonde named Rollergirl (Heather Graham - an actress who keeps you on
the edge) who will remove all her clothing for a sex scene except for her
roller skates. The house becomes a haven for excess in the numerous drug
parties and the sexual dalliances in the bedrooms. Eddie is immersed in this
world and loves all of the excess and addictions, particularly the addiction to
cocaine that leads to his downfall. This is the heavenly dream of the 1970's
party scene - to indulge in drugs and sex forever.
The world of porn filmmaking is one aspect that writer-director Anderson does
not fully explore. He shows us only glimpses, such as the scenes where Eddie
does his first sex scene with Amber demonstrating how the crew maintains their
composure while the sex gets hot and heavy. Amber even tells Eddie to come
inside her thereby ruining the close-up come shot in a hysterically funny
scene. What Anderson is really interested in is the effect porn has on the crew
members and the actors: there's a credible section involving one crew member
(William H. Macy) who sees his wife, a porn star, continually having sex with
other men at parties or on the street in plain view. She has become addicted to
sex, but he has not because he doesn't allow it to become a part of his life.
 Eddie's rise and fall and rise again are the most startling chain of events
in the movie - he becomes so heavily addicted to cocaine that he is fired by
Jack on the set due to his temper tantrums. Eddie begins to lead a life of drug
deals, homosexual encounters in parking lots, and finally a nearly fatal
encounter with a rich drug addict where firecrackers are exploding and the song
"Jessie's Girl" by Rick Springfield plays in the background while he and his
pals are getting ready to rob the guy. It's a no-win situation and it shows
that if sex is no longer an addiction for Eddie, then the gratification
pleasure of his drugs is.
 "Boogie Nights" has a similar structure to Scorsese's "GoodFellas" and
"Casino" in the stylistic camerawork and editing, and the two-act structure
where we see the eventual rise leading to the downward abyss where nothing is
left except...more excess. The transition from the decadent 70's of
promiscuity, endless blissful fun and halter tops to the nastier, more violent
era of the 80's, where all that bliss and decadence peter out (Jack has to
resort to making porno on video because it is cheaper), is handled flawlessly
by the deftly written screenplay and the audacious, engaging narrative
structure. Anderson's point is that those who survive in the 80's, including
Eddie, will still succumb to their initial addictions because that is all they
have. 
"Boogie Nights" is a garish, violent, unsentimental, alternately funny,
humanistic and intricately layered film that will stay with you. It has no
particularly likable characters, easy resolutions or sentimental situations.
What it does brilliantly, though, is to make us empathize with the characters
and with the crucial decisions and surprising events that take place in their
lives, and how they learn to cope with their emotions and move on. "Boogie
Nights" is about as pure a cinematic treat as you're likely to get. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or
Faust667@aol.com 

Title
Review for Crash (1996)
The controversial "Crash" is the darkest and most twisted film to come out of
David Cronenberg in years. The film stars James Spader as a commercial
producer, James Ballard, who is married to a attractive, sexy woman, Catherine
(Deborah Kara Unger). They indulge in their own sex fantasies: James has sex
with his female assistants, and she carresses the cold surfaces of jet
airplanes with her nipples. Then James gets into a fatal car accident and kills
a passenger. The driver, Helen Remington (Holly Hunter), survives and becomes
attracted to James. They start having sex in almost any wrecked car they find.
Helen introduces James to Vaughan (Elias Koteas), the high priest of auto
wrecks who recreates famous car crashes such as James Dean's and Jayne
Mansfield's. Then they meet Gabrielle (Rosanna Arquette), a cripple who has a
huge gash on her leg resembling a vagina. James and Catherine get sucked into
this weird cult where a car crash or a video of a car crash equals sexual
pleasure.
"Crash" is not an easy film to watch nor should it be. It shouldn't be
dismissed as pornographic either since there are no gratuitous sex scenes - it
isn't erotic or thrilling, just plain twisted. My interpretation of it is that
these people need to feel pleasure in their sexual encounters and they do it by
getting into car wrecks - it feeds their drive and lust. There are really no
performances in this movie, the actors just simply react to each other with
looks and glances and sexual gestures (Hunter seems out of her element in her
less than hypnotic stares). You will not identify with any of these people or
remotely like them. So why see this movie? Because it is challenging,
stimulating and provocative. The tears in Catherine's eyes at the end of the
film indicate that this sex game may have gone too far. Like Cronenberg's
"Videodrome" and his recent "eXistenZ," it will make you feel icky, unsatisfied
and uneasy for days on end. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with comments, suggestions or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at 
jerry@movieluver.com 

Title
Review for Nightmare on Elm Street 4: The Dream Master, A (1988)
The Freddy Krueger craze in the late 80's grew and grew, and "Nightmare on Elm Street 4" proved to be no exception in proving the popularity. It was, and still is, the biggest hit of the series. There were more spectacular deaths, more Freddy one-liners, and there was the hit song "Put Your Mouth on Me". 
The film starts with the three surviving Elm Street kids brought together into a nightmare thanks to Kristen (played this time, with less conviction than Patricia Arquette, by singer Tuesday Knight). Ken Sagoes (reprising his role from Part 3) inadvertently resurrects Freddy in a car lot with the help of his dog Jason and some flaming urine (!). Now Freddy kills the remaining Elm Street kids and is after some fresh blood, or else the movie would be over. Enter the Carrie-like Alice (Lisa Wilcox) who has premonitions and walks around in a trance. She's the only one who can destroy Freddy, and since he kills most of her friends, she acquires their strengths and becomes a formidable opponent for the big showdown in an abandoned church.
It is obvious that the series began to have less and less of the dark atmosphere of the Wes Craven original, and more of Freddy's demented criminal acting as a jokester. Still, this one is creatively designed and imaginatively directed by Renny Harlin ("Die Hard 2"). Check out the best scene in the film: Alice walks into a theatre showing "Reefer Madness" and dreams that she floats into the movie-within-the-movie, "Purple Rose of Cairo"-style. There she finds a nearly-abandoned diner where Freddy serves "Soul Pizza". 
The movie is strictly by-the-numbers and, although not as good as Part 3, it is still the most visually enthralling of the entire series. After the silliness of "Wes Craven's New Nightmare," I hear that "Freddy vs. Jason" may possibly bring back Alice. We can only hope. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Vita  bella, La (1997)
Roberto Benigni is the modern-day Chaplin - quixotic, energetic and clownish.
He's always surrounded by societal misfits and higher-ups who want no part of
him, yet Benigni always finds a way to immerse himself in their company and
conform to society's expectations, all the while still remaining buffoonish.
"Life is Beautiful" is his latest film as writer-director, but this time he's
confronted by a deeper reality - the Holocaust. 
Benigni stars as Guido, a Jewish-Italian buffoon who continually runs into a
pretty schoolteacher (Nicoletta Braschi), whom he desperately longs for. The
first time, he confronts her at a farm where he makes off with some eggs. Then
he makes a merry trip to one of the picturesque villages of Tuscany, seeking
employment as a waiter and living with his uncle. 
Of course, he keeps running into the schoolteacher, who admires his
persistence. In one incredibly riotous scene, Guido impersonates an official
who is to lecture a class about races. Guido makes such a spectacle of himself
by undressing in front of the class and making observations about racism that
practically had me falling out of my seat laughing. Guido finally wins the
teacher's heart, and they get married, have a son, and run their own bookstore.
During the last hour of the film, Guido and his son are captured by the Nazis
and taken to a concentration camp. It is here where Guido tries to convince his
son that it is all a game, a contest played by military-style officials where
the grand prize is a real tank! 
The first hour of "Life is Beautiful" is sweet and comical, among Benigni's
finest moments on screen. It is on par with the rampant silliness of "Johnny
Stecchino." The second half is not as ingenious, and I think mainly because
Benigni chose a subject that is difficult to take on any comic level. 
The notion is that Guido tries to shelter his son from the horrors of the Nazi
death camps by accentuating that it is all a game, a farce that can be reckoned
with. In doing so, Benigni has removed all the inhumanity and horror from the
Holocaust - he turns it into another one of Guido's comical pranks. 
Some of it is successful - I like the scene where Guido serves as translator
for a German commandant who explains what the duties of the prisoners are in
the camps. There is also a brief moment where Guido sees a mountainous hill of
corpses, all photographed as if they were a glass painting. 
By the end of the film, though, the theme of survival and sacrifice is lost
when we don't really see what was lost or gained from the experience. It
doesn't help that the camps and their surroundings are photographed in the same
colorful, picturesque quality as the Tuscan village scenes. 
"Life is Beautiful" is a paradox in theory - it presents the Holocaust as a
fairytale, and expects us to laugh along with Guido. If we had seen it from
Guido's son's point-of-view, the comical scenes would have worked better. His
son surely would have had his own wild-eyed view of one of the century's
greatest atrocities. And the last scene of the American tank arriving at the
camps reeks of Spielbergian sentiment. 
In general, "Life is Beautiful" does so many things right, and is often
wonderful and touching. Benigni is one of the few uncommonly pleasurable actors
in the movies today, and he has agreeable chemistry with his real-life wife
Braschi ("Down By Law"). It was a mistake, though, to transcend the meaning of
the Holocaust by turning it into a farce. 
The movie doesn't have the atmosphere or the sardonic pull of the similar Lina
Wertmuller classic, "Seven Beauties," which accepted the reality of the war and
had the superb comic actor Giancarlo Giannini at its center, saving his own
life by sleeping with the commandant. Sure, we all make sacrifices, but
sometimes we need to see what we're making them for. 
For more movie reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or comments at jerry@movieluver.com or
at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Jeepers Creepers (2001)
I might give more credit than deserved but I must declare that "Jeepers
Creepers" is, despite lapses in logic and plot holes big enough to drive a semi
through, alternately chilling and frightfully good entertainment. It is a hark
back to movies like "Fright Night" and "Return of the Living Dead" where good,
scary thrills and chills, not to mention characters we care about, were central
to our enjoyment. 
The film begins in an ominous tone recalling the open roadways out in the middle
of nowhere of "The Texas Chainsaw Massacre." We see two kids in the car, Trish
(Gina Philips) and her younger brother, Darryl (Justin Long), leaving for spring
break from college and headed home. There is the usual banter between siblings
about former boyfriends, dirty laundry, parents and urban legends. One
particular legend is about a prom couple that died out in the same road they are
driving on - they were found minus a head and a body. Suddenly, a roaring,
tootin truck that seems to have come out of hell chases them and nearly runs
them over. The truck disappears but later, Darryl spots a cloaked figure dumping
bodybags down a silo. The upshot is that the very same truck that almost killed
them is also there. Instead of continuing on their way home, Darryl decides to
go back to the church and find if anyone is alive in those bodybags. What
happens next is often terrifying, eerie and blackly comical - almost a
horror-comedy 
but not quite. 
"Jeepers Creepers" is sometimes uneven as it awkwardly balances itself between
humor and horror. The first half-hour, however, is great, terrifically chilling
fun since we are not sure where the movie is headed. When Darryl ends up in the
basement of the church, he finds bodies stitched together and decorating the
walls like the Sistine Chapel. We sense the killer is out there and that he
could be in the basement. The question is: what is this killer? In the credits,
he is known as the Creeper whose murderous strategy is taken from the lyrics of
the song "Jeepers Creepers." He is also able to drive a mean truck at fast
speeds and materialize from one place to another. 
Director Victor Salva ("Powder") does a splendid job of crafting what would
normally be a poor man's Clive Barker freakshow. Salva knows how to milk
suspense out of deserted roadways, dark basements, silhouetted scarecrows, black
crows, and so on. Most of the movie is saturated in atmospheric details, a nice
respite from slasher film cliches and postmodernist winking. There is a great
moment where the Creeper assumes a scarecrow position. I also like the constant
birdcalls from the crows, a reminder that death is nearby. 
Surprisingly, the acting by the two leads is astonishingly good. We are not
talking about prettified teens from the Freddie Prinze and Sarah Michelle Gellar
school. Gina Philips and Justin Long create credible teenagers facing an
unknowing, evil force. Their bickering, bantering moments are upstaged by
moments where they simply talk to each other, understanding and sizing each
other up. The film spends at least fifteen to twenty minutes establishing their
characters and that is a noble achievement in this day and age of soulless teen
characters who make self-reverential horror movie statements. 
"Jeepers Creepers" would have benefitted from tighter pacing towards its
conclusion, less of a Psychic Lady character who gives away too much
information, and less of the cops who try to kill the Creeper at the police
station. I would have loved to learn more about the bodies that decorate the
walls of the church and more of the Creeper's superhuman abilities. We are
unsure of what to make of this creature nor do we know its ultimate goal. But
that is part of the fun of "Jeepers Creepers" - its vagueness supplies the
chills, especially in the final, haunting shot. Watch out for those peepers!
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Wishmaster (1997)
There is one great shot in the hopelessly overwrought "Wishmaster." It is a 
quick shot but definitely a keeper. The heroine of the film, Alex (Tammy 
Lauren), visits the well-kept house of a curator (Robert Englund). He shows 
her various historic, priceless statues, including one of Pazuzu! Yes, the 
very same one from "The Exorcist," though perhaps smaller. It is a great 
shot, and one of mystery, allure and introspection, all the things the rest 
of "Wishmaster" is not. 
The titled character is an evil genie, also known as the Djinn (Andrew 
Divoff, who played the anonymous biker villain in "Another 48 HRS."), who is 
ready to wreck havoc on the world by granting people their innermost wishes 
and desires. The trouble is that he takes their simple wishes and exploits 
them in an evil manner. For example, he grants a wish to a homeless man who 
wishes the rude pharmacy manager would contract cancer and die. The Djinn 
grants the wish, yet the manager grows pale and dies within a few minutes 
after the wish is granted. Surely the homeless man did not mean to do that!  
Alex, the jewel expert, inadvertently unleashes this evil spirit from a fire 
opal and, in a nod to "Nightmare on Elm Street 4," she can feel pain each 
time a victim falls prey to the genie. She has to grant him three wishes and 
in return, he gets to destroy the world or rule it or whatever he plans to do 
with it. 
"Wishmaster" could have been an enjoyable, highly moralistic little horror 
film if done with some imagination and taste. Instead it feeds on buckets of 
gore to make its exclamatory points about why you should think about the 
wishes you make before making them. The film quickly grows ponderous and 
silly, particularly with the Wishmaster's tired one-liners (do genies truly 
utter four-letter words? Haven't they been around long enough to make more 
snappy remarks?) Divoff is convincingly menacing as the Djinn but he even he 
grows tiresome. Here's a wish: I wish Wes Craven would direct the films he 
produces.    
P.S. Buck Flower plays the toothless homeless man in "Wishmaster," a similar 
role to his Bread character in the "Back to the Future" movies where he also 
played a homeless man. Alluding once again to the "Exorcist," Flower has a 
similar line to the homeless man in that film: "Hey, can you help an old 
altar boy? I am Catholic." Sacrilege!
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Scream 2 (1997)
"Horror movie sequels suck," says a film student at one point. "The entire
horror genre was destroyed by sequels." I couldn't agree more considering the
junk that preceded the original "Scream" such as "Halloween: The Curse of
Michael Myers" or "Wes Craven's New Nightmare" to name a few. I approached
"Scream 2" with the same kind of dread: why make a sequel to a self-referential
movie that didn't exactly ask for a follow-up? Surprisingly, "Scream 2" is that
rare sequel that is far superior to the original in every aspect - it is
wittier, funnier, bloodier and, double surprise, more cunning and clever. It's
also a more effective commentary on teens and twentysomethings who get wrapped
up in the mundane slasher/horror films of yesteryear. 
"Scream 2" brings back Sidney (Neve Campbell), the strong screaming heroine
from the original Scream, who now has a new boyfriend (Jerry O'Connell), and is
attending a midwestern school called Windsor College. This time, she has
caller-ID and can tell when someone is playing a prank on her. Jamie Kennedy is
also back as the geeky survivor from the original who is now a geeky film
student at the same college. All is well until someone dressed in the Edvard
Munch-like mask and black cape begins to stalk the streets again. The killer is
now hacking off girls at the college's sorority, a group whom Sidney wisely
decided not to join (Shades of "Black Christmas"). The corpses begin to pile up
forcing tabloid reporter/superstar Gale Weathers (Courteney Cox) to unwisely
report on the murderous news, once again. These incidents also bring the former
police officer Dewey (David Arquette), another survivor from the original, back
to visit his old friends and to rekindle his romance with the unwilling Gale.
And we also see Liev Schreiber (he had a brief cameo in "Scream") as the
wrongly convicted Cotton who's looking for a little pay back.
"Scream 2" might seem like just another slasher picture with better actors, but
it is more than that - it manages to be a sequel-within-a-sequel film that
keeps referring back to itself in clever, original ways. For example, we see
that Gale's book on the events in the first film had been made into a feature
film called "Stab." We see clips from the film starring Heather Graham ("Boogie
Nights") in the Drew Barrymore role, and Tori Spelling as Sidney, an actress
whom the real Sidney had scoffed at in the first film. And then we have the
coup de resistance: the opening sequence set in a movie theatre showing the
film "Stab" where most of the audience is in costume waving fake knives.
However, the real killer may be somewhere in the theatre. 
And there are the requisite in-jokes and little asides. My favorite is when
Gale refers to her nude Website as her head on "Jennifer Aniston's body." I
also liked the scene where the geeky film student is talking to the killer on a
cell phone: "My favorite scary movie is 'Showgirls'. Very frightening." And the
aforementioned sequel discussion in film class is a classic. 
"Scream 2" is very effective in establishing its characters including Sidney,
the 90's horror version of Jamie Lee Curtis impressively played by Neve
Campbell, who still harbors certain doubts about the people in her life, such
as her boyfriend who may or may not be the killer. Campbell has several good
scenes, and she, once again, makes Sidney a sympathetic, heroic character. She
has a very moving scene where she is performing the part of Cassandra on stage
stalked by actors in demon outfits. One of them turns out to be the killer
wearing the mask, or was it just a hallucination? Courteney Cox is more
animated and hilarious, this time, as the media-obsessed Gale who has a
fixation on the killer and can't wait to see when he'll strike next. She has a
hysterically funny scene where she hires a new cameraman who's hesitant to work
for her because he might get killed like the last one. "He wasn't gutted. I
made that up. His throat was slashed," admits Gale. The cameraman's response:
"Gutted, slashed - the guy is not in the union anymore. Besides, brothers don't
last long in situations like this." Isn't that the truth? 
"Scream 2" is strictly by-the-numbers in terms of plot structure and story, but
it also tends to be unpredictable. There are the usual scares but some of them
are unexpected. Basically, it's a sequel about a sequel being made as we are
watching it - you can almost feel the giddiness in Gale's character as she
becomes aware that the events happening around her is good material for her
next book that will eventually be made into a movie sequel to "Stab." Get it?
"Scream 2" is part of the 90's postmodern movement where we are consistently
reminded we're watching a movie about a movie-within-a-movie.
Director Wes Craven still knows how to build suspense and thrills better than
any other horror director: the opening pre-credit sequence with Jada Pinkett as
a moviegoer at the "Stab" screening is one of the most frightening and
compelling scenes I've ever seen, certainly topping the Barrymore opening from
the original. Screenwriter Kevin Williamson, who also helmed the original, has
crafted a smarter, more character-oriented script with sharper dialogue and a
keener eye for detail. "Scream 2" also succeeds in pinpointing the problem of
teenagers and twentysomethings obsessed with violence in American movies today,
especially horror movies, and how many of them will blame the entertainment
industry for their own blood lust. 
"Scream 2" was easily one of the most entertaining movies of 1997, and it is
Wes Craven's best work since the original "Nightmare on Elm Street." Neve
Campbell and the whole cast bring a sense of humanity and pathos that
definitely makes this a cut above the rest. As a character rightly suggests at
the end of the film: "It's going to be one hell of a movie." 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Little Romance, A (1979)
Picture-postcard romances are not my cup of tea, particularly teenage or
coming-of-age romances. Therefore, it is with great enthusiasm that I report
that "A Little Romance" is one of the finest, most poignant picture-postcard
romances I have seen - genial and enlightening throughout. 
The film begins with a theatre showing clips from "Butch Cassidy and the
Sundance Kid." "True Grit," and "The Sting" laughably dubbed in  French. The
kid watching these American films is Daniel (Thelonious Bernard), a French kid
with eyes full of amusement at everything he sees (he would have been at home
in a Francois Truffaut film). Daniel emulates certain gestures and lines from
these American heroes, such as "bingo!" and "Here's looking at you kid." One
day, his class visits the film set of an American production starring Broderick
Crawford (exceedingly funny cameo). While Daniel observes the action, he
notices a girl reading a book rather than enjoying the action of filmmaking.
Her name is Lauren (Diane Lane, in her film debut), a lover of philosophy
books, who instantly senses something she likes about a kid who will carry her
books and has his own homespun philosophies on literature and American movies.
They start dating, meeting at subway stations, porno movie theatres, and
cavorting in front of the Louvre. Their dream is to go to Venice and kiss in a
gondola under a bridge where the church bells toll. This tall tale is told by
the supposedly worldly con artist (Laurence Olivier), who shares a train ride
with them to Venice after supposedly winning a bet at the races for the
lovebirds. 
"A Little Romance" moves swiftly from one episode to another, and it is the
charming performances by the three leads that engages us from the beginning.
Bernard and Lane have terrific chemistry, and we always hope that their
romantic fantasy is fulfilled. Lane in particular was already beginning to show
her flirtatious personality with her winks and frequent nods - quite a good
early performance. Bernard is also winning as Daniel, and evokes a smile that
is impossible to forget (say that about any recent child actors in the movies).
Olivier is at his hammiest and at his most assuredly comical - he obviously is
having a blast playing this fallible, elderly con artist and pickpocket. 
There are also brief supporting performances by Arthur Hill as Lauren's
agreeable father and Sally Kellerman as Lauren's nervous, flirtatious mother,
an actress who may be having an affair with a movie director (who looks like a
combination of Peter Bogdanovich and William Friedkin). She has a great line
when she shouts to Lauren proclaiming the move from France to "goddamned
Houston!" 
"A Little Romance" could have used more emphasis on Lauren's parents and
especially Daniel's father, who is practically left out of the film.
Nevertheless, this is an exceptionally sweet and uplifting film delicately
balancing between comedy and romance with unforced ease. And there is something
to be said about a film focusing on such smart kids with aspirations. Imagine
that. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, complaints or general comments at
Faust667@aol.com or at jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Killing, The (1956)
Stanley Kubrick's heist drama "The Killing" is one of the finest noir films of the 1950's, a film so deliberately wire-tight that it will leave exhausted and exhilarated. Its one of the most tense thrillers of all time, and likely to leave you gasping for air after it is all over. 
The film introduces us immediately to a host of characters, all involved in a big-time upcoming heist of a racetrack. Kubrick introduces the device of the omniscient narrator, a sort of "Dragnet"-like voice-over that is essential in understanding and following the structure of the story, particularly the time shifts in "Rashomon" style, atypical for that time. The narrator also comments on the actions of the characters, their timed schedules and documentary-like shot scenes of their initial preparations and confrontations with others while planning and partaking in this heist. 
Johnny Clay (Sterling Hayden) is the leader of this heist, a witless though direct and thorough professional thief and ex-con. He is ready to rob San Francisco's Bay Meadows Race Track of a cool two million dollars. This prodigious amount of money is to be split up between Clay and a crew that includes a former Greek wrestler and chess player, Maurice (Kola Kwarian); a psychopathic sharpshooter with a thick accent of some kind, Nikki (Tim Carey); a patrolman deep in debt (Ted de Corsia); a wimpy track cashier, George (Elisha Cook, Jr.); a track bartender, Mike O'Reilly (Joe Sawyer); and a wise old drunk, Unger (J.C. Flippen) - the latter has a touchingly real scene where Unger admits to Clay that he sees him as his own son. It is a motley crew to be sure, and the narrator makes it clear from the outset that this will be a botched, messy robbery, which they often are in the movies anyway. 
Kubrick was already beginning to show a smooth handling with his actors. Hayden says his lines with such dexterity and a fast-paced alertness that you must listen closely to keep up with him, as was the case later with Hayden's similar role in Kubrick's "Dr. Strangelove." He is tall, commanding, and takes no prisoners. 
Elisha Cook, Jr. has many great scenes, a handful of them are with his conniving wife, Sherry (played by the fabulous Marie Windsor). Their relationship shows a genuine love-hate bond where money is the driving issue, and there are the customary put-downs of her husband's behavior by Sherry (You've got a hole in your head.") 
I also enjoyed the scenes between the track bartender, Mike, and his invalid wife whom he promises to take better care of. All these scenes indicate not only the level of financial desperation in these men but also how far they are willing to go to protect their families. In the case of the stocky cop, his needs are to pay off a loan shark. The cashier George simply wants to give his wife a better life, and is thus dismayed to learn that money is all she cares about. 
"The Killing" has many twists and turns, and slowly the machinations of the plot become tighter and unfold faster once they approach the climactic robbery itself. We know the planned robbery will go wrong, but the steadfast pacing and controlled tension makes it amazingly tense to watch. The narrator knows what will happen and so do we, and part of the pleasure of the film is seeing the racetrack robbery from different perspectives. This was all unusual for its time, and led the way to Tarantino's own pulp stories, particularly "Reservoir Dogs," its most direct influence. 
There are so many great scenes and dialogue of such color and distinction that this film bears close relation with the classic noir "Double Indemnity" (Example: "You've got a big dollar sign where others have a heart.") "The Killing" is simply a huge improvement over Kubrick's former noir tale "Killer's Kiss." The music by Gerald Fried tightens the narrative screws and keeps us in suspense. The performances are extraordinary (including Vince Edwards as another small-time hood). The camerawork is astoundingly good (shot by Lucien Ballard, who used the widest camera lens at the time, a 25mm, for heightened reality). "The Killing" is high on my list of the most fatalistic of all noir tales, guaranteed to keep your stomach in knots from start to finish. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Mallrats (1995)
The sophomore slump for most first-time independent directors continues at a
steady rate. There was Steven Soderbergh's fabulous debut "Sex, Lies and
Videotape," which he followed up with the somber, deadening "Kafka." Robert
Rodriguez showed himself off to gross injustice with "Desperado," a terrible
sequel to his acclaimed "El Mariachi." If you give the first-time director more
money for his next effort, failure seems to seep in. Kevin Smith made an
astonishing splash in 1994 with his hilarious comedy "Clerks" - a film made on a
shoestring that has more laughs, insight and sharp one-liners than most
Hollywood comedies about Generation X-ers. "Mallrats," however, is an utterly
obnoxious, stupid and unworthy picture coming from someone who displayed such
promising potential. 
The film stars Jason Lee as Brodie, a loser with a grand collection of comic
books who would rather play Sega games than fondle his impatient girlfriend
(Shannen Doherty). She thankfully dumps him, thus Brodie takes out his
aggression by going to the mall with his best friend (Jeremy London), who also
got dumped on by his girlfriend (Claire Forlani). A big televised dating game
contest is taking place at the mall, and there are also some delicious cookies
to eat there as well. 
"Mallrats" begins as a comedy-of-manners between twenty-year-olds and ends up as
an insipid movie about losers with no direction or ambition in life. Yes, so was
"Clerks" but that had some fundamental truths and pointed humor. All you will
find in "Mallrats" are obscenities galore with not a shred of wit or comic
potential for any of the actors to play off of. There are two very good jokes -
one about the holographic paintings where the image is supposed to gradually
appear if you look long enough, and the other is about an Easter Bunny who is
mistakenly beaten up. Jokes about the "Star Wars" trilogy are tenuous and dated
at best. 
Kevin Smith's cumbersome, lazily written screenplay gives nothing for the
audience to chew on, and it doesn't help that there is a surprisingly lame cast
of actors. Firstly, Jason Lee (who has improved in later years) is so annoying
to watch on screen that I was waiting for him to drop dead. The wasted Shannen
Doherty is given nothing to do except smile, yell, and have sex with Jason Lee
in an elevator - Doherty was terrifically funny in "Heathers" if anyone cares
about her comic potential. A bald Michael Rooker is wholly miscast as the
producer of the dating game contest who vomits continuously through the last
third of the picture. This is supposed to be funny? The best bits are supplied
by "Clerks" returnees, Jay and Silent Bob (Jason Mewes and Kevin Smith), but
even they grow tiresome. A cameo by Marvel Comics creator Stan Lee shows
desperation rather than creativity. 
Kevin Smith is capable of making a funny comedy and he proved he was a talent to
watch for in his debut "Clerks." "Clerks" was a sharp, on-target look at wasted
youth yet it possessed a degree of intelligence. In "Mallrats," Smith unkindly
shows contempt for these idiots...and the audience. Sometimes, it is better to
laugh with the characters than to laugh at them.   
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for What Women Want (2000)
When I go to the movies as frequently as I do, I eavesdrop on people's responses. I can tell you that after I sat through a screening of "What Women Want," what women want is Mel Gibson, pure and simple. Gibson is often a delight to watch in this movie but he is not allowed to break loose and neither is most of the cast. What remains is an insipid, boring, snail-paced romantic comedy that trashes the outrageous concept it has in store. That can't be what women want. 
Gibson plays Nick Marshall, a self-important womanizer and ad executive (aren't they all in these kinds of movies?), who one day has a freak accident while trying out new women's products. Nick suddenly develops the ability to hear women's innermost thoughts (not to mention a female poodle!), their desires, wants, and essentially what they are really thinking when on a date or having sex or walking by him. Nick is annoyed at first at this magical new sense, but he learns to use it to his liking. He has his eye on the cafe waitress (played with alarming zing and smooth sex appeal by Marisa Tomei), who apparently wants Nick sexually. This works in Nick's favor, and the irony is that Nick has not changed much, he just knows what women want from him and he learns to listen to them as much as anything else. 
"What Women Want" has a terrific premise that is squandered by far too many subplots. There is the silly romance betweeen Nick and the new boss of the agency, Darcy Maguire (Helen Hunt), a position Nick had coveted. Hunt and Gibson have zero chemistry and so their romance barely lit my fire. 
Then there is the whole song-and-dance about Nick's teenage daughter whom he is trying to understand and come to terms with - there is even a cliched montage where she dresses up in various prom dances to the tune of a pop song. How many more of those do we need? 
And to add more insult to injury, there is the suicidal worker in the agency whose thoughts naturally register to Nick. Nick sees trouble and tries to save her but what the heck does any of this have to do with the movie's main focus on Nick's superb ability, often leading to bedding women? It just feels tacked on as a simple-minded moral statement about using one's uncommon gift to good advantage. Oh, please!
The problem is that "What Women Want" does not truly exploit its central idea - a man listening to and hearing women's thoughts is ripe for lots of imaginative scenes. And what if Nick had another freak accident and could hear men too? The possibilities are endless. Think of "Being John Malkovich" which took its idea of people entering the mind of Malkovich and milked it for all it was worth. The difference is that "What Women Want" doesn't have the courage of the former - it wants to be a chick flick where women can swoon over the close-ups of Gibson's face and restrained charm while he tries to romance Helen Hunt. Hunt is so vapid in this movie and Gibson becomes so monotonous in his comic delivery (save for the final scene between him and Tomei) that audiences, particularly women, are more likely to groan.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at jerry@movieluver.com 

Title
Review for Simple Plan, A (1998)
Once in a blue moon, a film will come along and will grab you by the throat and
never let go - it will also make you identify with actions committed by human
behavior under certain circumstances. "A Simple Plan" is that kind of film - a
rip-snorting, understated morality tale told with finesse and acute observation
by a director who's not known for restraint, Sam Raimi ("Darkman," "The Evil
Dead"). 
Bill Paxton stars as Hank Mitchell, an accountant for a small feed store in
the frozen tundra of Minnesota. Only this town is not populated by the
stereotypical denizens of "Fargo" - these are ordinary people about to be
overcome by extraordinary circumstances. Hank is an average, righteous Joe,
living a complacent, innocent existence with his wife, Sarah (Bridget Fonda).
Hank's fate lies in the woods when he's accompanied by his inarticulate
brother, Jacob (Billy Bob Thornton), and his alcoholic friend, Lou (Brent
Briscoe). The threesome inadvertently discover a small plane lodged in the
snow, and there appears a miracle in the form of a duffel bag: millions of
dollars in cash. Naturally, the three men are at odds of what to do with the
money - Hank decides he'll keep it since he's an accountant and can manage it.
The truth is that neither one knows how to deal with such a sticky situation.
Hank tells the boys to keep their secret quiet while he does just the opposite
- he tells his gleamy, smiling wife when he throws the cash on the table. Lou
is no better when he spills the beans to his shouting wife. The only one who
seems capable of maintaining secrecy is Jacob because he has no one to turn to
anyway, except his brother. 
"A Simple Plan" shows how men and women act when money enters their path, and
how their behavior changes drastically. This is not fresh cinematic territory -
it's Treasure of Sierra Madre in a frozen hell - but what's new is how
compellingly the story is told. Hank appears to be the hero of the story but
slowly he's consumed by random acts of violence, and we see that the money
means more to him than anybody else. Jacob also shows that he's not a complete
idiot, and we're never sure what his true agenda is outside of wanting to stay
in an old, decrepit house where their father used to live. Lou is a drunk who
teases Hank's manhood, and all he wants is some money to pay for late bills.
Only Hank's wife remains the solely sensible one of the lot - she makes the
decisions and tells Hank what course he (and the story) should take, and it
always, ironically, results in calamity. 
"A Simple Plan" is adapted from a 1993 novel by Scott B. Smith, who penned the
script as well, but this story does not unfold under expected pretenses, namely
countless twists and turns. Actually, the movie is not quite noir - you might
call it a bleak drama that transcends noirish expectations with its full-blown
character portrayals. There are still no heroes, but that's besides the point -
these people are undone by the money that slowly reveals layers in their
personalities. Amazingly, the money becomes less and less important to them as
the film rolls along to a horrific finale in the woods, unveiled with
unexpected, sudden shocks and a twist of fate unheard of in the movies in quite
some time.
Bill Paxton is sheer perfection as Hank, flawlessly wavering between
nervousness and anxiety. Is he as righteous as he thinks he is, or does he
possess a creepily violent side? Billy Bob Thornton cuts another rich
characterization with his dim-witted, stringy-haired, vague Jacob, who holds a
grudge against his brother, Hank, and who dreams of going on a date with a
simple gal. Bridget Fonda gives one of her finest acting jobs to date as the
intelligent Sarah who wants more out of her bland existence. She expresses her
rage in a touching, heartfelt speech where she expounds on unaffordable dinners
and coupons acquired to save money. 
"A Simple Plan" moves along at a controlled pace, involving us at every turn
and allowing us to empathize with each of the characters and their motives. The
script doesn't satirize nor condescend the characters. Instead, writer Smith
makes them believable and congruent to their actions. This is not just the
result of a stirring screenplay and weighty performances, but it is also due to
Raimi's simple, unpretentious direction. And the snowy landscape and muffled
sounds contribute greatly to the atmosphere - we really feel the literal
coldness of the surroundings, as in "Fargo." 
"A Simple Plan" may have an unsatisfying ending thematically whereas ambiguity
could have resulted in richer, deeper parallels. That is surely a minor carp
for a film that makes us realize the severe consequences that come with
criminal actions - we must always pay a price no matter how strong we are. 
Check out more reviews at JERRY AT THE MOVIES located at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/

Title
Review for Vampires (1998)
James Woods is such a volatile, energetic performer that he somehow makes every
film he's in his own, and does so by charging up the screen with tightly
controlled rage and tension. The same cannot be said for the turgid, monotonous
shenanigans of "John Carpenter's Vampires," a shallow film where Woods is
reduced to a one-dimensional sideshow attraction. 
"Vampires" is set in New Mexico, where Woods plays vampire hunter Jack Crow,
whose mission is to search and destroy vampire nests in the countryside. He's
assisted by an anonymous motley crew of professionals armed with crossbows,
shotguns, and fishing lines (so they can drag the vampires out into the sun).
Oh, and there's a priest who comes along to bless each burnt vampire corpse.
The master vampire, Valek (Thomas Ian Griffith) eludes them during one of their
raids. As an act of revenge, he visits a party they are at that same night and
slaughters nearly everyone of them except for Crow and his partner (numbingly
played by Daniel Baldwin). Crow is then hired by the Vatican to kill Valek and
any other vampire nests that may have developed. In the meantime, Valek's
mission is to find a cross that will enable vampires to walk the earth during
the day. 
"Vampires" could have been an old-fashioned B-movie with lots of gore and
witticisms courtesy of Crow and his crew. Once the crew is vanquished, though,
the movie loses focus and treads along cliched, charted territory. We get the
hooker (Sheryl Lee) who's bitten by Valek and can telepathically anticipate his
every move; the typical stake-in-the-heart theatrics (there must be more
original methods of killing vampires); the naive priest who turns out to be
heroic; and so on and so forth. As directed by Carpenter, this movie is
sluggishly paced and completely devoid of humor or horror. There's also an
anticlimactic ending that fails to deliver any thrills at all, surprisingly. 
There are some pluses. For instance, when the vampires emerge from the ground
(as opposed to coffins), it is spectacularly shot and very menacing. One can
also savor the former "Twin Peaks" star, Sheryl Lee, who brings an element of
empathy to her stereotypical hooker character - she's abused and slapped around
by Jack and his sidekick in such a manner that you can't help but care for her.
Griffith is perfectly cast as Valek, and he'd be great as Lestat ("Interview
with the Vampire") if anyone cares to make another film version of Anne Rice's
novels. I also enjoyed the musical score by Mr. Carpenter himself. 
This pseudo-horror western is not the first of its kind. I fondly remember the
cult film by director Kathryn Bigelow called "Near Dark," which also had a
western setting and an interesting central relationship between a vampire
couple. At least that movie moved along at a good pace. This one represents a
new low in Carpenter's career - he's lost the element of surprise. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with questions, concerns or comments at jerry@movieluver.com or at
Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Apt Pupil (1998)
Stephen King's novella "Apt Pupil," part of the "Different Seasons" short
stories, is probably one of his most ambitious recent efforts. It is the story
of a young boy's growing fascination with an SS officer living in a typical
suburban American town, but the movie version shies away from its basic premise
and becomes a slightly baroque Gothic thriller. 
The apt pupil is a blank-faced high school student named Todd Bowen (Brad
Renfro), who is obsessed with the Nazis' tortures of the Jews during the
Holocaust. After some Nancy Drew-type investigating, Todd discovers that a
local resident named Arthur Denker is really a former SS officer named Kurt
Dussander (Ian McKellen). One day, Todd visits the old man's house and, at
first, the old man denies the kid's charges. Finally, Dussander succumbs, and
is coerced by Todd into telling him the detailed atrocities he committed. If
Dussander complies, the kid will not tell the authorities his true identity
since he is on a wanted manhunt list. In one eerie scene, Dussander puts on his
SS uniform and marches until the kid insists that he stop. The comfort of evil
has struck again. 
"Apt Pupil" begins promisingly, and I thought the film was going to show the
grim reality of the war through the spoken words of a Nazi who was just
following orders (this was one of the novella's high points). The film begins
that way, but then the machinations of the plot take over. For example, we see
Todd's fascination and obsession seeping into his life when his high-school
grades deplete, he loses contact with his best friend ("Dawson's Creek's"
Joshua Jackson), and he dreams of gas showers. Then there's the nerdy guidance
counselor (a fine comic bit of casting by a mustached David Schwimmer), who
tries to determine the root of Todd's school problems. Todd's basketball
playing, ironically, is better than ever. These are all fine details that
should be explored, but the problem lies in the casting of the lead character. 
Brad Renfro ("The Client") exhibits a blank, emotionless, cold-eyed stare as
Todd throughout the whole film, making him less than interesting or obsessive.
I also didn't feel the tension building or developing between him and
Dussander, considering how the film tries to show that a kid can be induced
into evil. Mostly we get elements out of your typical Gothic horror/slasher
movie: there's Dussander struggling to place a kitten in an oven; the
unnecessary inclusion of a homeless man (Elias Koteas) who suspects that
Dussander has homosexual tendencies; a bloody murder scene with Wagner's tragic
excerpt from "Liebestod" suffusing the background; and Dussander's attempts to
pass off as Todd's grandfather. All of these elements diminish whatever power
the crucial central story had of a boy's fascination with evil. 
The one redeeming factor is the superb performance by Ian McKellen as the
weary, gentle, menacing Dussander, but the film shows him only as a
one-dimensional monster. During the war, the SS officers were given orders and
they had to uphold them, but they were still human beings performing atrocious
acts of inhumanity. If the film tried to maintain a human, empathetic level
with Dussander's role in the war - to see ourselves in the face of
incomprehensible horrors - then it would have been a more cunning portrait of
evil. As it stands, he's a monster, nothing more. Think of the similar role
played by Armin Mueller-Stahl in "The Music Box" - he did it with shards of
humanity and understanding. 
Director Bryan Singer ("The Usual Suspects") and writer Brandon Boyce throw in
too many complacent, cinematic flourishes instead of trying to deal with the
nature of evil and how it breeds in small-town America, especially in
adolescent boys. Singer would have been more apt at showing how evil cannot be
easily pigeonholed or traced - now that would have been scarily profound.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or comments at jerry@movieluver.com or
at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Pay It Forward (2000)
You have heard the concept before. You receive an e-mail or a letter in the mail
regarding a great new opportunity - you send one dollar to seven addresses and
they will send one dollar to seven others, and so on. Before you know it, you
will make thousands of dollars a month. The idea forms a chain or a pyramid
strategy, hence, chain letters. The reason the idea does not work is because it
feels like a rip-off, plus whose to say that people will follow through and pay
it forward. The film "Pay it Forward" wants us to believe that people repaying
acts of kindness for kindness done upon them can work if a kid makes them
believe in the idea. But how many people are genuinely kind enough to follow
through with such a plan? Do we want to be forced to act kindly? 
Consider the opening sequence of the film set in an elementary school. Trevor
McKinney (Haley Joel Osment), a seventh grader, listens attentively in class as
his social-studies teacher, Mr. Simonet (Kevin Spacey), gives an extra-credit
assignment for the semester. The class is to come up with a plan of action to
make the world a better place and follow through by performing said action.
Trevor devises an original plan: one person does an act of kindness for someone
and that person will pay it forward by helping three other people. A chain
reaction is expected as numbers will grow and before you know it, the world will
be at peace again. But there are flaws with such a plan, aren't there? Could
such a chain reaction occur with no money involved? There may be benefits if the
acts are reciprocated but what if they aren't? This movie never dares to
consider that certain people do not want to be helped or even want to act
kindly. 
For example, there is the homeless drug addict, Jerry (Jim Caviezel), who is
taken home by Trevor. We sense that Jerry is only interested in his next fix,
which he is, but he also claims that this kid has helped him to see the light
and get another chance at life. There is the homeless alcoholic (Angie
Dickinson), her own alcoholic daughter, Arlene, Trevor's mother (Helen Hunt),
who always keep a bottle stashed in her washer. There is also another drug
addict and a couple of school bullies. And then there is Mr. Simonet, who has
burn scars all over his body, uses "a lot of big words" and whom Trevor tries to
fix up with his mother, Arlene. Trevor hopes to at least help his mother and Mr.
Simonet, as well as his friend who is beaten up by bullies. He is trying to pay
it forward. Suddenly, a movement is born, or so it seems. 
"Pay it Forward's" structure is all over the place, as it jumps backwards and
forwards in time. We see a reporter (Jay Mohr) at a crime scene where his car is
nearly demolished. A lawyer sees him, and offers his Jaguar as compensation for
the reporter's loss. The lawyer is paying it forward, and thus begins the
reporter's quest to discover the origins of this movement. "Four Months Earlier"
is the title reminding us of where we are in time yet throughout the film, Jay
Mohr's character seems to occupy the same timeline as Trevor's, particularly
during the genesis of his plan. 
Time shifting is not this film's problem. A bigger flaw is the lack of time
spent on this ingenious plan, its pros and cons and so on. Too much time is
devoted to the silly romance between Mr. Simonet and Trevor's mother to the
point of nausea. Helen Hunt is astoundingly good as the trashy waitress but her
alcoholic mood swings seem too abrupt to really believe, or as abrupt as it
should be. She undergoes such a quick recovery that it hardly seems plausible
she was ever an alcoholic to begin with. Kevin Spacey is adequately restrained
as the scarred Mr. Simonet, and has all the best dialogue scenes. But hardly
much of this matters as much as Trevor's plan of action. We see samples of it
but not enough is balanced with the film's increasingly tepid romance, not to
mention the inclusion of Trevor's own father (Jon Bon Jovi) who appears and
disappears so fast that you'll forget he ever existed. I would also have liked
to have seen more of Dickinson's character or even Caviezel's.
Some have called "Pay it Forward" shamelessly manipulative and overly
sentimental. Some have called it touching. I just found the Spacey and Hunt
characters real and engaging yet they are mostly saddled with unrealistic
dialogue and shameless cliches, and the rest of the characters are mere
stereotypes. The film is strangely watchable but also devoid of real human
emotion, and plus there is a tragic, unbelievable coda that negates most of the
film's two hour running time. All in all, not terrible but too thin and
cliche-ridden to recommend to anyone, let alone three people. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at Faust668@aol.com
or at faustus_08520@yahoo.com

Title
Review for Rosemary's Baby (1968)
If schlocky horror director William Castle ("House on Haunted Hill") had
directed Ira Levin's bestseller "Rosemary's Baby," it would have had minor
shock effects and some scare tactics. It might even have included a hovering
demon baby and black carriage in the theatre! Such is the style of Castle (who
appears briefly in a phone booth scene) and the difference is lucidly
demonstrated in Roman Polanski's adaptation and direction of this chilling,
slow-paced horror film - a distinguished classic in a genre that has been
cheapened in the ensuing years by gore and more schlock.
"Rosemary's Baby" begins in New York City where a couple, Guy and Rosemary
Woodhouse (respectively played by the late John Cassevettes and Mia Farrow)
rent a high-rise apartment. They are introduced to their new home by the
superintendent (wonderfully played by Elisha Cook, Jr.).  Things go wrong from
the get-go.  There is a dresser obscuring a closet, voices and chants are
heard, various shadows are seen on walls, a young woman is found dead in the
street, and so on. The dead woman, a runaway, had lived with the next-door
neighbors, the Castavetts, who adopted her.  The Woodhouse couple meet the
next-door neighbors for dinner as a sign of respect, an affable old couple who
dress in loud outfits, Roman and Minnie Castavett (Sidney Blackmer and Ruth
Gordon). They are talkative, nosy people and have conflicting opinions about
Catholicism and the Pope. As they talk over dinner, the wise Roman curiously
remembers Guy's supporting role in the play "Luther": 'I was struck by a
gesture you made. It had a wonderful sense of authenticity'. Roman also seems
to have been a former businessman who has travelled all around the world.
Minnie is simply nosy, and almost every time she appears, Beethoven's "Fur
Elise" is playing in some tenant's piano.
While the film progresses, there is a growing feeling of something unnatural
about to take place. Rosemary undergoes physical and emotional changes in her
character, from cropping her hair in a "Vidal Sassoon" style to getting
pregnant. Her pregnancy is handled by two different doctors: one is Dr. Hill
(Charles Grodin), a "Charlie nobody" as Guy calls him, and there is the reknown
Dr. Saperstein (Ralph Bellamy) who prescribes herbal drinks and tanis root for
Rosemary. 
Meanwhile, Rosemary's husband Guy grows distant while successfully landing
numerous acting jobs, though he occasionally brings her flowers as a sign of
love. Her good family friend, Hutch (Maurice Evans), discovers that her
neighbors are in fact part of a coven of witches. That could explain the
scratches on Rosemary's back and some of her weird dreams where she is raped by
Satan (actually played by the late founder of the Church of Satan, Anton La
Vey)! Slowly, Rosemary begins to believe that the Castavetts are after her
unborn baby. 
Polanski places a great deal of ambiguity in "Rosemary's Baby" making us feel
as though Rosemary is simply paranoid and is imagining that there is a
conspiracy, and that her husband is one of the conspirators. There is a sense
of unease and unseen menace in the film thanks to Roman's claustrophobic
direction and cinematographer William Fraker's disorienting compositions (my
favorite being the hallway shot of Minnie making a phone call to Dr.
Saperstein, showing that she is partially obscured by the entrance door to the
bedroom so that we never see her face). Throughout the film, we are never sure
if the supposed coven of witches mean well or if they intend to do harm - could
they care a little too much about Rosemary? Is Guy's stoic demeanor a sign that
something is wrong? Could Hutch's suspicious be erroneous? Or is Rosemary going
crazy a la Catherine Deneuve's similar state of paranoia in Polanski's
"Repulsion"?
"Rosemary's Baby" was reviled by Catholic groups back in 1968, condemned for
its view of Satanism (maybe the shot of the Time magazine cover with the "God
is Dead" title did not help). Otherwise, it was critically well-received and
placed Roman on the star director map leading to many more Hollywood offers.
After more than thirty years, "Rosemary's Baby" still retains its implicit
power of genuine forces of evil unseen by Rosemary's eye, including the famous
final sequence which still rattles the nerves. For its unnerving sense of doom
and menace coupled with sharp doses of black humor, you can do no better than
this baby. This is Polanski at his devilish best. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or comments at faustus_08520@yahoo.com
or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Buffalo '66 (1998)
"Buffalo '66" is the type of film that serves as a reminder of those small,
lonely towns throughout America where you don't see or hear much, and the only
excitement to be found is maybe at a third-rate bowling alley or a pool table
at some tavern on a squalid street corner. In other words, a film about the
kind of places you know exist, but would never think of visiting - a place not
unlike Buffalo. Vincent Gallo's directorial debut "Buffalo '66" focuses greatly
on the squalid nature of such towns. 
The scrawny Gallo stars as Billy Brown, a young man released from prison after
six years for a crime he didn't commit. And what's the first thing Billy does
after exiting the prison's front gate? He asks the guard if he can use the
bathroom. This is something Billy tries to do for the first fifteen minutes of
the film, but he can't seem to find one. Finally, he relieves himself at a
tap-dance studio where he abruptly kidnaps a blonde, Lolita-like teenage
student named Layla (Christina Ricci), and threatens her with words like "Don't
wash the front windshield of the car like that!" 
Billy's motive for kidnapping Layla is to make her pretend she is his wife so
he can present her to his parents as a sign of maturity and responsibility. She
calmly agrees, but wonders if his parents will cook meat since she's a
vegetarian. When they arrive at his parents' house, they are greeted with
indifference and the cheerless dinner scene, an absolute riot to watch, is
beset by past humiliations, particularly when Billy is reminded that as a kid
he was allergic to chocolate doughnuts though his mother didn't care. 
"Buffalo '66" captures the seediness and icy coldness of Buffalo better than
any other film could, but it's deficient in the screenwriting department. Gallo
does a marvelous job of developing the hirsute antihero Billy, who is really
just a lost soul in search of something. I also liked the way he wrote and shot
the dinner table scenes, emphasizing the pain and dysfunction between Billy and
his parents by composing a wide spatial distance in the reverse angle shots
(the parents are superbly played by Ben Gazzara and Anjelica Huston). But the
film suffers by not divulging much information about Layla - who is this girl?
Is she a sexpot, a hooker, a forlorn dance student, an angel, or none of the
above? The cherub-like Ricci plays her with great sex appeal and perfect comic
timing, but she is much too enigmatic a character for my tastes - a nobody who
is still a nobody by the end. And the feel-good ending negates most of what
preceded it. 
Still, in an era of bland blockbuster phenomenons and clever post-modernist
horror flicks, "Buffalo '66" is surely different and it has an edge. It betrays
its own edginess and sense of anxiety, but it holds your interest right from
the opening black-and-white title credits to Gallo's imposing presence. He has
one of the more hauntingly expressive faces I've seen in a long time, and it
suggests anything but peace. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general comments at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Any Given Sunday (1999)
When it comes to Oliver Stone movies, they can either run hot or cold but, at
least, you are riveted by the images, the sounds, and the persuasive
performances. Oliver Stone's newest film, "Any Given Sunday," an epic parable
about football, has lots of visual razzle-dazzle to spare, plenty of
bone-crushing sound effects, and some temporarily persuasive performances. It
is also a complete comedown from the director, a relentlessly torpid mishmash
of montages within montages that will make you want to take some Valium to
relieve the massive headache you will get.
Al Pacino stars as Tony D'Amato, a veteran football coach of the fictional
Miami Sharks, who drinks too much, hollers too much, screws around with
prostitutes, and is getting too old for the game. A spoiled, bratty rich girl,
Christina Pagniacci (Cameron Diaz), the late team owner's daughter, starts
telling Tony to "hold it together, you bull-headed moron!" She wants control of
the game, but in more economic terms. Tony also has a young star quarterback,
Willie Beaman (Jamie Foxx), who is egoistic, has no team spirit, and is certain
that the game is his. He replaces the older, injured Jack "Cap" Rooney (Dennis
Quaid), who faces a wife (Lauren Holly) that demands he continue playing the
game for another couple of years. 
In fact, there are many characters in "Any Given Sunday," but so few are given
more than a few minutes onscreen at a time. The cast is eclectic (James Woods,
Ann-Margret, Matthew Modine, Jim Brown, Elizabeth Berkley) but there are only
traces of them. That leaves us with Pacino, an excellent actor, who is given
shards of a character to play, but without any depth or dimension. Cameron Diaz
does as well as she can, but like everyone else, she sort of drifts in and out
of the frame barely making an impression. This is akin to watching football on
television, the cast resembles nothing more than stick figures in Stone's
arena. 
The biggest problem lies with the editing. Stone has assembled footage in
extraordinary shifts of mood and excitement in films such as "J.F.K," "Natural
Born Killers," and "U-Turn," but here, it is the shift of one close-up shot
after another in rapid succession. This often feels like super MTV, shots and
whole sequences are so choppily edited that they leave a feeling of gradual
disorientation. The worst of it is during the actual football games. Instead of
showing us the mechanics and strategies of playing between the offense and
defense, we get close-ups of bodies flying through the air, lots of physical
poundings and flips, and twisting footballs, but no sense that any of this is
being played on the field. In other words, we never get a panoramic sense of
the field itself, and so everything is a blur, leaving us wondering as to what
exactly is happening on screen. To top it off, there are numerous montages
within montages, clouds speeding through the horizon, and the usual moonlight
shots, which Stone has shown us before. All this is draining to watch, and one
loses interest quickly. 
It is also hard to judge the actors in the film since they are cut-and-pasted
in such randomness that Stone barely lets a take run longer than three seconds.
A theme is hidden somewhere in this mess about how football players have no
education and have nothing else to offer besides great games and reaping in
lots of profits. But all is lost in Stone's grandiose style that, for the first
time in his career, has no true rhyme or reason (celebrityism and lifestyles of
the players, not to mention physical abuses of their bodies, are given minimal
exposure). The overall effect is blurry, and casts a pale shadow of the once
great Oliver Stone. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or comments at jerry@movieluver.com or
at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Pulp Fiction (1994)
"Pulp Fiction" is one of the most pleasurable movies I have seen in a great
while, and it will stand as the breakthrough movie of the 90's. It is a love it
or hate it deal - either you admire the artistry of Quentin Tarantino's dark
flourishes or you detest the sickening violence and brutality inherent
throughout. Not only is the title "Pulp Fiction" a household name but so is
Quentin Tarantino, a video store clerk who never went to film school and became
an overnight success directing 1992's gory "Reservoir Dogs." All the attention
is not for naught; "Pulp Fiction" is a great film that breaks new ground, is
politically incorrect and unconventional. Tarantino has not so much reinvented
film as much as he has rejuvenated it - he has brought back the sheer joy we
all share of watching a good movie. The last time this phenomenon occurred was
with the Steven Spielberg masterpiece, "Raiders of the Lost Ark."
"Pulp Fiction" won the Golden Palm award at the Cannes Film Festival in 1994
and won the Best Original Screenplay award at the Oscars. Since the film's
release, "Pulp" has stirred great controversy over its obscenities, short
bursts of bloody violence, racist overtones, sexual abuse and rape, and
misogyny. All of these charges are largely silly because there is more violence
and misogyny in the cartoonish "True Lies" and "Forrest Gump" than in "Pulp"
(all released the same year). What upsets people is that "Pulp" is more open
and subtly honest with these issues, and because the characters only seem cold
and heartless. This is largely a falsity as you will observe. There is truth in
the film but it is mostly an exaggeration, and shouldn't be taken seriously. 
John Travolta and Samuel L. Jackson play the main characters, Vincent Vega and
Jules, two black-suited hoods who work for the big, black, bald boss Marsellus
Wallace (Ving Rhames). Vincent and Jules are on a mission to retrieve a
mysterious stolen briefcase belonging to Marsellus. Some college roommates are
in possession of the briefcase, and Jules torments and kills two of them with
his gun, but not before ranting and raving a biblical quote from "Ezekiel
25:17." 
Later, Vincent meets Marsellus's wife, Mia Wallace (Uma Thurman). He is
supposed to entertain her while the boss is away on business. They go to a 50's
diner restaurant called "Jack Rabbit Slim's" where they do the Bat dance to
Chuck Berry's "You Never Can Tell." When they come back to her house, Mia has a
heroin overdose where she is treated by an adrenaline needle to the heart
administered by Vincent at a drug dealer's house. By the way, the grungy drug
dealer is hilariously played by Eric Stoltz ("Killing Zoe"). 
Another story circulates around "The Gold Watch," and this concerns a
hot-headed boxer named Butch (Bruce Willis). He is told to throw a fight by
Marsellus (this subplot reaches as far back as "The Set-Up" and a hundred other
noirish tales). Of course, Butch does not throw the fight and kills the
opponent. He tries to flee with his French girlfriend (Mia De Medeiros) but he
won't leave without his gold watch, which he left at his apartment. When he
tries to retrieve it, he finds Vincent whom he kills without hesitation. Butch
almost gets away scot-free until he confronts Marsellus on the street - they
hit and shoot each other until they are caught and bound by S&M freaks in one
of the most thrillingly gory moments in the history of cinema. 
Then we return to the Jules and Vincent predicament involving the roommates and
the mysterious suitcase - this episode is titled "The Bonnie Situation." Jules
and Vincent kill all the roommates except for Marvin. They take Marvin along
with them, and in the car, Jules feels that their survival from death was an
act of God. Just then, Vincent accidentally blows off Marvin's head and,
needless to say, it is a bloody mess. They arrive at Jimmy's house (Jimmy is
played by Quentin Tarantino) where they store the bloody car in his garage
until Winston the Wolf (Harvey Keitel) comes by to help the boys clean up the
mess by telling how to do it. This whole sequence plays like an eerie extension
of th trunk scene from "GoodFellas." 
"Pulp Fiction" is great fun and a miraculous movie simply because it plays and
twists with the conventions of at least three different genres - the lurid
atmosphere of film noir, the standard action-oriented melodrama, and your basic
gangster crime picture. The difference is that the characters end up in bizarre
situations that aren't dictated by cliched plot points or mediocre chases.
These characters live and die by doing stupid things! Butch's stupid deed is to
get his precious gold watch back at this apartment where the killers are
inevitably waiting for him. When he arrives, there seems to be no one around.
Ah! But Vincent went to the bathroom and left his silencer on the kitchen
counter thus making it easy for Butch to blow him away!
"Pulp Fiction" has one classic scene after another and my favorite is the
extended sequence with Vincent and Mia on their date at the Jack Rabbit Slim's
restaurant where a facsimile of Buddy Holly (Steve Buscemi) is their waiter.
Their conversation consists of T.V. shows, Mia's supposed foot massage,
five-dollar milk shakes, and "think of something to say"-type language, while
they shoot frequent glances at each other. It is a delightful, entertaining and
wonderful sequence to behold. The philosophical discussions between Vincent and
Jules are also priceless, including the discussion on McDonald's hamburgers in
America versus France, and let's not forget that Jules's favorite burger is the
Big Kahuna burger. 
"Pulp Fiction" has been severely criticized for containing foul language,
gratuitous violence, and thoroughly repellent characters whom you couldn't care
less about. Firstly, the violence is not gratuitous, it is explosive and brief
(unlike some of "Reservoir Dogs" more profane passages). Secondly, these
characters are not repellent (except for the nonsensical inclusion of the Gimp)
because Tarantino shows that he cares about them by instilling them with
humanistic touches. Marsellus seems to be a one-dimensional big gangster boss
until you see the hate etched on his face when he is hideously raped by one of
the hillbillys. In fact, Butch goes back to save Marsellus from these hillbilly
freaks even though Marsellus initially wanted him killed. And look at the
conclusion of the film (which is actually the beginning) where Jules decides to
get out of the gangster business after having experienced a case of "divine
intervention," and decides he'll "walk the earth like Caine in 'Kung Fu'."
Finally, don't forget Vincent aiding Mia after a heroin overdose. The scene is
both frightening and hilarious, like most of Tarantino's masterful epic. 
Perhaps, this is Tarantino's finest hour, and he may never make another movie
quite like "Pulp Fiction." Some critics have said that he may never make a real
movie about real people in real situations dealing with real emotions. That may
be true, but "Pulp Fiction" is as real a movie as we are likely to get for
sometime. It is also one of the greatest entertainments of the 1990's.   
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with questions, concerns or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at
Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Goya (1999)
Famed Spanish painter Francisco Goya created paintings of carcasses of pigs, 
sheep and other animals using dark, vibrant colors (he also painted visions 
of death using people as well). His life must have been fascinating but you 
wouldn't know it from watching Carlos Saura's "Goya in Bordeaux," which 
reveals so little of the man and his art that it may as well be about good 
old King Henry VIII, if not for the time period and costuming. 
The old Goya is played by Francisco Rabal, shown living in exile in France 
with his caring wife and his mature teenage daughter, Rosario (Daphne 
Fernandez). Goya reminisces about his past to Rosario, though she has heard 
these stories countless times before. He speaks of an affair he had with the 
dangerous Cayetano, Duchess of Alba (Maribel Verdu), who later opposed and 
was thus poisoned by the Queen Maria Luisa. There are also glimpses into his 
days as a court painter, his portraits of people he found both significant 
and otherwise, his increasing deafness, his admiration of Velazquez's "Las 
Meninas" and the visions of death he had that so haunted him till the end of 
his life. The younger, middle-aged Goya as shown in these flashbacks is 
played by Jose Coronado, and he is so charismatic and romantic that one 
wishes Saura spent more time exploring this actor. Alas, he does not. 
"Goya in Bordeaux" is stunningly shot by one of our great cinematographers, 
Vittorio Storaro (who helmed Saura's previous "Tango," as well as some early 
Bertolucci), and it is beautifully crafted with various lighting color 
schemes and silhouettes, as if we were watching a painting unfold before our 
eyes. Unfortunately, there is barely much illumination into Goya's life and 
so we get the feeling that we are watching a series of still lifes that shed 
scarce insight into the man. We mostly see the older Goya fretting and 
arguing and feeling disoriented by his paintings but that is as far as one 
gets into his soul. As it is, this film may as well be about any sick old man 
living in exile. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
Faust667@aol.com or at faustus_08520@yahoo.com

Title
Review for Batman & Robin (1997)
The "Batman" movie series has approached the mentality of the campy Adam West
TV series of yesteryear: stupid and juvenile. "Batman and Robin" is a bad film;
wholly uneven and one-dimensional unlike the previous "Batman" films that
relied so much on character. This one has so many fight scenes and Dolby-ized
explosions and car wrecks that, at first, I thought I was watching an overblown
action flick a la Stallone.
The miscast George Clooney (TV's "E.R.") stars as the lighthearted, rather than
brooding, Batman who is more concerned with bedroom theatrics and the look of
his belt buckle and body armor than with catching the bad guys. Chris O'Donnell
reprises his role as "Bird Boy," excuse me, Robin, the bird-brained Bat partner
who is always horny. Poor Michael Gough returns as the dutiful servant of Wayne
Manor, Alfred, who is getting quite ill (after seeing the script, no doubt)
Then there's Alicia Silverstone (also miscast) as a schoolgirl who is Alfred's
niece and loves to ride around in motorbikes because of the danger principle
(?). She eventually dons a Bat suit and presto (!), she's Batgirl. Red alert to
all screenwriters: where's the transition? Somehow, the idea that Alfred
prepared a Bat suit for her because he was expecting her to enter the Bat cave
is hardly credible. 
Is there a story or a worthy plot in this movie? Answer: neither. There's a
plot thread which is left dangling longer than Batman does from the ceiling.
Arnold Schwarzeneger is Mr. Freeze, a Terminator-like villain who shoots every
innocent bystander with a freezing beam that turns them into ice sculptures.
Why is he doing this? Because he wants to save his cryogenically preserved wife
by finding a cure to a disease which the dying Alfred also suffers from. Got
it? And the villainess is Poison Ivy (Uma Thurman), a sexy "Plant Girl" who has
venomous lips and chlorophyll for blood. "Don't kiss her!" utters Batman at one
point before Robin is lured into lip lock status. Poison Ivy wants Mother
Nature to begin plant life all over again and thus becomes partners with Mr.
Freeze who is ready to freeze Gotham City. Will Batman, Robin and Batgirl stop
them in time? Does anybody care anymore?
Joel Schumacher ("Batman Forever") helmed this travesty as well and it is a
considerable waste of celluloid. He shoots all the fight scenes in extremely
tight close-ups so it is hard to decipher what is happening sometimes. Some
action scenes do work, particularly the dazzling opening sequence, but how many
tight butt shots and shots below-the-belt can you stand? Holy sexual innuendos!
The characters are amazingly all underdeveloped. The duality of Batman and
Bruce Wayne is hardly represented anymore, and the script's idea of Bruce is to
have Clooney walk around in a black robe and smile incongruently. After a
while, I started to think that Batman and Bruce Wayne were not the same person!
Chris O'Donnell tries to act tough but appears more as a jealous, sexually
frustrated kid than a hero. Ditto Alicia Silverstone who is as clueless as
everyone else. Schwarzeneger seems to be having a good time but his one-liners
("The Iceman Cometh. Hell will freeze over. Just chill") get to be repetitive
after a while and do nothing to enhance the character - he's just a blue-eyed
hulk. Uma Thurman is marvelous in perhaps the best performance in the movie but
her Poison Ivy shtick (blowing kisses of purplish smoke) is thinly executed and
done with none of the relish that Michelle Pfeiffer had with Catwoman. And pity
Michael Gough who I hope will outlive this pointless franchise.
I am a big fan of the Batman series but this one is tired, unimaginative and
soulless. There's no excitement or spontaneity in the dusty Batcave anymore.
The music is loud enough to keep you awake, the explosions are delivered on
cue, and there's enough TV-style humor to make Adam West want to don his suit
again, but there's no sense of who Batman and Robin are or why they should be
considered heroes. As usual, the threadbare villains steal the show. One more
movie like this and the villains will become the heroes to root for. Maybe
that's not such a bad idea. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with questions, concerns or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at
Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Summertime (1955)
Katharine Hepburn is one of the most vigorous, attractive, sophisticated women
to ever appear on the silver screen. She's also one of our most versatile
actresses with a body of work that includes "The Philadelphia Story,"  "Adam's
Rib," "Guess Who's Coming to Dinner" and, one of her last great roles, "On
Golden Pond."  "Summertime" is one of the most beautiful movies to ever take
place in Venice: a luscious, delicate comedy-drama by director David Lean ("Dr.
Zhivago"). For those of you who remember "Only You" - the sappy romantic comedy
with Robert Downey Jr.  set in Venice - this is far superior to that film. 
Based on Arthur Laurents' play "The Time of the Cuckoo," Hepburn stars as the
independent, lonely Jane Hudson who has just arrived in Venice: a secretary
from Ohio who is looking for romance and adventure. She stays at the "Pensione
Fiorini" hotel, converses with other fellow Americans such as the Yaeghers, an
older couple, and an unknown artist (a very young Darren McGavin), and she
spouts such Italian phrases as "bravo" and "prego" while filming every landmark
she sees with her 8mm film camera. One sunny day at a cafe, Jane notices a
handsome Italian gentleman staring at her - she is overcome with feelings but
she resists them (She wants to be around people but somehow finds an inner
peace when isolated). Eventually, she runs into him again at an antique store
just before buying an 18th century red goblet. The gentleman's name is Renato
de Rossi (Rosanno Brazzi), an antique store owner and, before you know it, they
fall madly in love. Naturally, Jane discovers that Renato is married. 
"Summertime" is a slight film compared to Lean's other works, such as "Dr.
Zhivago" or the underrated "Ryan's Daughter," but it is superbly acted,
well-written, and subtly directed. Hepburn manages to be likable, stubborn,
fierce, and loving. Brazzi makes a perfect companion for Hepburn: romantic,
charming and charismatic. Who can ever forget her her unforced and hysterical
walk into the river while filming with her camera? You'll have a delightful
time with the invigorating "Summertime" - it is more than a travelogue of
Venice.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with questions, concerns or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com 

Title
Review for End of the Affair, The (1999)
Watching the dispassionate World War II romance "The End of the Affair," one is
instantly reminded of "The English Patient" considering it starred the same
lead actor, Ralph Fiennes. Fiennes does not strike me as a romantic lead - he
somehow has an aura that is too cold and stuffy. Thus, "End of the Affair" is a
beautiful film to watch but it suffers from Fiennes's presence. 
The film begins literally at the end of the affair. A well-known, London
fiction writer named Maurice (Ralph Fiennes) coincidentally meets an old
friend, Henry (Stephen Rea), during a rainy evening. Henry, a dour civil
servant, had not seen Maurice in years and invites him back to his house for a
drink. After a while, Henry confesses that his wife, Sarah Miles (Julianne
Moore), may be having an affair and has reluctantly thought of hiring a private
detective. Maurice takes matters in his own hands since he knows Sarah - he
once had an affair with her and may be quite jealous as well. Thus,
writer-director Neil Jordan ("The Crying Game") fractures the timeline by
showing us the affair and its consequences, and its inevitable denouement,
while Maurice walks through the London streets in the present day to uncover
Sarah's supposed infidelity. 
"The End of the Affair" is bold in its time fracturing structure, particularly
in how it takes us back and forth from the present day to the past sometimes
within a single scene. Neil Jordan often cuts away to the past during a scene
in the present that mirrors the past. One notable example is when Maurice first
arrives at Henry's house and walks up the stairs and there is a cut to a
woman's legs being caressed by Maurice as they walk up to the bedroom. Not a
new device of cinematic language to be sure but Jordan handles it with delicate
skill and panache. 
There are a couple of problems with the story, however, that are handled with
less skill. For one, the romance between Maurice and Sarah never quite makes us
feel the passion of their affair, and the casting of the less than smoldering
Fiennes reflects that. Somehow, it never bursts forth with the fireworks one
would expect from a romantic story (one can conclude that Stephen Rea might
have been a better choice since his relationship with "the lady" in "Crying
Game" was far more passionate). To make matters worse, the scene in the
building where after they have one of many earth-shaking trysts, a bomb strikes
and there is a sense of God's intervention, is handled badly and strikes too
many false notes. 
The redemptive stroke of genius in "End of the Affair" is the dazzling Julianne
Moore, who encapsulates Sarah with delicacy, charm and nuance - plus, she makes
a fitting romantic lead. Her British accent is also down pat, but you knew that
already if you saw "Big Lebowski" or "An Ideal Husband." Though I would not
call this one of her best performances, she still manages to hold her own
against Mr. Fiennes.
If "End of the Affair" had a better leading man in the role, someone not so
suffocated with charmlessness, then it might have been a true romantic tragedy.
As it is, it strikes some sad notes but it never breathes with verve or
passion. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Romeo + Juliet (1996)
Guns, warring gangs, lavish parties, blue crucifixes, a black transvestite, an
MTV soundtrack and, oh yes, a love story. What is this, a Godard film? A remake
of "West Side Story"? No, it's "William Shakespeare's Romeo and Juliet." What?
Yes, it's a modern-day variation of the Bard amidst Verona Beach, actually
Mexico City. 
Leonardo DiCaprio is the brooding Romeo. Claire Danes is the weeping Juliet.
Harold Perrineau, Jr. is Mercutio. The over-the-top Paul Sorvino is Juliet's
father of the Capulet family. Romeo is from the Montague family, and he
desperately falls in love with Juliet when he sees her through a fish tank.
They play around in pools and in big beds, but there's not much in the way of
romance. Silly? Most definitely. 
"Romeo and Juliet" wants to be an MTV version of the oft-told Bard tale albeit
with dazzling visuals and milisecond cuts - it's "Natural Born Killers" crossed
with "West Side Story." The problem is that all the poetry of the Bard's text
is lost in the translation to a modern-day setting. The soundtrack pumps out
more songs per minute than I could stand and practically drowns out all the
dialogue. DiCaprio emotes but doesn't exactly do more than that. Claire Danes
giggles for an eternity - she's like a loving puppy with big startling eyes,
but is miles away from her strong work in "Little Women." Everyone else
overacts to the hilt, including the annoying Paul Sorvino, the high-pitched
Miriam Margoyles as the Latina housekeeper, and the endless stares supplied by
Diane Venora ("Heat"). The best performance, in terms of appropriate tone and
inflection, is Pete Postlethwaite (In the Name of the Father) as Friar
Lawrence. 
The biggest mistake was in making "Romeo and Juliet" an MTV cartoon with the
original, antiquated text making the whole film as incongruous and
anachronistic as you might expect. Stick with the Franco Zeffirelli version
instead. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Palmetto (1998)
Film noir has lately seeped in many corners of the film industry. We've seen
examples of deadpan noir (an Ebert term applicable to "Destiny Turns on the
Radio"), farce noir ("Clay Pigeons," "Fargo"), revisionist noir ("Pulp
Fiction," and a slew of rip-offs), old-fashioned, hard-boiled detective noir
("L.A. Confidential"), time-bending, surreal, neo-noir ("Lost Highway," an ode
to "Detour") and, finally, daylight, Florida noir. As far as current noir, I am
most impressed by "Lost Highway" because it is so unconventional and a sign of
the new cinema to come where there are no boundaries with structure or logic. I
am less excited with Florida noir, a hark back to Elmore Leonard's shenanigans
in the ordinary "Stick." Not that Florida is a flat setting (it was ideal for
1991's "Cape Fear"), but it doesn't build for the kind of atmosphere that noir
needs - that air of desperation. That desperation is well-handled in
"Palmetto," but it fails miserably in "Wild Things" - two of the newest
additions to noir. 
"Palmetto" stars Woody Harrelson as a rambunctious former reporter just out of
prison for a crime he didn't commit - he was apparently framed in a police
cover-up. Now he starts life over with his sexy girlfriend (Gina Gershon), an
artist, and is offered a job with the police department! He resists the offer,
and finds himself neck deep in trouble with a flirtatious blonde siren
(Elisabeth Shue). After stealing money from her purse, she asks him to
participate in a scheme involving the kidnapping of her sister. Before you can
say murder, corruption, conspiracy, double indemnity, Woody gets in a jam he
can't get out of. The desperation begins. In an ironic twist, he's hired by the
police department to cover his own story, which involves him as a possible
murder suspect. 
"Palmetto" is breezy fun for a while, but it takes much too long for it to go
anywhere. An inordinate amount of time is spent on Woody's couplings with Ms.
Shue before the plot kicks in gear. The problem here is that Harrelson and Shue
have no believable sultry sparks between them - Shue's best leading man has
been Nicolas Cage by far, and he played a drunk! The film has the perfect
sweltering atmosphere to convey hidden passions and desires, but its tone is
too uneven. It goes from completely deadpan, to wildly over-the-top, rainy
climaxes, to deadly serious innuendoes of the "Gingerbread Man" variety -
witness the gory shenanigans of the Michael Rappaport character that belongs in
a different movie. 
At least "Palmetto" floats with Woody's charisma and comic timing (not to
mention the more lustrous Chloe Sevigny), but "Wild Things" has no one
dependable to keep things interesting. The story has Matt Dillon (wildly
miscast) as Lombardo, a respected high-school teacher who is convicted of
raping two local teenage beauties of the "Scream" variety, the rich blonde
Kelly Van Ryan (Denise Richards), and the girl from the alligator nests' living
in a trailer, Suzie (Neve Campbell). And that's about as far as I can go in
describing the plot except to say that Kevin Bacon shows up as a clean-cut cop,
and Bill Murray hilariously plays a shyster. 
Although "Wild Things" is sleazy, exploitative to an extent, and often cheesy,
the film's twists and turns are much too apparent. Perhaps, I've seen too many
film noir thrillers but I could anticipate its every move, excluding Kevin
Bacon's stunning reversal of roles that I'll keep mum about. The other flaw is
that the complex weaving of twists reveals little about the characters or their
humanity. In the best tradition of film noir with classics that range from
"Double Indemnity" to "Chinatown," there was always an identification with the
protagonists and an understanding of their motives for their actions, no matter
how depraved. Here, there is no one to identify with on any level, possibly
because no effort was made to make the characters' personalities real or
consistent - they appear to be cartoon characters out of a Vogue fashion
spread. The only character worth caring about is Neve Campbell's Suzie, but
then we learn she's not quite what she seems either.
"Palmetto" is the better film to see, but I miss the old days of film noir
when the dialogue sparkled and cut the air like stabbing someone's back. The
atmosphere was always there, but it served as an existential backdrop for the
sins of mortal men and women. Desperation hung like an endlessly dripping wet
blanket - it was omnipresent. "L.A. Confidential" and "Lost Highway" are the
best recent examples of that type of noir. The rest is disorganized, silly and
counterproductive. 
More reviews can be found at JERRY AT THE MOVIES
 

Title
Review for U Turn (1997)
Oliver Stone's "U-Turn" is his best film since "J.F.K": a jagged, furious,
interminable assault on the senses with enough bloody violence, expletives and
adulterous affairs to send any sensitive Christian out the door. It is a solid
piece of unpredictable entertainment: wickedly funny and darkly comic at every
turn. 
Based on the book "Stray Dogs" by John Ridley (who also wrote the script),
"U-Turn" stars Sean Penn as Booby Cooper, a gambler with a bag full of money
who inadvertently breaks down in the strange town of Superior, Arizona. His
troubles are just beginning: he brings his 1964 Mustang convertible with a
broken radiator hose to a sully mechanic named Darrell (Billy Bob Thornton);
his bag of money (an overdue gambling debt) is blown to bits during an
unexpected convenience store robbery; he has a fling with the sexy Grace
(Jennifer Lopez) before his nose is broken by her husband Jake (Nick Nolte) who
in turn asks him to kill his wife; he has a diner encounter with a ditsy blonde
teenager (Claire Danes) before he's repeatedly challenged to a fight by her
tough boyfriend (Joaquim Phoenix); and then there's the old, blind Indian (Jon
Voight) who teaches him moral lessons about life such as 'Nothing is nothing.
Everything is everything.' 
"U-Turn" engages us and pushes our buttons right from the opening sequence with
a spectacular sight of the Arizona desert where a red Mustang is headed for
unwanted trouble. Bobby is not a hero, though: he's flawed, has murderous
impulses and not much of a conscience. This is the world of film noir, and we
know there are no heroes in such a world. Bobby has no qualms about killing
Jake's wife, Grace, as long as he gets the dough. But when Grace asks him to
kill Jake, split with the money and head for Hawaii, what can Bobby do? He's
confused, pathetic and headed for disaster considering a loan shark is after
him. At one point, since he lost his gambling money, he opts for just
two-hundred dollars to pay the mechanic for the damage to the car. Nobody,
however, will lend him the money. He has a little over twenty bucks left yet it
is not enough for the train ticket to Juarez, Mexico. He pleads and pleads for
it and finally convinces the ticket agent (Laurie Metcalf) to give him a break
- the guy definitely needs it but his day isn't over yet. Before you can say
existentialism, Bobby endures several beatings, tortures, backstabbing, and
double-crosses to make Franz Kafka blush. This is a world he can't escape from,
and his illicit affair with Grace could lead to more than he bargained for. Who
can he trust?
Oliver Stone is the perfect director for this neo-noirish, blood-soaked Western
that is reminiscent of the cult film "Red Rock West." He bludgeons the screen,
courtesy of the deft cinematographer Robert Richardson, with grainy colors,
strobe cuts, and black-and-white images. The bright colors (bright reds,
greens, and dark blacks) lend the film a baroque, cartoonish look atypical of
Stone's ouevre, but his style is more evocative of the chaos and unpredictable
surprises in Bobby's world than in "Nixon" or "Natural Born Killers." The
rapid-fire montage cutting and editing is not as wild as you might expect -
this is the first Stone film I can think of since "The Doors" where you can
actually breathe while all the sound and fury is exploding on screen. 
As in Stone's other work, the performances are extraordinary. Sean Penn turns
in one of his finest roles as the confounded, bruised Bobby with black hair, a
bandaged hand, and slick clothes, and is more distraught than anyone else in
the movie. Nick Nolte is all fire and brimstone as the vicious, crazed
real-estate mogul Jake who has a certain obsession with Grace - his overbite
and white orange crewcut reveals a strong yet weak, disturbed man who weeps
during sex. Jennifer Lopez ("Selena") is quite captivating as the femme fatale
Grace, an Apache woman who has an incestual past revealed in quick montages -
she keeps the character cryptic to the point where we don't know if she can be
trusted anymore than if Bobby can. Billy Bob Thornton is the welcome comic
relief in this bizarre odyssey as he spews and spits with relish resembling a
revolting court jester. Claire Danes ("Romeo and Juliet") is engagingly
delirious as the girl who is attracted to Bobby - her scene in the diner where
she questions him on the disappearance of Patsy Cline is a classic. Joaquim
Phoenix is bitingly hilarious as her jealous boyfriend. Also worth mentioning
is Powers Boothe as the sheriff of Superior who may have some ties to Grace's
past, and there's also a strange cameo by Liv Tyler as a passenger at a train
station. She doesn't utter a word but most film buffs will love to see her
brief appearance anyway. 
"U-Turn" is not a great film - there's too much time devoted to the mysterious
Grace and her predictably angry husband Jake - but it is a nice change-of-pace
for Stone. It's joltingly alive and incredibly funny. Other major pluses are
the superb performances by all, brilliant cinematography and a terrific
soundtrack full of Peggy Lee songs. "U-Turn" deserves a place in the Western
noir tablets along with "Blood Simple," "Wild at Heart" and the aforementioned
"Red Rock West." 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with questions, concerns or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com 

Title
Review for Freddy's Dead: The Final Nightmare (1991)
"Freddy's Dead: The Final Nightmare" is a guilty pleasure for me considering how many people hate it. It's silly, stupid and more self-parodic than it should have been, but it has a looseness and a fast pace that distinguishes it from most horror fare.
This time, pizza-faced, maniacal Freddy Krueger (Robert Englund) is back in Springwood, Ohio, looking for some fresh blood after killing off all the Elm Street kids and being sent back to his mother's womb by the formidable Alice in "Elm Street 5."
The main plot is about a kid suffering from amnesia who comes to believe that Freddy is his father. How he came to that realization, I am not sure! Enter a teen psychiatrist/counselor (the sullen Lisa Zane), who is the only one that listens to this seemingly creepy kid. She follows him to Springwood to find that the town has turned into a loony bin where parents are all left without any children or teenagers to care for (Freddy wiped them all out). Eventually, this psychiatrist discovers that she is Freddy's daughter, and he uses her to get to the kids at a youth shelter. Only a fellow psychiatrist and dream expert (Yaphet Kotto) can help her with her traumatic emotions. 
"Freddy's Dead" is more funny than scary, but there are too many half-hearted attempts at humor (watch for the cumbersome cameos by Tom Arnold and Roseanne Barr), and there are mostly bloodless performances by a largely emaciated cast, but it is always watchable. There are also subtle themes of incest, child abuse, neglect, and adoption, which is intriguing, to say the least, for a film of this type. The 3-D finale is well-done, as we are taken on a thrilling trip through Freddy's twisted brain. Be sure to look out for a drooling Alice Cooper as Freddy's father! Worthwile time-filler...but beware Freddy fans, hardly scary!
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Deconstructing Harry (1997)
Woody Allen's last couple of movies lacked bite and true comic spirit, and I
had the feeling his work was going to continue along the lighter side, as in
"Everyone Says I Love You." Now with the shockingly disturbing and provocative
"Deconstructing Harry," he has created one of his most lacerating, uneven yet
truthful comedy-dramas ever. 
Woody Allen plays a successful author named Harry Block who's currently facing
writer's block on his latest novel. While he's creatively challenged, Harry
loves to sleep with any woman he meets, has affairs with girlfriends and wives,
and finds a kinky pleasure in sleeping with prostitutes. At one point, he asks
one particular prostitute (Hazelle Goodman) to tie him up, beat him, and "give
him a blow job." Harry also has a knack for pills and whiskey and little else -
all there is his art that feeds his soul, or what he has left of it. 
Harry's life is remarkably similar to his novel. The characters he creates are
exaggerated figments of people he was once close to (As a counterpoint to his
life, Woody dramatizes the real-life characters in his book by having different
actors). His Jewish sister and brother-in-law (played by Caroline Aaron and
Eric Bogosian) are depicted as hateful denizens in his book yet they are not
that different in reality. Harry also had an affair with his ex-wife's sister
(Judy Davis) who threatens to kill him after threatening to commit suicide.
They are hilariously depicted in his book as lovers (played by Richard Benjamin
and Julia Louis-Dreyfus) who have sex in front of his half-blind grandmother!
              "Deconstructing Harry" is an unusual experiment for Woody Allen
because he actually dissects himself and his life through his art and through
his relationships. One can argue that he has done that with every film he's
made, but what is most unusual is how rough Woody is on himself - for the first
time in his career, he curses, and talks about sex in graphic detail. He also
curses at his ex-wives (Kirstie Alley, Amy Irving) who are always yelling at
him for his numerous affairs and for how they are depicted in his novel! The
only sweet relationship he has is with a lovely fan (Elisabeth Shue) who's
about to marry Harry's best friend (Billy Crystal) who may be the Devil
himself! 
Woody also has a grand time including scenes from Harry's former novels. There
is one where different kinds of Jewish stereotypes are depicted in relation to
Harry's family, such as the perfectly cast Demi Moore as a psychotherapist who
"sees true beauty and meaning" in Judaism. Then there are the Jewish parties
where the guests are dressed as Darth Vader and the waiters as stormtroopers!
How about his uncle who may killed his first wife and eaten her! And then
there's Woody's greatest comic invention since "Zelig" called "The Actor," a
character (Robin Williams) who is always out of focus!
"Deconstructing Harry" juggles a lot of characters and situations and throws
them up in the air with great abandon. Woody Allen's visual style is more
complex since there are less long takes and lots of jump cuts to emphasize
Harry's own dissection of his life and the others around him. The film doesn't
always succeed nor is he as deconstructive of Harry as he should be, but his
theme of how an artist's work is more significant than his life is superbly
realized. "Deconstructing Harry" is not as consistently hilarious as his
earlier films, and maybe it isn't meant to be. It is, however, as daring,
courageous, darkly comic and outrageous a self-portrait as I've seen in a long
time. 
For more reviews, check otu JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with comments, suggestions or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or
jerry@movieluver.com 

Title
Review for Tao of Steve, The (2000)
Romantic comedies continue to multiply in Hollywood and the independent scene (the last couple of good ones I can recall on an independent scale are "Chasing Amy" and "The Brothers McMullen".) "The Tao of Steve" is a harmless time filler, likely to provoke some light laughs on a rainy Saturday afternoon. Its major selling point is the casting of the sweet Donal Logue at its center. 
Logue does not play Steve, in fact the title is a philosophy carried around by Dex. Logue plays Dex, a sweet, likable slacker with a prominent gut who has his own agenda on how to seduce women. No, it is not seduce and destroy, but rather do not let on you are seducing, then let them go after you have sex. First rule is to eliminate your desire. Second rule is to be excellent at something in their presence (camping is not an option). Third rule is to withdraw. This philosophy, known as the Tao of Steve, is based on the ancient Chinese philosopher Lao-tzu whom Dex reads avidly. The name "Steve" is used because it is the coolest name, and its claim to fame is from the coolest of all movie stars, Steve McQueen. The least coolest name is Stu (ironically the name of the coolest character in "Scream" but that is a moot point). 
The film begins at a ten-year college reunion where Dex was once known as Elvis, hence the most popular of all the students. He chuckles as he mentions that now he is a fat Elvis. At the reunion, he meets Syd (Greer Goodman), a set designer for the Santa Fe Opera, whom Dex has literally forgotten about, including their own tryst years ago. Most uncool for Dex and so anti-Steve. Dex naturally falls in love with Syd, and does not eliminate the desire - he makes it plainly known, even telling her he is falling in love with her. 
"The Tao of Steve" has some measured moments of truth about Dex's nature and about relationships in general, but it peters out to a hasty resolution that seems false and predictable. Let's just say that it is the kind of ending more attributed to Hollywood than an independent film of this kind. There are also frequent pop-culture references to "Hawaii Five-O," "Six-Million Dollar Man" and other TV shows of yesteryear, complete with music from said shows. It all feels contrived and unnecessary, simply marking time. And the cinematography is a little too muddy for my tastes considering the beautiful location - Santa Fe, New Mexico may be a bit overcast at times but it is ripe for high contrasts in filmmaking. 
Still, there is a genial warmth to the film thanks to Donal Logue (who won the Special Jury Prize Award for Best Actor at Sundance). He could be a mean-spirited, viciously verbal macho male yet, as written by director Jenniphr Goodman and co-writers Greer Goodman and Duncan North, the screenplay opts for gentler tones of body language and a sensitivity in Dex that makes him instantly likable. He is so damn sweet that it becomes infectious - how can a woman resist the temptations of a philosophical male who speaks of lust as a primary way of living? So what if he works part-time and smokes marijuana daily for breakfast!
"The Tao of Steve" is not a total success because it travels on safer terrain rather than truly exploring what motivates someone like Dex. He is the kind of guy that can surprise you, lead you to think he's less clever than he looks. The film's homespun philosophy is that love rules the day over lust, and a lover like Don Giovanni would eventually come to realize this. I feel Dex is a unique enough character that he would only make you think he has realized this. Sometimes those who see the error of their ways contine making the same errors. 
Footnote: The opening sequence of "The Tao of Steve" is set at a supposedly four-year college where a ten-year reunion is taking place. Actually, it is Santa Fe Community College, a two-year school that would not likely have a reunion. The setting looks familiar enough since I attended that very same school for two-and-a-half years! 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Curse of the Jade Scorpion, The (2001)
There is no way to explain my constant fascination with Woody Allen. He is one
of the few comedy geniuses of the 20th century. From masterful comedy-dramas
like "Annie Hall" and "Manhattan" to somber, Bergmanesque dramas like
"Interiors" and "Crimes and Misdemeanors" to self-portraits that are as acrid
and alive as any of his early works like "Husbands and Wives" and
"Deconstructing Harry," Woody has maintained a body of work that reflects his
philosophy and psychology of general relationships on Manhattan's Lower East
Side. And he can be hard on himself when he deconstructs his own life, but
always with an edge and a distance that may not always appeal to everyone who is
not from New York. I would never confuse Woody for a mainstream comedy director
in this jaded day and age. That is why it is a pleasure to report that "The
Curse of the Jade Scorpion" is a delightful souffle, spiked and stinging with
wit from all corners of the screen. It is as smarmily funny as "Small Time
Crooks" and "Manhattan Murder Mys
tery" and as affectionate and buyoant as "Bullets Over Broadway" and "Zelig."
"Curse of the Jade Scorpion" is set in Manhattan in 1940 where C.W. Briggs
(Woody Allen) is a fraud insurance detective who cracks nearly every case with
sheer luck and ingenious instinct. He is admired by his co-workers, which
includes Dan Aykroyd as his professional boss Magruder and Jill (Elizabeth
Berkley), a secretary who will let someone rub her chest as long as they bring a
ring. The one exception to this staff is Betty Ann Fitzgerald (Helen Hunt) who
is hired by the company to make it more efficient and workmanlike (she also
considers condensing the private detective agency). She hates C.W. and sees him
as vermin and as a dinosaur (there are probably as many synonyms used to
describe Woody negatively in this film than in any other). C.W. hates her too
and you can see it will probably lead to a romance at some point. One night at a
birthday party, C.W. and Betty Ann are asked to participate in a magic act by
the great Voltan (David Ogden Stiers). They are put in a trance where the names
like "Madagasc
ar" and "Constantinople" are uttered and where they are apparently lovers. Once
snapped out of the trance, C.W. continues to hate Betty Ann. However, precious
jewels begin to disappear from wealthy estates and C.W. might be a prime suspect
thanks to the trance-like powers of the great Voltan. 
"The Curse of the Jade Scorpion" reminds me of the great 40's romantic comedies
where a bickering couple would trade insults and engaging repartee with ease
("His Girl Friday" is my favorite of that period). Woody Allen and Helen Hunt
are a match made in heaven and show love and hate for each other with aplomb.
Their chemistry works well - Hunt is all professionalism and Allen simply cracks
wise. What is ultimately satisfying and unusual is to see Allen in a role that
would have been suited for someone like Cary Grant or James Stewart. Seeing
Allen as a short man with a milder neurosis than usual  is simply startling and
hilarious - consider the opening sequence where he arrives at his office in a
trenchcoat and felt hat as if he were Humphrey Bogart. Similarly, Hunt cleverly
assumes the role of a 40's working woman with authority and great energy - I am
not crazy about Hunt overall but in the right role, this actress sizzles and
holds her own with Allen. 
"Jade Scorpion" has the customary Allen quips but it also has an informal,
chaste, elegant atmosphere. A romantic comedy like this in the 1940's would have
been rapid fire in pace and language. Here, Allen chooses to slow it down
somewhat, as if inviting us for a cup of tea rather than coffee. To some, this
may be offputting but I was positively entranced. The irradiating glow from the
cinematography by Zhao Fei enhances the elegance and brings a nostalgic tone to
the proceedings. 
As always, Allen knows how to choose the right actors. Can you recall Sean Penn
being as faultless and knowing as in "Sweet and Lowdown"? Can you recall Winona
Ryder ever being as bewitching as in "Celebrity"? Well, "Jade Scorpion" has
Helen Hunt at her best as aforementioned. There is also Dan Aykroyd as a
businesslike romantic interest (I never thought Aykroyd would share a kissing
scene with Helen Hunt) with choice lines - he delivers a performance every bit
as nuanced as anything he has ever done. Elizabeth Berkley is actually tolerable
on screen, shedding any leftover negative vibes from "Showgirls." David Ogden
Stiers, an Allen regular, vibrates with stinging ardor. Everyone is perfectly
cast and seems to occupy a time in history credibly, unlike say "Pearl Harbor."
"Curse of the Jade Scorpion" is a hoot and a half and tightly written and
directed. They say Woody Allen is not worth caring about anymore, and that he is
way past the comic highlights of his career. Some may say he is simply marking
time, making one film a year to keep himself busy. He may not create a
masterpiece like "Crimes and Misdemeanors" or "Annie Hall" but who cares. He
still makes films and let us be glad his wit lives on. The real curse would be
to avoid him. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, complaints or general comments at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for America's Sweethearts (2001)
I consider it sinful to cast Julia Roberts in a movie nowadays. She is such a
watchable presence and has such a stunning smile that it is easy to see why
she's a movie star. Star first, actor second. The truth is that she has always
impressed me as an actress first, movie star second. Even in mediocre films like
"Sleeping With the Enemy" or "Dying Young," she has proven her worth and her
talent is undeniable, particularly her finest Oscar-nominated role in "Erin
Brockovich." Amazingly, she is given a tertiary role in producer Joe Roth's
directorial debut, "America's Sweethearts." Wise move since it gives us the
chance to see Roberts participate in an ensemble for once rather than center
stage. 
"America's Sweethearts" are Gwen Harrison (Catherine Zeta-Jones) and Eddie
Thomas (John Cusack), a formerly married movie star couple who have not spoken
to each other in a year. Gwen has moved on and carried on an affair with a
Spanish hunk (a hilarious Hank Azaria). Eddie has taken leave of absence at a
clinic with the help of a long silvery-haired guru (Alan Arkin) to try and
recuperate. Gwen has gone solo at the movies sans Eddie and has remained a
box-office flop ever since. Now rumors abound that a new film called "Time After
Time" (the last time the pair had appeared together onscreen)  has finally been
completed by a revered, Oscar-nominated director Hal Weidmann (Christopher
Walken). The trick is that Weidmann refuses to show the film until the day of
the press junket. This drives irate studio chief, Dave Kingman (Stanley Tucci),
insane. He decides to enlist the help of sly press agent, Lee Philips (Billy
Crystal), to concoct a supposed reconciliation between Gwen and!
 Eddie so that their new film ca
n become a hit. Lee seeks the help of Gwen's personal assistant and sister, Kiki
(Julia Roberts), to make this work. But will Gwen and Eddie be able to stand
each other? And is Kiki interested in Eddie since he once kissed her when he was
drunk? 
"America's Sweethearts" is an old-fashioned Hollywood romance masquerading as a
smart satire on Hollywood, as well as mixing a dash of the screwball comedy
genre. It is not an even mix considering that the screwball portion is left on
the sidelines (except for one slightly tired bit about a dog) and hardly coaxes
much out of a romantic triangle that feels a tinge forced, lacking the punch
that leads to an expected  payoff. The satire on Hollywood is by now a cliche
but it leads to the zingiest scenes in the film (the screenplay was co-written
by Billy Crystal). In other words, the film is often a mess but an enjoyable
mess nonetheless. 
I was surprised by how good the performances were and how well-timed in terms of
comic pacing. Catherine Zeta-Jones ends up stealing the movie from everyone and
deservedly so. She plays the bitchiest diva on screen in quite some time, and
about as needy and cumbersome as one can expect. She has no conscience and
demands too much from her overworked sister, Kiki. Zeta-Jones' scenes with
Roberts lacks some insight but they are still believable as siblings. 
John Cusack may have the toughest role as Eddie since we know he is still in
love with Gwen after their break-up - he also develops feelings rather quickly
for Kiki. Only we wonder what was so wonderful about a bitchy goddess like Gwen?
What exactly did Eddie see in her? Cusack has played a sad sack before but here,
he does it with more restraint than usual. His dinner scene with Roberts is
breathlessly good, exuding more romantic charisma than in most teen romance
comedies.
I am a big, supportive fan of Julia Roberts and always look forward to seeing
her onscreen. In this film, Roberts, like Cusack, is a bit more laid-back than
usual and it serves the purpose of the character Kiki. She is at her winsome
best and has a terrific scene where she erupts with rage at Cusack and
Zeta-Jones by dumping scrambled eggs on them! Also, it is a rarity to see
Roberts in a flashback appearing forty pounds heavier!
There is also a great supporting cast at hand, including Crystal who is simply
marvelous as always as the anything-goes press agent who is willing to create
drama in the actors' lives to promote a film. Seth Green is astoundingly funny
as Crystal's naive trainee who has no concept of film history. Also worth
mentioning is the amazing Christopher Walken, playing an eccentric director who
claims to have made the most honest film of his career ("Even Kubrick was
misunderstood."). 
"America's Sweethearts" is largely and consistently funny enough to get a
passing grade. A riotous last half-hour gives it the necessary lift it so
desperately needs. The whole cast is sweetly engaging but Roberts is still my
favorite sweetheart. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Virgin Suicides, The (1999)
I don't think I have heard a more blunt title in ages but for the most blunt summary of a film's content, you can't do better than "The Virgin Suicides." This is Sofia Coppola's brilliant debut film, a searing, intelligent drama of innocence destroyed by the overprotective ruling hand of parents. 
The film opens with the title filling the screen from every corner, as if it was scribbled by overzealous teenage girls. Then the film gradually reveals one particular family, the Lisbons, five luscious-looking Catholic girls living in Michigan during the 1970's. The overprotective parents include the nerdy-looking father, a math teacher (James Woods), and the domineering, stuffy mother (a largely unrecognizable Kathleen Turner). Kirsten Dunst (in perhaps the best role of her career) plays the main Lisbon girl, Lux, whom every adolescent male pines for, including those who live in the neighborhood. These girls seem perfect but everything is on the surface - they are like Barbie Dolls with masks to hide the real problems. At the beginning of the film, a thirteen-year-old Lisbon girl (Hanna Hall) fails a suicide attempt, and then successfully makes another attempt. Nobody knows why, and the parents seem unaffected, as if it was a temporary setback. The father keeps thinking he s!
!
ees his dead daughter, and so do the other girls. But the question is: why did she kill herself? Could it happen to the others?
The main focus in "The Virgin Suicides" is Lux, and she is pursued by Trip Fontaine (Josh Hartnett), a cool dude, for no better description, who is pined for by all the girls for his smoothness and seductive quality - he is a like a young Don Juan. Lux avoids him but his charm eventually gets to her, to the point where she is asked to the prom as are all her sisters (they all end up wearing the same dress). Coppola also makes good use of songs by ELO and others to accentuate the mood, and the prom scenes are especially good at evoking a constrained innocence that is likely to be broken any time soon. 
The prom is the central climax of the film where everything goes downhill. The mother gets so fed up with Lux's disappearance after the prom that she keeps everyone locked up in the house, confined by Lux's unconstrained behavior. Week after week, the girls are kept inside, restricted from ever leaving the house except to pick up the mail. The father seems to go slightly insane, resorting to talking to the plants at school. The mother throws out all rock n' roll records and anything else that might corrupt the girls' innocence. 
"The Virgin Suicides" basically gives away what will happen to the girls - it is even foretold in the film's opening voice-over, narrated by an older Trip played by Michael Pare. There are no easy answers or conventional explanations to their suicides, but we can only surmise by the strange behavioral interaction between the girls and the parents (communication is notably absent). The beauty is that Coppola captures the essence of adolescence, and shows how fragile the Lisbon girls were within their confinement. They were easily corruptible, but were incapable of dealing with emotional pain and duress - instead, they dealt with it through an easy path, an escape, by ending their lives.  
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Goodfellas (1990)
I have made a promise to myself not to review Martin Scorsese's "GoodFellas" for
one very good reason - it is the best film of the 1990's and I still stand by my
opinion. I have dedicated a webpage to Mr. Scorsese in the last couple of years
and have thoroughly and intensely studied many of his films. I still consider
"Taxi Driver" the most phenomenally great American film ever made, and I stand
by it. But back to "GoodFellas." How can a gruesomely violent, offputting
portrait of the American mob be far superior to respected films of the 90's like
"Schindler's List," "Dances With Wolves," "Unforgiven," "The Silence of the
Lambs," "American Beauty," and, well, what is the point of belaboring the
obvious? The film has its share of detractors as well as admirers, but in
retrospect, there is simply nothing as influential or as alive and kicking as
"GoodFellas." 
The story is well known. It is all told from the point-of-view of an Irish kid,
Henry Hill (the perfectly cast Ray Liotta) who joined the mob in his youth,
skipping school to work in their places of business. Henry became fascinated by
the way of life, not so much the violence and gangland hits that are often not
the subject of crime films. By the time he is 21, he is married to the feisty
Karen Hill (Lorraine Bracco), is able to waltz into the Copacabana club without
waiting in line, makes money in restaurant deals, steals money from airports,
trucks, etc. Henry is at one point told by his mother that he looks like a
gangster. He has the looks, the snazzy suits, the connections, the power and,
just as easily, the ability to abuse it and lose it all. Yes, as indicated by
the Tony Bennett song in the opening credits, it is a rags to riches story in
the most ironic sense of the word. Scorsese has called this tale (based on a
true crime book by the excellent writer/reporter Nicholas Pillegi "Wiseguy"), as
well 
as the subsequent "Casino," a story of the American Dream. Perhaps, but since
when is it a dream of any kid to become a gangster? "It was better than becoming
President of the United States," says Henry Hill during his narrative voice-over
which succumbs the entire film. Maybe but the razzle-dazzle lifestyle of money,
Cadillacs, drugs and scores of women also has its limits. In "Casino," there
were no limits to what powerful men could have and consume. In "GoodFellas,"
there are limits, mostly because we are dealing with lower-level gangsters, at
least a little higher on the scale than the ones in "Mean Streets." To
categorize in more facile terms, "Mean Streets" was about racketeering in the
streets, "GoodFellas" is about the abuse of having access to anything in the Mob
and finally, "Casino" is about how the Mob's involvement in casino operations
can become a sickness. 
In 2 hours and a half, Scorsese does an incredible job of detailing the inside
life of organized crime, how it works and operates, how they behave, and manages
to tell the story of one man whose desires outweigh his priorities and has to
contend with having a family and working 24 hours a day. We see what it is like
to be a gangster and how sudden bursts of violence can come out of nowhere and
be totally unprovoked. A classic example is Joe Pesci's famous speech as Tommy,
the itchy trigger-happy gangster, when he asks, "Do you think I am funny?" In
the tension-filled scene, Tommy asks Henry why he thinks he is funny. Henry
can't provide a straight answer, and Tommy's scary glare takes over. We are sure
violence is about to erupt and it is amazing how Scorsese makes the audience
nervous as well (the theatre I saw it in back in 1990 was filled with audience
members who were silent, unsure what was going to happen next). Scorsese plays
the audience like a piano, and the whole movie has that same tension running
 at its core. 
Part of the tightly controlled tension comes from the notion that gangsters only
care about money and if you screw with them, they can kill you. As written by
Scorsese and Pileggi, the film never moralizes - it simply observes and shows us
what these guys are made of. For the first time in cinema history, "GoodFellas"
asserts that gangsters are nothing but scum - they are rotten criminals with
little in the way of sympathy for anyone else except their boss. In this case,
the boss is Paul Cicero (Paul Sorvino), a man of some integrity who wishes to
get involved in any business except drugs - the reason is because drugs can make
rats out of gangsters and he certainly doesn't want to end up in prison for
being ratted out. But these men are generally not men of principle or morals -
they have codes of conduct and their own morals within their circle. They have
codes that must be heeded, namely "never rat on your friends and always keep
your mouth shut." Wise advice given to Henry Hill as a young kid by celebrate
d thief and killer James Conway (Robert De Niro), but will Henry keep his word
or will he violate the code?
"GoodFellas" segues from one sequence to another flawlessly and so seamlessly
that we feel we are watching life unfold before our very eyes. It helps that the
film is narrated by Henry Hill since he is knowledgable of the inner workings
and anthropology of the mob. At times, "GoodFellas" is like a remarkable fusion
of a documentary-like narrative mixed with the personal story of one man who
sought to make more money than God. But things start to tumble. James Conway
gets greedy when he initiates the famous Lufthansa heist. Tommy loses his cool
and kills anyone who gets his temper rising (he even kills a made-man, normally
an untouchable in the mob circuit). Henry becomes involved with drugs like
cocaine and gets addicted himself, not to mention his wife, Karen. Everything
falls apart and consequences begin to escalate. It is a world so dangerous and
yet so alluring that we can't help but feel botj sorry and angered by Henry's
own lust for the life.  
In terms of editing and sheer cinematographic skill and peerless performances,
"GoodFellas" is sheer perfection. Its influence is clearly felt in all of the
crime pictures of today, particularly Quentin Tarantino. It is a serious crime
picture with offputting, realistic violence, unadored by the irony that has
taken the edge off of crime pictures ever since "Pulp Fiction." In "GoodFellas,"
it is all about edge and a certain immorality in Henry Hill that becomes clearer
in subsequent viewings. Scorsese's direction and Thelma Schoonmaker's faultless
editing create a world so rich and explosive that it rivals any crime picture
before or after it. There are endless tracking shots, freeze frames, zooms, but
never anything to detract from the story Scorsese is telling - it all perfectly
coincides with each scene. Consider the 2 and a half minute unbroken take inside
the Copacabana. We see Henry and Karen on their first real date entering the
club from a back entrance and watch as they scour from one room to the ne
xt, through hallways and corridors and finally entering the kitchen before
getting to the restaurant where an extra table is brought just for them. It is
essential to see it as one long take because it is primal in showing the allure
and thrill of the life. 
I've seen "GoodFellas" again and again and marvel at that fantastic sequence
inside the Copacabana, the moment where Henry Hill feels he has gone too far but
can't seem to get enough when snorting coke, Karen's crying fit when she feels
her life is in danger, Henry beaten by his father with a belt, Jimmy Conway's
quiet, understated scene where it is implied that he wants Henry killed, the
situation with Henry's girl helper who has a thing for her hat, watching Henry
make pasta sauce while watching the helicopters that may be watching him, and I
could go on. It is as perfect as any movie I've seen, and it is clearly Scorsese
at the top of his game pulling one trick out of his hat after another. Sure, it
is tough to watch, could be considered morally repugnant, and some of it is not
meant for all tastes (like the grisly stabbing at the beginning of the picture).
But it is about mob life, how easily that life can be taken away in the blink of
an eye, and notably how alluring the life of a mobster can be. The al
lure is all that Henry Hill wanted, and it is a shame he did not see it any
other way. 
For more reviews of Scorsese films, check out
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/Scorsese.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Iron Giant, The (1999)
The 1950's is an era that has always fascinated me, and so any film that
focuses on such a long forgotten time and place of innocence and sensibility is
one I look forward to. Earlier this year, there was "October Sky," a film
centered on an ambitious boy's dreams of rockets in a West Virginia mining
town. "The Iron Giant" is the latest film set in the 1950's when the Cold War
had just started, and a farm boy befriended a giant metal robot unaware of its
potential harm. 
The film begins with an innocent, likable kid named Hogarth Hughes who
desperately wants a pet, but his single mother (Jennifer Aniston) will not
allow it. One day, the antenna at the house fails to work, and Hogarth notices
that something gnawed and bit its way to his house. He searches in the middle
of the woods near the power station and finds a giant metal robot wrestling
with the electrical power lines. The boy is mystified and in awe of this giant
creature - he slowly observes how calm it is and befriends it. Of course, how
can he explain to his mom that his new pet is over twenty stories high? He
tries to hide it in the barn, but it manages to make the other parts of its
body function on their own. In one hectic scene, Hogarth pants and squirms
trying to push the robot's hand out the bathroom window while his mother knocks
on the door. 
"The Iron Giant" has a little bit of everything. There are mad generals,
insanely clumsy government agents, lazy beatniks, Mad magazines, disbelieving
townsfolk, Atomic Age training films, junkyards, etc. Just about anything
associated with the 1950's is presented here with no shame (those training
films are hilarious), as well as various rock songs from that period. 
"The Iron Giant" also has charm and pathos to spread, and it does it
convincingly with the simple metal giant who is also a weapon sent from the
enemy (possibly the Russians?). It is friendly, jovial, learns how to speak and
eats anything metal, but it can also fire missiles when threatened to defend
itself. The advertising for "The Iron Giant" and the look of the robot
strangely reminded me of the short Nazi animated film shown in "The Rocketeer"
- a combination of shock and terror at the possibility of something threatening
our world during a time of political chaos. 
"The Iron Giant" is often preachy, reverential, and its anti-gun message could
not come at a better time (but it could be relatively more subtle than
proclaiming that guns are bad). There are the typical stereotypes and cliches
but in a sense, none of it matters. For an animated film that is as
well-designed and clever as this one, this is entertaining, boisterous, simple
fun thriving on simple pleasures. "The Iron Giant" taps into our dreams of
finding a genuine friend in the form of something extraordinary, and it
delivers.    
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with questions, concerns or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at
Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Plump Fiction (1997)
As with "Scary Movie" parodying "Scream," it is simply a real effort to sit
through "Plump Fiction," a parody of "Pulp Fiction" and "Reservoir Dogs." Why?
Well, the jokes are simply recycling dialogue bits and other gags from "Pulp
Fiction" without the finesse or pungent wit Tarantino brought to his own work.
The concept behind "Plump Fiction" just can't possibly work anyway. 
The filmmakers of this film forget that satire and parody search for the sublime
and the ridiculous in other notable films that may have unintentionally funny
scenes or that have material ripe for parody. Keenan Ivory Wayans might have
done better satirizing "Nightmare on Elm Street" and the "Friday the 13th" films
more so than "Scream" when making "Scary Movie." The reason is because "Scream"
was a postmodern slasher flick that actually winked at the audience already,
providing the humorous ambition of actually satirizing and deconstructing the
slasher genre. Say what you will about "Scream" but I never took it seriously as
a modern horror film, at least not in the same breadth as "Halloween" or "The
Exorcist." 
The same problem plagues "Plump Fiction." There is a scene in the horrendous
"Spy Hard" where Leslie Nielsen and a female lead dance at a club mimicking the
expressions of John Travolta and Uma Thurman's famous dance sequence from "Pulp
Fiction." The problem is that the sequence from "Pulp" was a riff on Travolta's
dance numbers from "Saturday Night Fever" and a riff on the Batdance from the
pulpy "Batman" TV series. It was already mocking and satirizing those
pop-culture icons. So how can you possibly spoof or satirize something that is
already a spoof? It goes without saying that "Plump Fiction" has a similar dance
sequence that is actually funny but not at the same level as "Pulp" was. 
"Plump" basically reiterates most scenes from "Pulp" and Reservoir." Scenes
involving Sandra Bernhard and some Reservoir Nuns, not to mention Forrest Gump
and Nell, hardly elicit much of a smile. Best bits involve Pamela Segall and
Matthew Glave as the Coxes, riffing on "Natural Born Killers" which is certainly
ripe for parody. Segall does an excellent impersonation of Juliette Lewis and
her body language - the difference is that she is in on the joke and it is
well-executed. Tommy Davidson is also terrific as Julius, the Samuel L. Jackson
character, and at least he brings his own persona to the proceedings. I also
enjoyed a clever scene that parodied "Clerks" and "Reality Bites." But many of
these gags seem desperate at best. 
The Zucker brothers have made spoofing a household name but consider the sources
they were spoofing. "Airplane" spoofed all disaster films in general. "Top
Secret" spoofed all spy films and Elvis pictures. And so on. Their targets were
films that were not aiming to be funny at all. "Pulp Fiction" was a black comedy
that was riffing and deconstructing all of film noir in general. That is what
the filmmakers of "Plump Fiction" have forgotten.   
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Spartacus (1960)
A 70mm Cinemascope spectacular directed by Mr. Stanley Kubrick, a format of 
film ratio in the same breadth since its inception in 1953's "The Robe," as 
well as many other epics. No, this is not "2001: A Space Odyssey." It is one 
of Kubrick's lesser works, at least in contrast with the films he created 
later on. "Spartacus" is the "Gladiator" of 1960 and far superior to its 
modern counterpart. It is often beautifully made, wonderfully scored, and 
exceptionally acted by most of the principal actors, but it is also a 
long-winded story with not enough pathos to warrant a more than three-hour 
length. 
Spartacus (played by the dignified Kirk Douglas) is a born slave selected to 
become a gladiator by the brutal yet cowardly Batiatus (Peter Ustinov, who 
won the Best Supporting Actor Oscar). Spartacus joins a gladiator school that 
has a tough regiment which includes running, jumping, dueling and avoiding a 
spinning ball with blunt projections (later used to similar effect in 
countless films including "First Knight"). These training gladiators are 
treated like prisoners of war - they are housed in dark, unpleasant dungeons 
where outside light hardly exists. Women are given to them to be pleased, but 
Spartacus proves to be impotent since love is something he is not experienced 
in - some of these scenes show the tender side of Kirk Douglas that has 
rarely been shown before or since. 
One day, the domineering, sardonic General Crassus (Laurence Olivier) visits 
the school along with some gleefully depraved friends to watch a real fight 
to the death. Batiatus is reluctant to stage such a fight but gives in 
anyway. Spartacus and an Ethiopian (played by the late Woody Strode) fight 
for the pleasure of the spectators, who interestingly seem to ignore the 
brutal fight until the moment of the kill. The Ethiopian chooses not to kill 
Spartacus while holding him down, and is thus killed by Crassus. 
Later, there is a revolt against the guards and an escape, though the slaves 
first stage similar fights to the death among the surviving guards. Spartacus 
is disgusted at such conduct in general, and persuades the slaves to fight 
the Romans in full glory, perhaps they could be called the "paths of glory." 
The rest of the film focuses on Spartacus' strategies to fight the Roman 
legions through most of Italy, while the Senate deals with the aspiring 
dictatorial machinations of Crassus in contrast with the older, wiser General 
Gracchus (Charles Laughton), who is wholly opposed to his sadistic, prideful 
antagonist. It is like a political campaign full of the usual backstabbers 
and irate politicians. 
The film's pleasures are listening to these Senate hearings, and the 
conversations between Crassus and Batiatus, and Batiatus and Gracchus - both 
Crassus and Gracchus are politicians with slightly different agendas on how 
to attack Spartacus' army. There is also some unusual insights on the private 
lives of Crassus and Gracchus, particularly for 1960. We learn that Crassus 
is bisexual and also pines for Spartacus' wife, Varinia (Jean Simmons). There 
is an originally censored scene, later restored, where Crassus shares a bath 
with a slave, Antoninus (Tony Curtis), who later joins Spartacus' army. The 
sly discussion is on oysters and snails, and Crassus admits he likes both 
oysters and snails (Olivier's lines were later post-dubbed by Anthony Hopkins 
for the 1990 restoration). In contrast, Gracchus is merely a womanizer and 
lives with several women who attend to his every whim.
If "Spartacus" suffers, it is from the developing relationship between 
Spartacus and Varinia, another former slave, which is often playful but 
mostly dated in its peculiar innocence. There must have been some strain on 
their marriage considering the chaos in and around Rome and her incoming 
pregnancy but because of the time in which this film was released, one must 
not fret over such details. 
Another flaw is how Spartacus is presented in the film. The adapted 
screenplay by the formerly blacklisted Dalton Trumbo focuses on the strength 
of Spartacus as a skilled fighter and his transition into an exceptional 
general with an acute sense of planning battle strategies. The first half of 
the film certainly shows that side of Spartacus, but as the film spans its 
196 minute running time, we find that less focus is placed on Spartacus and 
more on Varinia's eventual escape from the throes of Crassus, who wants to 
possess and own her. By the end of the film, Spartacus becomes a supporting 
player who is left crucified on a cross as are all his troop members. 
"Spartacus" is often breathtaking and alluring, and the battle scenes are 
well-directed and disorienting. This is a film that must be seen in a 
theatre, particularly to be astounded by the 70mm format that fills our own 
field of vision in ways most movies today do not. As compared to most of 
Kubrick's epics, however, which never seem dated and evolve with each passing 
generation, this one is just a pleasant time filler, an interlude for those 
interested in Kubrick's career. It is the one film where he had the least 
creative control over his vision, and it shows. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com 

Title
Review for Halloween H20: Twenty Years Later (1998)
              "Halloween: H20" is the seventh in the endless "Halloween" series
and, although it is superior to the last few sequels, it is also surprisingly
bland, unscary, emotionally defunct, and unrewarding. 
"Halloween H20" finally brings back Jamie Lee Curtis as Laurie Strode, who last
fought and screamed her way through Michael Myers' path at the end of
"Halloween II." Now it's twenty years later, and guess what day it is. Laurie
is now twenty years older and has been in hiding as Keri Tate, the headmistress
of a prestigious private high school where her son attends! Keri is still
having nightmares about Myers, drinks Vodka by the gallon, and confides in her
love interest, a psychiatrist (Adam Arkin of "Chicago Hope"), about her hellish
past. But, what do you know, Michael has tracked her down, courtesy of a nurse
who knew Laurie from the old days in an uninventive opening sequence. 
"Halloween H20" is fun for a short while, and it is a pleasure to see Janet
Leigh in a largely brief cameo as Norma (!) who provides a maternal shoulder
for Laurie (sorry, Keri) and drives the same sedan she drove in "Psycho" - it's
a post-modernist "Scream" twist and the only witty idea in the entire movie.
But instead of creating a scenario of suspense where Keri tries to fend off not
only Michael but her own personal demons, the movie opts for blood-soaked,
stupid thrills by having some emaciated, hormonal teens go through the clichd
motions of your average slasher flick. The kids say, "Who's there?", and the
incompetent direction by Steve Miner ("Friday the 13th Part 2") allows us to
see Michael in the shadows too soon before he walks up to the victims
and...well, you get the idea. Let's not kid ourselves: the two "Scream" movies
and the original "Halloween" went through the same motions but with, oh so much
more atmosphere, finesse, suspense and humor. 
There are two tense sequences that stand out: one involves an anonymous mother
and her daughter at a rural rest stop where Michael lurks behind bathroom
walls; and the coup de resistance moment where Michael and Laurie finally meet
face to face through a window. It's a moment of pure shock and horror, exactly
what should have been there throughout the whole movie.
Beyond that, "Halloween H20" has no real scares, surprises or suspense, but it
does have the enormous dignity of Jamie Lee Curtis. Her scenes with her teenage
son and with Arkin are pleasurable to watch and a bit of a novelty in a
disreputable genre. Curtis brings pathos, tears and toughness to her role that
Neve Campbell and Jennifer Love-Hewitt will never quite muster. She almost
singlehandedly saves this mediocre, run-of-the-mill sequel.
Footnote for the curious: The post-"Halloween" movies and rip-offs offered the
idea that a virginal teenager had a better chance of surviving a killer's
throes than those who had unruly sex. Laurie Strode was virginal in the first
two "Halloweens'" but now she has a son through the miracle of...sexual
intercourse. Is Laurie's son the reason Michael Myers is after her?
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with questions, concerns or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com 

Title
Review for Big One, The (1997)
"The Big One" is a pleasurable comedy, masquerading as a documentary, focusing
on Michael Moore's attempts to focus on the truth surrounding the layoffs in
Michigan and around the United States. We see unemployed people barking at
Michael Moore and at the cameras about their poverty, Borders Bookstore
employees complaining about tax cuts on their paychecks, a woman crying to Moore
at one of his booksignings about her inability to find work, and the penultimate
moment when Moore confronts the Nike chairman and asks him why people in Mexico
are working for 80 cents an hour. 
"The Big One" has lots of scattered moments of truth, and plenty of it is just
hearsay - the scene where the workers yell to Moore is obviously staged. I
enjoyed the scenes where Moore and his video crew enter places of business and
are threatened to leave, or when he gives some associates and bigwigs a big, fat
check for 80 cents to the Mexican workers because "we want to help them out."
All of this will be very familiar to anyone who's seen "Roger and Me" or his TV
series "TV Nation." 
Moore has a lot of good arguments about what's happening to hard workers around
the country who work for candy companies or GM - if these corporations are
making so much money, why are there so many layoffs? One word: competition, so
they can be ahead of the others. That is why they pay so little to Mexican
vagrants or children in Mexico and other countries - it is cheap labor for
maximum profit. And then there are the airline workers who make flight
reservations - nothing unusual about that except some of them are prisoners! 
"The Big One" is very funny throughout and is more tightly edited than "Roger
and Me." Moore could have a career as a comedian if he wants it, but he is after
bigger game - to expose the truth through nuggets of humor. Some may say he is
just exploiting the workers he's documenting. I would say he's exploiting the
exploiters. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Opposite of Sex, The (1998)
I described Christina Ricci's face as cherub-like in "Buffalo '66," and nothing can be further from the truth than in "The Opposite of Sex," a delectable comedy-drama where she plays a tramp with a heart of lust. Ricci has a beautiful, fascinating face that speaks volumes of lustlike, uninhibited qualities - she would have been ideal as Lolita. 
Ricci plays Deedee, a sixteen-year-old tramp who just moved in with her half-brother Bill (Martin Donovan), a gay teacher in Indiana. He lives with the spinster-like Lucia (Lisa Kudrow), sister of Bill's former lover who died of AIDS, who takes an immediate dislike to Deedee. Bill's new boyfriend is the muscular, dim-witted, bare-chested Matt (Ivan Sergei). Deedee sees a new catch for her net and proceeds to seduce and bed Matt, who is almost too willing. This results in Deedee getting pregnant, taking most of Bill's savings, and running off with Matt to L.A. Bill and Lucia proceed to find them, and it all involves endless plot complications and twists. 
"The Opposite of Sex" begins as a satire, and winds itself topsy-turvy as a road movie about the importance of family and relationships. I didn't mind the winding, but the satire is the best and most clever part of the film. There's something playful about writer-director Don Roos's sly take on family life, the media, and how a gay man perceives the madness in (a) Deedee conquering his male lover, (b) putting up with the aggravating Lucia, and (c) accusations of sexual crimes at his school by a former student, Jason (Johnny Galecki), Matt's other lover. 
The satirical elements are not maintained, however, when the road movie takes over the second-half of the picture resulting in a "Something Wild" ride through twists and surprises. There's also the introduction of a bland sheriff (played by none other than Lyle Lovett) who holds a torch for Lucia, and a Louisiana redneck kid - they both bring the film to a halt whenever they appear. And the conclusive Canadian border sequences hardly mirror the originality of the first half of the movie. 
"The Opposite of Sex" is told from the point-of-view of Deedee, and we hear her self-aware narration as she comments on the facts of the story. My favorite quips were regarding plot devices: "A gun. This is foreshadowing. Duh." Even funnier are her comments on gays: "Only gays love houses like this," or when she refers to Billy and his friends as "losers." She constantly reminds us we are watching a movie and foretells all the clichs that take place, though the movie never really transcends them. 
There are quite a few problems with "The Opposite of Sex" in terms of its theme and exploration of sex and relationships. For one, Deedee is an unredeeming brat and tramp rolled into one, who even holds Bill's dead lover's ashes in a ziploc bag as collateral - there is no way she would ever have a heart of gold. The movie tries to say that sex (and sexual orientation) is all that matters in a relationship, and there is no existing foundation for love. Then it switches gears, particularly Deedee's motives, and says that family is all that matters. The happy ending not only reverses its theme but succumbs to a development in Deedee's character that is hardly believable. 
As good as Ricci is, Deedee is still portrayed as a vixen with no inner life. We learn precious little about her or her past except that she destroys other people's lives. Others fare better in sharply written roles such as Martin Donovan playing the blank-faced Bill. He plays his role perfectly and is used to better effect here than in any of the recent Hal Hartley films. Lisa Kudrow is the major surprise: her facetious one-liners and double takes are intoxicating and proves there is life beyond her Phoebe character in "Friends." 
There are enough wildly comedic parts and choice dialogue bits to qualify "The Opposite of Sex" as mild entertainment. I kept thinking of a similar road movie/satire called "Flirting with Disaster," which stayed true to its themes with no cop-outs or false endings. "The Opposite of Sex" flirts with coming close to that movie's greatness, but never adheres to its own convictions. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Pecker (1998)
There are always films that you are better off renting on video than seeing at
a theater. "Pink Flamingos" is one of those films that I wish I had seen in a
theater - it's designed for the midnight movie circuit. "Pecker" is one of
those films designed for the Staten Island trash circuit. It is not meant to be
seen in any cinematic form. It is so thoroughly revolting and unfunny that I
have to hold my breath to remind myself that director John Waters made it. 
Revolting may not be the best term to use for "Pecker," since John Waters used
to be the king of bad taste (hence "Pink Flamingos"). I am more astonished by
how putrid the writing and directing are in "Pecker" - it has no redeeming
value whatsoever. 
This trash concerns a kid named Pecker (Edward Furlong), who works at a
sandwich store in the run-down section of Baltimore. He constantly snaps photos
of everything he sees, including steaks; his girlfriend's breasts; his sugar
freak sister; a group of men "teabagging" customers at a local club; his best
friend (Brendan Sexton III) posing before shoplifting from supermarkets; his
grandmother's Virgin Mary statue, and on and on...But is any of this funny or
remotely engaging? No. 
Before you know it, Pecker is discovered by a New York art dealer (Lili Taylor)
and becomes a media sensation, as does his whole family. He appears on the
cover of Vogue magazine, invites comparison to Diane Arbus, and attracts the
attention of the famous photographer Cindy Sherman! But this story of how fame
and fortune can be more damaging than staying true to yourself is a theme that
has been done to death, and Waters does nothing to keep it new, fresh or
interesting. 
The actors are embarrassingly bland and uninvolving, including the always
sprightly Lili Taylor. Furlong exudes little charisma or depth, and Christina
Ricci as Pecker's girlfriend - an expert on stains - is needlessly over-the-top
and unintelligible at times. The only actor that delivers an ounce of wit is
Waters regular Mink Stole, as a voting booth attendant - she makes the screen
sparkle for the few seconds she appears. 
"Pecker" is brainless, unrewarding junk that will make you wince at how
shockingly bad it is. Almost every scene is flatly staged and acted. Along with
"Cry-Baby," this is Waters at the extreme bottom-of-the-barrel level. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general comments at
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Goodfellas (1990)
I have made a promise to myself not to review Martin Scorsese's "GoodFellas" for
one very good reason - it is the best film of the 1990's and I still stand by my
opinion. I have dedicated a webpage to Mr. Scorsese in the last couple of years
and have thoroughly and intensely studied many of his films. I still consider
"Taxi Driver" the most phenomenally great American film ever made, and I stand
by it. But back to "GoodFellas." How can a gruesomely violent, offputting
portrait of the American mob be far superior to respected films of the 90's like
"Schindler's List," "Dances With Wolves," "Unforgiven," "The Silence of the
Lambs," "American Beauty," and, well, what is the point of belaboring the
obvious? The film has its share of detractors as well as admirers, but in
retrospect, there is simply nothing as influential or as alive and kicking as
"GoodFellas." 
The story is well known. It is all told from the point-of-view of an Irish kid,
Henry Hill (the perfectly cast Ray Liotta) who joined the mob in his youth,
skipping school to work in their places of business. Henry became fascinated by
the way of life, not so much the violence and gangland hits that are often not
the subject of crime films. By the time he is 21, he is married to the feisty
Karen Hill (Lorraine Bracco), is able to waltz into the Copacabana club without
waiting in line, makes money in restaurant deals, steals money from airports,
trucks, etc. Henry is at one point told by his mother that he looks like a
gangster. He has the looks, the snazzy suits, the connections, the power and,
just as easily, the ability to abuse it and lose it all. Yes, as indicated by
the Tony Bennett song in the opening credits, it is a rags to riches story in
the most ironic sense of the word. Scorsese has called this tale (based on a
true crime book by the excellent writer/reporter Nicholas Pillegi "Wiseguy"), as
well 
as the subsequent "Casino," a story of the American Dream. Perhaps, but since
when is it a dream of any kid to become a gangster? "It was better than becoming
President of the United States," says Henry Hill during his narrative voice-over
which succumbs the entire film. Maybe but the razzle-dazzle lifestyle of money,
Cadillacs, drugs and scores of women also has its limits. 
In "Casino," there were no limits to what powerful men could have and consume.
In "GoodFellas," there are limits, mostly because we are dealing with
lower-level gangsters, at least a little higher on the scale than the ones in
"Mean Streets." To categorize in more facile terms, "Mean Streets" was about
racketeering in the streets, "GoodFellas" is about the abuse of having access to
anything in the Mob and finally, "Casino" is about how the Mob's involvement in
casino operations can become a sickness. 
In 2 and a half hours, Scorsese does an incredible job of detailing the inside
life of organized crime, how it works and operates, how they behave, and manages
to tell the story of one man whose desires outweigh his priorities and has to
contend with having a family and working 24 hours a day. We see what it is like
to be a gangster and how sudden bursts of violence can come out of nowhere and
be totally unprovoked. A classic example is Joe Pesci's famous speech as Tommy,
the itchy trigger-happy gangster, when he asks, "Do you think I am funny?" In
the tension-filled scene, Tommy asks Henry why he thinks he is funny. Henry
can't provide a straight answer, and Tommy's scary glare takes over. We are sure
violence is about to erupt and it is amazing how Scorsese makes the audience
nervous as well (the theatre I saw it in back in 1990 was filled with audience
members who were silent, unsure what was going to happen next). Scorsese plays
the audience like a piano, and the whole movie has that same tension running
 at its core. 
Part of the tightly controlled tension comes from the notion that gangsters only
care about money and if you screw with them, they can kill you. As written by
Scorsese and Pileggi, the film never moralizes - it simply observes and shows us
what these guys are made of. For the first time in cinema history, "GoodFellas"
asserts that gangsters are nothing but scum - they are rotten criminals with
little in the way of sympathy for anyone else except their boss. In this case,
the boss is Paul Cicero (Paul Sorvino), a man of some integrity who wishes to
get involved in any business except drugs - the reason is because drugs can make
rats out of gangsters and he certainly doesn't want to end up in prison for
being ratted out. But these men are generally not men of principle or morals -
they have codes of conduct and their own morals within their circle. They have
codes that must be heeded, namely "never rat on your friends and always keep
your mouth shut." Wise advice given to Henry Hill as a young kid by celebrate
d thief and killer James Conway (Robert De Niro), but will Henry keep his word
or will he violate the code? 
"GoodFellas" segues from one sequence to another flawlessly and so seamlessly
that we feel we are watching life unfold before our very eyes. It helps that the
film is narrated by Henry Hill since he is knowledgable of the inner workings
and anthropology of the mob. At times, "GoodFellas" is like a remarkable fusion
of a documentary-like narrative mixed with the personal story of one man who
sought to make more money than God. But things start to tumble. James Conway
gets greedy when he initiates the famous Lufthansa heist. Tommy loses his cool
and kills anyone who gets his temper rising (he even kills a made-man, normally
an untouchable in the mob circuit). Henry becomes involved with drugs like
cocaine and gets addicted himself, not to mention his wife, Karen. Everything
falls apart and consequences begin to escalate. It is a world so dangerous and
yet so alluring that we can't help but feel both sorry and angered by Henry's
own lust for the life.  
In terms of editing and sheer cinematographic skill and peerless performances,
"GoodFellas" is sheer perfection. Its influence is clearly felt in all of the
crime pictures of today, particularly Quentin Tarantino. It is a serious crime
picture with offputting, realistic violence, unadored by the irony that has
taken the edge off of crime pictures ever since "Pulp Fiction." In "GoodFellas,"
it is all about edge and a certain immorality in Henry Hill that becomes clearer
in subsequent viewings. Scorsese's direction and Thelma Schoonmaker's faultless
editing create a world so rich and explosive that it rivals any crime picture
before or after it. There are endless tracking shots, freeze frames, zooms, but
never anything to detract from the story Scorsese is telling - it all perfectly
coincides with each scene. Consider the 2 and a half minute unbroken take inside
the Copacabana. We see Henry and Karen on their first real date entering the
club from a back entrance and watch as they scour from one room to the ne
xt, through hallways and corridors and finally entering the kitchen before
getting to the restaurant where an extra table is brought just for them. It is
essential to see it as one long take because it is primal in showing the allure
and thrill of the life. 
I've seen "GoodFellas" again and again and marvel at that fantastic sequence
inside the Copacabana, the moment where Henry Hill feels he has gone too far but
can't seem to get enough when snorting coke, Karen's crying fit when she feels
her life is in danger, Henry beaten by his father with a belt, Jimmy Conway's
quiet, understated scene where it is implied that he wants Henry killed, the
situation with Henry's girl helper who has a thing for her hat, watching Henry
make pasta sauce while watching the helicopters that may be watching him, and I
could go on. 
It is as perfect as any movie I've seen, and it is clearly Scorsese at the top
of his game pulling one trick out of his hat after another. Sure, it is tough to
watch, could be considered morally repugnant, and some of it is not meant for
all tastes (like the grisly stabbing at the beginning of the picture). But it is
about mob life, how easily that life can be taken away in the blink of an eye,
and notably how alluring the life of a mobster can be. The allure is all that
Henry Hill wanted, and it is a shame he did not see it any other way. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@ayhoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Erin Brockovich (2000)
There is no other female star as watchable as Julia Roberts - no matter what
film she is in, she is indeed the sparkling star whom can't take our eyes off.
She sometimes makes good films ("Notting Hill," "My Best Friend's Wedding") and
rotten films ("Runaway Bride," "Sleeping With the Enemy"). Count her latest
"Erin Brockovich" as one of her best, a conventional but unquestionably
spirited and entertaining romp showcasing Julia's qualities to full flowering
effect. She burns on screen with such radiance, beauty and toughness that the
film will leave you beaming in phosphorescent delight.
Julia stars as Erin Brockovich, a real-life crusader who went against all odds
and came back as a winner of justice. At the beginning of the film, Erin is
desperately trying to get a job and uses her persuasive, feminine skills to get
one (she fakes resumes to obtain interviews). She fails, ends up in a car
accident, and gets a lawyer (Albert Finney) who fails to get her compensation
for her neck brace. Erin is so overwhelmed with anger that she confronts the
lawyer, Ed Masry, and convinces him to give her a job in his shabby L.A.
office. She is after all a divorced, single mom with starving kids, but her
attitude and flashy clothes, not to mention excessive cleavage, causes her
fellow employees to take notice. After sifting through a pro bono case
involving the company Pacific Gas & Electric in a nearby town named Hinkley,
Erin discovers that deposits of a lethal substance called chromium had been
placed in the water causing various tumors and other afflictions in the
townspeople. She investigates and questions the townsfolk, and before you know
it, she is knee deep in the water literally pulling a dead frog out as
evidence. 
Erin's personal life has its ups and downs. She reluctantly has a babysitter
named George (Aaron Eckhart from "In the Company of Men"), a biker with
multiple tattoos, a bandana and a big grin, but he is also a very nice guy and
falls in love with Erin - the character is refreshingly cliche free of what we
expect to see from hardcore bikers. After a while, George becomes the caretaker
rather than the boyfriend since Erin is on her endless adventurous crusade
against PG&E. Will Erin realize that her work is less important than her
family, or will she fight to the bitter end and lose the multi-million dollar
court case? This may be the stuff of a Lifetime TV drama, and I only wish that
writer Susannah Grant devoted a little more attention to this inevitably
fractured relationship. There is an uneasy balance between Erin's case and her
home life, especially since George almost disappears from the story.
What makes "Erin Brockovich" special is Julia, and she cuts a dazzling figure
out of this character. She is tough, funny, sexy, charming, rude, obnoxious,
warm, caring, tender, flirtatious - my goodness, what a delight to see such a
real, intoxicating woman on screen for once! Julia disappears into the role so
well that we forget it is Julia, the movie star. For the first time in years,
Julia acts with tremendous, dramatic force. 
Albert Finney is also pleasurably engaging as the haggard Masry, and his
double-take reactions to Erin's behavior and inappropriate language are
priceless. Another miraculous performance is by Marg Helgenberger as Mrs.
Jensen, one of the Hinkley townspeople afflicted with cancer - her porch scene
with Julia is as moving as one can expect. 
Director Steven Soderbergh, known for nonlinear puzzles like "The Limey" and
"Schizopolis," effectively taps into Julia's high-wire act to keep things
afloat. If the screenplay took more chances with such a conventional storyline,
it might have been a more winning character study. As is, Soderbergh allows for
some occasional jump cuts during Erin's frantic moods, and a burnished glow to
the desert scenes in L.A. that makes one feel the heat and humidity. And Julia
creates an inspiring character - an uneducated, strong, honest woman who used
her brains and beauty to uncover corruption and to save people whom she cared
about. Inspiring indeed.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Primary Colors (1998)
A Look Back at PRIMARY COLORS (1998) and THE WAR ROOM (1993)
After hearing the media's relentless obsession over President Clinton's sexual
life and personal affairs (not to mention "Wag the Dog"), we get Mike Nichols'
irreverent, deeply hysterical "Primary Colors" that centers on a presidential
candidate trying to evade questions about purported sexual dalliances. This
couldn't be a more timely subject and make no mistake, this film is about
President Clinton. "Primary Colors" also reminded me of the intoxicating
documentary "The War Room" from 1993, which focused on Governor Clinton's run
for the presidency in 1992. The same basic premise exists for both films: the
underdog aiming for the presidency amid a flurry of rumors and personal
bashing. 
"Primary Colors" stars John Travolta as the white-haired, doughnut-eating,
Arkansas-bred Jack Stanton who vies for the presidential office. As played by
Travolta, Jack is quite a charmer and full of charisma, more so than Clinton.
He is even married to a Hillary Clinton-type, played to the hilt by Emma
Thompson using an authentic American accent. Stanton gets help from his
campaign staff headed by a James Carville-redneck-type (Billy Bob Thornton),
and a promising, idealistic campaign staffer Henry Burton (Adrian Lester). Jack
has fleeting sexual flings with co-workers while the staff prepares a campaign
aimed at proving to the people that Stanton believes in putting the people's
needs first. 
Unfortunately, Stanton's sexual history is put at the forefront of the
political forum and is exploited by fellow candidates, including Gov. Fred
Picker (Larry Hagman in top form) who enters the race late - Picker may
intentionally remind you of Ross Perot. In order to defend himself against
verbal attacks and seemingly fabricated tape recordings, Jack enlists the help
of an old friend, Libby Holden (an intense Kathy Bates) a.k.a. "Dustbuster," a
lesbian, all-purpose troubleshooter who has no qualms about placing a gun on a
man's privates. 
"Primary Colors" is based on the book of the same name by Anonymous (recently
known as political journalist Joe Klein), and it is rife with richly drawn
characters, an acidly sharp script by Elaine May, and astute direction by Mike
Nichols. It is a film that begins as comedy and slowly evolves into a dark
satire - a reproach of the process by which someone like Jack Stanton gets
elected despite the personal allegations. 
"The War Room" is a vibrant, witty excursion into the presidential campaign of
1992 when then Gov. Clinton was running for office. The film follows the
campaign process via chief political strategist James Carville and adviser
George Stephanopolous, and is all set in the "war room," formerly a Little Rock
newspaper office. 
Carville and Stephanopolous are two of the most charismatic characters I've
seen in a documentary (or film) in a long time, and they couldn't be more
opposite in their physical demeanor. Carville, in his Southern drawl, is always
actively making decisions whether it's about prepared speeches, the look of a
campaign poster, or arguing endlessly on the phone about the other candidates
or Clinton's past - "Every time somebody even farts the word 'draft,' it makes
the paper."         Stephanopolous is the more timid, quiet, reserved individual -
he reminds me a lot of Michael J. Fox's character Alex P. Keaton in "Family
Ties"; Fox subsequently played a variation of George in "The American
President." George is more subtle and calm than Carville, and operates in an
equally articulate manner. At one crucial point, George receives a call from a
black woman claiming to have given birth to Clinton's child. George convinces
the caller that she will be ridiculed in the press if she comes out with such a
sensational story. This scene is reminiscent of the scene in "Primary Colors"
where Stanton's advisers visit a teenage black girl claiming to have the
candidate's baby. 
As directed by D.A. Pennebaker and Chris Hegedus, "The War Room" is very keen
on details and conversations between staff and personnel regarding the plight
of the Clinton campaign. The atmosphere grows more and more tense as we get to
the inevitable climax where Clinton wins the nomination in the election
victory. On the eve of the election, Carville gives an emotional speech
regarding the strong effort he and his aides have made in helping Clinton, and
the positive effect politics has had on his life. George is even questioned by
the secretary as to how he feels: "Exhausted." 
"The War Room" could have used more footage of Clinton and perhaps the
filmmakers could have catched him in truly private, unguarded moments as to how
he really felt about the adultery charges. Still, "The War Room" and "Primary
Colors" greatly succeed in capturing the political atmosphere and the
exhausting process in which a candidate is elected. The irony is that Clinton
and Stanton's adulterous affairs not only sidestepped their political agendas,
but made them stronger candidates for the presidency. In other words, give the
people what they want. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
Faust667@aol.com or at jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Book of Shadows: Blair Witch 2 (2000)
Perhaps I am overindulgent in my praise but I still think "The Blair Witch 
Project" is one of the best horror films of the last twenty years. It was 
good enough for me to dedicate a webpage to the film considering how many 
people had misunderstood it and its intentions. Although the film may not 
have been completely original, its approach certainly was. Primarily shot on 
video and 16mm black-and-white film, it had the look and feel of an extremely 
low-budget feature that could have been made by anyone with a camcorder and a 
computer. The difference with "Blair" as opposed to other independent horror 
flicks, such as "The Evil Dead" and "Halloween," is that it did not feel like 
a movie - it sort of transpired before our eyes in practically documentary 
fashion. Now we have a sequel, "Book of Shadows: Blair Witch 2," that commits 
the error of most other shopworn sequels - it has gore, sex, loud heavy metal 
music, and a host of ghostly manifestations right out of 1999's "The 
Haunting." The original suggested the 
menace of evil. This "Blair" leaves precious little to the imagination, 
though we can be thankful that there is still no visible witch. 
"Blair Witch 2" begins promisingly enough. There is a nifty prologue set in 
the town of Burkittsville where the "Blair Witch" mania has spun out of 
control, and the local citizens speak out on how they have dealt with it. The 
local sheriff reassures the "Blair" fans that there is no witch in the town 
or in the woods. But then things go wrong. A mental asylum is shown as a 
flashback of where Jeffrey Donovan, a former patient, was abused by the 
doctors and guards. Once Jeffrey is released, he organizes a Blair Witch 
Hunt, which is a tour of the Black Hills woods where the original movie took 
place. Jeffrey finds four other willing participants for his tour through the 
magic of the Internet. They include: Kim Director, a telekinetic goth chick 
(resembling a pale Heather Donahue) who found the movie to be cool; Erica 
Leerhsen, a sensitive Wiccan obsessed with spreading the good word about 
witches; and a couple (Stephen Barker Turner and Tristen Skyler) involved in 
writing a book on the Blair Witch. Together they
 camp out in the woods where they find misplaced trees and another wandering 
tour group. After a wild night of drugs and heavy Jack Daniels boozing, they 
find out the next day that the cameras are all gone, except for the tapes, 
and all the research from the Blair authors is shredded. What happened during 
that night? And what is it with all the bloody witch markings on their 
bodies? And who killed that rival tour group at Coffin Rock? 
At this point, the film begins to get a little more intriguing in the 
investigation of the tapes that were set up in the cameras to record their 
nighttime activities. The group's intent is to discover what happened to 
them, and what they find is quite grisly and decadent to say the least. 
Unfortunately, director Joe Berlinger (acclaimed documentarian of films such 
as "Paradise Lost" and "Brother's Keeper") throws in everything to the mix 
except the witch. We get milisecond shock cuts in the form of flashforwards, 
relentlessly repeated montages of stabbings and dripping blood, ghostly 
manifestations of the Burkittsville children killed long ago by the witch, 
naked bodies dancing and cavorting in the woods, some sexual byplay between 
Erica and Stephen, and so on. Although it is not as overdone as your basic 
slasher cum horror flick sequel, it feels like a bastardization of everything 
the original "Blair Witch" did so well.
Another problem are the characters who feel like they had been recycled from 
the "Scream" mix (Marilyn Manson's song "Disposable Teens" gives a hint of 
what's to come). With the sole exception of the goth chick, all the 
characters are unmemorable and bland to say the least - they scream, shout 
and argue but they hardly have much in the way of personality. Heather, Mike 
and Josh were annoying too but they had gobs of humanity, wit and sympathy - 
everything this cast lacks. The pregnant Tristen Skyler, who should be the 
most sympathetic of the bunch, comes across as the most unlikable - she even 
dreams of killing her newborn! If we cannot care about the characters, then 
we care less if there is a witch inducing a group hypnosis on this bunch.
The concept of this film is fascinating - it assumes the original was just a 
film and that this group is out to perhaps debunk the myth. Although the 
ending is gripping, it lacks the emotional subtext of the original. There are 
some good Heather Donahue jokes, a nod to Frederick Wiseman's excellent 
documentary, "Titicut Follies," and some occasionally tense scenes but 
mostly, this is a lifeless, perfunctory affair. It's obvious that nobody 
could have made a decent sequel to a phenomenon like "The Blair Witch 
Project," a horror film that only comes around once in a blue moon. There is 
sound advice from Randy in "Scream 2" that the filmmakers should listen to - 
'Sequels suck. They are inferior films. The horror genre was destroyed by 
them'. Sounds just about right.     
Please check out my BLAIR WITCH PROJECT analysis at 
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/index3.shtml
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Boys Don't Cry (1999)
It is no secret that America has its share of homophobia and racism abounding
in all corners of every state. I am sure in Falls City, Nebraska, it is no
different. The girl who passed herself off as a boy named Brandon Teena
probably knew that such homophobia existed but that did not stop him (I will
refer to Brandon as a male) from being true to herself. And so commences the
bristling, highly effective "Boys Don't Cry," a debut film by director Kimberly
Peirce based on a true story. An incredibly mesmerizing film, Peirce certainly
shows a gift for handling actors and raw emotions. 
The highly magnetic Hilary Swank stars as Brandon Teena, formerly Teena
Brandon, who moves to Falls City despite the hesitations and warnings from her
cousin. Brandon makes fast friends in Falls City with some beer-swilling,
truck-driving, pot-smoking young people. Two of them (Peter Saarsgard and
Brendan Sexton III) are former jail buddies with nothing on their minds except
drinking and putting their hands through flames. But there is one Brandon has
his eye on - the dour-looking female teen who loves karaoke, Lana (Chloe
Sevigny). She drinks heavily and works in a factory, but is immediately smitten
by Brandon because he is so unlike any other males she has encountered in this
dead-end town. Brandon respects her, and suddenly, Lana seems to overcome her
sullenness and becomes full of life - as if a diamond had sprung and sparkled
her sensibilities. 
Brandon has a troubled past to contend with, however, and it inevitably catches
up with him. He has robbed, cheated and lied but all for a positive cause in a
way, to stay true to himself. Brandon wants to do away with girlish
sensibilities - he cuts his hair short and places a sock in between his legs.
And he gets away with it! He asks girls out in roller-skating rinks and treats
them like queens. Lana is the latest girl to be comforted by Brandon, and even
if there is the danger of her finding out what his real gender is, we know she
will still love him. 
"Boys Don't Cry" has two magnificent performances that will touch the heart and
rivet the soul. Hilary Swank is clearly amazing in that she looks like a boy
and we respond to her as such - her beaming smile glows and makes Brandon that
much more sympathetic a character. We know there is an inevitable tragedy he
will face, and so the tension builds because Brandon means well and is
harmless. 
Chloe Sevigny also undergoes a miraculous transformation, from her binge
drinking habits and dourness to a pleasing beauty with an angelic face waiting
to be loved. Ever since her dramatic turns in "Kids" and "Trees Lounge," I have
fallen in love with Chloe - her presence evokes compassion, much like the late
Audrey Hepburn. It is a quality unheard of in most young actresses today, but
Chloe has it down pat.
"Boys Don't Cry" is raw and painful, and is not intended for general audiences,
but those who can deal with the subject matter will be rewarded with the
performances of Swank and Sevigny. They embody the film with sweetness and raw,
naked emotion - their relationship is as real as any love story I have seen of
late. If I have any complaints about the film, it is only that I wished to see
how Brandon tried to adapt from day-to-day as a boy - there is one scene where
he has to buy tampons but otherwise, he seems to be able to deal with the
situation remarkably well. Still, director Peirce knows that the heart of the
film is Brandon, the rebel without a cause. His only concern is to have a sex
operation and to live with Lana in Memphis. He has ambitions and dreams ("You
hallucinate 24 hours a day," says one character about Brandon) but his main
focus is to be free and to live. The fact that he couldn't is what makes "Boys
Don't Cry" such a moving, poetic experience. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or complaints at faustus_08520@yahoo.com
or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Negotiator, The (1998)
"The Negotiator" is yet another generic "Die Hard" clone crossed with "Speed" mixed with "The Fugitive" and, for fun, a dose of "Dog Day Afternoon," action thriller. The difference is in the ebullient casting.
Samuel L. Jackson is Danny Roman, an admired hostage negotiator who is framed for a murder he didn't commit. Really? In a stunning reversal of roles, Danny decides to hold some hostages in an office building, including the late, great J.T. Walsh as a seemingly corrupt Internal Affairs chief, and the hilariously nervous chatter of Paul Giamatti (best known as Pig Vomit in "Private Parts"), as a credit-card fraud artist. Has Danny gone too far off the violent end, or will a smooth-talking negotiator, Chris Sabian (Kevin Spacey), defuse him and his actions? 
To see the dynamic Samuel L. Jackson and Kevin Spacey together is a real treat, and some of the dialogue between them and the hostages tingles with excitement and true fervor. But director F. Gary Gray ("Friday") can't resist throwing in a few action scenes and broken glass to distract from the power of the dramatic confrontations, and the movie ends with a pat, stupid conclusion that looks more like last-minute revising and intervention by a committee than a screenwriter's block. Not half-bad, and worth it for Spacey and Jackson's performances, but still - as ordinary as thrillers get.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Jay and Silent Bob Strike Back (2001)
Warning: if you are not a fan of "Clerks" or "Chasing Amy," not to mention
"Mallrats," then it is very likely that you will find little enjoyment in Kevin
Smith's newest film. "Jay and Silent Bob Strikes Back" is a delirious joyride
for all View Askew fans, taking us from New Jersey to Hollywood and back with
many belly laughs and a few lulls along the way. It is mandatory that you are
educated in this universe or else, you'll have a joyless time.
To anyone not familiar with View Askew, it is the name of Kevin Smith's
production company in Red Bank, N.J. and the universe in which all his
characters from his first four films reside in. Jay (Jason Mewes) and Silent Bob
(Kevin Smith) are the two drug dealers who have appeared in all of Smith's
films. Usually left on the sidelines, they take center stage this time as they
continue selling drugs in front of the Quik Stop convenience store in Leonardo,
N.J. Jay and Silent Bob get wind from their old friend, Brodie (Jason Lee), that
the comic book based on them, Bluntman and Chronic, is getting made into a
Hollywood movie by their other old friend, Banky (also played by Jason Lee).
Huh? Okay, if you saw "Chasing Amy," you'll recall that Banky and Holden (Ben
Affleck, who reprises his role here) were comic book artists who made their
claim to fame with their "Bluntman and Chronic" comic book. In this movie, Banky
sold the rights to Miramax studios to make the movie. Jay and Silent Bob are
infuriated that they
 are not getting a piece of the collective pie so they embark on a journey to
Hollywood that includes some hot babes dressed in slinky outfits, a wild
orangutan, plenty of gay and fart jokes to make GLADD blush (which they
reportedly have), Carrie Fisher as a nun, George Carlin as a hitchhiker, clumsy
federal marshals, Internet bashing, and more in-jokes (many associated with
"Star Wars") than almost any movie I have ever seen. 
"Jay and Silent Bob Strike Back" has quite a few good laughs but there are also
far too many lulls. The scenario involving a federal wildlife marshal simply
marks time (including an unfunny cameo by Judd Nelson). Plus, those
slinky-outfitted babes (which includes a vivacious Shannon Hamilton) exude more
groans than smiles, aping the recent remake of "Charlie's Angels." Best bits
involve the Quik stop employees, Randal and Dante from "Clerks" (played by Jeff
Anderson and Brian O'Halloran), who call the police in to arrest the likable
drug dealers. I also liked Ben Affleck as Holden and as himself, not to mention
Matt Damon as himself, as they trade asides on each other's careers and mocking
their joint effort, "Good Will Hunting." There is also Mark Hamill as
Cock-Knocker, which has to be seen to be believed, Wes Craven making another
"Scream" sequel, and Jason Biggs and James Van Der Beek as themselves portraying
Bluntman and Chronic in the movie version. You can also count on several other
cameos by other c
haracters from Smith's View Askew universe. 
The stars of this show are Jay and Silent Bob and they are often hysterical to
watch. Jason Mewes in particular steals the show as Jay with his sexual body
language and obscene comments having to do with one particular area of the
female anatomy. Kevin Smith as Silent Bob merely makes disapproving looks and
gestures and too much of this can go a long way. Still, they make a fitting
pair, as always, and drive the movie forward with more scatalogical jokes than
one can count in this jaded day and age of sexually promiscuous teen movies. 
"Jay and Silent Bob Strike Back" is fitfully funny and often clever enough for
those not easily offended by gay and fart jokes (count me in the mix). It is not
half as good as "Clerks" or as hackneyed as "Mallrats" or "Dogma," but it does
fall somewhere in between. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Cast Away (2000)
When it comes to Tom Hanks, it is difficult to criticize him. Why you may 
ask? Because as an actor, he becomes so enveloped in his roles that it is 
hard to notice when he is or isn't acting - the Jimmy Stewart of our 
generation simply becomes the characters he plays without any obvious tics or 
methods to his madness. And make no mistake, Hanks is not playing himself, he 
is acting but since it is invisible, it is harder to trace. From his 
Oscar-winning turn in "Philadelphia" to last year's sympathetic prison guard 
in "The Green Mile," Hanks is one of our best actors because he consistently 
surprises audiences and critics alike in his choice of roles. As the 
efficient Chuck Noland, Hanks has his most demanding role to date, eschewing 
his soft side for a more snippy side considering the location he is placed in 
- the rough terrain of a lost island. 
At the start of the film (in a far too long prologue), Chuck is already in a 
race against time considering he is a Fed-Ex employee. He chastises the 
Russians in Moscow for late arrivals of packages (he keeps timers inside 
packages he self-mails to prove his point). His intent is to keep the 
business efficient and on the mark, or else the whole company will end up 
like the U.S. mail.
Chuck barely maintains an intimate relationship with his girlfriend, Kelly 
(Helen Hunt), whom he tries to propose at Christmas time in good old Memphis 
(It is no surprise to discover that Chuck is an Elvis lover). Unfortunately, 
time is another scapegoat as Chuck is off on another trip in his busy work 
schedule, delivering a package that must arrive overnight to its designated 
location. He hands Kelly an engagement ring in a box, to be opened when he 
gets back. And off he goes yet during a catastrophic thunderstorm, the plane 
crashes near some uncharted island...and if you have seen the trailers for 
this film, you'll know Chuck becomes a castaway and is thus cast away as well 
from civilization. 
Chuck arrives in this uninhabited island on a deflated raft. Some Fed-Ex 
packages wash ashore as well, but what is this man going to do? He has no 
cell phone, no plane, hardly any food except for coconuts (a natural 
laxative), and is in an island where nobody ever comes through. He has to 
depend on his survival instincts of course which develop rather quickly, 
including spearing fish, building fires, gathering wood, making videotape 
with rope, using roller skates as cutting tools, living inside a cave for 
shelter, and so on. Chuck is our modern-day Robinson Crusoe without benefit 
of videographers or unwanted bystanders from the popular "Survivor" show - he 
is truly an isolated man who finds a partner in a Wilson volleyball. 
The scenes on the island are truly awesome, and director Zemeckis is often at 
his best here evoking long silent pauses in many of these scenes, as it 
should be. At least we are spared the bickering of Anne Heche and Harrison 
Ford in the charmless "Six Days, Seven Nights." This is an existential 
journey for Chuck, left pondering about his existence and his girlfriend 
Kelly and if he will ever get out of the island. How long can a man talk to a 
volleyball before becoming insane? 
I will not give away too much more of "Cast Away" but I will say that the 
film's bookends are less stronger than the crux of the story - a man's 
survival in an unnamed island forced to deal with the losses in his life. 
This was the same flaw in "Green Mile" and "Saving Private Ryan" - when will 
Hanks step out of these damn bookends? The last few scenes in the film do 
work, and there is a level of ambiguity that is much appreciated in these 
days of cookie-cutter Hollywood movies. But it is not as powerful as all 
those scenes on the island. 
Hanks does some of his best work ever here, exuding a little toughness, 
snippiness and cynicism about himself and his past and future existence - 
this may well be Hanks's first existential, fully mature leading man role to 
date. The transformation from a fastidious workaholic to a harried man ("I 
just have to keep breathing") is quite affecting to watch. 
Helen Hunt, an often bland actress, gives a surprisingly touching 
performance. Her Kelly is aware that Chuck may not always be there for her 
because of his strenuous job, and thus becomes aware of loss early on. It's a 
small role for Hunt but not a thankless one (as it was in "What Women Want"), 
and about as magnetic as her work in the Oscar-winning "As Good as it Gets." 
"Cast Away" is finally about loss and how to deal with it in purely 
fundamental terms. Being cast away from civilization as we know it may be a 
greater loss than one can fathom, and Chuck knows it for the period of time 
he remains on the island. If the opening and closing sequences had been 
truncated somewhat and if Zemeckis had spent more time on that island, then 
"Cast Away" would have been a superb motion picture. As it stands, it is a 
solid entertainment and there are scenes as moving as any I've seen in all of 
2000, yet it could have been so much more. Still, my vote stands for "Cast 
Away," casting aside "Survivor" any day of the week. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com 

Title
Review for Ice Storm, The (1997)
The 1970's remains the most fascinating decade of the last sixty years. It was
time of political corruption, assassinations, funky clothes, mop tops,
psychedelic music, blaxploitation cinema, subversive literature and films, etc.
Films of the 90's continue to explore this decade in great detail from "Casino"
to "Nixon" to "Dazed and Confused" to the current "Ice Storm," a delicate,
delectable, irregular tragicomedy of family manners and mores. 
The film's basic structure is patterned around Thanksgiving weekend in 1973 in
the quaint little town of New Canaan, Connecticut. Kevin Kline stars as Ben
Hood, a corporate executive and father to a semi-dysfunctional family where
nobody quite listens to anyone else. Ben is not entirely satisfied with his
life and indulges in a less-than-stimulating affair with his beautiful
neighbor, Jane (Sigourney Weaver). Ben's wife (the fantastic Joan Allen) is a
frigid, repressed woman who seems to find no joy in her life except when she's
stealing red lipstick from the local pharmacy or chatting with the local
minister. Their daughter (Christina Ricci) is affected by the Nixon campaign,
steals candy bars from stores, and is developing hormonal desires towards her
dazed boyfriend (Elijah Wood) and his tense brother (Adam Hann-Byrd).
 "The Ice Storm" is essentially an observation of family life after the end of
the Vietnam War and during the numerous liberation movements of that period.
The country is beset by lies such as the Watergate debacle, and in the
messiness of family life in typical suburbia. We see the traditional
Thanksgiving dinner; "key" parties where women pick up men to drive with by
randomly picking keys from a bowl; and the teenagers who indulge in marihuana,
sexual games, drinking, and playing with death, e.g., Elijah Wood walking on a
diving board during an ice storm. 
These are all events and they are depicted with knowing clarity by director
Ang Lee. Lee explores this territory better than any American film director
might have, yet he does not bring us close to the characters - we remain
distanced from them and their troubles. Lee was the ideal director for "Sense
and Sensibility" in showing repressed minds but this is set in the 70's, a time
of liberation not repression. The only fully developed character (and one whom
we are not distanced from) is Ben's daughter played by the remarkable Ricci who
brings a wry sense of humor to her precocious character - she has a
terrifically humorous moment where she dons a Nixon mask while trying to have
sex with her boyfriend. The other characters are merely thin characterizations
presented in mostly fleeting moments. Sigourney Weaver is especially playful as
Jane, the sexy adulteress who gives sound advice to the blabbering Ben: 'I
already have a husband. I don't need another,' but her character is shown only
intermittently. The relationship between Ben and his wife is well depicted but
lacking in weight - they seem to drift in their lives without divulging many of
their emotions or feelings. Perhaps that is the point, but it is not dealt with
greater depth. There's a beautiful moment where Ben's wife sees her daughter
riding a bicycle and she, for a moment, feels inner peace. Then she starts to
ride a bike to feel some sense of "liberation." It's a terrific moment and it
is one of the few moments to really strike an emotional chord.
 Cinematographer Frederick Elmes ("Blue Velvet") does an astounding job of
depicting this world with dark blue tones for the night scenes, and graying
clouds making the days seems colorless. I love they way he dramatizes the
ensuing ice storm complete with close-ups of a train's icy wheels making
contact with icy rails, and the frozen icicles on the tree's leaves. Ang Lee
also enhances the oncoming climate with the constant weather reports of the
danger ahead. This is also meant as a metaphor for the troubling family
relations in New Canaan. But where's the drama? 
"The Ice Storm" is a very fine film and it is exquisitely made. It also has a
wonderful cast, but it's often devoid of genuine feeling - the sentimental
ending (parents can redeem themselves through their children) negates the
somber, enigmatic mood that preceded it. If the film opted to tell its story
from the point-of-view of Christina Ricci, then this would have been a more
complete picture of 1970's family life. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or
Faust667@aol.com 

Title
Review for Quills (2000)
When I think of the Marquis De Sade, I think of sadism, pure and simple (heck, the word comes from his name). Others may see him as a pornographer, a brutally harsh man, bestial, etc. It is a surprise therefore to see that director Philip Kaufman ("The Unbearable Lightness of Being") has sanitized the grand old Marquis somewhat, making him less the dangerously lecherous man and more the swooning, almost sympathetic writer dying to write his devilishly seductive prose with his needful quills. 
Geoffrey Rush is De Sade, shown living in a dank stone cell in a mental institution known as Charenton. De Sade delights in writing and in speaking in gentle, arousing tones, embellishing and enunciating each and every syllable as if the English language were his own. Though he is imprisoned, he continues to write his novels, particularly the controversial "Justine," with the help of a chambermaid (Kate Winslet), a secret courier who delivers his work to the nearest town to be published anonymously. Of course, most of the townspeople know it is De Sade's work, only he could publish such scandalous writings. 
Naturally such published works cause controversy and so the institution sends Dr. Royer-Collard (Michael Caine), a brutish, callous man to cure De Sade of his fiendish talent by way of torture. De Sade's work gets so out of hand and causes such scandals everywhere, including one involving Collard's own youthful wife, a former nun who reads De Sade's work with relish, that the writer is stripped of his talents, physically and emotionally. His quills are taken away, as are his clothes. You can't censor a good writer for too long since he uses any available means of writing his prose, including his own blood (by pricking his fingers) and his feces. This lunatic cannot live without writing, and never before have I seen such a slowly developed emotional catharsis for an artist intent on making his work come to fruition in any way possible. 
"Quills" is quite prescient in its look at censorship, and how the writer of what some have described as pornography can be used as a scapegoat for the ills of society  - certainly such lascivious prose would not cause women to act lustful now would it? And what about the other patients in the institution who act out his plays regularly  - are they capable of misinterpreting his work and using it as an excuse to commit violent acts? 
The centerpiece of the film is the naive young priest (Joaquin Phoenix), who believes that De Sade's work is immoral yet still admires the man for his tenacity. Still, the priest does manage to read some of the man's work and it may be possible that it causes him to develop feelings for the beautiful, buxom chambermaid.
"Quills" works mainly because of Geoffrey Rush's magnificent, fully alive performance - he wretches, he cavorts, he has a devilish laugh and smile, and basically, he is irresistible. I think the real De Sade must have been too, and his work shone with equal engagement. The chambermaid may find De Sade too intensely passionate for her blood, but she is nevertheless intrigued by him and sexually connected to him. De Sade turns out to bring out the best and worst in everybody close to him, including his long-suffering wife and, in a couple of startling scenes, the hypocritical Dr. Royer-Collard. 
Exquisitely acted and often hauntingly beautiful in its bleached, murky look, "Quills" is about a madman who writes such erotic, violent words that it causes trouble not only for him, but for everyone around him. We can't stand to bear his pain or his enclosed surroundings yet we are unable to turn away and that, in the end, was the beauty of De Sade's art.    
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Critters 2: The Main Course (1988)
Question: what sequel has none of the humor, wit, scares or horror of
the original cult film "Critters"? Answer: "Critters 2." Easy
enough. There have been bad sequels but none as excruciating to sit
through as this one, which only shares one aspect of the original's
flavor - the title with a number in front of it. It not only recaps
the original film with nary a story, but it also lacks any substantial
purpose other than to cash in on the original's brand name.
"Critters 2" has also has the distinction of being the most contrived
of all sequels. It is so contrived that it has almost no reason to
exist as a movie. Consider the plot for a moment. This time, the
lovable Brad Brown (Scott Grimes, with an earring) is back, having
helped to extinguish all those furball creatures from space years
earlier. He returns to Grover's Bend, visiting his grandmother for
Easter. Amazingly, he hardly spends any time with her, and instead
peruses through some old photographs and a useless slingshot. But what
do you know? The Critters' eggs that were left open for a sequel at
the end of the original film are now hatching. I recall they were
hatching already in the original's closing shot but never mind. Some
of the local residents use them as Easter eggs, sold to them by an
antique dealer! The new sheriff in town has to dress up as the Easter
Bunny! And before you can say the words "unintentional comedy," the
sheriff is killed by those mean little furb!  alls with razor sharp
teeth, and the local residents stay indoors at the local church. And
Brad is blamed since his appearance in town coincides with the
hatching of the Critters's eggs!!! Can the filmmakers be serious?
But low and behold, the bounty hunters, who are pursuing those furry
creatures known as the Cripes (or is the Krites as indicated on the
video cover box?), are back at the same damn town to blow them away
with their perhaps unintentionally phallic, futuristic shot guns. This
includes the return of actor Terrence Mann (as the long-haired Ug, the
strongest of the bounty hunters) and Don Opper (the village idiot
Charlie, who has become a bounty hunter himself), appearing as if he
was sleepwalking through all this.
The original instilled some sense of dignity with Brad's family trying
to protect themselves and their home from the Critters. This time, the
human interest level is kaput - in fact, there is not one solid
characterization throughout except for the fabulous character actor
Barry Corbin (replacing M. Emmet Walsh from the original) as the
colorful retired sheriff. Corbin, like Gene Hackman, could never give
a lifeless performance if his life depended on it - if he were the
main character, this cruddy, lazily patched together sequel might have
some substance. The townspeople and the town remain anonymous with no
real visible locale threatened except for the local church. There is a
laughable, forced romance between Brad and a local reporter that makes
after-school specials seem positively sultry by comparison. The
critter action scenes are cut far too frantically, and the best the
film can do is to show rolling furballs along the dusty roads. As it
stands, "Critters 2" is as iner!  t and undignified as they come.
Footnote: The most interesting thing to say about "Critters 2" is the
scene where one of the bounty hunters tries to shape-shift their
appearance into Freddy Krueger from "A Nightmare on Elm Street"
ad. Fitting since "A Nightmare on Elm Street Part 3: Dream Warriors"
showed a clip from the original "Critters" just before a TV addict met
a demise from dear old Freddy.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Spanish Prisoner, The (1997)
There is an unexpected joy I have in watching a David Mamet film - a joy
mostly derived from his expert unfolding of complex, involving puzzles.
Arguably, Mamet is always at his best when he directs his own screenplays as
evidenced by "House of Games" and "Oleanna" - his style is simple and direct.
"The Spanish Prisoner" is a terrifically entertaining film - an intriguing,
finely detailed, exhilarating comic puzzle that leads from one revelation to
another. 
Campbell Scott stars as Joe Ross, a bespectacled scientist-of-sorts who is also
a brilliant mathematician. He's also the inventor of the Process, an invention
that will make his company more lucrative than ever before. 
Ross's boss, Mr. Klein (a laid-back Ben Gazzara), is so impressed by the
Process that he holds a meeting in the Caribbean to discuss its future - a
company lawyer (Ricky Jay) is on hand to look after the finances. On the
Caribbean, Joe meets a typical Mamet character named Jimmy Dell (Steve Martin)
who offers Joe one-thousand dollars for his watch - this is the kind of request
that should drive Joe away from Jim not towards him. Denying his request, Joe
decides to accept Jim's dinner invitation in exchange for his apologetic
remarks.
Naturally, Jimmy Dell is the driving anchor of the movie and it would be unfair
for me to explain what the plot's surprises have in store for you. Suffice to
say, if you are a Mamet fan you'll anticipate many of the twists and turns the
plot takes. If you have seen the Mamet-like labyrinth "The Game," you'll see
some distinct similarities.
Surprisingly, "The Spanish Prisoner" works because of its characters and the
sharp dialogue rather than the elaborate machinations of the plot. Joe Ross is
the bland every man whom things happen to and not always for any clear reasons.
As played by Campbell Scott, the character is broadly sketched displaying no
apparent flaws or weaknesses except that he's too trustworthy. In other words,
he's a cipher - a trait uncharacteristic of Mamet - but Scott manages to bring
some droll, subtle humor to Joe's character. 
Two of the finest performances in the film are by Steve Martin and Rebecca
Pidgeon (Mamet's wife). Steve Martin gives a superb, restrained performance as
the seemingly rich New Yorker who asks for other simple services of Joe such as
sending a book to his sister in New York. Is that all Jim wants, or is he up to
no good? Martin's poise and mannered speaking are as fluent and as engaging as
anything he's done in his career. 
Rebecca Pidgeon (an accomplished singer in real-life who also starred in
Mamet's "Homicide") plays one of the sweetest, smartest women in all of Mamet's
works. Her character, Susan, Joe's secretary, bears a certain affection to Joe
that leads to all kinds of plot turns. Susan is sexy, intelligent, convivial, a
bit annoying in the beginning but we grow to like and accept her, and is
manipulative and perhaps deceitful, but we are never sure. My two favorite
scenes with Pidgeon are the airplane scene, where she discusses how you never
truly know the people in your life, and a hilarious moment where she fabricates
an argument with Joe to evade questions from the police. 
"The Spanish Prisoner" is in many ways both akin and atypical of Mamet's former
films. For one, the film is rated PG. Gone are the customary four-letter words
we normally associate with Mamet and, as a result, it's also more light on its
feet and less heavy than usual. Part of its lightness comes from the greenish,
mossy look of the cinematography that fits perfectly with the title and the
mood. Although the film is occasionally flawed and unevenly paced, "The Spanish
Prisoner" is still high quality verbal entertainment. From Mamet, I wouldn't
have expected less.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with questions, concerns or comments at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com 

Title
Review for Pollock (2000)
The most innovative of the Abstract Expressionists was Jackson Pollock whose 
surrealist paintings gave way to "action paintings," the idea that paint 
could be dripped onto the canvas and create vivid splashes of color. Pollock 
created the drip technique and thus, a sense of freedom within the canvas was 
born where space became largely ambiguous. Pollock is world reknown, so much 
that American film directors like Martin Scorsese or Oliver Stone are often 
referred to as the "Jackson Pollocks of cinema" for their often seemingly 
free form styles. Such an innovator is given a fairly conventional though 
often harrowing treatment by Ed Harris in his directorial debut. 
Naturally, Ed Harris plays the tortured, neurotic, manic-depressive Jackson 
Pollock. The film begins in New York City in the postwar era of the 1940's 
where Pollock is still an unknown. He meets with another painter, Lee Krasner 
(Marcia Gay Harden), who hears of Pollock through word-of-mouth and becomes 
interested in his work. After all, if you are a painter in New York who is 
talked about in circles, you must make your appearance through the proper 
channels. Lee Krasner knows the proper channels. She is acquainted with Peggy 
Guggenheim (Judith Ivey), the owner of the Art of This Century Gallery, who 
is ticked off when climbing five flight of stairs to find Pollock is not 
home. Nevertheless, she sees his work and commissions it to be show in her 
gallery. 
Pollock also finds a willing romantic partner in Lee Krasner who knows of the 
man's faults and still decides to be with him. Pollock is an alcoholic and 
usually finds himself sleeping outside tenements. His solution is to get away 
from the city, and so Krasner offers him an option - get married and move or 
she walks. They move to the Hamptons near the beach for tranquility. This is 
also beneficial for Pollock who can find himself locked in his work rather 
than in alcohol. As time goes on, Pollock eventually discovers his drip 
technique and becomes a sensation in New York and around the world. And when 
does Pollock know that his work is finished? "How do you know you are 
finished when you are making love," asks Pollock when interviewed by Life 
magazine. 
"Pollock" occasionally finds the painter at work in his studio but the film's 
screenplay devotes more time to his turbulent relationship with Lee Krasner. 
Lee puts up with Pollock through his affairs and endless drinking bouts 
because she wants him to be the great painter that he is. It is clear that 
Lee is devoted to him and tries to help him, thus putting her own career on 
hold for his sake. They frequently have their arguments, some more harsh than 
others, but they still manage to stay together for several years. 
By the 1950's, Pollock grows into a bearded, fat, obnoxious, unlikable man. 
He retreats from his "drip" style to his original abstract paintings. He also 
has an affair with a luscious art groupie (Jennifer Connelly) and largely 
detaches himself from Lee. The brief romance is mostly dull as compared to 
his emotional bond with Lee, and the film meanders a bit whenever Connelly 
shows up, whom I do admire as an actress overall. 
My complaints of the film are largely relegated to the depiction of Pollock's 
own status in the art world. The recent "Before Night Falls" did not dwell on 
why the famous writer, Reinaldo Arenas, became a writer, it only showed his 
surroundings and how they affected him. But Pollock is a more complex, 
larger-than-life character. He seems to lack communication with his mother 
(Sada Thompson - the matriarch from the 70's TV show "Family") or his brother 
and his family - they attend his gallery shows but they never speak to each 
other, particularly at the dining table. Pollock's family life is given so 
little shred of introspection that we never understand why they ever visit 
him in the first place - consider that almost every scene with his family 
ends in a violent disruption. Does Pollock's temperamental personality and 
his seclusion in his work cause his family to be silent or are they unhappy 
with his artistic life? Whatever lack of communication exists may hint at 
Pollock's own troubled nature but the film never makes that connection. 
The two fantastic lead performances rescue whatever character limitations 
exist. Ed Harris is powerful and harrowing as the troubled Pollock - he even 
looks like the painter judging by recent photographs I have looked at. Marcia 
Gay Harden is the strong, sympathetic, tough and direct Lee Krasner (she 
deservedly won an Oscar for Best Supporting Actress for her work here). They 
have several great scenes together but my favorite is when he asks her if 
"they can make a baby." She says no, claiming that fulfilling his needs is 
enough and all she ever wanted. It is indeed. 
If "Pollock" had dwelled on the artist's personal, familial side and if the 
fleeting world of Abstract Expressionists had been developed, the film might 
have been a stunning masterpiece. As it is, it is a hellish, demanding work 
with two ball-of-fire performances that will rattle your nerves, shake up 
your senses, and largely disorient you. Just like Jackson Pollock did. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
Faust668@aol.com or at faustus_08520@yahoo.com

Title
Review for Basquiat (1996)
Film biographies are probably the most difficult to make because you have to
draw insight into the main character, and dramatize the life he/she lived in
their own particular time and place. Recent biographies such as "Michael
Collins" dramatized the world the revolutionary lived in but remained aloof in
terms of his personal life and his motivations. "Basquiat" commits some of the
same errors but it is more energetic and vivid a portrait of a lost soul. 
The film is based on the true story of Jean-Michel Basquiat (Jeffrey Wright), a
graffiti artist who rose to prominence in the money-grubbing art world of the
80's, and went through a rapid decline through the abuse of drugs and instant
fame. At the beginning of the film, we see Basquiat (who calls himself Samo)
living in a cardboard box in a New York City park. He already is indulging in
heavy drugs, including heroin, but he has dreams of selling and displaying his
graffiti work in an art gallery. One day, he falls for a waitress named Gina
(Claire Forlani) while spreading tomato sauce on a table and making a portrait
of her. Eventually, Basquiat hits it big when a gallery shows his work to great
acclaim, and consequently acquires the interest of several gallery owners,
dealers, poets, pop artists such as Andy Warhol, self-promoters, etc. 
Julian Schnabel makes his directorial debut with this film, and he is a
justifiable choice since he was an actual friend of Basquiat's. Schnabel
creates a pointed commentary of the New York art world showing how eager
gallery owners and buyers embraced a new artist and eventually exploited him.
What Schnabel doesn't do as successfully is to capture the man behind the
artist. We see Basquiat as a frequently dazed and confused artist who loves
drugs and seems to love his girlfriend...and that's about it. There are no
glimpses into the artist himself, where his vision emanated from, or what drove
his creativity. Of course, Oliver Stone's "The Doors" remained curiously remote
about a similar artist, Jim Morrison, but that was a more visually dazzling
film of a certain era and we saw how living in those times could push someone
over the edge. "Basquiat" doesn't succeed on the same level: it presents
Basquiat as a man already in the gutter before his rise. In other words,
there's too little of the rise, and too much of the fall. The scenes with
Basquiat and Gina are too temporary to register any sense of loss of love
between them; we see that his drug abuse may have pushed them apart yet every
glimpse of Basquiat is presented in short vignettes with no particular payoffs.
He has one gallery showing after another but there's no sense of accomplishment
- for all we know, Basquiat could just be a junkie wandering around SOHO trying
to impress everyone, including Andy Warhol. 
Speaking of Andy, the relationship between Basquiat and Warhol works best, and
it's both melancholy and deeply moving. David Bowie is a real joy to watch as
the dazed Warhol who's consistently murmuring to himself. It's a portrayal on
par with Jared Harris's deadpan interpretation in "I Shot Andy Warhol." I love
the scene where Warhol is painting an Amoco logo and Basquiat paints right over
it causing Warhol to softly murmur "What are you doing? You're painting right
over it?"         
"Basquiat" has a slew of actors from what seems to be the Hall of Fame of
Independent Films. There's Dennis Hopper, Gary Oldman (very understated),
Parker Posey (as a snooty dealer), Willem Dafoe (as an electrician who gives
the movie's best line about art), Courtney Love, Elina Lowensohn, Christopher
Walken (as a TV journalist), Michael Wincott (as a poet), and Benicio Del Toro
as Basquiat's best friend. These people drift in and out of Basquiat's life
without making much of an impression except for his one true friend, Andy
Warhol. 
"Basquiat" is well-made and enjoyable throughout with fine performances,
including the ideally cast Jeffrey Wright in the title role. He brings pathos
and a sadness in his eyes that fitfully captures the artist. "Basquiat" the
film is not a complete portrait, though - it is mostly an assemblage of
exciting brush strokes. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general comments at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust667@aol.com
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general comments at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Air Force One (1997)
Most action thrillers nowadays rely on countless explosions, dozens of
special-effects, wall-to-wall cartoonish violence, and enough gunfire to give
Schwarzeneger a headache. The idea is to essentially give the audience a
relentless assault on the senses and nothing more; some succeed such as
"Mission: Impossible," and others fail like the mediocre "Broken Arrow" and the
absurd "Ransom." Then there are the rare, humanistic, character-oriented
thrillers like "The Fugitive," the original "Die Hard," and the spectacular "La
Femme Nikita" and "The Professional," both directed by action whiz Luc Besson
who also helmed the offbeat "The Fifth Element." At least those films offered
more than the usual slam-bam-thank-you-mam action. "Air Force One" is exactly
what you might expect - explosions and action unashamedly standing in for
character and plot.
"Air Force One" is an incredulous thriller; an occasionally exciting yet
overbearing, feeble-minded piece where Harrison Ford plays the President of the
Unites States as a straight, righteous man with no flaws. As he boards the Air
Force One plane, Russian terrorists hijack it and hold all the presidential
aides and staff members hostage in exchange for the release of an imprisoned
Russian leader (Jurgen Prochnow). Ford is the kind of President who does not
believe in negotiating with terrorists, especially not one played by Gary
Oldman, so he fights mano-a-mano with them instead (imagine Abraham Lincoln
going mano-a-mano with John Wilkes Booth). The First Lady and her daughter are
also on the plane, and their lives are in danger if Ford does not comply with
the terrorists. 
Except for the novelty of having the President as the hero, "Air Force One" is
strictly a "Die Hard"/"Under Siege" rip-off taking place on a plane, e.g.,
"Passenger 57," "Turbulence," and the others before it. There's nothing here
that we haven't seen before and, most definitely, better. Harrison Ford makes a
decent hero, as always, Gary Oldman is terrifying to watch, and there's a
wonderful supporting cast including Glenn Close, Philip Baker Hall, Dean
Stockwell, etc. Let's be honest, though: what we have here is a lot of machine
gunfire and a high body count as compensation for a threadbare story, and a
scenario as ludicrous as the one in Clint Eastwood's "Absolute Power." Close,
but no cigar.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Ninth Gate, The (1999)
Johnny Depp stars as Dean Corso, a goateed, unethical book dealer who
specializes in finding rare books for wealthy collectors (the kind of books not
available online at Amazon.com). One particular collector, Boris Balkan (Frank
Langella), requests Dean's help in locating two existing copies of "The Nine
Gates of the Kingdom of the Shadows," a guide on how to conjure the spirit of
Satan, reportedly written by Satan himself. But Satan could not have written
three different copies of the same book, now could he? Dean's job is to
authenticate the other existing copies, and to determine if Balkan's is the
real deal. At first hesitant, Dean decides to travel to New York, Paris and
Portugal on his search. He encounters twin booksellers, a feisty widow (Lena
Olin), a stringent baroness in a wheelchair (Barbara Jefford), and an
aristocrat who plays the violin (Jack Taylor) and lays out all his precious
books on the floor of his living room. Naturally there are mysterious deaths
along the way, and there is a mysterious woman, identified in the credits as
the Girl, with piercing green eyes (Emanuelle Seigner, Polanski's wife) who
happens to appear wherever Dean goes. 
"The Ninth Gate" has a smoothly refined, exquisitely moody feel to it, thanks
to the amber, murky tones in the cinematography. Every scene in the film feels
as if there are mysterious forces within waiting to be uncovered, and the pages
of the books evoke an elusiveness in Dean's close introspection of every single
detail - you just sense he will find something which may lead nowhere. That is
Polanski's gift as a storyteller, letting minute details flourish in our mind
but we must be quick to catch them. I like the way he makes us focus on the
Girl when she first appears at Balkan's lecture, he tilts the camera down to
show that her legs barely touch the floor where she sits. The other neat touch,
though incidental in theory, is when Balkan shows Dean his collection of books
guarded by glass doors where the password to open them is 666. I also found it
interesting that Dean never sees the Girl floating in the air whenever chaos
ensues. 
In the past, Polanski's atmosphere, mood and implicit horror always lead to a
dramatic, shocking finale, as in "Repulsion" or "Rosemary's Baby." This time,
the film sort of ends but in such an abrupt, wanting fashion that we wonder why
he went through the whole expense of involving us in the first place. To add
insult to injury, the film's final half-hour is submerged in absolute ridicule,
including a laughable Satanic ceremony, Langella yelling and screaming while
chanting to Satan, and a gratuitous sex scene that would make Hugh Hefner
chuckle with derisive laughter. 
I still enjoyed "Ninth Gate" overall but it is more of an exercise in style
than substance, and Polanski does not take the film as seriously as he should
have. It is as if he wanted to revisit the themes of "Rosemary's Baby" and
decided to end it all in a "Fearless Vampire Killers" mode. A guilty pleasure
for us, and probably for Roman as well.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or concerns at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Contender, The (2000)
Rod Lurie's "The Contender" has been criticized for taking a strong liberal, 
Democratic side as far as the political race is concerned. I hasten to 
disagree though one can argue but why carp? "The Contender" is about the race 
for political office, and how in this post-Clinton climate, a presidential 
nomination is based on one's personal life, not the political. 
The fabulous Joan Allen ("Pleasantville," "Nixon") stars as the fierce, 
determined, stubborn, sexy Laine Hanson, a senator who has just been 
appointed as a vice-presidential nominee by the President of the United 
States (Jeff Bridges). Laine is everything a promising new candidate should 
be: she has a loving husband, a young son, and loves politics. Problem is she 
is also a woman, and has a sketchy past (not to mention she is an atheist). 
It is discovered that she may have been involved in explicit sexual acts with 
several guys while in college. GOP Rep. Shelly Runyon (Gary Oldman) is deter
mined to blast the news all over the media - his agenda also stems from 
disapproval of a woman in office, regardless of her past actions. 
Hanson's solution is clear: either admit to these past indiscretions or admit 
that they never transpired. But Hanson is fierce and stubborn - she also has 
some sense of decency. She refuses to admit to anything and would rather keep 
mum than fall for Runyon's own stubborness and sense of moral code. What 
Runyon does not realize is that his own obsession of Hanson's sexual past is 
likely to put him in conflict with the President and cause a genuine lack of 
credibility. 
"The Contender" can be considered liberal and Democratic but I take issue 
with that. I think the film mainly wants us to see how devalued the political 
process has become. We should not judge a political candidate based on their 
sexual or personal history. Our focus should be on the candidate's stand on 
political issues. I am sure everyone can agree that it should be the case 
with Republican or Democratic parties. Should a woman take office if she 
could get pregnant while in the midst of a nuclear crisis? Or if she got her 
period? As Hanson threateningly says at one point to Runyon while having 
lunch: "If someone has to push that button, be sure it is a woman who is 
getting laid." 
There is a subplot involving an FBI agent inquiring about Hanson and another 
vice-presidential candidate caught in some hot water over an incident 
resembling Ted Kennedy's own Chappaquidick incident. The candidate is Gov. 
Jack Hathaway (William Petersen), who failed to rescue a woman trapped inside 
a car in the river. Hathaway's noble yet failed attempt at a rescue risks his 
chances of becoming vice president. Again we are asked, why should a man's 
nobility in a decidedly apolitical incident ruin his political future? 
"The Contender" has great performances and several robust sequences of 
cunning direction and acute sensibility. Not one shot or line of dialogue is 
wasted. Everything flows with terrific precision. Oldman's snickering and 
Bridges's authoritative understanding add to the potency of the material. But 
it is Joan Allen's robust performance that takes us deep inside the political 
process and asks us not to question her actions or past indiscretions as much 
as whether they really matter in the end. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
faustus_08520@yahoo.com

Title
Review for Psycho II (1983)
Anthony Perkins will always be Norman Bates in my heart, and the original
"Psycho" will always be one of the great suspense thrillers of all time. Having
said that, I watched "Psycho II" again the other night and as much as I admire
some of it, it falls two thousand peaks below the original (but less so than
the bloated Van Sant remake). 
Perkins is once again a tanned - but older - Norman, as he is released from a
mental institution after spending 23 years there for murder. The man is still
as loony as ever and returns to the dreaded, ominous house across from the
Bates Motel. Life has changed dramatically for poor old Norman. Firstly, he
starts to work at a greasy spoon kitchen. Secondly, a sleazy owner (Dennis
Franz) runs the Bates Motel now, occupied by oversexed teens, drug addicts,
drunks, etc. And to make matters worse, Norman has invited a demure, clumsy
waitress (Meg Tilly) to stay at his house as a roommate. But now Norman is
getting phone calls from someone purporting to be his dead mother! Who is it?
Could it be the high-strung, vengeful Lila Crane (Vera Miles returning from the
original)? 
"Psycho II" has some tension, generated mostly from Perkins, who does solid
work as an older, kinder Norman. I particularly like the moment when he slices
bread while staring intensely at the knife. The direction by Richard Franklin
is diverting, and there are numerous high-angles of the Bates House and one
exceedingly wide-angle lens shot that shows the house to be more dangerous than
inviting. 
In fact, there is a lot to savor in this film, but it never jells (as Martin
Balsam's Arbogast said in the original). During the second half of the film, it
borders on the slasher-film mentality (including a gratuitous scene where two
teens make out in the basement of the Bates House). One too many killings
slices the psychological impact that I am guessing writer Tom Holland was after
- to expose Norman as something more than having a murderous Oedipal Complex. 
The cast is uniformly perfect (including Vera Miles, Meg Tilly and Robert
Loggia as a doctor), the visuals are scarily effective, the music occasionally
spooky (though it does lack the late composer Herrmann's thrust). But it is an
undernourished sequel, lacking the cleverness, depth and madness of the
original. And showing the infamous shower scene from the original does little
justice to this movie. 
Overall, this is a decent sequel that would not make Hitchcock roll over in his
grave in shame. Maybe he would just twitch a little. 

Title
Review for Mask of Zorro, The (1998)
It is rare to see an action-adventure film that evokes memories of the action
serials of yesteryear - remember The Masked Avenger or Buck Rogers? A
commonplace argument is that recent action films focus more on Dolby-ized
explosions and car crashes than any story or plot. "The Mask of Zorro" is that
rarity - a fast-paced, rollicking action film that brings back the snap and
vigor of Zorro in all its glory, without resorting to extreme violence or heavy
explosions, and it has a reasonably decent story to tell.
During the opening sequence, we learn that Zorro, otherwise known as Don Diego
de la Vega (played with panache by Anthony Hopkins) is the masked hero of the
Mexican people. Some prisoners are about to be executed by a firing squad led by
Governor Don Rafaelo Montero (Stuart Wilson), and the crowd bawls. Before you
know it, Zorro comes out of thin air and rescues the prisoners with sword, whip,
a trusty steed, and attitude. Unfortunately, he is apprehended by Montero's
guards resulting in the death of his wife. 
Twenty years later, Alejandro Murieta (Antonio Banderas) is a wandering street
thief who inexplicably becomes Zorro's star pupil - I say inexplicably because
who would want to tutor a curly long-haired wanderer on the street, but never
mind. Zorro teaches Murieta everything about swords, chivalry, matters of
etiquette, conversation, and well-groomed appearances. Thus, Murieta becomes the
new, dashing Zorro slicing his way through several of Montero's minions, and
dancing elegantly with Montero's daughter, Elena (British-born Catherine
Zeta-Jones), who is really Vega's daughter. 
"The Mask of Zorro" has plenty of stunts and action scenes, but its main thrust
is an expanded backstory about Vega's past and the revenge he seeks on his
wife's death. This exposition with the well-cast Hopkins shows more flair and
promise than I might have anticipated, even for a hokey Hollywood production
like this one. 
As for Banderas and Zeta-Jones, they do have sparkling chemistry, culminating in
a romantic kiss during a sword duel. The biggest weakness is Stuart Wilson
(previously a villain in "Lethal Weapon 3") as the fatuous Montero who isn't
remotely threatening or evil. Still, "The Mask of Zorro" is as escapist and fun
as Hollywood has been getting lately.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at Faust668@aol.com
or at faustus_08520@yahoo.com

Title
Review for Lost Highway (1997)
Bill Pullman plays an impotent saxophone player, Fred Madison, who lives in a posh L.A. house with his beautiful wife, Renee (Patricia Arquette). One day, Renee finds a videocassette on her front doorstep. They both watch the tape. It turns out that someone is videotaping the exterior of their house. They ignore it ('Maybe it's a real-estate video'). They keep receiving more video packages until one reveals Renee's murder! Fred is framed, or is he? He is incarcerated and, through some mysterious circumstances, metamorphoses into a young mechanic named Peter Dayton (Balthazar Getty). What the hell is happening here? Is Fred dreaming he has become someone else, or is he denying and forgetting the evil he has wrought, namely the murder of his wife?                                                                 
These are very minute flaws in Lynch's most enigmatic and most profound film in the history of cinema. You'll leave the theatre in a state of disillusionment saying "what the hell was that all about?" There are no resolutions, no logical connections, no easy answers, and no sense of redemption in Lynch's world (And no real conclusion to boot). Add to that the most bizarre cast since "Twin Peaks": Richard Pryor, Gary Busey, Marilyn Manson (!) and the late Jack Nance (Henry from "Eraserhead"), and you are in for one of the wildest, best films of the nineties. It is his darkest, weirdest, nastiest bit of business ever (Red Alert: the Mystery Man appears to be in two places at once, which mirrors the opening and closing shots of Fred talking to himself through a speaker - a surreal joke about Fred's duality). Lynch has said he likes unsolved puzzles. "Lost Highway" will leave you thinking for days on end as to its meaning. It is the viewer's interpretation that really matters.    !
!
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Scarlet Street (1945)
"Scarlet Street" is one of the strangest noir tales ever told on screen,
primarily because it seems rooted in almost something farcical. Here is the
story of a modest cashier who makes a conniving woman believe that he is a
world-famous painter. This could be a comedy but under the hands of German
director Fritz Lang ("Metropolis"), it takes on the existential - showing that
one person's actions can result in a hopeless situation. 
Edward G. Robinson plays Chris, a sullen cashier working for an anonymous bank
company. His one joy in life is to paint, a habit not taken seriously by a
single character in the film. One night, after hastily leaving a celebration in
his honor, Chris sees a woman in the street robbed by some guy. The victim is
Kitty (Joan Bennett), a purely electrifying doll, funny yet devious with a
devilish smile. The thief gets away yet Chris is mesmerized by Kitty, taking
her out for a drink (initially coffee, as always with a noir protagonist). He
asks to meet her again, and his love for painting makes Kitty suspect he is a
renown painter with lots of money to spare. Kitty thus uses Chris, and we
discover the thief from earlier is actually her boyfriend, Johnny (Dan Duryea),
whom she passes off as her cousin. Chris sees Johnny as an intrusion, but
nevertheless, he falls hopelessly in love. He is so in love that he steals
money from his bank so he can rent her a luxurious Greenwich Village apartment!
Chris also sees the apartment as a studio where he can paint, away from the
constant squabbling of his unhappy wife, Millie (it is more spacious than the
bathroom he uses in his apartment). But Kitty has other plans - she sees
Chris's paintings as an avenue for success and profit, and so does the
irascible, persistent Johnny. Therein lie the twists. 
"Scarlet Street" has lots of comical scenes, mostly provided by Bennett who
does enough double takes and lascivious stares to make her the almost
cartoonish version of Joan Crawford. All her scenes with Robinson are set in
bedrooms or closed-in restaurants, and they are all perfectly flawless, exuding
both humor and tension. Bennett also makes Kitty ambiguous - we are never sure
what to make of her, and her sensuousness and supposed sensitivity reinforce
her two-sided nature. She is out to make a buck anyway she can, but is she as
amoral as Johnny, who goes so far as to sell Chris's paintings himself? 
Robinson is at his most restrained and sympathetic, even when his actions
become questionable, we know he will do anything for the love of his life.
Counterbalancing between blindsightedness and naivete, his final act of love
resulting in tragic consequences is a marvel to witness - his pained gestures
show a man slowly coming apart at the seams. This is an extraordinary
performance, almost as good as his similarly repressed protagonist in "Woman in
the Window."
Fritz Lang, who previously directed "Woman in the Window," does wonders with
the film, showing just about every single facet of noir - smoking, shadows in
the night, wrongful murders, accusations, double twists, and an unseen
electrocution. "Scarlet Street" is a terrific film, brimming with humor and
horror in balanced doses. Most significant is Lang's inevitable ending
reinforcing the hopelessness of Chris's situation. Though the ending initially
had problems with the censors, it is justified and shows a degree of punishment
- living with a crime is often more punishing than actual punishment from the
law. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or comments at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Cell, The (2000)
Villains of any size, shape or form, whether depicted in cinema or 
literature, are often interesting when they are made to see human, 
particularly when there is a side to them that we can identify with. Often 
such identification results in disgust because we see that we are as capable 
of murder, torture or an assault of any kind towards humanity. The same holds 
true of serial killers, and the best film about them is still John 
McNaughton's "Henry: Portrait of a Serial Killer," the most potent film 
imaginable about diseased minds, all the more disturbing because it shows a 
man who could be your next-door neighbor. "The Cell" is not one of those 
films, it has a glossy sheen to it but it lacks much human interest and is 
seemingly submerged in gory visuals. 
The serial killer in this film is Carl Stargher (Vincent D'Onofrio) who 
kidnaps his victims with the help of his albino dog (a rare breed) and keeps 
them encased in a subterrranean glass box before submerging in water and 
videotaping their helpless ordeals. And, to make matters worse, he turns them 
into dolls, masturbates with them by suspending himself from the ceiling, and 
then dumps them in reservoirs under bridges. This Carl is certainly monstrous 
and evil enough but he also has enormous headaches and ends up in a coma 
(partly due to a viral schizophrenic condition). The FBI eventually finds 
him, but there is still one living victim about to be submerged in water 
within 40 hours! 
Enter the good social worker, Catherine Deane (Jennifer Lopez), who interacts 
with her patients by entering their subconscious via cables and wires 
(reminiscent of the sleeper hit from eons ago, "Dreamscape.") Catherine is 
enlisted to enter the mind of Carl, and at first hesistant, she chooses to 
find a way of making Carl trust her long enough to find the latest victim. 
What follows are vividly oversaturated colored dreamscapes, evoking the style 
of Dali and the tortured psyche of David Lynch, and many of these scenes are 
incredible designed and photographed. I love the opening sequence of Lopez 
walking in the desert with a flowing white robe, or the images of horses, 
blinding white lights in the form of crystals, crimson red neck braces, gold 
dresses littered with thousands of rhinestones, and so on. Never has the mind 
of a serial killer looked so inviting and yet so dangerous. 
The artwork, cinematography, and lighting of all of these dreams are 
spectacular and one of first-time director Tarsem Singh's strengths. But, as 
is often the case with music video directors, the visual style of such scenes 
seems to be its only strength. Singh barely uncovers much depth in any of 
these characters, including Lopez's Deane, a social worker who lives with a 
cat. That is it, that is all we discover about her and that she has a thing 
for driving herself into the subconscious of kids in coma states. 
As for the Stargher character, minimal attempt is made to make this sexual 
monster human. D'Onofrio has shown shards of sympathy for his characters 
before (notably his crazed Gomer Pyle character in "Full Metal Jacket") but 
here, he is at the mercy of the director's deliberately overdone visuals, 
which shed precious little insight into this schizo's personality. 
If "The Cell" did not depend on plot as much as characterization (eliminating 
the race-against-time-to-save-the-victim angle might have helped), then it 
could have had the humanity of something like "Silence of the Lambs." "The 
Cell's" frenetic energy, purely caffeinated, 
pounding-like-an-ultra-sound-bass musical score deflate any essential 
particulars like depth or substance. I want to recommend "The Cell" based on 
its often strong visual imagination but its generic police investigation and 
thin characters (including Vince Vaughn as an FBI expert on serial killers) 
diminish whatever the potency the story had.    
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
Faust667@aol.com or at jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Prophecy, The (1995)
Make no mistake: "The Prophecy" is not one of the great horror films of all
time nor is it on my list among the best, but it is as intelligent and
hallucinatory a demon/angel horror flick as we are likely to say for some time.
And it is Christopher Walken who transcends its murky storyline. 
The film is set in a small Arizona community where there are no secrets, and
somehow this is an existential resting area for the archangels and demons from
above and beyond. There is the sweet, bearded angel Simon (Eric Stoltz) who
takes the souls of humans with him by sucking their breath (a reminder of the
breath-sucking gremlin in "Cat's Eye") - in this case, he has taken the soul of
the most vile human corpse on earth, a general. The archangel Gabriel
(Christopher Walken) is continuing the Second War of the Angels by trying to
prevent Simon from continuing his soul-sucking methods - he wants the souls for
himself. Somehow, this all relates to a brooding homicide detective (Elias
Koteas) who almost became a priest, an elementary school teacher (Virginia
Madsen), a Native American child who may or may not be possessed, and so on. We
see eyeless angels, morgues, burned corpses, demons chained to rocks, visions
of angels impaled in a vast horizon, war atrocities on grainy film stock, and
it is all done with style to spare and never gratuitous or exploitative. 
"The Prophecy" never makes much sense and I never quite understood Gabriel's
intentions - does he want to rule the heavens by taking a few souls or is he
just mad at God? Some of this is supposedly based on Milton's "Paradise Lost,"
but it would have been more productive if Lucifer was the one bent on vengeance
against all, including God. After all, Lucifer was a former angel, "The Bringer
of Light," until he was cast down in Hell after questioning God's blind faith.
The main impetus of the film is that the angels got jealous and felt God did
not love them anymore when He gave humans souls but since angels are not human
anyway, what do they care? 
The main attraction is the tall, entertaining wonder known as Christopher
Walken - his trademark tics and maneuvering of body language keeps me
interested and riveted from one film to the next. His piercing eyes and offbeat
humor are enough compensation and justified when playing a miffed angel like
Gabriel - imagine what he could have done as the Tall Man in "Phantasm." 
"The Prophecy" is a fitful blend of humor and horror and tends to be
over-the-top - Viggo Mortensen overacts and undermines as Lucifer during the
fiery finale. Still, it is unusual and enlightening to see a horror film
concerned with so much biblical jargon and wars between angels. Milton would
have been proud.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 

Title
Review for Man on the Moon (1999)
MAN ON THE MOON (1999) - A Film Review By Jerry Saravia
Andy Kaufman remains as the old saying goes, "a mystery wrapped inside of an 
enigma." He was the most unconventional comic to ever grace a stage or an 
open mike because he purely challenged the whole notion of what comedy was. 
Comedians are known for one-liners, such as the famous Milton Berle, and 
punchlines - a plethora of jokes are expected to make the audience laugh. 
Kaufman is not someone you would accuse of taking the easy road to make 
people laugh - his intentions were based on showing up as the showman and 
nothing more. He did not tell jokes nor did he know how to tell them, and he 
was not a political or angry comedian like Lenny Bruce was. No, this man 
played the theme to "Mighty Mouse" and wrestled with women to get laughs. 
"Man on the Moon" stars Jim Carrey as Andy Kaufman, showing us his early 
stage routines of mimicking Elvis Presley leading to his famous Latka Gravas 
character on the popular TV show "Taxi." His agent (played by Danny De Vito, 
who does not do a reprise of his "Taxi" character) is amazed by Kaufman, but 
has no idea how to promote such a talent, so he lends him the coveted "Taxi" 
role promising a "Fonzie-type" breakout character. It is no secret that Andy 
despised "Taxi" and caused a ruckus, often using his hateful alter-ego 
character, Tony Clifton, a lounge singer, to cause chaos on the set. It is 
also no secret that Tony become a bigger star than Andy, especially in the 
days of Andy wrestling with Memphis wrestler Jerr Lawler (amusingly playing 
himself). 
The moments where Tony Clifton appears ,silencing the crowd before singing or 
insulting audience members, are the most outrageous and the funniest. Clifton 
was Andy, and sometimes Andy's best friend and writing partner, Bob Zmuda 
(Paul Giamatti), was also Tony, and so this caused more confusion among 
audiences. How could anyone respond with a straight face to anything Clifton 
or Andy did on stage or on TV? 
In fact, that is largely the appeal of "Man on the Moon." The film distorts 
reality on screen just as Andy did - we never knew what to expect from him or 
when he was staging fights or insults or actually doing them. The truth is 
that it was all staged, including the punishingly slow, one year debacle of 
Lawler fighting Andy on the ring or on David Letterman. That distortion or 
the fact that Andy was always in on the joke himself is what makes his life 
so speculative. Who was Andy? What kind of man was he? When was he not 
fooling around, and when was he being serious? There came a point when his 
sister did not believe that Andy had lung cancer, which he tearfully admits 
on stage while the audience bawls with laughter. 
Carrey is so good as Andy that he disappears into the role, and it is more 
than just a recreation of the man or his acts - it is spookily eerie in that 
it really feels like Andy Kaufman is alive and well on screen. Carrey also 
carries scenes of tenderness beautifully such as the movie's key line where 
he tearfully replies to his girlfriend's remark "There is no real you" with 
"Oh, yeah, I forgot." I also like the moment where Andy is tricked by a 
psychic surgeon, who is actually a charlatan, into believing that his 
cancerous condition will be taken away - Carrey's face shows a mixture of 
elation and sadness. Jim has so many good moments that an Oscar nomination 
should be guaranteed - we have not seen such an authentic recreation of a key 
figure in show business since Val Kilmer's Jim Morrison in "The Doors." 
If only the film dealt with his childhood past in more detail, especially in 
the days when he thought there were cameras in his bedroom walls watching his 
act (a reminder of Carrey's performance in "Truman Show"). And what did his 
parents think of Andy's act? Or his sister and friends, especially his 
girlfriend (thanklessly played by Courtney Love)? There must have been some 
thoughts on Andy - was he just a showman out for thrills or a genius of 
comedy? 
"Man on the Moon" does not try to understand Andy Kaufman nor is there any 
attempt to. The mystique is still there, including the possibility that his 
lung cancer was a joke and that he will return in the year 2000 (the film 
makes no attempt to disprove the hoax). It is not a complete or fulfilling 
biography as was director Milos Forman's last film, "The People vs. Larry 
Flynt," but it is a strange and entertaining experience. I have a feeling 
Andy would have wanted it that way. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general comments at 
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Ghost World (2001)
It is rare to see a film that transports and moves me in such a way as to be
breathtaking. A film that leaves me so ecstatic and excited by cinema all over
again - a sublime experience in an era of dumbed-down, mediocre pictures. For
the 1980's, "The Breakfast Club" was the ultimate statement about teenagers in
high school. For the 1990's teen way of life, perhaps something like "American
Beauty" stands as definitive about how teenagers think and talk nowadays (unless
you prefer "American Pie"). But a defining statement of the world today is
clearly felt in "Ghost World," an unparalleled masterpiece of pop culture
attitudes and more specifically, teenage alienation and discomfort in an era of
Internet hype and media hogwash. I was planning on seeing Kevin Smith's latest
the following day but I just couldn't. After seeing "Ghost World," you may not
want to see anything else for a few days since it gets under your skin so
thoroughly that you will feel compelled to buy the graphic novel from which the
film is b
ased on or listen to the soundtrack or both. It is that good. 
Based on the comic book by Daniel Clownes, "Ghost World" is a bleak view of
America today in an suburban town where 50's retro diners coexist with
politically correct art teachers. It is also a world of lonely, miserable people
who can't help being where they are in their station in life. Enid (Thora Birch)
is the offbeat, downbeat, ironic, contradictory, sarcastic teenager who has just
graduated from high school. Her best friend, Rebecca (Scarlett Johansson), has
also graduated and is relieved. Their relief does not translate to collegiate
futures - they have their own plans. Enid and Rebecca plan to work full-time
jobs and rent an apartment and basically make ironic statements on people who
surround their field of vision. Enid not only spouts ironic commentary, she
lives by it. She hates any and everything except for her friend Rebecca. She
sees a bald man and his wife at a cafe and immediately suspects they are
Satanists. Both Enid and Rebecca decide to spend their time gazing and talking.
One day, Enid r
esponds to a personal ad where some guy had seen a blonde and felt they shared
something special. Enid pretends to be the blonde and calls for a date. The guy,
Seymour (Steve Buscemi), comes to one of those 50's retro diners to meet the
blonde, who is of course not present. But something curious happens - Enid
follows Seymour around and begins to like the fact that he is representative of
everything she doesn't hate. He is a dork in her estimation but he also loves to
collect 78 rpm records of old blues singers. More importantly, Enid can relate
to Seymour's loneliness. 
Enid's home life is not pretty. Her father (Bob Balaban) eats jelly with relish
and dates a woman she hates. He does try to support his daughter but she is
unresponsive and selfish. Enid lives in her own fantasy world of irony and of
dancing to Indian music - she does not see that she alienates people by hiding
or being cleverly ironic. After alienating even Rebecca and Seymour, Enid feels
lost - a lost soul in search of her inner self. "I don't know what I am doing,"
says Enid at one point and that statement sums up her life. If Enid hates any
and everything and can't commit to a job, then where is her station in life? Can
it be with the summer art class where she has to contend with a politically
correct art teacher? Can it be the old man who waits for a bus that never comes?
Who can Enid relate to now if she can't hold on to her own friends?
"Ghost World" is not likely to appeal to the same teenagers who love "American
Pie" and its score of imitations. After all, Enid's preoccupation in life is not
sex - she would like to belong to something but she is too honest in this media
age to belong to anything she doesn't already despise. The same is true of
Seymour who is offended by shouting radio deejays and modern blues songs. He may
feel that times are better but he is still rooted in the past, particularly with
offensive minstrel ads and old blues songs. But he is a loner too and despises
society yet works for a corporation to support himself and his collection of
78's. 
Thora Birch encapsulates the modern alienated and alienating teenager perfectly
in Enid. She is a wonder to watch as she unfurls her commentary on screen with
winking nuances and explosive fierceness, always wearing horn-rimmed glasses.
Look at the scene in a zine shop where she dresses up in original punk rock
clothes, combat boots and green hair and claims her fashion statement as irony -
none of the clerks in the store see it that way. Birch screams, crackles,
hollers, whispers, laughs and cries, and she is sarcastic not to mention
touching in her weaker states where she starts to lose what she had. It is a
brave, risky performance by Birch that embellishes the promise she showed in
"American Beauty."  
Also noteworth is Scarlett Johansson as Rebecca, also ironic in her own way but
also looking ahead in the future - she does not wish to stay in the same town
forever. Her dry, low monotone voice is in direct contrast to Birch's
occasionally high-pitched delivery. Johansson first came to prominence in the
sweet film "Manny and Lo" and here, she is maturing into a fine actress. 
Finally, there is Steve Buscemi in one of his best roles as the lonesome
Seymour. He connects with Enid but also wants to move on in his own station in
life. The tragedy of his character is that he can't despite trying to. Buscemi
is as restrained as ever and gives measured poignance to Seymour's downfall. 
"Ghost World" is directed by Terry Zwigoff, who helmed the fabulous, disturbing
documentary "Crumb" a few years go (there's even a nod to Crumb's rock band).
This is Zwigoff's first non-documentary film and it is a great, poetic
masterwork - his restraint and static camera style are perfect for the
observations of this ghostly world as seen through Enid's eyes. And the
ambiguous ending will haunt you for days as to where Enid's future lies. It is
as moving and poetic as any film you will see this year. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for I Know What You Did Last Summer (1997)
I know what has happened to the slasher film genre - it has become limited and
uninspiring offering little in the way of novelty or surprise. True, the
"Scream" movies revived the dusty genre only because they poked fun at it, and
brought a self-reflective gaze upon it. But this genre has nothing to offer
unless a talented filmmaker can reinvent it and bring some level of humanity.
"I Know What You Did Last Summer" is not that film, and it is as idiotic and
mind-numbingly awful as you can imagine. 
The premise centers on four teenagers who kill a pedestrian on the road at
night during a July 4th celebration. They contemplate their dilemna and
unconvincingly draw up reasons why they can't tell the police - to protect
their futures beyond high school. They dump the body by the docks (though the
supposed corpse never seems to be truly dead). A year later passes, and the
main teen of the cast (a frail-looking Jennifer Love-Hewitt) arrives home from
college to find a note in the mail indicating the film's title. Someone knows,
but who? Could it be her ring of friends that night who swore never to tell
anyone? Could it be the kid who drove by during that night making inquiries?
Could it be the backwoods woman (Anne Heche) whose brother committed suicide
that same night? 
This is a mildly intriguing premise for a slasher film, but all sense of
mystery and horror is thrown out the window once the killings and
implausibilities set in. We have a body in a trunk full of crabs that
conveniently disappears, a killer in a slicker outfit during a hot summer (how
conspicuous), a girl's blonde hair chopped off while she's asleep (!), and more
and more ridiculous scenarios that will shock you into laughter and boredom. 
The actors are bland and forgettable (save for the cute-as-a-button Hewitt),
the scares are predictable, the dialogue is sheer rubbish, and of course, there
is a door left open for a sequel. Most of these movies ("Halloween: H20,"
"Urban Legend") are mediocre and thrill-less to being with offering little
imagination or raison d'etre. Writer Kevin Williamson of "Scream" fame should
have known better. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with questions, concerns, or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for eXistenZ (1999)
Virtual reality is a concept that is beginning to lose its luster partly
because no one seems to have the imagination or the stamina to explore it.
After enduring endless ordeals like "Lawnmower Man" and "The Matrix," one can
savor the lurid, fascinating, uneven "eXistenZ," the latest from the twisted
mind of David Cronenberg, who helmed mind and body experiments like "Crash,"
"Videodrome" and "The Naked Lunch." 
"eXistenZ" stars Jennifer Jason Leigh as Allegra, a twisted, sexy computer
designer whose latest creation is a game called eXistenZ, a virtual reality
game where a bio-port is connected to the spine, and resembles a fleshy game
pod made of amphibious organs and brain matter. The game begins, but this is
not a world of razzle-dazzle computer pyrotechnics or laser beams or kung-fu
fights. Instead, you experience a world where trout farms exist, guns made of
chicken bones and fire human teeth, people walk and act like zombies, and
Chinese waiters serve you two-headed amphibians. To make matters worse, Allegra
enters her own game with a seemingly incompetent market trainee (Jude Law), who
has not been accommodated with a bio-port. 
"eXistenZ" never makes clear when it is a game or when we are seeing reality,
although I am sure that in our reality, two-headed amphibians who seemed to
have wandered in from Jurassic Park are non-existent. Nevertheless,
Cronenberg's idea is to show that a faux reality may not be far from our own -
our feelings and emotions dictate our fantasies, and some are more dangerous
than others. If only he pushed further with this concept as Wim Wenders did
with the dreamlike, humanistic "Until the End of the World," a parable about
the danger of being addicted to visual images. Cronenberg wallows in grisly,
fleshy details and sudden bursts of violence - the most impressive is the
shooting of a Chinese waiter, which shows that the Jude Law character may be
taking the concept of the game's "free will" too far. 
The actors follow the command of Cronenberg's universe, and no one ever
overacts even in the game. Jennifer Jason Leigh is indeed one of my favorite
actresses of all time - a quixotic wonder with her expressive eyes, sexual
demeanor, and wavy-like patterns in her blonde curls. She is the perfect
Cronenberg heroine, and we side with her and hope she can survive her own
destructive game. Jude Law reminds me of Rufus Selwell in "Dark City" - he
handles his role with aplomb and subtle smirks directed towards the whole
ridiculous show. I also enjoyed the tense, rat-like Ian Holm as the designer of
the pods - it is a real kick to watch this actor repairing a bloody pod. 
"eXistenZ" still has Cronenberg's continuing clinical obsession with flesh and
bodily fluids - it affected me to watch these slimy appendages being applied to
our semi-heroes in agony, as if they couldn't get enough. This is decidedly not
meant for the "Matrix" action crowd. Thus, "eXistenZ" disturbs and intrigues,
but it never is truly profound or provocative. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 

Title
Review for Kundun (1997)
The life of the fourteenth Dalai Lama (the human manifestation of Buddha) is a
complicated one: a Buddhist monk who sought to protect Tibet from the Chinese
communist forces by employing nonviolence. This is a project that other
directors such as Zhang Yimou ("Shanghai Triad") or Chen Kaige ("Farewell My
Concubine") would have aptly taken on. I never expected Martin Scorsese, the
poet of violent, lowlife characters, to undertake such an overwhelming,
ambitious project. On the other hand, this is the same man who brought us
distinguished achievements such as "Alice Doesn't Live Here Anymore," "The Last
Waltz," and "The Age of Innocence," not to mention his memorable gangster
trilogy: "Mean Streets," "GoodFellas" and "Casino." "Kundun" is a gorgeous
film: a lavish treatment of the Dalai Lama's life, but it is just that - a
treatment. 
"Kundun" is the secret name of the Dalai Lama, and it is a name only his
family or close members use. Kundun's life is chronicled in linear fashion:
from his days as a young boy screaming "This is mine. This is mine!" as he is
discovered to be the fourteenth incarnation of Buddha, to his days as an
eighteen-year-old bespectacled leader whose best defense against the Chinese
army is to leave the palace in disguise, on a journey to India. Tenzin Thuthob
Tsarong plays the leader as an adult who finally meets the Chinese dictator Mao
Zedong (Robert Lin), and his shiny black shoes, in Beijing as Tibet is being
invaded by the Red Army. Mao's response to the Dalai Lama's pleas for religious
tolerance is "Religion is poison." 
The first half-hour of "Kundun" is at its best when conveying Kundun's
childhood as he is taken from his humble village to the Holy City of Lhasa
where he brings in forbidden treasures such as "Life" magazines, film
projectors where he runs cowboy films and silents, and cars. Despite all these
trappings, Kundun keeps forgetting he's the Dalai Lama and that he has a
country to protect, including the 5,000 soldiers who guard it. "But I am only a
boy," proclaims Kundun. "What can I do?" His spiritual guides convince him that
he is the Dalai Lama and, therefore, must know what course of action to take. 
All of "Kundun" is very subjective: it is all told from his point-of-view.
There are no Western outsiders like Brad Pitt or Peter O'Toole to distract us.
This is a noble, risky achievement, but the movie does not succeed in letting
us inside Kundun's soul or his spiritual beliefs. As written by Melissa
Mathison ("E.T."), the screenplay reduces the Dalai Lama to a statue for us to
look up in wonder; a man representative of peace and nonviolence, but little
else. Didn't Kundun ever have some doubts about his spirituality? Did he ever
question the fact that he was the Dalai Lama? Mostly, we see Kundun weep at the
thought of imminent violence, and we see him being greeted and idolized by
others as he walks in a solemn state with his red robes. The film's best
sequence is Kundun's nightmarish vision of his followers murdered by the Red
Army in a vast landscape of death - we see several corpses surrounding him in
an atypical shot of Scorsese's canon. Beyond that, the film is not very
introspective of Kundun - we see glimpses of his soul but not much more.
 On the plus side, "Kundun" is the most beautiful movie of Scorsese's career -
it is so voluptuously shot by Roger A. Deakins and so beautifully composed that
you are not likely to see a purer example of cinematography for a long time.
There's never a wasted, uninvolving shot making the whole film as captivating
and involving as it can be. It is also elegantly edited by Thelma Schoonmaker,
full of dissolves from minute details of pearls and cuffs to wide shots of the
villages occupying Kundun's existence. The scenes of the Buddhist marches,
ceremonies and rituals are as powerfully executed as you can imagine,
especially the funeral procession of Kundun's father being fed to the vultures.
The film is certainly not boring, and it is rightly meditative and slow-moving,
much like the superior "Why Has Bodhi-Dharma Left for the East?" 
"Kundun" is a major departure for Scorsese - it is possibly his most
spiritual, peaceful film since "The Last Temptation of Christ." The problem is
Scorsese detaches us from Kundun's soul, and is much too respectful of him
(Even Jesus Christ had his flaws). A common criticism of Scorsese's past work
is that he takes an objective view of his characters; what he really does is
create behavioral portraits. I never found myself detached from any of his main
protagonists (except for Jimmy Doyle in "New York, New York"). Travis Bickle,
Jake LaMotta, Newland Archer, Rupert Pupkin, "Ace" Rothstein are but a few
examples of Scorsese's most successful, soulful portraits. Kundun could have
been another example. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or
Faust667@aol.com 

Title
Review for Robin Hood: Prince of Thieves (1991)
ROBIN HOOD: PRINCE OF THIEVES (1991)
Reviewed by Jerry Saravia
October 16th, 2001 (originally viewed on July, 1991)
As legend would have it, Robin Hood was a man of the people, one who identified
with the poverty of the English people and would steal from the rich and give to
the poor. His determination resulted in ongoing fueds with princes and paupers
and those whom he stole from. The legend resulted in one terrific film with
Errol Flynn back in 1938 called "The Adventures of Robin Hood" (it is still the
definitive version). There was also the more mature, older Robin trying to have
a romantic relationship with a suicidal Maid Marian in "Robin and Marian,"
starring Sean Connery and Audrey Hepburn. In 1991, Kevin Costner and director
Kevin Reynolds had the temerity to bring back Robin Hood to the screen with
Costner's American accent almost intact as a sour but also determined Robin. It
almost felt like the end of cinema as we knew it. Casting Costner was like
casting Gary Cooper as Dracula! Yes, brave casting indeed, but could Costner do
it?
"Robin Hood: Prince of Thieves" has Costner as a depressed Robin with only
occasional flashes of humor. His depression stems from the fact that he has just
arrived back from the war of the Crusades after a few years, leaving with a Moor
named Azeem (Morgan Freeman) back to England and good old Sherwood Forest.
Unfortunately, Robin's father (Brian Blessed) has been killed by the evil
Sheriff of Nottingham (Alan Rickman) and now, Robin wants revenge. Plus, he
decides to help several homeless Englishmen and other denizens from the Sherwood
Forest and other villages who need a strong leader to lead them and grant them
freedom. Who better than Robin himself? 
In hindsight, I dreaded watching yet another update on the Robin legend. Patrick
Bergin showed some dash but little chemistry in the TV movie that was to be
released theatrically the same year as this film. Only Sean Connery came close
as a fitting replacement to Errol Flynn. Costner shows little gleam - he is the
most morose Robin Hood to ever appear on screen. And yet I must confess that I
enjoyed Kevin Reynold's remake immensely. It is clever, witty, wicked, dark, and
often joyous. It is by no means a great film, largely because of Costner, but it
is a fun ride for the most part. 
The action scenes have a thrilling intensity to them. The escape from the
dungeon in the opening sequence (through a modern manhole!) has the
nerve-wracking thrills of an Indiana Jones flick. There are also point-of-view
shots of arrows flying through the air, discovery of gunpowder long before Marco
Polo that results in fiery explosions, flaming arrows, swords that emit sparks
when clanging against each other, screaming crones, black magic, a Maid Marian
(Mary Elizabeth Manstrantonio) that knows how to wield a sword though she ends
up as a scared damsel in distress anyway, double-crosses galore, evil priests
and clerics, and so on. This Robin Hood is designed to entertain you in any way
it can and it succeeds. 
Though it contains a miscast Kevin Costner, the other actors do their best and
bring some sense of style. Mary Elizabeth Manstrantonio is almost Shakesperean
in her mannerisms and excellent English accent as the fierce, loving Maid
Marian. Morgan Freeman excels as Robin's trusty aide who has a bigger sword than
anyone in the movie. But it is really Alan Rickman who steals the show and is at
his devilish, wicked best as the theatrical Sheriff of Nottingham ("Call off
Christmas!"). Rickman goes over-the-top but hilariously so, he just can't
believe one man and his merry band of men could revolt against him. 
Director Kevin Reynolds opts for too many close-ups and so this Robin Hood tale
does lack the grandeur of the earlier incarnations. Still, in terms of action
setpieces, he has the right flair. The fiery forest attack is expertly done as
is the heartstopping climax where the Sheriff has a sword duel with Robin. There
is also a nifty sequence where Robin fights a guard who turns out to be Maid
Marian!  
Overlong and nearly parodic (plus containing a "Star Wars" subplot that sure is
grating), "Robin Hood: Prince of Thieves" is often superb entertainment and a
nice addition to the Robin Hood cinematic legends. Plus, check out the grandly
majestic cameo at the end by a great, iconic actor - it is one of the best
cameos in history. It is such a wonderful surprise that it had audiences
cheering at the end of a screening I saw, as if the real hero had finally
arrived. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for English Patient, The (1996)
Audiences are in favor of love stories told in the traditional Hollywood
manner: sweeping locales, breathtaking scenery, crisp dialogue, and, more
importantly, romantic chemistry between two gorgeous Hollywood stars. We have
been privy to sweeping love stories such as "Sense and Sensibility," which was
much admired by Hollywood and the Academy Awards, as was "Titanic." In 1996, it
was "The English Patient," a flawed yet superbly acted romantic tragedy told
mostly in flashbacks, and set prior to World War II. It's "Brief Encounter"
crossed with "Lawrence of Arabia" (funny that they were both directed by David
Lean). It has romance to spare but, in terms of tragic love, it doesn't have
much weight.
"The English Patient" is the Hungarian Count Almasy (Ralph Fiennes), who is on
an expedition with a group of cartographers in the blazingly hot desert of
North Africa. It is there that he meets and falls in love with Katherine
Clifton (Kristin Scott Thomas), the noble, beautiful wife of one of the
cartographers. When Katherine's husband leaves for another expedition, the two
embark on a passionate love affair, instigated by their bonding in a sandstorm.
Count Almasy is the narrator of the film, telling his story in a deathbed after
being horribly burned in a plane crash. He's cared for by his nurse, Hana
(Juliette Binoche), who decides to stay in a nearly decrepit castle with this
"english patient." The present storyline is set during the last days of World
War II, but the Count remains haunted by Katharine's death and by the intrusion
of a wandering thief, Caravaggio (Willem Dafoe) - he recognizes the Count and
suffers a physical handicap as well. 
"The English Patient" is a beautifully mounted film told in the typical
Hollywood style - the opening shot of the contours of the desert layered
against a plane flying overhead is an extraordinary moment to behold. The movie
has all the right ingredients of an old-fashioned Hollywood romance yet it
somehow manages to trivialize the crucial romance...between Almasy and
Katherine. Their relationship leaves you out in the cold because
writer-director Anthony Minghella ("Truly, Madly, Deeply") truncates too many
scenes between them. The strong passionate romance is only suggested and,
therefore, it misses at becoming an affair we can become involved in and its
eventual tragic repercussions.        That leaves room for the other supporting
characters such as the always grinning Hana, who is completely devoted to
Almasy, and falls in love with an Indian soldier, Kip (Naveen Andrews). There's
also the thief and morphine addict, Caravaggio, who has a personal vendetta
against our scarred hero. This is a character who becomes secondary and trivial
when comparing to the overwhelming love stories the movie wants to tell.
Caravaggio keeps intruding the narrative.
The relationship between Hana and Kip is sweet and invigorating, and it
climaxes with Ella Fitzgerald singing "Cheek to Cheek" on the soundtrack.
There's also a moment that is quite intoxicating - it is when Hana observes a
bare-chested Kip washing his long, flowing black hair. She is aroused by it,
and it is a moment that is as breathtaking as you can imagine - a moment to
stop time. There are several scenes like that especially when Hana and Kip
elevate themselves with a harness to look at an enormous painting using flares
in the darkness. These are precisely the moments missing in the
Almasy-Katherine affair.
The love affair between Almasy and Katharine is handled with just as much
discretion but it feels wrongfully neglected. The chemistry between Ralph
Fiennes and Kristin Scott Thomas crackles with excitement yet the affair is not
equally handled as scorchingly - Ralph Fiennes's performance is fine but he
projects a cold, detached mood that deemphasizes the love story. As Almasy
reminisces in his final days about her, it becomes just that - a reminiscence
lacking in substance. We see how much they love each other but we never really
see how they become in love with another. It is really only the love affair
between Hana and Kip that makes us feel the passion and commitment between two
lovers. The late, great director David Lean, who made some of the most
enlightening romances of the last thirty years, showed you the passion and the
tragic loss of love in its entirety.
"The English Patient" is an exquisite film, and it is beautifully acted by all
the principal actors. It certainly makes you see the tragic consequences of
their love affair, but it doesn't invite you to share them. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with questions, concerns or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Go (1999)
I have become sickened by all the Tarantino rip-offs, too many to mention.
Almost all have none of the grace, wit or humanity that dear Quentin invests in
his own works. They are like well-designed wallpapers flung with graphic
violence, countless obscenities, and numerous rock n' roll/rap songs and
packaged as something shocking and new. Some star Michael Madsen, Martin Sheen
or Dennis Hopper. "Out of Sight" was the most dazzling but that had the
advantage of a great author, Elmore Leonard, as its basis, and Steven
Soderbergh, a stylish director. The new "Go" is different - it's as
symmetrically close to "Pulp Fiction" as you can imagine but it has an electric
energy and volume all its own.
The film begins with a supermarket checkout girl named Ronna (soft-voiced and
droopy-eyed Sarah Polley from "Sweet Hereafter") who establishes a drug
connection for two handsome soap opera stars, Adam (Scott Wolf) and Zack (Jay
Mohr). Ronna's drug of choice is ecstasy, which one member of her elite group
nearly overdoses on and imagines speaking to a cat with Zen subtitles. Ronna
has to deal with the seedy drug dealer, Todd (Timothy Olyphant), who has a
propensity for sexual favors. But when her good friend, Claire (Katie Holmes),
another supermarket checkout girl, is left alone with this devil, things truly
go haywire. 
After Ronna's predicament, we flash back to the beginning of the story told
from the point-of-view of a thick-accented, red-haired Brit, Simon (Desmond
Askew). Simon is a drug connection for Todd (Ronna is the replacement) and goes
off to Vegas with his pals, including the suave Marcus (Taye Diggs) and a
stoner who thinks he's black, Tiny (Breckin Meyer - always the pothead).
Unfortunately, after a debacle involving backroom lap-dancers ("Do not
touch!"), they are now on the run from a vicious gangster (the terrifically
oily J.E. Freeman). And it is here where we experience one of the most dazzling
car chases ever filmed to the tune of Steppenwolf's "Magic Carpet Ride." 
Then the story flashes back again and we see the story told from the
point-of-view of the two soap opera stars, who are working undercover under the
tutelage of the Teutonic cop Burke (William Fichtner), a character that makes
you squirm. Burke invites the pair to a Christmas dinner that is fraught with
misunderstandings and unclear intentions. Let's just say it is a howler of a
sequence, guaranteed to keep you laughing at its inevitable payoff. 
The characters, as well as the audience, experience one near-catastrophe after
another, and all the characters seem intent to make a whole 24-hour,
Rashomon-like experience as dangerously exciting as possible with no
inhibitions - they will do absolutely anything for thrills. There are
gangsters, awry drug deals, dances to the tune of "Macarena," distorted
visions, extreme violence, conversations about Tantric sex and the comic "The
Family Circus," and lots more to feast the eyes and the ears. 
"Go" is suffused with electric energy throughout - there is not a moment that
is not thrilling or kinetic in any way. Director Doug Liman ("Swingers") frames
his charismatic actors with tension abounding every step of the way by means of
a constantly roving camera. The opening titles show a stroboscopic club where
silhouetted patrons dance the night away in light blue hues, and the editing is
lightning-paced. This brilliantly sets up the rest of the film's pace, and
sometimes Liman will slow down long enough to study the actor's faces. 
I enjoyed all the actors on screen, but Sarah Polley has a dole-like quality
that is more realistic than the cardboard teens shown in other films - I could
not stop looking at her. Katie Holmes displays a sensuousness and a charm that
made me swoon. I also liked the merry soul of Taye Diggs, a definite
star-in-the-making. 
"Go" may remind many of "Pulp Fiction," but this film has its own momentum,
and plenty of style to spare. It's a crazy film that will keep you on edge -
funny, energetic, joyous, jolting, ironic, and tense. You can't ask for a
better time at the movies.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 

Title
Review for Chocolat (2000)
"Chocolat" is the kind of syrupy, mystical fable that audiences will able to 
fully ingest and come back for seconds. It is simple and simple-minded enough 
for mainstream audiences but for others, its ambitions point to something far 
more than what is delivered. 
As "Chocolat" opens, a brazen wind blows through the French countryside until 
it arrives in a small religious town where it settles upon thrusting open the 
doors of the local church. Inside the church are the locals, including Comte 
de Reynaud (Alfred Molina) who is a bit perturbed by the sudden whiff of air. 
Nevertheless, the wind brings in two nomadic, red-cloaked outsiders, Vianne 
(Juliette Binoche) and her daughter, Anouk (Victoire Thivisol). They arrive 
in town ready to open a delicious chocolate shop, though their timing 
couldn't be more off. Vianne is opening her shop during the Lent season, 
observed by most of the local denizens who intend on fasting. The problem is 
Vianne is atheist and causes turmoil with the Comte, who basically runs the 
town despite the fact he is only a historian. The Comte even revises the 
young priest's sermons to his own moralist liking!
What is Vianne to do? She has a wonderful shop full of Mayan chocolate 
recipes served with chili powder and whipped cream but thanks to Comte's 
rising intervention, she may not be able to keep any customers. It is bad 
enough that her darling Anouk, who has an imaginary kangaroo friend, is 
Vianne's illegitimate daughter. That doesn't seem to irk the crotchety, 
rebellious Armande (Judi Dench), Vianne's landlady, who favors Vianne's hot 
chocolates. Pretty soon the kleptomaniac Josephine (Lena Olin), physically 
abused by her cafe owner husband (Peter Stormare), moves into Vianne's shop 
and begins baking chocolate with her. And as luck would have it, a gypsy 
named Roux (Johnny Depp) arrives in town, ready to dazzle and court Vianne, 
causing rising temper tantrums in Comte and the town itself who oppose 
gypsies. 
Nothing in "Chocolat" occurs that can't be predicted on some level yet it is 
Lasse Hallstrom's assured direction that makes up for the film's too tidy 
climax and formulaic structure. Hallstrom also has a gift for knowing how to 
handle actors and make them luminescent. Nothing could be further from the 
truth than Juliette Binoche, who gives new meaning to the term 
"incandescent." Every shot with Binoche is bright and lovely beyond words, 
and I can't think of a better actress to play the seductive Vianne. She is 
delightful, witty, beautiful and tempestuous. Comte refers to her as Satanic, 
but her seductive charm is in guessing what kind of chocolate her customers 
prefer and thus tempting them to sample it.
Alfred Molina gives one of his most magnificent performances yet, teetering 
on the edge between cartoonish villain and a virtuous, righteous man. His 
subtle glances and grimaces are terrifically timed. Dame Judi Dench also cuts 
another beautiful performance as the snippy landlord who is estranged from 
her strict daughter (Carrie-Ann Moss). Lena Olin is at her most emotionally 
heartfelt since "Enemies: A Love Story" as the battered wife who tries to 
separate herself from her loutish husband. 
"Chocolat" is delightful but also fluffy, and ends with a sermon from the 
young priest that is superficial and preachy beyond words - the dialogue as 
said sounds written, not spoken. And isn't it possible that the film could 
have taken place in some other season besides Lent to accommodate the film's 
theme of how intolerance can corrupt yet can also prove to be incorruptible? 
Isn't it enough that a woman in a red cloak and red shoes with an 
illegitimate daughter comes into a Catholic town unveiling the repressed 
spirits of all the townsfolk with her Mayan chocolate? Still, "Chocolat" is a 
nice treat but it could have used the weight of films like "Like Water For 
Chocolate" or "Babette's Feast" to make for a richer dessert. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, complaints or general comments at 
Faust667@aol.com or at faustus_08520@yahoo.com

Title
Review for Casino (1995)
The greatest American film director since Orson Welles is Martin Scorsese, and
he has an extensive resume to prove it. In the 1990's, he has dazzled us with
"GoodFellas," "Cape Fear," and "The Age of Innocence." These films are the
best, most thought-provoking and entertaining of the decade, offering
multitudes of cinematic pleasures. "Casino" is one more to add to the crop, an
indelibly fascinating saga of the Mob's fallout from Las Vegas in the late 70's
and early 80's. 
"Casino" stars the great Robert De Niro as Sam "Ace" Rothstein, a high-rolling
gambler and expert bookie who runs the fictional Tangiers hotel casino for the
mob "back home" (purportedly Chicago, but names had to be dropped in the event
of a lawsuit). Ace has to maintain active control of the casino and make sure
not to disturb the Mob's constant "skimming" of money from the count rooms. Ace
is acutely aware of how a casino is run and knows every single trick in the
book - he even weighs each roll of dice to see if it meets his standards. He is
the quintissential control freak, going so far as to make sure that there are
an equal amount of blueberries in each muffin at the restaurants!
Enter Joe Pesci as the childhood friend of Ace's, known as Nicky Santoro, a
volatile, brutally violent Mob enforcer (he has no qualms of squeezing a guy's
head in a vise in one of the most shockingly profane moments in film history).
Nicky comes to Vegas to keep an eye on Ace, who is reluctant to have him in
tow. Throughout the years, Nicky causes so much trouble for Ace (opening a
jewelry store and performing all kinds of heists, not to mention multiple
murders) that they can't even be seen together. 
On one night at the casino, Ace sees the beautiful Ginger McKenna (Sharon
Stone), a glitzy hooker who swindles from her escorts, and the moment he sees
this grand beauty, he becomes enamored to the tune of Mickey and Sylvia's "Love
is Strange." They have an affair, but Ginger does not love him despite agreeing
to his marriage proposal. This is not a marriage, it is a monetary arrangement.
What does she have to lose? She has everything money can buy including an array
of fur coats, garish outfits, an excessive amount of jewelry, a beautiful house
with a pool (which they never seem to enjoy), and a "key" to his safety deposit
box. Ginger is basically "set up for life." 
"Casino" is based on actual events as depicted in the gritty non-fiction book
by Nicholas Pileggi, and the script is written by Pileggi and Scorsese (they
previously collaborated on "GoodFellas"). The alcoholic/drug addict Ginger and
the explosive Nicky lead Ace downhill with their bantering and brief affair.
The FBI and the Mob eventually curtail the Vegas business of skimming leading
to what many say was the last remnants of the Old West. 
"Casino" boasts some great performances including De Niro as the highly
repressed "Ace" - a man who does not change through the course of the story and
is more interested in controlling all the odds than anything else. Joe Pesci is
at his snarling, foul-mouthed, hateful best here since "GoodFellas," playing
essentially the same role - a diminutive thug prone to sadistic violence. In
addition, he clumsily resorts to careless behavior when sleeping with Ace's
wife, and relentlessly badgers dealers for no reason. 
There are also equally meaty roles supplied by Kevin Pollak as a crooked
realtor turned politician, L.Q. Jones as one of the casino supporters who has a
tiff with Ace concerning the firing of his son (amusingly played by Drive-In
Critic Joe Bob Briggs), Alan King as a cigar-chomping Teamster, Frank Vincent
as Nicky's partner in crime, and even Scorsese's mother, Catherine Scorsese, as
the mother of a mobster who chastises him for cursing.
Sharon Stone is the true revelation in Scorsese's epic, bringing down all the
king's horses and all the king's men in Ace's casino empire. She contrasts
nicely from glamorous hustler to pathetic, boorish drunk. An example of her
transition is evident early in the film when the just-married Ginger sobbingly
calls her former pimp lover, Lester Diamond (James Woods), whom she gives money
to in need. Ginger is so sickened by Ace's surveillance that she resorts to
cocaine and binge drinking. Later in the film, out of desperation, she runs
away with her daughter to Lester. Sharon Stone flawlessly depicts Ginger's
changes and attitudes, both emotionally and fashionably, and is more vibrant on
screen than ever before. 
"Casino" is full of so many great scenes, including the first hour which is a
docudrama of how casinos are run, how the Mob skims profits, and how the money
is packaged and shipped from Vegas to "Back Home," as the titles indicate. The
first count room sequence is an unedited marvel that runs a little more than
two minutes as we see how they make an entrance and leave with a suitcase of
money without anyone asking any questions. We even see how the pit bosses and
casino managers track all the players - there's a moment of sudden violence
when a con-artist is given a fake heart attack and his hand is severely
pummeled by a mallet. Scorsese's point, as in "GoodFellas," is that the Mob
will go through severe measures to make sure you get the point. 
The dramatic personal stories of Ace, Ginger and Nicky sets up the second half
of the film, and they are expertly handled by Scorsese, especially the scenes
of torment between Ace and Ginger where he seems to watch her like a hawk.
Still, Scorsese overdoes the emotional scenes between Ace's quiet rage and
Ginger's inebriated periods spent in bed - they weigh the movie down a bit in
the middle section. The scenes between Ginger and Nicky don't make a lot of
sense either but their portentous affair does show a relentless nature within
them that leads to their tragic denouements. The slimy James Woods knows how to
play sleaze and does it with poise as Lester - I do wish it was a more
full-bodied character so we could understand Ginger's attraction to him. Still,
this is Wood's finest role since 1989's "True Believer." 
Any way you slice it, "Casino" is still a stunning work of art by Scorsese, and
it ranks as one of the best crime films ever made. The characters are not
weaved with any sense of sympathy or sentiment, yet you will not easily forget
them. They stay with you, and the restrained Ace (the most complex, fully-drawn
De Niro/Scorsese character yet) is the first Scorsese male protagonist who will
stop at nothing to keep his female counterpart with him. Despite her severe
problems, Ace will do anything to help her because he loves her and their
daughter, and it is one more person he feels he can control. 
"Casino" is not as great as "GoodFellas" and does not possess the same
force-of-nature style, but it is as equally honest, scintillating, humanistic
and complex.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at
Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Scream (1996)
Wes Craven's career as a director is starting to get more interesting - he
seems to be finally exploring the mysteries of horror as he did in the classic
1984 film "A Nightmare On Elm Street." His subsequent films didn't match that
one's genuine power or mystery as witnessed by the horribly misguided "Wes
Craven's New Nightmare" or the jarring horror-comedy "Vampire in Brooklyn."
"Scream" is a visually impressive movie and it attempts to revise and transcend
the typical slasher flick with mixed results. At the very least, it tries.
"Scream" is set in a typical L.A. suburb where the local high school teenagers
worship the torpid slasher flicks of the 80's, including the Jamie Lee Curtis
screaming roles from "Halloween" to "Prom Night." They know all the formulas
and cliches by heart, and they worship them with unmitigated glee. Neve
Campbell, from TV's "Party of Five," stars as Sidney, a virginal teenager who
is receiving strange calls from a stalker; he keeps quizzing her on slasher
movies. Sidney's mother was killed by a stalker, and she is torn (pardon the
pun) by how he mentions intimate details of her. Enter Sidney's pals, which
include her anxious boyfriend, Billy (Skeet Ulrich), and her best friend (Rose
McGowan from "The Doom Generation"). I will omit the other cast members for now
because part of the fun of this thriller is that we don't know who the killer
is, it could be any of Sidney's clique of friends. 
Strange murders start occurring at the high school and Billy is a prime
suspect. Feeling that her life is in danger, Sidney attends an all-night
slasher video party with her pals. Although not as naive as her friends, Sidney
should know better than to go to her friend's house (after all, she watches
those dumb movies, too). No medals for anyone who guesses that the killer may
be there. And if these teenagers are so clever, why do they make the same
mistakes as the cartoonish teens in those movies? 
"Scream" is a smart, very entertaining satiric thriller in the first
three-quarters. It is only until the last quarter that the movie opts to be as
bloodily nauseating and predictably stupid as any of the slasher flicks it
pretends to mock. Instead of throwing us surprising thrills and chills, it goes
for nonstop gore and an avalanche of stabbings and pointless cruelty - blood
filling up the screen is not scary. Craven takes the easy route rather than
enthralling us in our seats with unimaginable horror as he does in roughly the
first hour and ten minutes. 
The pleasures in "Scream," though, are many. The electrifyingly intense and
scary opening sequence with Drew Barrymore is one of the most thrilling
sequences in any thriller I've ever seen. Another plus is the killer who wears
a black cape, and a mask that resembles Edvard Munch's painting, The Scream,
thus making the killer a monstrous figure of pain. The performances by the
actors set the right tone for this material. Neve Campbell makes Sidney into an
effective heroine; a girl tortured by the painful memory of her mother's death,
and with the sad notion that her boyfriend could be the killer. Rose McGowan is
beguiling to watch with her huge eyes and Betty Boop lips as Sidney's
no-nonsense pal, and there's the brooding Skeet Ulrich who resembles Johnny
Depp from the original Elm Street. There's also a pointed jab at the media with
a "To Die For" news reporter (Courteney Cox) who wants to find this stalker by
any means necessary. There are also numerous in-jokes and cameos, including Wes
Craven himself as a janitor named Fred and, if you're quick, Linda Blair as a
reporter.
"Scream" is scary, effective and sometimes haunting, and balances elements of
comedy, horror and satire with ease. But when the typical stalker-in-the-house
routine ending comes in making Sidney less stronger than she was previously,
it's all blood and guts with no imagination or real sense of terror. Craven's
idea was to make a film that would transcend all the cliches of the slasher
film genre, invent some new ones, and bring a creepy sense of menace to the
proceedings. By the end, it's Craven wallowing in the bloody thrills rather
than poking fun at them, and reinventing them. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with your comments and/or arguments at Faust667@aol.com  or 
jerry@movieluver.com 

Title
Review for Hannibal (2001)
Ridley Scott's "Hannibal" has been criticized for its over-the-top gross out
scenes and little else. There is a reason for this - there is little else to
discuss and that is unfortunate. For all the character development that "The
Silence of the Lambs" provided for Hannibal Lecter and Clarice Starling,
"Hannibal" focuses on cartoonish types in a freak show designed to titillate, a
far cry from what "Silence" accomplished. 
"Hannibal" begins effectively as we observe Clarice (Julianne Moore, replacing
Jodie Foster) on a drug raid with the help of several FBI agents. She kills a
drug czar (Hazelle Goodman) by firing a bullet at her chest as she clutches her
baby. The incident puts Clarice in a difficult position with the FBI as she has
to turn over her gun and badge. She is on the Guiness Book of World Records for
being the only FBI female agent to have the most kills. This Clarice, ten years
after dealing with Hannibal Lecter face-to-face, is a changed woman, colder and
less emotional. Probably a dose of good old Hannibal is just what she needs to
get out of her slump. Still, another agent named Krendler (Ray Liotta) has it in
for Clarice, and desires her sexually. As always, Clarice's interests in life
exclude anything sexual. One funny scene shows Krendler looking at photos of
Lecter unaware Clarice is watching him. She alerts him and he asks, "What are
you doing in the dark?" Her response: "Thinking of cannibalism." 
So far, so good. "Hannibal" then switches to Florence, Italy where the good
doctor Lecter resides and is trying to find a job as a museum curator! A
detective named Pazzi (Giancarlo Giannini) is investigating the disappearance of
the former curator and discovers that the doctor is Hannibal and is on the FBI
ten most wanted list (which also includes the terrorist Bin Laden)! 
The film's pacing slackens, spending far too much time on the Italian detective
and so little on Clarice who is still looking for Hannibal. Keeping the two most
memorable characters in the history of movies apart amounts to awkwardly
patched-together situations that have little to do with anything. In fact, as
written by David Mamet and Steven Zaillian, the story is almost nonexistent.
There is no tension, no surprise and a general lack of credibility. How can
someone like Hannibal, who never wears a disguise, be able to move about Italy
in a flowing cape and a hat and not be noticed? How can you not notice someone
wiping the glasses of wine they drink from at a restaurant? Well, the detective
notices but surely there must have some way of him communicating this
information to the FBI if he wanted to. 
Of course, Pazzi chooses not to as his primary motive is financial. You see a
certain billionaire by the name of Mason Verger (Gary Oldman) wants Hannibal fed
to his killer boars. It turns out that Verger was forced to slice off his own
face and feed it to his dogs thanks to Hannibal. Now he is a faceless cipher
with no eyelids and a horrifying expression that is sure to creep out the most
jaded viewer. He is about as loony as Hannibal himself and provides a handsome
reward to anyone who knows of  Hannibal's whereabouts. Enter the desperate
Pazzi, yet he doesn't realize he is being hounded by Hannibal.  
But none of this matters in the least. There is no sense of urgency since
Hannibal can escape and elude authorities so easily. The crux of the film is the
Florence investigation but I missed the central relationship between Hannibal
and Clarice - they so embodied "Silence of the Lambs" that here, they are mostly
left on the sidelines. No character shadings or depth to either one of them
leaves us out in the cold. A real shame since Julianne Moore is an excellent
replacement for Jodie Foster, and a brief meeting between her and Hannibal sheds
little light on either one of them. 
Another factor is that Hannibal was imprisoned in "Silence" thus leaving plenty
of time to understand his motives and desires, and his developing interest in
Clarice. Letting him loose like a wild animal does little to raise our
expectations - he is simply a madman with an insatiable appetite for flesh who
has a host of sardonic comments to make about cannibalism. Where is the charm
and elegance Hopkins brought to the original? 
Moore is well-cast and strong and empathetic but she still remains as one-note
as Hopkins does. It is not her fault, the script needed plenty of fine-tuning
but what can you say about two top-of-the-class screenwriters hired to provide
such a mediocre, rambling screenplay? 
"Hannibal" looks and sounds terrific thanks to director Ridley Scott. It is
glossy filmmaking but with no soul or human interest. A climactic dinner
sequence remains as loathsome and gory a sequence as anything Hollywood has ever
produced before (though Scott has directed it tastefully). But mean-spiritedness
and gore are central to "Hannibal" - it is a bloodless freak show where the
characters are all cartoons. "Silence of the Lambs" defied genre expectations by
never quite fitting into a thriller mode or a horror movie scenario - it was, at
its best, a psychological character study with a gripping hold on the audience
through its sheer intensity and surefire direction by Jonathan Demme. This film
is a pure slasher flick, unengaging and uneven. And all poor old Hannibal has
left to say are such flat one-liners like "Goody-goody" and "Ta-da." How rude!
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Thin Red Line, The (1998)
It took director Terrence Malick twenty years to make a film, which is about a
decade longer than it would take Stanley Kubrick. Did he run out of ideas, or
was he sick of Hollywood? It is an inconsequential matter because Malick has
crafted one of the most poetic, life-affirming statements on war that has ever
been produced by a Hollywood studio. "The Thin Red Line" is a masterpiece - a
quiet, powerful observation of men in war, their lingering thoughts on what war
means to them, and how violent human behaviors affect nature. 
The film's opening shot is not of bullets grazing and imploding on the beach
of Normandy, but of a crocodile entering a lake underwater. The next few shots
centers on Private Witt (James Caviezel) cavorting among the natives on an
island off the coast, but where are we? Why are we here? Isn't this a war film?
Later, an American patrol ship spots Witt and another soldier, and it is up to
First Sgt. Edward Welsh (Sean Penn) to remind Witt what their God-like mission
is. Their mission, as Lieut. Col. Tall (Nick Nolte) explains, is to ascend upon
a certain hill on the Guadalcanal island to infiltrate a Japanese bunker. This
is the conventional section of the film - the war itself to find the bunker,
and the risk of being shot down like flies by the Japs. With its sweeping
grandeur, artfully shot and edited battles, and incongruous points-of-view,
this long sequence caught me off guard, and is thus tinged with more emotion
and heartbreak than anything in "Saving Private Ryan." I think the reason it
works so well is that we are aware how unfair and unpredictable war is -
bullets and gunfire can come from anywhere. One soldier (played by Woody
Harrelson) accidentally pulls the pin on a grenade thus literally blowing
himself apart! 
Malick also invests time on how his characters think of war in the context of
their lives, and their loved ones back home. One particular soldier, Private
Bell (Ben Chaplin), is always reminiscing of his days with his wife, whom we
see in short shrift during flashbacks. He wants to be with her, but knows that
he may meet her "in the dark waters." Nolte's ferocious lieutenant wonders why
he's fighting, then he realizes that war is what he's been working up to for
twenty years. His fierce attitude is upheld by his notion that war makes a man
virile - "My son is a baker salesman." When he speaks eloquently about his
tough career to Captain Gaff (John Cusack), he says to him: "You are my son." 
Malick also makes vivid points about nature, and how the brutal inhumanity of
war affects it. This is where his artistry truly lies - his films, "Badlands"
and "Days of Heaven," are inherently about nature. This time, along with the
help of cinematographer John Toll, he shows us the raping of the earth by men
of war. Although nature is a process of violence, war rapes the blades of grass
and the soil by its incessant violence upon it, including explosions. This is a
theme that the mass audience will not care to understand - close-ups of
colorful parrots, bats, rattlesnakes, and crocodiles do not a war film make, do
they? Yet, these innocent animal species did not ask to be part of it, nor did
the natives who walk among the pastures or the soldiers who are killed
arbitrarily. That close symmetry between man and animal is repeatedly and
intelligently paralleled by Malick. 
"The Thin Red Line" is not the type of film that is character-driven, but
rather character-oriented. In other words, this is a film about faces within
the confines of nature, and the chaos that surrounds them. The interior
monologues are told through voice-overs (originally voiced by Billy Bob
Thornton) of individual men and their perceptions of what war entails. 
The actors who make the strongest impression are James Caveziel's divine
Private Witt (the dreamy, poignant hero of the film), Nick Nolte's memorably
furious Colonel, Elias Koteas's straight-arrow Captain Staros who refuses to
send his men to death, Sean Penn's amazingly watchable Sgt. Welsh, Ben
Chaplin's courageous Private Bell, and the stoic, eccentric quality of John
Savage's McCron. Other actors (John Travolta, George Clooney, John C. Reilly,
Adrien Brody) are left in the dust (there was extensive recutting), but
Malick's astute direction always rivets our attention. 
Malick has crafted a beautiful film full of some potent, sublime images. I'll
never forget the shots of the tortured Japanese soldiers and their cries of
pain; Caveziel's beatific face and the moment he's confronted by the enemy; the
deployed cargoes crashing on the water; the sunlight peering through the trees.
Overall, "The Thin Red Line's" overt, lingering lyricism indicates that nature
should be restored and not ignored, in light of virile fighters on the terrain.
Rarely has such a war film made the point that our surroundings, and what we
make of them, is infinitely more important than the evil that men do. 
Check out more reviews at JERRY AT THE MOVIES located at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 

Title
Review for Deep End, The (2001)
I was stunned after seeing "The Deep End." Here is a film noir story with the
machinations of the thriller genre but all wrapped in ivory silk, as if any and
all cliches that could occur are withheld in the service of melancholia. This is
noir that is not really bleak and a thriller that looks for behavioral
characteristics to thrill us, all told with an absorbing sense of serenity that
distinguishes it from most other thrillers. 
The film begins with a jeep arriving at some undisclosed nightclub in Reno. A
tall, lanky, red-headed woman warns a sleazy guy to stay away from her son. We
are unaware of what the situation is but we know he represents sleaze and we
know she is a worrisome mother. It turns out the mother's son, Beau (Jonathan
Tucker), is having a homosexual affair with Darby Reese (Josh Lucas), the sleazy
guy at the nightclub who owes a huge gambling debt. Beau's mother, Margaret
(Tilda Swinton), wants him to stay away from Darby since all he represents is
trouble. When Darby makes an unscheduled visit at their house in Lake Tahoe,
Beau pleads with him to keep away. Darby will keep if Margaret pays him $5,000.
A fight ensues resulting in the accidental death of Darby. The next day,
Margaret finds the body and thus, the film's moral center takes over in an
unusual, lyrical manner. 
I will not say much more except that this serenely modest thriller is different
from most Hitchcock thrillers in that usually the protagonist and the audience
is aware of information that no one else is aware of. In this case, we know the
truth behind the accidental death of Darby that no one else in the movie knows.
Not even the seedy man from Reno ("E.R.'s" Goran Visnjic) who demands money to
keep his mouth shut from what might be a potential murder. And Margaret does her
best to keep calm and hide Darby's body. She wants to protect her son, her
father-in-law, and her other son and daughter from the evils of the world,
notably Reno. 
Tilda Swinton is clearly the star of "The Deep End," imbuing the screen with a
vitality and strength that is breathtaking to witness. I have only seen her in
one other film, the magnificent "Orlando," but her performance here makes me
want to pursue her earlier work. Perhaps even more so than Cate Blanchett,
Swinton has a sense of authority as the doting, respectful mother that dominates
the screen. It is no accident that the number of closeups in the film enhance
her strong, magnetic presence. Interestingly, Swinton's Margaret seems to barely
take notice of her children except for Beau - it is a family life where the
father-in-law is more concerned about her than anyone else (including her unseen
husband who is a Navy officer). 
"The Deep End" is directed by Scott McGehee and David Siegel III, who previously
collaborated on "Suture." They have an uncanny eye for detail and savor
appropriately breathless cinematic moments that never disrupt the pace or
momentum. I found the shot of Swinton underwater while looking for car keys from
Darby's body positively thrilling and unnerving to watch. Also look closely at
framed shots of Swinton, usually seen from windows or from other obstructions
(one extreme example is a fish-eyed lens shot reflected in a drop of water).
Water and glass are prominently featured whenever Swinton's Margaret appears on
screen and it nicely balances with the Lake Tahoe setting - prominent yet
unassuming. 
"The Deep End" is occasionally melodramatic towards the end and climaxes sooner
than it should have. Still,  a magnificent central performance by Swinton, not
to mention an understated cast and a hauntingly lyrical tone that switches from
engaging thriller to a heart-rending love story, more than makes up for it.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Enemy of the State (1998)
With a title as generic as the movie itself, this latest Jerry Bruckheimer
production is not as headache-inducing as "Armageddon" but it may still leave
you with a slight migraine. That is not to say that "Enemy of the State" isn't
fun, it is, but in a crudely packaged, sensationalistic way. 
Let's consider the plot for a moment. Will Smith plays a labor lawyer named
Robert Clayton Dean, whose life is already in peril before the plot thickens.
He's facing problems with the Mob regarding a videotape and a troubling
association with an ex-girlfriend (Lisa Bonet). By chance, he abruptly meets an
old college friend of his (Jason Lee from "Chasing Amy") who slips a videotape
into Dean's shopping bag. This tape contains footage of the murder of a
congressman, and it is up to the high-ranking National Security Agency (NSA)
officials to get their hands on it. This agency is run by Thomas Reynolds (Jon
Voight, the villain du jour), and he's eager to get the tape back since he was
at the murder scene. 
It's a Kafkaesque downfall for Dean, who can't use any of his credit cards and
can't convince his wife (Regina King) that he's innocent of all these charges
they've drummed up in the media, including an alleged affair with his
ex-girlfriend. Worse yet, Dean's house and his entire life is bugged right
through with high-tech surveillance equipment. Dean hides out and finds a
certain Mr. Brill (Gene Hackman) who used to work for the NSA and can outwit
any of those officials. Still, Dean is only a lawyer and makes stupid mistakes,
like calling his wife. Wake up Dean, the phones are bugged too! 
This film is illogical and senseless, but it moves at a fast clip. There are
enough comical surprises by Smith, though the script makes him a little too
bland for my tastes. He has a hectically funny scene where he pretends to be
hotel hospitality, and undresses before a hysterical Oriental couple while the
NSA are trying to catch him. Some scenes are unforgivably implausible, such as
seeing Dean running down a tunnel in a white robe (wouldn't any car stop?); the
NSA killing everyone they question except for Dean; a laughable Tarantino-like
shootout between the Mob and the NSA, and so on. 
"Enemy of the State" is a high-tech conspiracy thriller with no surprises or
sense of real, imminent danger. It is too dependent on loud explosions and
gimmicky, electronic music to remind us that we should feel tense. The outline
of the plot is very similar to Coppola's classic "The Conversation," which was
a deftly handled character study relying on dialogue and a quiet, understated
style to convey the madness of privacy invasion. The other connection is the
frenetic performance by Gene Hackman as a bug expert, practically the same role
he played in "The Conversation," but with far less subtlety this time around. 
All in all, this is an overdone popcorn thriller in the fast-cut, explosive
style of producer Jerry Bruckheimer and director Tony Scott ("Top Gun"). It'll
keep you awake and you'll enjoy Smith's precious few quips, but you'll have
forgotten about it by the next day. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general coplaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Tumbleweeds (1999)
The road movie is a genre not likely to die anytime soon because it represents
the American landscape of searching for your identity. Now the road movie about
a single/divorced/widowed mother searching for a new place and a new man with a
daughter or son in tow is nothing new, and a certifiable genre in its own
right. From "Alice Doesn't Live Here Anymore" to "This Boy's Life," the genre
has been milked dry of all possibilities, but then comes "Tumbleweeds," which
mildly reverses expectations. 
The change is the casting of English actress Janet McTeer as the Southerner
from North Carolina, Mary Jo Walker, a vibrant, energetic woman who has just
left her husband, and hastily leaves with her daughter, Ava (Kimberly Brown),
to another state. They disagree over where to go to and finally decide on San
Diego, California, near a beach. Ava goes to school and discovers she a talent
for acting, and thus prepares for a role as Romeo in the school play of "Romeo
and Juliet." Mary Jo works for a telephone wake-up call service, and has a
strange boss (Michael J. Pollard) watching her every move. Everything seems
perfect, including the truck driver she's dating, Jack Ranson (Gavin O'Connor),
who asks them to move in to his house. Ava smells trouble from the start,
already devising an escape route from her bedroom. 
Mary Jo has always escaped from her life and her abusive boyfriends and
husbands, and Ava loves her mother dearly but she also knows her too well.
Their relationship and need for each other is at the core of "Tumbleweeds," and
it is pinpointed in one scene where Ava explains to Mary that everything may
seem fine with the new beau, but six months is longer than Mary should expect
to stay attached.
Everyone who is a film buff can predict where "Tumbleweeds" will go with its
premise. Jack seems nice but he's also tempermental, and ignores Ava. We know
that Jack will be all wrong for Mary Jo, yet her co-worker, Dan Miller (Jay O.
Sanders) may be what she needs - someone who can take of her and who
understands the iambic pentameter in Shakespeare. We also are aware that Mary
Jo will finally realize that she is, in effect, only running away from herself.
Janet McTeer is sheerly perfect as Mary Jo - those penetrating yet soothing
eyes and luscious smile give us everything we need to sympathize with her and
her plight. She has a very touching scene with her co-worker and best friend,
Laurie (Laurel Holloman), where she admits that she does not know why she's
always leaving. The beauty is all there in this beaming, dreamy Mary Jo, but
she is also emotionally fragile.
Kimberly Brown gives one of the best, purest and most naturalistic performances
of any child actor this year as the presumptuous, smart Ava. I found myself
laughing heartily whenever she secretly winked or nodded to her mother, and
plus she has some truly humane scenes with McTeer. One particular example is
when Mary Jo is showing Ava how to kiss using apples, and the way it is shot
and timed makes the scene as simple and real as any other film could be. I also
liked an earlier scene where they toss out old clothes from their car, trying
to start anew.
My big reservation about "Tumbleweeds" is that it ends just as the story is
getting more interesting. This is one of those independent films tht would have
benefitted from a 2 hour-plus running time, especially with the introduction of
characters such as the widower Jack , the kind gardener Ginger (Lois Smith), or
Mary's best pal, Laurie. I also would have preferred a less formulaic approach
and not so many cliches (the film often feels more episodic than the rambling
character study it aimed to be). Still, benefitting from the amazing
performances by McTeer and Brown, "Tumbleweeds" has moments of true beauty and
realism that will make you tumble with joy. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or comments at jerry@movieluver.com or
at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for People vs. Larry Flynt, The (1996)
It is rare for Hollywood, especially in these politically correct
times, to pursue controversial biographical figures who leave a bad
taste in societal and political terms. Bad taste could be the title of
director Milos Formas's unequivocally great film biography on the king
of bad taste - the controversial Hustler magazine publisher, Larry
Flynt.
Woody Harrelson plays the flashy Larry Flynt (always wearing loud
disco suits) who starts out in Ohio running a plethora of strip clubs
with his patient brother (played by Harrelson's real-life younger
brother). Flynt loves the job because he can sleep with any woman he
wants. He decides to start putting nude pictures of women in
newspapers and eventually magazines. At one of these strip clubs, he
meets Althea Leasure (Courtney Love), a 17-year-old stripper who
becomes Larry's wife and business associate. They have an open
marriage - Althea is bisexual and has many male and female lovers, and
Larry can screw every woman he meets, as long as he doesn't kiss
them. Their love and commitment is deep, and their relationship
reminded me a lot of the two lovers in "Leaving Las Vegas" where two
people can fall in love despite who they are, and what they do for a
living.
"The People vs. Larry Flynt" is not just a love story, it is a hybrid
of events in Larry Flynt's life such as the lurid, loathsome porno
magazine he created, which has sparked dissent among feminists and the
like, the eventual tragic circumstances of the attempt on his life,
Althea's death from AIDS, and the Supreme Court ruling centering on
his right to Freedom of Speech - the right to mock any politician
without being sued for hurting his/her feelings.
Firstly, Forman concentrates deeply on the emotional bond between
Flynt and Althea, it is a relationship based not only on respect but
also mutual honesty.  For example, there's a crucial scene where Flynt
decides to become a born-again Christian and attracts the attention of
Jimmy Carter's evangelist sister, Ruth Carter Stapleton. Afterwards,
he decides to make Hustler a "safer" magazine by eschewing
misogynistic, violent pictures of women and replacing them with
religious symbolic collages. Althea can't and won't accept his
moralistic and religious stance - she doesn't want him to stop being
the avaricious publisher he is.
The second half of the movie becomes a springboard for Flynt's Freedom
of Speech defense as he is sued for libel by Moral Majority leader
Jerry Falwell (apparently, Falwell was offended by Hustler's depiction
of an incestuous relationship with his mother). As Flynt memorably
retorts, "If the First Amendment can protect a scumbag like me, then
it will protect all of you.  Because I'm the worst." He is persecuted
by all kinds of moral watchdogs, prosecutors, protesters, and
political affiliates. Flynt is a hard man to keep down - he continues
to fight even after being shot and paralyzed, enduring never-ending
trials, and jail. He doesn't stop for a second after being released
from jail - he wears an American flag as a diaper to court, throws
oranges at the judge, and becomes a political freedom fighter
defending his pornographic magazine all the way to the Supreme Court.
Woody Harrelson gives the boldest, most liberating performance of his
career - he growls, he spews, he laughs in the face of every judge,
and generally offends everyone because he has the right to do
so. Harrelson delivers to the fullest extent with verve and a
wonderful sense of humor - it is impossible to hate Flynt based on
Woody's emphatic, likable performance. Ditto the trashy Courtney Love
who brings a fuller sense of empathy and humanity for the smart,
vivacious Althea - she is the film's soul and it is a performance on
par with Elisabeth Shue in "Leaving Las Vegas" and Sharon Stone in
"Casino." Love also has that rare gift for an actress where she
doesn't seem to be acting - she is giving us a long look at this
woman's tragic, frail human soul (and unlike some naive critics, it
isn't due to Love's similar addictive background that gives the
performance fire and dynamic energy). Kudos must also go to Edward
Norton as Flynt's long-suffering lawyer.
Director Milos Forman has crafted a rich, penetrating, entertaining
tapestry of Larry Flynt's life with the help of screenwriters Scott
Alexander and Larry Karaszewski (who helmed the similarly ironic "Ed
Wood"). What the movie is most successful at is making Larry Flynt
into a national hero for all liberals out there. The screenplay,
however, omits the most obvious aspect of Flynt's life - he is
notorious in this country for his controversial magazine, and not so
much for the Falwell case. Throughout the film, we never really see
what drove or even inspired him to create such a magazine - the movie
opts to present a balanced viewpoint on the issue of censorship but it
is a mistake not to include the pictures of bestiality, violence,
masochism and, arguably, sheer hatred of women included in his
magazine (A brief shot of the infamous cover where a woman is being
fed into a meat grinder barely skims the surface). And where are all
the feminist characters such as Gloria Steinem who decried Flynt?
Perhaps I am being a bit too harsh but in order to see why so many
people hated Flynt, we have to see what drove them to hate him. He is
essentially protecting the entire magazine (as he does through the
movie) from censorship and libel, and not just the political
cartoons. It is his vision he wishes to protect.
Regardless of these significant oversights, "The People vs. Larry
Flynt" is director Milos Forman's finest film since Amadeus. He has
managed to bring a vivid, penetrating portrait of the most infamous
magazine publisher of the 20th century. His film biography is witty,
humanistic, honestly emotional, three-dimensional, acutely written,
and marvelously acted and directed. Forget "Michael Collins." Based on
the film and the renewed interest in this man, Larry Flynt is an
individual who will be talked about for decades.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or
Faust667@aol.com 

Title
Review for X-Men (2000)
I find that the trick to superhero movies is to let the audience in on the joke, otherwise you wind up with disasters like "Batman and Robin," which turned the Batman franchise into such a sex-plagued travesty that all of its noir origins dissipated as a result. On the other hand, there are superhero movies that make you gasp in wonder at all the wondrous sights, and also make you identify with the protagonists, namely the superheros. Superman and Batman are two classic examples. "X-Men" is a close second - the first comic-book movie since Tim Burton's "Batman" that not only feels like a comic book yarn, it looks like one too. While watching it, I got the feeling that every sequence, every shot, was unspooling before your eyes like the dynamic sights of color and information that often leap from comic books. Stan Lee should be proud.
The X-Men, for those who have not read the comic books, are essentially powerful mutants - men and women with extraordinary powers that they seemed to have been born with. There is Wolverine (Hugh Jackman), who has metal claws that elongate from his hands when he gets mad; Cyclops (James Marsden), who has deadly laser vision protected by a visor; Storm (Halle Berry), who can conjure rainy weather when necessary; and Rogue (Anna Paquin), who can turn people to stone if she touches them (she is not popular on the dating scene). These are the good mutants, presided by Professor Charles Xavier (Patrick Stewart), who has the ability to read minds. 
The evil mutants are presided over by Magneto (Ian McKellen), a former Holocaust survivor who wants the world population to be converted into mutants so they can be accepted into society. His minions include the tongue-lashing Toad (Ray Park), a human frog-of-sorts; the shape-shifting Mystique (Rebecca Romijn-Stamos), covered in blue-colored scaly skin; and finally Sabretooth (Tyler Mane), a growling animal, not unlike Wolvering though not as beastly.
The plot concerns an anti-mutant revolt started by a senator (Bruce Davison), who feels mutants present a danger to society. One can't quarrel with his view when witnessing the deadly emotions of Wolverine, seen at the beginning to be a bare-knuckled fighting champion for some kind of fight club, or the tragic, existential Rogue whose lips and mere touch warrant a coma-like paralysis or even death. Naturally, Magneto is at odds with the senator, as is Professor Xavier, though Magneto's plans are more dastardly - at least the kind-hearted professor is a believer in hope for his race. 
"X-Men" rivals other recent comic book extravaganzas in its character-driven story - these mutants are suffering because of their condition and unfortunate deviance from society. I tend to quarrel with people when they say entertainment is just sheer entertainment - even in something as hackneyed as "The Matrix," there is the sense that the filmmakers are sharing their thoughts about the world of today and how it is envisioned in these trying times. The best character in "X-Men" is Wolverine - an almost half-werewolf mutant with the ability to heal himself. He has a great line (that could sum up most of the mutant characters) when asked if the retraction of the blades from his knuckles hurt: "Every time," he says. 
My main quibble with "X-Men" is that it is simply an introduction to these characters - they come across as more than character types but they only seem defined by their powers. I know that it is too much to ask a blockbuster for some insight but consider what might have been. Wolverine is the most full-bodied character, but where does that leave Rogue and her emotional connection to him? What about Cyclops, Storm, the Professor or Jean Gray (Famke Janseen), the smart doctor who may have a thing for Wolverine? They are fun characters to watch, but who are they? And what about Magneto and his plans? He somehow does not seem to be such a major threat after all the sound and fury of the special-effects on display here. 
Still, "X-Men" is sheer fun to watch, and every moment gives us something to look at. The fights, the battles, and the characters (particularly the titanic Ian McKellen) contribute highly to the sense of fun it instills. And if this is what it takes to get the rumored "Spider-Man" movie rolling, then I am all for the "X-Men." 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Timecode (2000)
As a sheer experiment in filmmaking, "Timecode" is audacious but as human 
drama, it fails to evoke much of an emotional response, though it has 
selective moments of humanism and it is often compelling. 
"Timecode" takes place during a hazy afternoon in Los Angeles near Sunset 
Boulevard where a "creative meeting" is taking place among ad executives in 
an office building, and other events occur with different characters outside 
the building and beyond, including a psychiatrist's office and a limo that 
travels from some mansion to the aforementioned building. I don't want to 
sound too general with such a description, but that is about it. The 
characters merely float by us, making little introductions and soundbites. If 
this sounds like a documentary, in many ways, it is. Let me explain further. 
As directed by Mike Figgis ("Leaving Las Vegas"), "Timecode" was shot in real 
time using four digital cameras that each recorded up to 93 minutes of 
footage in one single continuous take. Not only is this the longest long take 
ever devised on film (shot of course on video and then transferred to film), 
but it is also the first film to ever have four 93 minute takes in four 
quadrants of the screen projected at the same time. The idea of breaking up 
the screen in four quadrants is not a new visual trick but an entire film 
viewed in this manner is new and something to behold. Often, Figgis will 
drown out sound from one or more quadrants to focus on something significant 
in another. This aural technique makes me wonder why Figgis did not cut the 
film to focus on what he wanted us to be attentive to. Perhaps this is my own 
problem of trying to discover what the director intended but I much rather 
see such an experiment used as part of the underlying story, as opposed to 
just for the sake of style. 
Some of the basic characters include a coke-sniffing security guard (Danny 
Huston), a jealous lesbian (Jeanne Tripplehorn, who spends most of the film 
in a limo), another lesbian with hopes of movie stardom (Salma Hayek), an 
attentive psychiatrist (Glenn Headley), and the founder of a film studio 
(Stellan Skarsgard) who is coming apart at the seams over a failed 
relationship. Skarsgard makes the biggest impression, creating a full-bodied 
character portrait of a lost soul, whereas the other characters sort of drift 
by, including a barely audible Holly Hunter as an ad exec. I did enjoy the 
frenetic Richard Edson, an unsung actor to be sure, as a low-budget film 
director with drug problems.  
Despite what is a literally mind-boggling visual experience to endure, the 
film is still quietly fascinating, and there are moments that break up the 
quiet, stately style such as a series of earthquakes, some screaming fits and 
a chilling finale. The use of music by Gustav Mahler gives the film some 
punch. All in all, a semi-successful experiment that will hopefully lead to 
more exciting uses for such an innovative technique. Although it is draining 
and sometimes repetitive, "Timecode" is certainly brave and risky fare. Just 
what we would expect from Mike Figgis.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com 
or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Score, The (2001)
Heist dramas are fashionable again. David Mamet has his own upcoming drama 
aptly titled "Heist." Ben Kingsley's riveting performance in the film "Sexy 
Beast" also involves a heist. Now, director Frank Oz ("Bowfinger") and three 
major stars, Robert De Niro, Edward Norton and Marlon Brando, combine their 
strengths to create their own caper flick. "The Score" is a thrilling 
character study, depending more on specifics related to the heist than with 
character. Still, it is as relaxing and comforting a film as you are likely 
to see in a mindless, mind-boggling summer. 
De Niro stars as Nick, a Montreal jazz club owner who masquerades as an 
efficient burglar. Nick is one of the best in the business, usually 
performing jobs for others in places outside of what he refers to as his own 
backyard. He has a stunning girlfriend (Angela Bassett), an airline 
stewardess, who visits him infrequently ("I'll see yah when I see yah.") 
Everything is in place for Nick but he looks like he is ready to quit too. 
That is until a shady, Sydney Greenstreet character named Max (Marlon 
Brando), an old friend of Nick's, offers Nick one big job in their own 
backyard. It turns out that the Montreal Customs House has a rare, 17th 
century French scepter in the basement, its value higher than Brando's last 
paycheck. The scepter is so valuable that it is placed under strict 
surveillance, namely video cameras and an invisible laser display. There is 
also a little snag and an inconvenience for Nick: Max has hired a cocky, 
seemingly sociopathic thief named Jackie Teller (Edward Norton) to help 
infiltrate the Customs House. It turns out Jackie works at the Customs House 
as a janitor named Brian, mimicking and fooling the employees into believing 
he is mentally challenged. He is in place already, it only takes Nick to 
perform the actual heist with Jackie's help. 
Needless to say, "The Score" fits the description of any heist thriller since 
the days of the Production Code. How many heist thrillers have had the same 
basic premise? How many have dealt with a character like Nick who sees this 
score as his last job, for good and ever? How many involve a virtually silent 
climax where the thief performs his sweat-inducing work amidst false alarms? 
The difference is in all the details, and there are enough to entertain and 
jolt audiences out of their seats. 
De Niro is one of my favorite actors, ranging from explosive portrayals of 
sinful men in "Taxi Driver" and "Raging Bull" to comedic highlights of 
minimalistic strength in "Wag the Dog" and "Meet the Parents." Lately, he has 
been saddled with mediocre fare such as "Fifteen Minutes" but what can you 
say about a man of his stature to keep himself from repeating past roles? 
Well, Nick is not unlike the ice-cold killer thief De Niro played in "Heat." 
This time, though, De Niro brings a world-weariness sense to the role and one 
can't help but feel that Nick enjoys his job as well - he is in command and 
refuses to take orders except from his boss. 
Edward Norton continues to impress me. Here he seems like an extension of the 
duality he prominently displayed in "Primal Fear" and "The Fight Club." It is 
a frightening performance in the sense that his character Jackie seems 
explosive yet reserved at the same time, willing to listen to Nick yet just 
as ready to rebel from the old-timers. His cockiness and energy are, in 
effect, part of his own undoing. How can Jackie feel superior to thieves who 
have far more experience than he ever will? 
Marlon Brando is a whole other matter. Brando seems intent on doing riffs of 
Sydney Greenstreet and the resemblance is amazing not to mention intentional. 
But there is that glee and weariness he brings that fills the screen with 
delight. His scene with De Niro is wonderful to watch, but not quite as 
potent as say the unique pairing of De Niro and Pacino in "Heat." Still, 
watching Brando mingle with De Niro and Norton is a pleasure to behold. And 
Brando's scene at an empty pool where he confesses to De Niro the truth 
behind the heist is exquisite. 
Director Frank Oz is a strange choice for this kind of material since his 
background is in the comedy genre. Still, he proves to be a master of tension 
and suspense in some notable scenes, particularly the heist itself which is 
among the most electrifying since "Topkapi." It is so good that my palms were 
sweaty while watching it. It is on par with the climactic underwater heist in 
"Sexy Beast." 
Oz's work with these acting giants also proves to be superlative (Despite 
rumors to the contrary, Brando seems effortless on screen thanks to Oz, even 
if he didn't want to be directed by Miss Piggy). One misguided exception in 
the casting is the underwritten role of Angela Bassett as Nick's girlfriend - 
a character that exists merely as a reason for Nick to quit. Only Bassett is 
too strong a presence for such a throwaway role - either eliminate the role 
or hire Halle Berry, for goodness sakes'! There is strong evidence that her 
role had been severely cut which is a shame since it would have shed some 
light on Nick's priorities in life. 
"The Score" is as pleasant and diverting a surprise as one can expect. It is 
absolutely nothing new but the acting, script and the heist climax makes it 
more than worthwile. It is not as character-driven as "Sexy Beast" or Michael 
Mann's powerful "Thief," nor as wire-tight as Kubrick's fast-paced "The 
Killing." Nevertheless, it is still watchable, tense and sweat-inducing as 
any good heist thriller should be. Unless you believe that all films should 
have digitally created characters, nothing beats a score like three diamonds 
in the rough - De Niro, Brando and Norton. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Cop Land (1997)
Sylvester Stallone has not had a beguiling career since the heyday of "Rocky"
nearly ten years ago. Since then he's tried and failed with comedy ("Oscar"),
musicals ("Rhinestone"), and drama ("Rocky V"). Stallone is usually best in his
action roles such as "Rambo" or "Cliffhanger," but his range as an actor is
fairly limited. "Cop Land" is supposed to be Stallone's first very dramatic
role but there's no energy and no enthusiasm, much like the movie itself. 
Stallone plays Fred Heflin, a simple-minded, stolid sheriff of Garrison, a
fictional New Jersey town. His chain of command in this town is nil, and he
only has two other people in his staff. His basic duties are relegated to
traffic duty. The New York cops who run this Jersey town are controlling
everything but there's corruption boiling everywhere. Michael Rapaport plays a
cop nicknamed Superboy who inadvertently kills two black teenagers during a car
chase. The police want to cover it up, and Superboy supposedly commits suicide
by jumping off a bridge. Fred is oblivious to these surroundings and decides to
take no action against the corrupt cops because they put him where he is now. A
colorful Internal Affairs officer (Robert De Niro) tries to get information
from the unwilling Fred but fails. It turns out Fred is more interested in a
cop's wife (Annabella Sciorra) but when people start getting knocked off, he
decides he has to do what is morally correct. He gets some guidance from a
former cop (Ray Liotta) who is also a cokehead. 
"Cop Land" could have worked with some imaginative direction, a stronger plot
and a better performance by the lead actor but it is no different from any TV
movie on the same subject. There have been countless movies on police
corruption - the best of these was the decadent "Bad Lieutenant" - and so
there's nothing here we haven't seen before and better. For example, there's a
gun planted at a crime scene; a typical Internal Affairs interrogation scene;
badges flashed by several cops; nonessential bar fights; and a final, cliched
shootout staged in slow-motion a'la Peckinpah. None of this is handled with any
energy, flash, or vigor - it has a TV movie staleness that discomfits rather
than enthralls. 
Stallone is inarticulate as an actor and, although that might help the role, he
sleepwalks through the film with no trace of humor or passion. Harvey Keitel is
naturally more animated as an actor but his corrupt cop character is something
he can play in his sleep. Ray Liotta is convincingly frantic as the druggy cop
but his role is too similar to his Henry Hill character in "GoodFellas." Peter
Berg, Frank Vincent, Michael Rapaport, Cathy Moriarty, Janeane Garofalo and
Annabella Sciorra play trivial, forgettable roles with no inner life or central
meaning to the story. A chance meeting between De Niro and Keitel is wonderful
to behold but the scene is never followed up on. Ditto the Garofalo character,
a new cop in Heflin's staff, who helps Heflin at the beginning but then decides
to leave town. Why? Where's the transition? 
"Cop Land" is directed by James Mangold who helmed the brilliant character
study Heavy. This film, though, has the same snail pace and static energy, and
it deadens rather than enliven the proceedings. Robert De Niro and Ray Liotta
breathe life into the film whenever they appear on screen. Stallone and "Cop
Land," however, are too ordinary and listless to keep anyone interested. Watch
the invigorating TV show "NYPD Blue" instead.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
Has there been a halfway decent science-fiction picture beyond the 
spectacular "Dark City" in the last ten years? The mind boggles. In one 
word: no. And the senseless, monotonous "The Matrix" will hardly qualify 
as anything but pure visual candy, yet the candy will rot rather than 
cleanse your cinematic spirits.
In an unsuccessful attempt to make us forget "Johnny Mnemonic," 
Keanu Reeves plays yet another emotionless, stone-faced cyber hacker 
nerd named Neo who sells illegal jack devices for virtual reality games. 
It turns out that Neo is living in a world that is a virtual reality 
game itself, an artificially created environment designed by aliens in 
Reservoir Dogs suits, otherwise known as The Matrix. The Matrix designed 
this world to learn about...human nature? What makes us tick? Who knows, 
yet a group of leather-jacketed freedom fighters with superhuman 
computer powers (and sunglasses) intend to fight the aliens and prevent 
more humans from being...programmed? They are Morpheus (Laurence 
Fishburne) and the attractive, interesting Trinity (Carrie-Anne Moss), 
along with the aptly named Cypher (bald-headed Joe Pantoliano). Later, 
it appears that Neo is in fact the Matrix...or so we would think. Yes, 
in typical sci-fi glory, the Matrix will restore the world to what it 
was before becoming a live-action computer game. 
I admire directors like David Lynch who take us into Byzantine 
labyrinths - endless mazes with circular loops that ask us to make our 
own interpretations. But "The Matrix" is not that film. The movie simply 
has an idea - the Matrix - but no story or fleshed-out characters worth 
caring about. The idea simply sits there while we watch fantastic 
special-effects fill every inch of the screen. There are some beautiful 
slow-motion shots of guns firing and bullet casings grazing every inch 
of concrete on building rooftops - a keen reminder of John Woo's wild 
comic-book pyrotechnics. I also enjoyed watching the flips in the air 
and the frozen movements suddenly turning back into motion. If "The 
Matrix" were simply a financial ploy for an incredible, imaginative sci-
fi picture, I would have said that I loved it. But the movie is an 
exercise in pyrotechnics, nothing more.
Instead of some intelligent dialogue and imaginative story 
structure dealing with the mysteries of virtual reality and real life, 
the movie opts for straightforward action, predictable, formulaic 
thriller elements, and bland characters. Keanu Reeves can't even smile 
or wink, much less emote any expression (What happened to this actor?). 
Fishburne, one of the most distinctive actors on the silver screen, 
mostly stands around and utters epiphanies about the state of the world. 
The one actor who stands out is Carrie-Anne Moss, who turns from a full-
fledged kung-fu expert to a simple girlfriend for the seemingly 
indifferent Neo. What a sham!
"The Matrix" simply recycles elements from "Dark City," "Strange 
Days," and every other tired sci-fi thriller in the last year or so 
without investing any interest outside tentacled spider robots and kung-
fu fights. If this is the state of the genre now, what can we expect in 
a decade? 

Title
Review for Crucible, The (1996)
Period films based on literary masterpieces range from the superior ("Age of
Innocence," "The Remains of the Day") to the detrimental ("The Scarlet
Letter"). "The Crucible" falls somewhere in between and, although it is not a
great film, it is certainly a passionate, powerful film that does justice to
Arthur Miller's spectacular 1953 play. Its power has not been diminished on the
big screen. 
"The Crucible" is set during the 17th century when an array of witchhunts
began. mostly led by the teenage girls who were accused. Set in 1692, the movie
starts off with a devilish ceremony where a group of girls are ranting in the
woods of Salem, Massachussetts, performing an unholy ritual. Abigail (Winona
Ryder) is the master of ceremonies, and she drinks animal blood to destroy the
wife of the man she loves. This unholy practice is witnessed by Abigail's
uncle, Reverend Parris (Bruce Davison), and a witchcraft trial commences the
next day. And almost immeiately, the accusations, denials and name-calling
begins - Abigail and the others decide to fool everyone into thinking that the
devil is visible, but visible only to them.
Numerous innocent townspeople are accused, including John Proctor (Daniel
Day-Lewis), a farmer who had a brief affair with Abigail and is now married to
his strictly devout wife, Elizabeth (Joan Allen). Abigail's form of revenge is
to accuse the reverent Elizabeth of witchcraft - at this point, any of these
girls can accuse anyone in town of witchcraft no matter how false the claims
may be (they go through extreme measures to prove them, too). The trials
continue and destroy many lives (mostly by hanging). Paul Scofield plays Judge
Danforth who overlooks the trials, and decides that if the accused confess to
their demonic ways, they will not be hanged. He presides over the trial with
doubts but is inclined to believe that demons of another kind have infiltrated
this town. 
"The Crucible" is a startling, alert interpretation of the Miller play, which
should come as no surprise since Miller wrote the screenplay himself. The
performances by the young actresses are over-the-top but necessarily so, to
establish the lengths of their insane accusations. Winona Ryder is effectively
hateful as the angry, vengeful Abigail (a far cry from her role in "Little
Women"), a frail, demonic child ready to pounce. Daniel Day-Lewis is also
superb as the brave, decent Proctor who simultaneously finds his soul being
eaten away by Abigail and his love growing stronger for Elizabeth. Joan Allen
("Nixon") gives the most understated performance as the seemingly frigid
Elizabeth, and her final scene with Proctor is heartbreaking to witness. And
let's not forget the overpoweringly magnetic Paul Scofield ("Quiz Show"), a
delectable presence whenever he's on screen spouting his lines with gusto and
verve. Another Academy Award nomination is in order for this grand actor of the
cinema, in addition to the whole cast.
If "The Crucible" falls short of greatness, it is because director Nicholas
Hytner ("The Madness of King George") plunges us into a sea of excess right
from the start, giving us little time to catch up with the story or the
characters (Ryder's portrayal of Abigail is nutty and vicious from the
beginning). Still, this beautifully mounted version summons the rage, hatred
and madness of those rough times with knowing cinematic skill, and doesn't
commit the fatal flaw of becoming a static, filmed play.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general comments at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Indiana Jones and the Last Crusade (1989)
The third time's the charm in the last entry of the wonderful "Indiana Jones"
series. Although it is essentially a recap of "Raiders of the Lost Ark" using
Nazis again as villains, it is also the official sequel to "Raiders," taking
place two years later after the original. It also has a comforting, relaxing
atmosphere that restrains itself from being as over-the-top as "Temple of Doom"
was. But do not fret, "Last Crusade" is chock full of action scenes and plenty
of humor and provides more depth on Indiana than the last two did. 
This time, Indiana Jones (Harrison Ford, aging gracefully) is in pursuit of the
Holy Grail, the cup that Jesus Christ drank from at the Last Supper. A
millionaire named Walter Donovan (Julian Glover) wants to acquire the Grail
before anyone else does and suggests that Indiana find it. Indiana, being the
resourceful adventurer and archaeologist, senses that his father (Sean Connery),
an expert on Grail mythology, is the more appropriate choice. Unfortunately,
Indy's father is already on the search and is missing, which means that Indy not
only has to find his father but also the Grail. Accompanying Indy on his first
stop in this journey to Venice is Indy's mentor, Marcus (the late Denholm
Elliott), and a typically beautiful art historian, Dr. Elsa Schneider (Allison
Doody). Lots of chaos ensues as well as wall-to-wall action scenes in
motorboats, planes, motorcycles, zeppelins, tanks, horses, and so on. The film,
as directed by Steven Spielberg, justaxposes all these scenes with moments of
pure comic relief a
nd enough moments of pause and reflection before embarking on yet another
dazzling action sequence. One inspired moment has Indy confronting Adolf Hitler,
a scene that is hilarious and eerie in a strange way (apparently, there was a
deleted scene where a Leni Riefenstahl filmmaker is shooting footage of the
burning of books in a Nazi rally). 
It is remarkable that after two movies, "Last Crusade" still finds something
innovative and fresh in situations that are as cliched as romantic kisses before
a fade out. For example, a typically sorry bit involving a revolving wall  is
punctuated by tightly edited action and some burst of humor, like using an Adolf
Hitler head statue to block the revolving wall from letting Nazis enter. A
motorcycle chase is handled with finesse when it turns into a jousting
tournament. A plane ready to fire at its heroes on a beach is demolished by
flying geese. Another plane nearly explodes when its wings fall apart entering a
tunnel where the heroes are being chased in a car. The climactic tank chase is
especially good, though it does seem to run out of steam after a while until it
ends with...well, just see the movie. Oh, yes, and the zeppelin sequence has a
one-liner by Ford that remains something of a classic. 
It was a blessing to cast Sean Connery as Indiana's father, Dr. Henry Jones, a
highly private professor who is amazed at his son's ingenuity from getting out
of one scrap after another. This also serves a more historical note in cinema in
that Connery used to play James Bond, who is the true sire of Indiana Jones
(lest we forget that Spielberg initially wanted to make a Bond movie before
George Lucas introduced an idea about an archaeologist). Connery and Ford have
the right chemistry and their bickering and shouting results in a newfound
respect for one another (Indy's father has mostly been estranged). 
The villains are nastily evil, as always, yet none come close to the great
villain Belloq from "Raiders of the Lost Ark." He had a charm and humanity that
is unrivaled, particularly when wooing Karen Allen's Marion, Indy's original
leading lady. Here, we have Michael Byrne as Vogel, a Nazi commandant, who
certainly has a hardened evil streak within but is mostly a cartoonish variation
on his similar role in "Force 10 From Navarone," which also starred Ford. There
is one other villain but it would be a spoiler to reveal who he is. 
Alison Doody has charisma to spare as the good doctor with a few cards up her
sleeve, but she is a disappointment when compared to Karen Allen's feistiness. 
She is a major improvement on Kate Capshaw's whiny love interest in "Temple of
Doom" if only because she does not scream every two minutes. 
"Raiders" returnees Denholm Elliott and John Rhys-Davies bring back their roles
with equal relish and delight. There is also a nod to "Raiders" when Indiana and
Dr. Schneider are in the catacombs of Venice and find a familiar illustration on
the wall: 
"Indiana Jones and the Last Crusade" is a more mature, less wildly over-the-top
entry in the series. It is lots of fun and often magical in its continuing
affectionate tribute to the serials of yesteryear. The action is still
frightfully intense and surprising thanks to Steven Spielberg's assured and
strenuous direction. Indy may still return in the future but with this
magnificent trilogy in place, there is no real need. Besides, we now know where
Indiana got his name from. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Wag the Dog (1997)
In light of the recent events involving President Clinton and Paula Jones, not
to mention the recent reports of the reemergence of Saddam Hussein, "Wag the
Dog" is as perceptive and realistic a satire as I have ever seen; a dark,
edgily written treatise on politics, Hollywood and the media, and how they are
all interrelated. 
"Wag the Dog" starts with a momentous sex-scandal involving the President of
the United States - he apparently had a sexual encounter with an underage Girl
Scout in the Oval Office. Naturally, the nation is on its toes with this
scandal that threatens the upcoming election. Facing a desperate hour, the
White House enlists a spin-control doctor, Conrad Bean (Robert De Niro), to
divert the nation's attention by inventing a war with Albania! To do this,
Conrad gets assistance from a disbelieving presidential aide (Anne Heche), and
a veteran Hollywood producer named Stanley Motss (Dustin Hoffman) - together,
they have to create the appearance of a war by utilizing the power of the mass
media. Motss orchestrates the production by creating a stage where a young girl
(Kirsten Dunst) is supposedly running along the barracks of Albania carrying a
kitten. "Get me a calico kitten," shouts Motss, admitting he's never had this
much fun on a production before. Through a two-day process of computer
animation, some "Anne Frank sirens," and a hand-held camera, a fake war is
unveiled before the public's eyes. As Motss makes clear, "This is nothing. This
is a walk in the park. Have you ever shot in Italy? " 
And this is just the beginning. The catch is that for every deceptive
performance they pull, the principals have to promise to never tell anyone, or
they will be killed. The ambitious Motss wants some credit for his work,
though: "The producer never gets any credit. How can you have a movie without a
producer?" Even the young "Albanian" girl can't mention her performance on her
resume - "It's just a pageant," declares Conrad. 
"Wag the Dog" is based on the book "American Hero," a fictional chronicle of
George Bush's attempts to create an unwanted war in the Persian Gulf. Is the
movie outrageous and exaggerated, or is it speaking the truth? Considering the
recent events surrounding Clinton's presidency, the movie is so truthful and
acidly written, it is bitingly scary and sad to watch. The movie is basically
saying that the media reports lies, not truths. Of course, we have seen dozens
of movies that showed the corrupt amorality at the core of politics and the
media - we see it every day, from the nightly news intent on reporting bloody
crimes, to "The Jerry Springer Show" that advertises more and more fist fights,
to the absurd overexposure of the Paula Jones case. What "Wag the Dog" does
differently is to show how far politicians and the press are willing to go to
sell their "product," basically yellow journalism, to the American public. The
public will believe anything the media reports to them, so if there's a war
going on with Albania, by golly, they'll buy it. Anything will work as long as
it distracts attention from the President's sexual dalliances. In one of
several attempts to prove their credibility, they concoct an old blues record
called "Old Shoe," which becomes the nickname for a long-lost war hero (Woody
Harrelson) who is actually a psychotic prisoner!
The wonderful cast is first-rate. Dustin Hoffman is excellent as the showy,
nervous, fast-talking producer Motss who recalls the equally pretentious
producer Robert Evans - it is a performance that ranks with Hoffman's best work
in "Midnight Cowboy" and "Rain Man." Robert De Niro brings a smoothness and
calmness that I've not seen him do since "Stanley and Iris"; note the calm
precision by which he utters lines such as, "I'm working on it," or "We'll have
to kill you" with a smile. Watching De Niro and Hoffman perform together is as
pleasurable an experience as I've had in all of 1997. Anne Heche has a less
remarkable role as the presidential aide, but she holds her own with these two
heavyweights, especially during the conference scenes. Kudos must also go to
Woody Harrelson's explosive cameo as the dumb, naive rapist with rotten teeth
who pretends to be a war hero from Albania. It is equally delightful to see
other memorable supporting roles including Willie Nelson as a singer trying to
come up with a theme song for Albania; Denis Leary who is great fun as a slogan
specialist; and there's William H. Macy (a Mamet regular) as an FBI agent who's
curious about the credibility of this war. 
"Wag the Dog" is as incisive and tragic a commentary on the amorality and lack
of values in today's media frenzy as Network was. A brilliant script by David
Mamet and Hillary Henkin, superb direction by Barry Levinson, typically
"contrasty" cinematography by Robert Richardson, and expert performances by a
game cast make for one of 1997's finest films. It's unforgettable, saddening,
hilarious, and honest about the manipulation of the media, and how they report
the news as if it was entertaining fodder for the dumb and dumber set. This is
not a film to be ignored. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general comments at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Third Miracle, The (1999)
Finally, we witness a film about priests and miracles that does not condescend
to the audience by featuring superfluous special-effects or a demonic Patricia
Arquette. "The Third Miracle" is a bloody miracle, an extremely well-acted and
thematically rich film by notable director Agnieszka Holland ("Europa,
Europa"). 
Ed Harris stars as Father Frank Shore, a postulator, known by many as the
"miracle killer," who is seen at the start of the film working at a soup
kitchen. He is called back into duty to investigate a woman who may or may not
be a saint but is loved by the people of a Chicago community all the same.
Every November, the people gather to see a statue that weeps blood - this is
coincidentally the month in which Helen O'Regan (Barbara Sukowa) - the supposed
saint - died. There is talk that she cured a young girl of lupus by simply
touching the girl. 
Father Shore has his doubts but the blood is discovered to be real, and the
girl, now a drug-addicted runaway, was cured of lupus. But can there be some
doubt that this is all highly coincidental? Is Father Shore the right priest to
investigate since years earlier he had debunked the myth of another saint and
thus destroyed the faith of an entire community? There is also the question
that a saint would never leave his or her children behind to pursue faith. Such
is the case with the late Helen, who abandoned her daughter, Roxanne (Anne
Heche). Roxanne is angry at her mother and feels she could never be deemed a
saint. 
"The Third Miracle" asks lots of questions and justifiably answers very few of
them. Father Shore may have doubts about his own faith (as most priests do in
the movies nowadays) but this is a job, and it is one he where he must be
nonjudgmental. He has his own emotional flaws, such as the possibility of
falling in love with Roxanne. He also has to fight against the devil's
advocate, Archbishop Werner (Armin Mueller-Stahl), a ferociously stubborn man
who feels the world has no need for more saints or miracles. But sainthood is a
tricky judgment, it has to be proved and tested and Father Shore goes against
all odds in pursuing the truth and, thus, waiting for another miracle. 
Ed Harris does solid work (as always) as the dubious Father Shore, one of the
few actors on the silver screen whom you can tell when his mind is at work. He
has a very touching, effective scene with Heche, as she visits her mother's
grave and they talk about the good Father's flirtations and loss of virginity
in high school. Some of this was also featured in the horrible "Stigmata," but
here Harris makes it all credible and believable. Anne Heche is sprightly and
alive as always...and she shares lots of emotionally implicit scenes with
Harris. 
"The Third Miracle" is not a great film (I am tired of seeing statues weeping
blood, for one, and the ending is abrupt) but it is richly rewarding and
tastefully done. It leaves you thinking about what the church constitutes as
miracles nowadays, and what a saint's credentials should be. Ultimately, it is
a fascinating look at the nature and question of faith in the church. And
thanks to Ed Harris, we almost come close to believing that any miracle may be
possible.  
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Titanic (1997)
"Titanic" represents both the best and the worst of current Hollywood
filmmaking. At its best, "Titanic" is a lavish, thrilling account of one of the
biggest disasters of the 20th century. At its worst, the movie is flawed in the
screenwriting department, and presents numerous cliches and particularly bad
acting. Nevertheless, this is one hell of a movie and it should not be missed. 
"Titanic" tells its tragic tale via the only survivor of the actual sinking of
the ship - a 102-year-old woman (Gloria Stuart) who recounts the vivid tale to
a group of research scientists led by a marine scavenger (Bill Paxton). This
scavenger is looking for a jewel aboard the Titanic's ruins, but instead he
finds a sketch of a nude girl wearing the long-lost jewel. The nude girl is, of
course, the elder woman, Rose Dewitt Bukater, who is played as a 17-year-old
girl by the stellar actress Kate Winslet. 
In luminous photography and sweeping visuals, "Titanic" quickly takes us back
to that fateful day in April, 1912 when the first of the Titanic's 2,207
passengers began boarding the ship in Southampton, England. Here we are
introduced to the major characters such as the itinerant-artist Jack Dawson
(Leonard DiCaprio) who wins a steerage-class ticket in a poker game, the
aforementioned Rose, along with her assertive mother (Frances Fisher), and
Rose's snobbish fiancee, Cal Hockley (Billy Zane). We also meet the shrewd,
unsinkable Molly Brown (Kathy Bates). 
Director James Cameron spares us no expense in showing us the elaborate decks
of the ship, the ballrooms, the pretentious bedrooms, the tiny steerage
compartments and the hot and heavy boiler room. We also see the differences in
the lifestyles and treatment of the haves and the have-nots. These differences
are further exemplified by the forbidden teenage romance between the
near-suicidal, potentially wealthy Rose and the clever, destitute Jack who
awakens a new sensibility in her by teaching her how to spit, and sketching her
in the nude. This causes problems between Rose and the violent, spiteful Cal
who orders his thuggish partner (David Warner) to keep an eye on Jack. Before
you can say romantic soap opera, the ship hits a big iceberg. According to the
ship's builder Thomas Andrews (Victor Garber), this will cause the ship to sink
within an hour. The lower levels of the ship gradually start to sink, including
the boiler room, forcing the stewards at to shut off the boilers and begin
evacuation. Unfortunately, there are only a limited number of lifeboats
available for the thousands of panicked passengers.
 "Titanic" is at its best during the last hour and a half where we see the
destructive nature of the sinking of this massive ship. At this point,
Cameron's main theme comes forth - man's technological advancement (and
arrogance) spells death for humanity itself. Thousands of lives are lost, and
we see how the stewards lead the first-class passengers into safety first.
There's also a terrifying scene where one of the stewards threatens and kills a
couple of eager passengers. We also see Rose trying to rescue Jack who's locked
away in one of the lower levels by Cal's partner. This whole section is so
stirring and emotional that you're not likely to leave the theater with dry
eyes.
Cameron's weakness is in his writing. The romance between Rose and Jack
certainly evokes a passion and sense of love that is unlike most other tragic
love stories. Cameron's main fault, however, lies with some of the supporting
characters. Billy Zane as the cocky, snobbish Cal is laughably oafish emitting
numerous cliches - he seems to have drifted in from a bad Harlequin romance
novel. The same can be said for the predictably cold character of Rose's mother
who does not approve of Jack because she wants her daughter to marry Cal for
the security he can provide. There's also too little of the boisterous Kathy
Bates as Molly Brown who brightens the screen whenever she shows up, and too
much of Cal's gun-toting partner who seems to have drifted in from an Indiana
Jones adventure.
Other bland characters include Titanic luminaries such as the worrisome
Captain Smith (Bernard Hill); the Whites Star Lines executive (Jonathan Hyde)
who insists that the ship travel at full speed so they can arrive in New York a
day early; and a couple of other forgettable wealthy passengers. 
Another lesser weakness is the movie's obligatory framing device of having the
elder Rose tell us her story of that fateful night - it's interesting yet
unnecessary in its own way because the power of the film is the compelling
story itself that we need no guidance in following.
 Still, this is among Cameron's best technical work by far, and it is a
tribute to him that we don't actually notice any of the special-effects. In a
sense, he makes us feel we are aboard the ship, before and after it sinks.
"Titanic" is an awesome spectacle and perversely entertaining, but its
narrative style and characters are less than stimulating. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with comments, suggestions or arguments at Faust667@aol.com or
jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Dracula Vs. Frankenstein (1971)
I have seen my share of absolute garbage at the cinema and on video but never
have I been privy to such an absolute waste of celluloid as Al Adamson's
"Dracula v.s. Frankenstein." It is the kind of film that makes Ed Wood look like
Orson Welles. 
And now that we are on to the subject of Welles, how would he have felt if he
had seen this? Well, consider that one of the directors of photography of this
tripe is none other than Gary Graver, who had worked closely with Welles from
1970 till the late master's death. The other cinematographer is Paul Glickman
who later lensed films such as "God Told Me To" and "The Stuff." I am not sure
whose fault it is but almost all of the photography is rendered so darkly that
it is hard to make out what is happening (especially the climactic fight between
the two horror titans). Some other scenes are so haphazardly composed that you
sense a group of film school students shot it. I suppose it is more proof that
Welles was behind the compositions and photography of his later work such as "F
For Fake" as much as Graver was. 
The story behind this time waster is more entertaining than the movie itself.
The late director Adamson had no clue what footage he shot, and spent two years
trying to assemble it and make some sense out of it. Originally titled "Blood
Seekers" or "Blood Freaks," it did not even have the two titled monsters at all
until the last minute. They probably thought, hey, let's title it "Dracula vs.
Frankenstein" and we are guaranteed box-office revenues at the local drive-in. 
There is J. Carroll Naish as a wheelchaired Dr. Durea, also known as the last of
the Frankensteins. Poor Lon Chaney Jr., in his last film appearance, is bloated
and obviously drunk (or seriously ill) as Groton, Durea's punch-drunk, idiotic
assistant who goes around decapitating young women at Venice Beach (under
Durea's control of course). Zandor Vorkov is the bearded Count Dracula who looks
likes a frequent guest at Chiller Theatre - he is seeking a blood serum that
Durea has. Oh, how can we forget Frankenstein's Monster (John Bloom) who is
brought back to life for no discernible reason or purpose within the sloppily
patched together story. There is also the late Regina Carrol (Al Adamson's wife)
as a Vegas showgirl searching for her sister who was last seen at the beach! Oh,
and there is a love interest known as Mike (Anthony Eisley) who has the hots for
Carrol and appears to be an aging hippie! And how about Russ Tamblyn as a rough
biker (you must be joking!). Another biker!
 with a swastika patch! Angelo R
ossitto (memorable in Tod Browning's "Freaks") as a ticket-taker who charges one
dollar for admission at a creature emporium and then eats the bill! And, last
but not least, Forrest J. Ackerman as a Dr. Beaumont who appears in a cameo and
is then killed by the Monster, again for no discernible reason. 
"Dracula vs. Frankenstein" might have seemed like good fun at the drive-ins in
the early 70's for the teenage couples. I am sure it was more fun for them while
making out than watching such garbage transpire before their very eyes.   
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Mission: Impossible (1996)
Back in 1996, I made the comment that Tom Cruise's films seemed to be less 
than stellar achievements. However, since then he has proven to be a solid 
actor with "Jerry Maguire," "Eyes Wide Shut," and "Magnolia." Mostly, Cruise 
has become the Dick Clark of superstars who never seems to age and always 
plays righteous, good all-American boys a'la "Top Gun."  Like some of his 
lesser achievements, "Far and Away" and "The Firm," "Mission: Impossible" is 
somewhat fluffy and mediocre yet it boasts some electrifying, entertaining 
sequences amidst all the muddle. 
Based on the hit television series of yesteryear, Tom Cruise plays Ethan 
Hunt, an able protege of veteran IMF (as in Impossible Mission Force) agent 
Jim Phelps (Jon Voight), and along with Phelps's team of undercover 
operatives, they attempt to capture a Russian agent with plans to steal a 
disc containing the identities of American agents stationed in Europe. Whew! 
Of course, something invariably goes wrong with Phelps's master plan and it 
is up to Hunt and a surviving female operative (Emanuelle Beart from "Nelly 
and Monsieur Arnaud") to uncover the enemy who may be a former IMF agent. 
The movie begins to lose track of an always intriguing premise - corruption 
at the heart of an organization, which in this case is the IMF. There are 
multiple twists upon twists upon some clever turns, and lots of latex 
disguises courtesy of ILM. The elaborate plot does become a bit confusing 
after awhile, but at least we have action scenes to marvel at. 
There are two terrific action setpieces that are as thrilling and enticing as 
anything I've seen since 1993's "The Fugitive." In one spectacular sequence, 
Hunt descends froma ceiling onto a computer room which has a heat sensitive 
alarm that can be triggered if the room temperature is above 98 degrees. This 
sequence is filled with unbridled tension thanks to director De Palma's 
uncanny choice of camera shots and editing strategies. The sequence, though, 
works mainly because the soundtrack is filled with such utter, complete silenc
e that all you can hear is Hunt's drops of sweat. 
Another titillating sequence occurs when the impenetrable Hunt is fighting 
the villains on top of a super speeding train, which is also dragging a 
helicopter. Scenes like this give "Mission: Impossible" an edge that 
literally keeps you on the edge of your seat. 
The ultimate flaw in "Mission" is that the plot is so convoluted that we stop 
caring about certain characters, including Phelps (a far too restrained Jon 
Voight) and the luminous Emanuelle Beart (Phelp's wife), both of whom become 
as one-note as you can expect. This is really Cruise's show all the way (he 
is also the producer) and he inhabits every single scene, making the 
character of Ethan Hunt knowing, charismatic, witty and resourceful, like 
just about every other character Cruise has played.  I can't imagine anyone 
else playing the role with the same level of sincerity - if only he would age 
a bit. This often feels like "Risky Business" crossed with the James Bond 
genre. 
Cruise has some able support from bald-headed Ving Rhames ("Pulp Fiction"), 
Jean Reno ("The Professional"), whose character has the tools to break into 
any security system, Henry Czerny as the coldly calculating IMF chief, and 
the wonderfully restrained Vanessa Redgrave (!) as some kind of underground 
mastermind. There is also a funny, unbilled cameo by Emilio Estevez. Only 
Voight and Beart seem to be sleepwalking through the proceedings. 
Another plus is veteran director Brian De Palma who does a professionally 
slick job fo directing, though his trademark style of nervous energy is 
largely absent this time. For better or worse, "Mission: Impossible" is 
fitfully exciting, electrifying nonsense...and terribly confusing and 
impossible to follow.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com 
or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for God Told Me To (1977)
Along with the king of low-budget horror Roger Corman, Larry Cohen has made some of the cheesiest horror pictures imaginable. There is the absurdity of "It's Alive" and the pointlessness of "The Stuff," one of the worst films of the 1980's. "God Told Me To" (also known as "Demon") is one of those rarities, a crude but continually engaging thriller that remains original in conception, if silly in overall execution. 
A series of unmotivated and unrelated killings have been occurring in New York City. The killings involve either a sniper randomly shooting people on the streets, a cop who suddenly smiles and starts shooting passerby in a parade, a family man who quietly shoots his entire family, and so on. The connection between all these killers is their motivation: God told them to do it. This raises the ire of Peter Nicholas (Tony Lo Bianco), a cop with religious beliefs who goes to church every Sunday. How could God tell these people to kill? Is this God's way of letting the world know He exists? Or did these sudden killers just snap?
Nicholas is convinced that something weird is going on in New York but the police force does not support his harebrained theory (though he is able to predict a killing in a parade from a tip). His wife (Sandy Dennis) fears for him, though they do not live together. His supportive girlfriend (Deborah Raffin) fears for Nicholas as well. And then Nicholas discovers that a blonde-haired, Christ-like figure had appeared to each of the killers prior to the actual murders. Is this mysterious figure the Son of God, or an alien force? 
"God Told Me To" has lots of surprises in store, and its documentary-like staginess, a hand-held camera is used in almost every scene at street level, enhances the plausibility. Perhaps due to a meager budget, Larry Cohen does not show special-effects of any kind (though one FX sequence has been reportedly stolen from the television show "Space:1999"). Cohen's strength lies in the superb, formidable cast, including Sylvia Sydney as a formerly abducted woman who bore a child though she was a virgin,  Richard Lynch as the soft-spoken Christ-like figure, Andy Kaufman brief turn as a smiling cop, Deborah Raffin's compassionate girlfriend of Nicholas, and finally, Lo Bianco's slow burn as a frazzled cop who is shaken by the religious implications of these murders. 
There is a lot to admire in "God Told Me To" but it does conclude with a fire-and-brimstone finale, echoing "Carrie's" similar ending, that does little to stir the imagination. And some of the scenes where Lo Bianco seems to go nutty inside apartment corridors and noirish-lit pool rooms also jettisons the philosophical nature of the material. Often thrilling, funny, exciting and tense, "God Told Me To" is one hell of a ride for a B movie. It's just that its aspirations seemed to be emanating from an A movie.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Blow (2001)
The drug-dealing business has been shown time and again on film in great detail
- it is a business that has shadowed American films as far back as Frank
Sinatra's heroin addiction in "The Man With the Golden Arm." The year 2000 saw
the interminable ugliness of addiction in the tough-as-nails "Requiem for a
Dream" and the futility of the war on drugs in "Traffic." I still must ask this
one question: what else is there to say about drugs at this point that has not
been said? Well, "Blow" is fascinating for detailing how cocaine arrived in the
United States in the first place, and the picture is not pretty in telling it.
"Blow" stars the usually doleful Johnny Depp as George Jung, a drug dealer who
first begins his business by selling marijuana in Venice Beach. He hooks up with
his best friend, the portly Tuna (Ethan Suplee), and his new girlfriend, Barbara
(Franka Potente from "Run Lola Run") at a beach house - they all have no desire
to work real jobs though Barbara is a stewardess. A contact through Barbara, the
effeminate hairdresser Derek (Paul Reubens), helps establish George's business
deal as long as he can be a viable partner. Before you know it, they are
rejoicing in tons of cash and partying with petite, blonde women on the beach.
Deciding to make more money,  George considers extending their business to the
East Coast where there are some eager college students. Thanks to Barbara, she
can fly out there and sell the marijuana for big bucks. Of course, he gets
busted, as he does numerous times in the film and goes to jail.
In jail, he gets wind of the cocaine business in Colombia and George decides
that such a drug would make a killing in the United States. It sure does, and he
makes more money than he ever dreamed. He also has a stunning wife (Penelope
Cruz) who becomes addicted to all the wealth and all the monetary glory. There
is no end to it, but of course all good things must come to an end. Thus,
George's trusted friends become backstabbers, even his own wife. How can such a
business for one man turn itself upside down? Maybe because everyone wants a
piece of the pie and they all want to become versions of George Jung. 
"Blow" is the rise and fall of a cocaine king, a story told countless times
before as in Brian De Palma's jumbled "Scarface." The big difference is that
George got their first, and he is not someone that handles business matters with
machine guns or chainsaws. He is seemingly unaffected by his surroundings and
that is a major flaw for a rise and fall tale like this one. Who is George Jung
really? Does he have any ambitions in life besides cocaine and marijuana? The
only inkling we get of his persona is through his parents (both played by Ray
Liotta and a far too thickly-New York-accented Rachel Griffiths) who want their
son to be successful. Only George's mother does not share her son's enthusiasm
for drugs - she even rats him out in one scene. George's father just wants his
son to be careful, as if the drug business was like any other which it decidedly
is not. Still, as played by Depp, he carries the same doleful expression in
every scene. He has shown far more nuance as Ed Wood or as the book seller in
"The Ninth Gate" than he does here. 
Director Ted Demme ("The Ref") borrows stylistic camerawork and editing styles
from "GoodFellas" and "Boogie Nights," using freeze frames and a roving camera
to keep situations flying from one scene to the next. It often works, as does
the dazzling opening sequence where we see how cocaine is made and shipped.  Too
often though, the film gets repetitive and monotonous but it does seem to perk
up occasionally to maintain interest. Still, if you have seen "GoodFellas" or
"Boogie Nights," you have seen this tale before. 
"Blow" is largely uneven and inconsistent but it does burst with some magnetism,
and at its core is a sad story of a man who truly had nothing to offer in his
life except drugs. The downbeat ending accentuates the life of a man who had no
inner life and no sign of intelligence - a Forrest Gump of the drug trade. All
we learn is that George simply blew it.   
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Dracula (1931/I)
Whether it is Bela Lugosi's frighteningly icy stare or Dwight Frye's madly
incessant need for bugs, this "Dracula" is among the most beautiful
interpretations of Bram Stoker's famous novel, (though it does take all
kinds of liberties from the original text). It is certainly Lugosi who
brings an eerie sense of menace to the film, and he makes you actually feel
uneasy while watching it.
At the beginning of this dreamlike film, we are treated to the sight of a
carriage on its way to Transylvania. Mr. Renfield (Dwight Frye) is on the
carriage which will take him to Castle Dracula for a business venture.
"Castle Dracula?," asks one of the superstitious gypsies. "No!!!"
Nevertheless, despite ominous warnings from the townspeople, Renfield
continues on his journey. He finally arrives at the castle (minus a
driver) and meets the graceful Count (Bela Lugosi) at the top of a
staircase. Here he has one of his many famous lines during the first
half-hour: "I am Dracula, and I bid you welcome," says Lugosi.
We finally enter the vast dining room where dinner awaits but there is no
servant. The Count acts as host and stares at Renfield, wraithlike and
obviously hungry for his blood. Renfield cuts his finger with a
butterknife and attracts some bloodcurling attention from Dracula before
being abruptly stopped by a dangling crucifix.
Afterwards, Renfield falls victim to the Count's fangs and becomes his
servant, as they make the trek to Dracula's new property at Carfax Abbey
in England. It is there where the Count immerses himself in the company of
Dr. Seward (Herbert Bunston), his daughter, Mina Seward (Helen Chandler),
and Jonathan Harker (mild-mannered David Manners). Of course, there are
some pretty necks to take advantage of in the meantime, while the corpses
with neck wounds baffle everyone except for vampire expert Dr. Van Helsing
(Edward Van Sloan). Meanwhile, the deliriously mad Renfield (with his
famously chattering laugh) is a patient at Dr. Seward's hospital, and thus
contemplates with his lack of sanity and unwillingness to do his Master's
bidding.
"Dracula" was directed by Tod Browning, who a year later helmed the
controversial and frightening horror film "Freaks." Here, his astute
direction plays tricks with the audience, and he does a competent job with
the superb cinematographer Karl Freund. This telling of Dracula leaves
everything to the imagination. In one shockingly good scene, Harker
notices that there is a wolf outside the house after Dracula hastily
leaves. Naturally, the wolf is Dracula, but in this film, we never see him
change into a bat, wolf or fog. In fact, Lugosi never has any noticeable
fangs! To make the film really work your imagination, we never see him
arise from a coffin. Each time a coffin's lid is open, we see a close-up
shot of a hand lifting it while the camera pans away to the left and back
to the right to witness the Count standing with the lid closed!
What makes this "Dracula" indelible in everyone's minds is Lugosi - he was
perfectly cast as the Hungarian accented Count. His frozen stares and
piercing eyes evoke an unforgettable image of an animal seeking its prey
yet doing it with poise and subtlety. This by no means is the best of the
vampire flicks (both "Nosferatu" versions can lay claim to that status)
yet all the sequels and remakes of the world will never match Bela
Lugosi's bloody good performance.
Footnote: Originally, "Dracula" was released without an actual musical
score, despite the use of the famous "Swan Lake" excerpt by Tchaikovsky
played during the introductory and closing credits. Recently, avante-garde
composer Philip Glass composed a truly melodic and moody score to
accompany the film for the first time.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or
at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for American Pie (1999)
I am not a big fan of gross-out comedies, particularly teenage gross-out
comedies a la "Porky's" or the "Animal House" variety. Somehow, the idea that
teenagers having nothing more on their heads than sexual promiscuity is not
very appetizing. Well, sure, I was once a teenager myself, during the
Republican 80's, and I did think about sex, but there were other things on my
mind too. "American Pie" is about teens in the 90's, sharing their zestful
quest for losing their virginity on prom night. But I am convinced that sex is
not the only preoccupation facing teens of America. 
Nevertheless, the film's opening sequence is a classic piece of raunchy humor.
Jim (Jason Biggs) is watching a porno channel that is barely registering on the
cable channel. But the channel's soundtrack is unmistakably clear, as Jim
fondles himself until his parents enter the room and are horrified by his
hormonal desires. He gets comical, expert advice from his father (hilariously
played by Eugene Levy), who buys him all the porno mags he needs to understand
sex. Still, Jim's curiousity gets to him when he is told that sex feels like
"warm, apple pie." 
Jim is not the only teen in high school hung up on sex - so are all his
buddies, mostly lacrosse players. One player (the winsome Chris Klein from
"Election") is not all he's cracked up to be, and feels that he has real
sensitivity. He woos an intelligent choir girl (Mena Sevauri), who is taken by
his willingness to sing just to get close to her. 
The Jerry Lewis-like Jim may not just be interested in sex, but he has a
predilection for its orgasmic innuendoes. In a triumphantly classic scene, Jim
broadcasts his bedroom antics with a sexy foreign exchange student on the
Internet. Only problem is that he is not aware this is being broadcast to the
whole high school community! Jim struts barechested while the voluptuous female
gets aroused by a skin magazine, and all the immature high-schoolers howl with
laughter. 
"American Pie's" saving grace is that some of these kids are made to seem
human, unlike the cardboard cartoon characters of "Animal House" or any other
horny teen flick from the late 80's starring Corey Feldman. No, these kids are
sweet and human and, uh, oh, sensitive! Jim's one line about how a nerdy,
talkative band player (Alyson Hannigan) has something else to talk about
besides sex pretty much sums up the sensitivity factor. Naturally. it turns out
she wants to use Jim because of his lusty, Net activity. Jason Biggs, Chris
Klein and Mena Sevauri at least seem to come from the real world of teenagers,
but the burning question remains: is there more to life in high school than
sex? If you have seen "Election" or went to high school, you may be compelled
to agree that there is. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general comments at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Nurse Betty (2000)
"Nurse Betty" is one nutty wild ride - a tour de force road comedy that has enough loose screws to drive anyone bonkers. Its trappings may recall the Coen Brothers mixed with a zany Tarantino streak, but it is so unpredictable and filled with so many surprises, both candid and subtle, that it becomes a sublime cinematic marvel. This is no typical road movie or typical movie for that matter. 
Renee Zellweger is Betty, a Fair Oaks, Kansas waitress obsessed with a soap opera called "A Reason to Love." Betty is a sincere, understanding, affectionate woman, almost saintly in her attitudes and naivete. Unfortunately, she is married to a lousy, terribly obnoxious car salesman (Aaron Eckhart), who treats her like cold fish and has an affair with his secretary. He is a nightmarish configuration of Ralph Kramden and Eckhart's own soulless character in "In the Company of Men" - he is nervy enough to eat his wife's birthday cupcake and then orders her to clean up the kitchen table. Surely such human beings deserve imminent death, right? 
Well, one night, Betty watches in horror as her husband is practically scalped to death by two hit men, Charlie and Wesley (Morgan Freeman and Chris Rock) who are looking for a stash of drugs hidden in one of the salesman's automobiles. The problem is that Betty is getting ready to go on a trip of her own, and is taking the very car that is being sought. This places Betty, unbeknownst to her, in a dangerous situation. She also has her own fantastic agenda - she is headed to Los Angeles, specifically the fictitious Loma Vista hospital, to find Dr. David Ravell, a fictitious character in the soap opera she loves, who is of course an actor named George McCord (played by Greg Kinnear). The fact that her husband had just been murdered doesn't even faze her - she is in her fugue state, a journey of freedom and independence. 
The two hit men, wonderfully played by Freeman and Rock, have their own agenda - to kill the one witness to the crime, Betty. The problem is Charlie is after Betty for other reasons - he has become enamored by someone so sweetly innocent and harmless. He dreams of dancing with her by the Grand Canyon, and keeps a torn picture of her in his car. What he can't believe is that she went to L.A. to look for something that does not exist. One of the best scenes in the film is when Charlie asks for coffee at the cafe (prior to the vicious murder), and Betty stares at the TV monitor (which is playing her favorite soap opera) as she pours a cup for him without spilling a drop. Charlie is transfixed by her from the beginning. His partner, Wesley, is only a smart-ass, cocky tough guy who can't believe his older partner's lovestruck stance.
I refuse to divulge any of the other numerous surprises in the film except to say that just when you think you know where it is headed, "Nurse Betty" literally throws you off course. There is a viciously ugly murder in the film that is as messy and realistic in ways few other similar films could have handled. There are also moments of sheer beauty and ridicule followed by perfectly timed moments of comedic hilarity. Many of the comedic moments come from scenes between Betty and George the actor, who is convinced her own lovestruck agenda is an audition for a role in the show! Zellweger and Kinnear play these precious moments to the hilt, culminating in a well-written scene where he badgers her for not playing to the camera during a taped show. 
The extraordinary cast play their roles with a nicely precarious balance between comedy and rage. Zellweger plays the most sympathetic, confused, emotionally unbalanced female character in a long time, at least since Hilary Swank's performance in last year's harrowing "Boys Don't Cry." One cannot forget to mention Morgan Freeman's delicately portrayed Charlie, an intense yet gentle man of principle - his controlled rage and his amiable tone are thrilling to watch. I also liked Chris Rock's volatile Wesley, who has a number of good one-liners; Aaron Eckhart's loathsome salesman; Kinnear's ego-centered George aka Dr. Ravell; and there is nifty support from Pruitt Taylor Vince as a Kansas sheriff and Crispin Glover as a former high-school friend of Betty's. 
"Nurse Betty" is basically about finding your dreams and fulfilling them by overcoming all obstacles. Betty has her dream and nearly loses it, while the sagelike Charlie finds that his dream is looking for beauty and fulfillment, and finding it in Betty's soul. Director Neil LaBute ("In the Company of Men") and writers John C. Richards and James Flamberg throw all caution to the winds, culminating in a beautifully reflective moment of peace for our dear, misguided heroine Betty. She makes us feel that such dreams are within our grasp, as long as we are persistent enough to pursue them. Do yourself a favor: pursue the wild, wacky, infectious "Nurse Betty."
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Original Sin (2001)
While watching the over-exaggerated histrionics and sexual biplay of "Original
Sin," all I could think of was how much more I admire Stanley Kubrick's wildly
panned last hurrah, "Eyes Wide Shut." If you recall, "Eyes Wide Shut" was the
infamous film starring Tom Cruise and Nicole Kidman that dealt with jealousy in
a marriage and sexual innuendoes. Except for the de-eroticized orgy, most of
"Eyes Wide Shut" left sexual romps to the imagination. It was all done with
class, style and sophistication and left audiences puzzled and frustrated,
particularly since one was not privy to seeing Kidman and Cruise in their
birthday suits. "Original Sin" delivers on its promise of promiscuity, sex and
tons of nudity - yes, Angelina Jolie is naked throughout this film. And so is
the leading romantic star Antonio Banderas. And it is all about as sexy and
erotic as any episode of "Red Shoe Diaries."  
Based on the novel "Waltz into Darkness" by Cornell Woolrich, the film begins
with a Cuban coffee planter, Luis Durand (Antonio Banderas), who is ready to
marry a mail-order bride. His interests are primarily lustful since he does not
believe in love ("Love is for those who believe in it.") Durand meets the bride
named Julia Russell (Angelina Jolie) although she looks nothing like the
photograph she sent him. This should be cause for alarm but Durand is, after
all, rather smitten (hey, it is Lara Croft after all!). They agree that they
can't trust each other since he told her he was a worker at a coffee plant, not
the owner.  What is striking about this scene is how lovingly composed it is.
Director Michael Cristofer ("Gia") takes a cue from Martin Scorsese's "The Age
of Innocence" by showing us Durand's subjective glances at the striking figure
of Julia, dissolving from shots of her hair, lips, eyes, hands, etc. After
seeing this sequence, I was convinced that Cristofer was g!
oing to rein us in on one heck o
f a full-blooded, passionate love story. Not so. 
What starts as a sumptuous mood piece quickly degenerates into heavy,
over-the-top melodrama. Julia is not what she seems since she takes Durand's
money and splits. Durand is heartbroken, so much that he is ready to kill her
only to then realize he is actually ready to kill for her (?). He hires a
private investigator (Thomas Jane) to find her, though the investigator has
already been looking for her for reasons that should be obvious to anyone who
loves melodramas of this type. Revelations take place as does twists and turns,
all foreseeable if, again, you have not lived in a monastery for the last twenty
years. Oh, yes, but we do see Banderas and Jolie cavorting in the nude, in
high-angle, softly pornographic scenes that only made me yawn. To call this
eroticism is to forget what true eroticism is - consider the lovemaking scene
between Greta Scacchi and Tim Robbins in "The Player," which is as erotic as
they come. Even Bertolucci's "Last Tango in Paris" had a modicum of nud!
ity. The sex scenes in this film
 play like a Playfold centerfold with Jolie at its center - it is no different
than any soft-porno film you might catch late at night on HBO.
Perhaps "Original Sin" was meant to be melodramatic (I have not read the book
nor seen Truffaut's original film version) but it is so high-pitched complete
with a grating soundtrack of Spanish songs that it becomes a chore to sit
through. Banderas succeeds in making Durand a torn man and I do enjoy watching
Jolie, a stunning screen presence. They just do not have an iota of chemistry
and since the characters are so one-dimensional, it is hard to care about them.
Thomas Jane's role is crudely overdone and simply too cartoonish. The ending is
such a howler and so nearly parodic that the whole audience erupted in laughter.
"Original Sin" simply needed to be dialed down a bit for its own good.
For an analysis of Stanley Kubrick's EYES WIDE SHUT, go to
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/index5.shtml 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for How the Grinch Stole Christmas (2000)
The pure enjoyment of any of Dr. Seuss' books is the heartfelt magic he brought to them, including "Cat in the Hat" or even good old Grinch. Chuck Jones's animated classic short from 1966 certainly had that in spades. Ron Howard's dull live-action version is a bland, overstuffed souffle, more likely to make you yawn than laugh. I've always been skeptical about a live-action version of the story since the animated short always did it so well in such a short running time. At 102 minutes, director Ron Howard is plowing all over the map with nothing to say. 
Jim Carrey is the Grinch, the lovable, sneaky, clever, furry, green-eyed being who lives atop Mount Crumpit, essentially an elf-shoe shaped peak atop garbage mountain overlooking Whoville. The Grinch hates Christmas, and he hates all the cheery Who denizens who live in Whoville (they even hold an annual Holiday Cheermeister award). The Whos live for Christmas, and they love to shop for gifts spending copious amounts of money (is there a message here about consumerism in America?) The Grinch hates these people so much that he takes a maniacal glee in trying to destroy their holiday spirit. In fact, I almost agreed with the Grinch's mean efforts. These Whos are joyless, frenetic people with pig snouts and no personality, and the flashback on how the Grinch became such a grouch entitles him to far more sympathy than probably intended. 
The film has no visual imagination whatsoever. Every shot is in close-up and it makes all the surroundings feel cramped and busy. The production design and art direction is washed-out at best with little sense of space or even any vivid colors - Whoville is so dully imagined that it reminded me of the colorless world from Barry Levinson's atrocious "Toys." No wonder the Grinch is so grumpy - his messy, dank domicile has more character and personality than anything in Whoville. 
Jim Carrey is fairly tolerable but his manic brand of humor and one-liners robs the film of any heart or soul and quickly proves tedious after awhile - I will say his final scene where he realizes what Christmas is really about proves what a good actor Carrey can be. Christine Baranski as Martha May Whovier, the Grinch's former childhood love, delivers a little pizazz but she hardly snares much screen time. Taylor Momsen as Cindy Lou Who, the only citizen who believes the Grinch is not as mean as he may look, has some tender moments, but most of the cast seems lost in the film's frenzied style.
What was needed for "The Grinch" was the impressive imaginings of Tim Burton, considering he created the story of the fabulous "Nightmare Before Christmas" back in 1993, a more comical take on the nature of Christmas. The original "Grinch" had style, flair and a sense of magic. This modernized version feels cold and dreary, like a soiled stocking left outside of Grinch's Mount Crumpit home.  
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Runaway Bride (1999)
Imagine Joan Cusack as a weird, wild and wonderful woman with certain
insecurities about herself, living in a town not unlike Mayberry or
Pleasantville. She falls in love with an older reporter (Hector Elizondo) who
comes into town trying to verify rumors about a bride who runs from each and
every wedding opportunity, hence Cusack. Cusack falls for the old tiger, but
differences settle in about age difference, and she confides in a therapist
(Richard Gere) who is a bespectacled man with a mustache - somewhere within
this stiff she finds an attractive man if he would only shave that mustache and
remove the glasses. Unfortunately. Gere has an attractive sister (Julia
Roberts) who tries to protect him from her wooing. Naturally, Cusack ends up
with Elizondo but there is a sense of bitterness and sadness that she did not
end up with Gere. Alas, "Runaway Bride," although be warned that the plot
description I just offered is not the movie itself. This is simply something I
thought of while watching and trying to stay awake with this stale, laughless
stupidity of a movie.
In reality, Garry Marshall's latest romantic comedy confection stars Richard
Gere as "Ike" Graham, a columnist for the USA Today who has trouble coming up
with any fresh ideas. He resorts to going to the local bar and is inspired by a
patron who speaks of a "runaway bride," a woman who leaves men at the altar.
Almost immediately Ike writes the column based on the patron's testimony
(though this is never really made clear). Women on the street berate Ike and
hit him on the head with rolled-up newspapers before he discovers a snarling
letter from the bride herself printed by the editor. Apparently, Ike
misrepresented many facts and exaggerated many figures. He is fired by the
editor, his former wife (Rita Wilson). Now, Ike goes to this picture-postcard,
Mayberry-like town and confronts the snarling woman, Maggie Carpenter (Julia
Roberts). She is about to get married again, and Ike senses that she will run
like a rabbit again. Or will she succumb to Gere's charm and smooth-talking
demeanor? And is it possible that good romantic comedies are a thing of the
past?
Basically, the formula is set up for this movie, and all the cliches are in
place, and nothing else. This is one of the most charmless, dullest and
periodically dumbest movies I have ever seen. How can a respected director like
Marshall reduce Gere and Roberts to cardboard cutouts with about as much sex
and romantic appeal as a pair of refrigerators? Roberts is actually boring to
watch in this movie - her wide grins and "duckbill platypus" mugging is
unflattering to say the least. Gere seems more stiff than ever, and shares no
charisma or chemistry with Roberts. Interesting, considering what a solid pair
they were in "Pretty Woman," also directed by Marshall. I never understood the
latter's success but it had gobs of wit and real emotions unlike this scrap
heap. Nevertheless, Gere and Roberts felt like real people in that movie - here
they are sitcom variations.
While desperately trying to stay awake, I noticed a couple of nods to "Pretty
Woman," a cameo by Garry Marshall at a baseball game, and a video copy of "The
Graduate," one of my favorite comedies of all time. There also is one good line
about Fed-Ex trucks, and a couple of briefly delicious moments by the droll
Elizondo. Outside of that, this "Bride" is of little merit. Even the quirky
Joan Cusack (not weird as she is described by Roberts) is often excruciating.
Jean Schertler as Grandma supplies a couple of chuckles but nothing more. And
for trivia buffs, there is Julia's sister, Lisa Roberts, as "Elaine from
Manhattan" in one scene. 
Forget the silly "Pretty Woman," "Notting Hill," released earlier this year,
was one of the best films of Julia's career - she carried the film with grace
and subtlety and had the good sense of co-starring with the daffy Hugh Grant.
They had sweet chemistry and had a solidly good script to boot from "Four
Weddings and a Funeral" scribe, Richard Curtis. "Runaway Bride" has none of
those virtues and seems to have been made in a rush. My advice to Ms. Roberts
about future romantic comedies is to follow Lola's example: Run Julia Run!
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with questions, concerns, or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com 

Title
Review for Ronin (1998)
The element of surprise has disappeared in modern action thrillers. We see the
usual thunderous explosions and gunfights bereft of any decent plot or
character exposition. Mostly, we get thrill rides that aim mainly please the
eye, not unlike the summer of 1998's experiment in overkill, "Armageddon."
"Ronin" is not exempt from the aforementioned expectations of your average
action thriller, but it is executed with a finesse in its strategy to thrill us
- it does it without CGI effects or special-effects of any kind. That in itself
is commendable. 
The term Ronin refers to Japanese legend where the Japanese samurai, left with
no leaders to lead them, roamed the countryside acting as warriors-for-hire.
This legend was prominently featured in Akira Kurosawa's great "The Seven
Samurai" and "Yojimbo" - the latter remade as "A Fistful of Dollars." "Ronin's"
version of the story deals with a band of mercenaries who are looking to be
hired, and find work courtesy of an IRA honcho named Deidre (Natascha
McElhone). The job is to obtain a mysterious briefcase, which is in the hands
of "five to eight men." That's the slim plot in a nutshell, and the mercenaries
set out to find the briefcase braving one shootout, car chase and double cross
after another. Who ever said you could trust mercenaries who just want to make
a quick buck? 
The international group of machos includes Sam (played by Robert De Niro), who
may be ex-CIA and has a way with a cup of coffee; a psychotic Russian computer
expert named Gregor (Stellan Skarsgrd); a hulking Frenchman named Vincent
(Jean Reno playing virtually the same role as in "Mission Impossible"); and a
very fast driver named Larry (Skip Suduth), who has a way with the narrow roads
and tunnels in Paris (shades of Princess Di's death come to mind). 
"Ronin" could almost be a James Bond thriller considering its numerous
locations (Nice, Paris) and assortment of artillery (machine guns, bazookas),
but it fits more squarely in the tradition of the espionage thriller genre.
Examples of this type of genre extend from Hitchcock's "Sabotage" to "The Day
of the Jackal." "Ronin" is directed by the exciting John Frankenheimer ("The
Manchurian Candidate") and he milks the formula for all the atmosphere and
intrigue you can get. At times, "Ronin" is vaguely European in its steely
attitude and tough-as-nail characters, including the deadly Gregor who has no
qualms of shooting a child in an open playground, or the Irish female leader
who may not be quite what she seems. 
"Ronin" is filled with car chases galore, but it is at its best during its calm
moments, some vaguely humorous. I liked the scene where Sam and Deidre pose as
a couple at a hotel so they can snap shots of one of the "five to eight men." I
thoroughly enjoyed the camaraderie between the members of the group, who size
each other up uncovering one's weaknesses and one's strengths. But there are
two sequences that must be seen to be believed: one is an elaborate setup
involving a Parisian bistro that is as perfectly timed and edited as anything
Hitchcock might have attempted, and the other is when the wounded Sam is giving
instructions to Vincent on how to retract a bullet lodged on his side. This one
sequence features the brilliant British actor Michel Londsdale ("The Bride Wore
Black") as a doctor whose hobby is designing samurai figures.
"Ronin" has too many chase sequences, and a scantily designed plot, but it's
always enticing, breathtaking, and watchable. The cast is watchable, too, and
De Niro's commanding presence (playing an action hero for the first time) and
Frankenheimer's alert direction make up for the brief lapses in plausibility. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or comments at faustus_08520@yahoo.com
or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Green Mile, The (1999)
The Stephen King books that usually adapt well to the screen are the
melodramas. Sure, in terms of horror, we have had "Carrie" and "The Dead Zone,"
yet often they are so ludicrous ("Maximum Overdrive") and badly shaped that
they come across as pale echoes of their literary counterparts. "The Shawshank
Redemption" was one major exception to the rule, as well as "Stand By Me" (both
adapted from the "Different Seasons" book). "The Green Mile" is based on a
six-part novel from 1996, once again focusing on a prison setting (as did
"Shawshank"), and once again directed by Frank Daranbot, who also helmed
"Shawshank."It may not be as moving or as deeply profound as "Shawshank," but
it will do.
"The Green Mile" begins with a old man at a nursing home who weeps when he
watches Fred Astaire singing "Cheek to Cheek" in "Top Hat." The reason for his
distress is outlined in a flashback to an Alabama prison in the 1930's where he
worked as a prison guard. Tom Hanks plays death-row guard Paul Edgecomb, who
has a urinary tract infection he tries to keep hidden. There are other guards
in this pristine-looking yet ominous, lime-colored prison, such as David Morse
(once the gentle, bird-like doctor in TV's "St. Elsewhere") as the imposing
second-in-command, the clean-cut kid (Barry Pepper, best remembered as the
Biblical sharpshooter in "Saving Private Ryan"), and the past master guard
(Jeffrey DeMunn), who's seen it all. There is also the ambitious, mean,
sadistic guard, Percy Wetmore (Doug Hutchinson), who has no qualms about
taunting the prisoners or killing mice. One mouse in particular that has the
guards in awe is adopted by a prisoner named Delacroix (Michael Jeter), and
named Mr. Jingles. 
One day, a massive bulk of a man named John Coffey (Michael Clarke Duncan) is
brought in for the crime of killing two young girls. He seems like a sweet man,
afraid of the dark, and takes a liking to Mr. Jingles. Paul Edgecomb doubts the
man is capable of violence, especially when John's hands glow mysteriously and
heals Paul's infection. But nobody has heard of Mr. Coffey. "He fell out of the
sky," says John's former lawyer (Gary Sinise, in an outstanding cameo). 
"The Green Mile" spends an inordinate amount of time expounding on the daily
routines of the guards - their camaraderie, how they bring in the prisoners,
their respectful treatment of them, and the preparations for the inevitable
executions (there are two of them in the film, and they are quite disturbing).
All this is as powerfully executed, no pun intended, as anything in "The
Shawshank Redemption," and the performance by Hutchinson reinforces that. His
character, Percy, has a killer instinct but he can also be scared and taunted -
it is a twisty, fascinating character.
The major fault with "The Green Mile" lies with the tedious bookends showing an
older Edgecomb, and it feels like writer-director Darabont is vying for the
same emotion as "Saving Private Ryan." No sale, and it is an unwanted
distraction that detracts from the more powerful moments in the film. Another
fault lies with the enormous sobbing scenes that actor Michael Clarke Duncan is
required to do - every scene he's in, he's teary-eyed. Duncan could have used
some moments of silence so that we would not know what to think of such a
gentle giant. On the other hand, director Darabont aims to make every moment as
dramatic as possible, cued with stretches of Thomas Newman's musical score,
making every scene far too self-important. I've said it before, and I will say
it again - restraint is an admirable trait. 
Though it does not match the power of Darabont's "Shawshank," "The Green Mile"
has a few great scenes in what is otherwise a middling, semi-laborious film
that plays it safe, and would have benefitted from some screenplay deletions.
But in an era where there are so few good Stephen King films, "The Green Mile"
is a step in the right direction. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or
at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Someone to Love (1987)
How interesting can it be to film people's responses to loneliness, loss of
love and women's liberation? New York filmmaker Henry Jaglom ("New Year's Day,"
"Eating") has taken the route of doing just that - filming people's responses
to those subjects, and the result is one of the most profound, exciting and
personal films of the 1980's. 
Henry Jaglom plays a film director named Danny who is shaken and perplexed by
his girlfriend, Helen (remarkably played by Andrea Marcovicci) who wants to be
left alone, much to Danny's chagrin, when she sleeps. After she brushes her
teeth, Danny has to leave so she can sleep in peace. On that note, Danny flies
to Santa Monica to see his brother (Michael Emil) who is in the real estate
business, and who deplores Danny's profession insisting it isn't work, it is
"play." His brother is co-owner of an antique theater that is about to be
demolished after having sold it. Danny gets the creative idea to stage and film
his old friends and acquaintances in the theater, and so he makes invitations
to all who are lonely on Valentine's Day to attend. A surprising number of
people show up including his emotional companion Helen, a singer; Dave
Frishberg who plays the piano in a beautiful montage sequence; Sally Kellerman
as a distraught, popular movie star who all the men flirt with; Kathryn Harrold
as an actress who wants to have a family; Steven Bishop who gets to play the
guitar; and even the sage Orson Welles, in his last role, as a film director
who delivers profound insights on women's liberation, loneliness and
filmmaking. And for avid film buffs, Oja Kodar makes a pleasing guest
appearance as a Yugoslavian woman who admires Danny for his truth and honesty
(Oja was Welles's longtime collaborator and companion and appeared with him in
"F for Fake"). 
"Someone to Love" is an eye-opening pseudo-documentary of relationships and
what it means to have a companion, and the benefits and hazards of being
lonely. It is the only film from the 80's to deal honestly, and with startling
candor, on such issues. The question of Danny's credibility as a filmmaker is
brought up at one point when he films Helen while dancing with her and she gets
visibly upset. To quote Michael Powell, is all this filmmaking healthy? Is
Danny asking questions that are too personal, or does he really want his
brother to mingle and meet people at this offbeat party? Could it be that Danny
is the only miserable person at this party?
"Someone to Love" has no real ending but it does have a stirring conclusion
with Welles smoking a cigar and cracking up as he expounds on what Jaglom may
or may not have accomplished in his film. "Your films are very different from
mine," says Welles. "You like happy endings because you are a sentimentalist."
"Someone to Love" is never sentimental but it is a love letter to all artists
(and people) who are miserable, happy or unhappy about life and love, and to
those who consider loneliness a virtue. Are women better off without a male
companion or a marriage? Are men also plagued by the same questions? These may
be questions you ask yourself everyday but rarely are these questions ever
explored in a film. "Someone to Love" is a sad, passionate, funny, messy film
of great magnitude by a great director. And yes, his films are very different
from anyone else's.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 

Title
Review for Ghost Dog: The Way of the Samurai (1999)
It pains me to write off Jim Jarmusch's "Ghost Dog: The Way of the Samurai" as
half-baked, but it truly is. It is also a half-cooked and undernourished tale of
a cold-blooded hit man with little or no sense of individuality. 
Ghost Dog is the name of the hit man (Forest Whitaker), a lone wolf in an urban
wasteland who performs hits for the mob. Basically, Ghost Dog is the retainer
but he carries no phone and seems to have no mailing address. His only contact
in the outside world is through a pigeon carrier that sends notes back and forth
to his "master." You see Ghost Dog was once saved by this mob affiliate,
referred to as the master, and now he has paid him back his respect by killing
people for a living. Ghost Dog also avidly reads the ways of the Samurai,
figuring his sense of loyalty and his brand of violence stems from it. He
couldn't be more wrong as both are tested to the limit when a hit goes awry and
now the mob want to kill the elusive, enigmatic hit man. 
"Ghost Dog" tries to be a fusion of hip-hop and gangster cliches coupled with
Jarmusch's own brand of poetry, mixing in the urban wasteland of the titled
character with the sense of grace and freedom, as witnessed by several shots of
birds above tenements. There are many scenes of beauty and grace and all are
succintly photographed by Robby Muller (who also shot the beautiful
black-and-white "Dead Man," also directed by Jarmusch). Jarmusch, however, is
not a stickler for narrative consistency and fails to bring any inner life to
the crucial character of Ghost Dog. 
How are we suppose to view this man? As played with panache and glum looks by
Forest Whitaker (who also played a similar character in "Diary of a Hitman"),
Ghost Dog is the classic Man With No Name character with no real background or
real sense of individuality. He seems to bond with the local French ice-cream
truck vendor and with a young girl who likes to read books such as
"Frankenstein," but essentially, this man has no friends and no family. All he
has are his nest of pigeons and his loyalty to the so-called master whom he
hardly sees much of. In an ironic twist, Ghost Dog gets paid only once a year
and always during the first day of autumn as part of his contract by the master.
Rarely do we get a glimpse of any humanity in the character - as played by
Whitaker, he is a hooded hulk bereft of emotion or purpose other than to kill.
He may lack individuality and truly has erroneous views on what being a samurai
is next to being a cold-blooded hit man, but coldness and detac!
hment seem central to the charac
ter. I simply felt nothing, not even pity, for this remorseless man. Why did he
choose to lead such a life? 
The film has some virtues, such as the casting of Cliff Gorman as the
second-in-command of the mob who has trouble keeping up the rent for a Chinese
restaurant backroom. I also enjoyed the scenes where Whitaker bonds with the
French-speaking ice-cream truck vendor whom he never understands yet reiterates
exactly what the other says. The violence is strong and brief, and there is a
fine moment where a drainpipe is used as an unusual method of shooting someone
(a moment lifted from Godard's "A Band Apart"). I also enjoyed seeing the
exhausted gangsters trying to find the hit man, going from one tenement to
another and coming up empty. It is also nice to see Jarmusch leaving his main
character mute for the first forty-five minutes, thus allowing us to watch a man
who is coming apart at the seams through Whitaker's expressive, haunting face.
Unfortunately, just when a glimmer of hope appears at the end, we are still left
with the same glum Ghost Dog we started with. 
For more reviews, go to JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at Faust668@aol.com
or at faustus_08520@yahoo.com

Title
Review for Terms of Endearment (1983)
A Look Back at TERMS OF ENDEARMENT (1983) and THE EVENING STAR (1996)
Aurora Greenway is one of those colorful, larger-than-life characters who exist
only in Southern novels, particularly those by Larry McMurtry ("The Last
Picture Show"). In "Terms of Endearment," coincidentally based on a novel by
McMurtry, Aurora (Shirley MacLaine) arose as a tender, full-blooded, fiercely
emotional creature. In the excruciating "The Evening Star," she is depicted as
a bloodless caricature, as if she drifted in from the latest soap opera series.
"Terms of Endearment" is one of the great movies of the 1980's - it is
captivating, unsentimental, brilliantly acted, and superbly directed by James
L. Brooks. The heart of that film was Aurora's troubling yet loving
relationship with her daughter Emma (Debra Winger). The trials and tribulations
they endure evoked a nice balance between humor and heartbreak. For example,
Aurora dates a swinging, hard-drinking bachelor and astronaut (Jack Nicholson),
and a tender love affair begins and ends abruptly between them. Emma marries
Flap (Jeff Daniels, who's been typecast ever since), a professor who teaches
English and has affairs with co-eds. In retaliation, Emma has an affair with a
banker (John Lithgow), and so on. 
"Terms of Endearment" has a wonderful ensemble of actors at their best, and
honest, vibrant writing. The beauty of the film is Brooks's careful balance
between comedy, seriousness and tragedy. "Terms" also never steps into
caricature or droll exaggeration resulting in a film that transcends its soap
opera origins. 
"The Evening Star" is at the opposite end of the pole. It is grossly
exaggerated, wildly uneven, contains numerous caricatures not characters, and
takes an eternity to end. This time, the eccentric Aurora (Shirley McClaine,
again) has Emma's sexy teenage daughter (Juliette Lewis) to contend with, a
grandchild in prison, and Emma's rich, snobbish friend (Miranda Richardson) who
is trying to buy Aurora's granddaughter's love. In addition, there's Aurora's
loving, loyal maid (Marion Ross) who seems more like an intrusion in her life
than anything else. Oh, and there's the local psychiatrist (Bill Paxton) who
has a brief, unbelievable fling with Aurora. 
"The Evening Star" suffers greatly in every department when compared to
"Terms." For one, the casting is actually awful. MacLaine overacts to the hilt
of all hilts - she's actually annoying and boring to watch. Juliette Lewis does
better with her role as a troubled teenager, but it is something she can play
in her sleep. Marion Ross and the late Ben Johnson, in his last role, seem to
be sleepwalking throughout. 
The one actress who is wrongfully cast, and an indication of what's wrong with
some sequels, is Miranda Richardson as the snobbish friend of the late Emma -
she spews seemingly delectable witticisms with a crooked drawl that brings out
the worst in Southern stereotypes and accents. Interestingly, her character was
played by Lisa Hart Carroll in "Terms" with complete restraint - a far cry from
Richardson's manic fits. Where's the dignity of Southerner Billy Bob Thornton
when you really need him? 
"Terms" was a real human drama and completely unpredictable and truthful from
beginning to end. "Evening Star" is utterly formulaic nonsense done with none
of the vigor or honesty of the original (and with a high mortality rate to
boot). The film is so desperate that it even brings back Jack Nicholson for an
unnecessary, heavy-handed cameo. Where's Jim Brooks when you really need him? 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with questions, comments or general complaints at Faust667@aol.com or
at jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Bridget Jones's Diary (2001)
Renee Zellweger is an actress whose sprightly charm and quivering, cutesy smile
can melt moviegoers' hearts like no other. She is the girl-next-door type but
her irresistibility breaks some new ground here - you get the feeling that she
can be embarrassed and impish at the same time. She is the unique joy of
"Bridget Jones' Diary," a fairly amusing if slightly misguided
romantic comedy with ample charm and considerable laughs. It just lacks the
extra leap to take it beyond conventionality. 
Bridget Jones (Renee Zellweger) is the neurotic, lonely, uncouth heroine of the
1996 bestseller by Helen Fielding. She is so lonely that she drinks
heavily while listening to Eric Carmen's "All By Myself" (a touching,
heartbreaking moment). At first glance, no one seems to take a gander at
Bridget. She is plumpish and tends to say exactly what is on her mind, including
at book receptions where everyone looks at her with slight bemusement. At dinner
parties, she confronts men who see her as an unappealing spinster, including the
rich Mr. Darcy (Colin Firth). Her boss,
however, takes a liking to her (he is played with irresistible glee by Hugh
Grant), and the two begin having an affair. Of course, Mr. Darcy gets jealous
since he does like her. 
It is no surprise where the film is headed when we know Mr. Darcy will
inevitably change his mind about Bridget. But the film takes on a knowing,
self-conscious style at the beginning where we begin to think that it will poke
fun at romantic comedy conventions. There is a moment where Bridget
> makes an error in judgment at work and we see her unsaid obscenity splashed
across the screen. "Bridget Jones' Diary," however, does not take as many
unconventional routes as one might hope. Bridget loves the two men but has to
decide between one. Bridget tries to bring her parents back together after a
brief separation. Some of these episodes work better than others but they hardly
figure cohesively as a whole. 
I have not read Fielding's book but I've been told that it truly maps out
Bridget's insecurities and messy lifestyle with more depth. The film does show
her drinking and eating and smoking too much and we sense she is real obsessive
and has trouble finding the proper man (she is also a bad cook, witness the
strange coloring of her cooked meals). But all these qualities are painted in
broad strokes. Bridget's biggest flaw seems to be her uncouth quality but I was
not clear why everyone seemed so perturbed whenever she made a speech (I found
her speeches funny and engaging). As played by Zellweger, she has charm and an
affable quality but her weight gain (reports say she gained as much as 20 to 40
pounds for the role) does not exactly put her on the same scale as Conchata
Ferrell (who I love no matter how much she weighs). In other words, I get the
sense that the film has been sanitized from its written form to accommodate all
women in the audience. Where does this leave the wom!
en who are perhaps uncomfortable
 with their weight or who need someone like Bridget Jones as their role model,
essentially saying it is okay to be fat and still have Hugh Grant as your
suitor? 
"Bridget Jones' Diary" has Zellweger at its center and she is as convincing and
delightful as one can imagine. Kudos also go to Hugh Grant and Colin Firth in
witty supporting roles (I could have lived without a cliched
fistfight between them). There is also a funny cameo by Salman Rushdie as
himself no less. The film has pizazz to offer but compare this to any other
romantic comedy, and I dare you to find the difference. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at Faust668@aol.com
or at faustus_08520@yahoo.com

Title
Review for Blue Velvet (1986)
Of all of David Lynch's films, I find myself ranking "Blue Velvet" on a lower 
meter. It's a good, blazingly original film that is also wholly uneven, 
obscene and tasteless to the core. The latter terms are not meant as a 
critique - Lynch at his best is always obscene and tasteless. But I also find 
"Blue Velvet" to be underwhelming, as say compared to "Eraserhead" (his 
greatest film) or "Lost Highway." It's  just that their themes are more 
complex and disturbing than this perverse take on suburbia.
"Blue Velvet" was released back in 1986 and was highly controversional for 
its time, mainly due to graphic scenes of torture and sex. There was also 
much talk about the sequence where Isabella Rosselini (Ingrid Bergman's 
daughter) is naked and publicly embarrassed, while teeth marks and cigarette 
burns cover her entire body. There is no question that Lynch has always had 
trouble protraying women in a positive light, but the sequence is pure 
misogyny serving no purpose in the entire film. Rosselini also endures several
 beatings by Dennis Hopper as a helium-sniffing psycho. There are also 
numerous close-up shots of ants and cockroaches littering the screen as if 
they are aware of something beyond our knowledge.
The story revolves around a murder mystery that is never quite explained or 
resolved. Kyle MacLachlan plays a college student visiting his 
picture-postcard hometown, Pemberton, when one day, he discovers a severed 
human ear on someone's lawn. He contacts the police and then decides to 
investigate on his own. This all leads to the apartment of a distraught 
singer (played by Rosselini), who is always singing "Blue Velvet" at a 
nightclub. Dennis Hopper plays the deranged killer who tortures her, and the 
scenes between the two of them are as startling and effective as any other 
scene in the film.
As Kyle veers further into this S & M world with the help of a policeman's 
daughter (Laura Dern) things get much weirder especially when Dean Stockwell 
shows up as a Kabuki transvestite. Both Stockwell and Hopper must hold the 
record for spouting more obscenities on film than Eddie Murphy. 
"Blue Velvet" is a fascinating, intriguing film but it is not completely 
successful. The elements of the mystery are so warped that I gave up after a 
while trying to follow it. It is true that some of Lynch's later work was 
more confounding and that it did not bother me much, but this mystery is 
actually more conventional and, dare I say, realistic so I did expect to be 
able to follow it. The performances are mostly shouting matches, especially 
between Hopper and Rosselini. Kyle MacLachlan and Laura Dern merely react 
than act, except for one exquisitely subtle scene at a cafe. Plus, the 
uplifting ending negates the darkness that preceded it, though I did like the 
shot of the bird with a wasp in its mouth. 
For whatever strange reason I cannot comprehend, I still liked "Blue Velvet" 
because nobody has ever produced or directed anything like it prior to its 
release. There isn't anything you can easily compare it to. It is definitely 
Lynch's wildest endeavor and, somehow, strangely compelling. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com 
or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Hamlet (1996)
Leaving aside Orson Welles, nobody else has tackled Shakespeare in all its
guts and glory, and in the beauty of the language. Kenneth Branagh's
full-throttled, four-hour version of Hamlet is the exception, and a model for
others to follow. Too often "Hamlet's" text is truncated, eschewing some of the
relationships and complex themes for simple emotions. Mel Gibson looks like a
wimp in the 1990 film version by Franco Zeffirelli; this new "Hamlet" will
leave you cheering and weeping with delight at Kenneth Branagh's bravura
performance. 
Branagh ("Henry V") stars as the virile Prince Hamlet who is torn by the
unexpectedly quick marriage of his mother, Gertrude (Julie Christie), to the
callous, manipulative Claudius (a scene-stealing Derek Jacobi), who is stealing
the throne of Denmark. What gets Hamlet to the boiling point of madness and
despair is that he is told by his associates that Claudius murdered Hamlet's
father - this is told in an eerie sequence by the ghost of Hamlet's father
(Bard veteran Brian Blessed). When Hamlet becomes aware of this, he becomes
anxious, jealous, manipulative, depressed, vengeful, and...yes, murderous. He
also has a lost love whom he pines for, Ophelia (Kate Winslet), but he can
never bring himself to admit his love to her, or do anything about his father's
death - he's a coward in denial. His cowardice becomes more evident when he's
continually walking through his palace becoming overbearing and obviously
theatrical - this Hamlet thinks nothing of insulting everyone, including
staging a play for Claudius where a prince's father is killed alarmingly the
same way as Claudius had killed Hamlet's father! Hamlet gradually becomes more
overbearing, and even cheerful, devilish. It is no wonder that Ophelia is
understandably confused by Hamlet's behavior, she becomes crazy herself. 
Kenneth Branagh is the perfect actor to play the bleached blonde, virile Hamlet
- he successfully brings all the character's emotions to life in a performance
I will never forget. It is outstanding how he makes us, the audience, unable to
keep up with his fast-talking rhythms and plans, but it is clear that his
madness and arrogance is leading to a path of doom - his lack of restraint
within himself is his own undoing. Derek Jacobi is simply marvelous as the
scheming Claudius - at times, he seems more dashing and in control than Hamlet,
yet it is noteworthy how Jacobi manages to mask Claudius's villainy and bring a
sense of sympathy. A round of applause must go to the return of Julie Christie
to the big screen - her Gertrude is the maternal, emotional force who tries to
heal Hamlet (I might add that Christie is at the appropriate age to play
Gertrude when comparing to the youthful Glenn Close in the Zeffirelli version).
Major pluses also go to Jack Lemmon as the doleful Marcellus, and the haunting
expressiveness of Rufus Selwell as Prince Fortrinbas who eventually brings the
throne to its knees. Kate Winslet ("Sense and Sensibility") is the ideal
Ophelia; beautiful, sad, sexy, and madly insane.
Despite the great performances, there are some that are superfluous at best. I
would have preferred other actors playing the First Gravedigger (Billy Crystal)
and Osric (Robin Williams) - they distract us from the genuine power of the
play and makes us feel as if we entered a Saturday Night Live special. Gerard
Depardieu's walk-on bit as Reynaldo also feels unnecessary. 
These are minor complaints for what is a superbly crafted work of art by
Branagh. Serving as director as well, he makes the play into a visionary
landscape of both the internal and external workings of Hamlet's mind. The
vastness of the palace; the nocturnal bluish moors; the wintry scenery; the
dazzling sword duels; Rufus's army marching symmetrically into the palace; and
the moment when Hamlet tells his famous "To be or not to be" speech - these
scenes, and many more, are beautifully realized by Branagh and cinematographer
Alex Thomson.         Branagh's first film was Shakespeare's "Henry V," a powerful,
stirring film that made me want to join Henry in his battles. Since then,
Branagh has fashioned a wonderful body of work ("Dead Again," "Peter's
Friends," "Much Ado About Nothing"), and he continues to amaze. This vivid,
breathtaking "Hamlet" finally gives Shakespeare and Branagh the respect they
both deserve.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with questions, concerns, or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Magnolia (1999)
I both loved and hated "Magnolia." Let me explain further. I've seen it twice,
and I am convinced that Paul Thomas Anderson's multilayered, mosaic character
study is the best American film of 1999. It is also a frustrating experience of
a movie because it is so filled with emotional pain and regret that it causes
one to avert their eyes from the screen in the hopes that it will all be over.
Of course, this is what life often feels like, full of regrets and pain since
we are all human and flawed. And that is what makes "Magnolia" such a cinematic
marvel to witness. 
"Magnolia" is set in L.A. on one rainy 24 hour day. It is raining so much that
all the characters keep referring to how it is "raining like cats and dogs." We
are shown the lives of several different characters who may live on the same
street named Magnolia. There is the lonesome, clumsy cop (John C. Reilly) who
is ready for any relationship that comes his way; the elderly Earl Partridge
(Jason Robards), a wealthy man who is near death; the sympathetic nurse (Philip
Seymour Hoffman) who takes care of Earl; Earl's gold-digging wife with a
conscience (Julianne Moore); the strutting, sexed-up guru Frank T.J. Mackey
(Tom Cruise), Earl's estranged son; the tired quiz show host dying of cancer
(Philip Baker Hall); the coked-up quiz show host's daughter who loves Aimee
Mann songs (Melora Walters); the genius whiz kid (Jeremy Blackman), a
participant on the aforementioned quiz show; and finally, the lonely, pathetic
former child genius Donnie Smith (William H. Macy) who wants love and has love
to give. 
"Magnolia" begins with an ingenious prologue about chances and coincidences in
life, told through some famous urban legends. One includes an attempted suicide
that becomes a homicide, a store clerk killed by three thieves who bear his
name, and the connection between a blackjack dealer and a pilot. The point of
these vignettes is to show how some people can come together by sheer
coincidence without knowing why or how. And, in essence, that is what
"Magnolia" is about. 
Somehow, these people find a way of connecting to each other in ways not
imaginable to them, or at least not immediately apparent to them. The most
powerful scenes involve the heartless, cynical Frank who is the guru of
something called "Search and Destroy," demonstrating to men the various methods
on how to get laid (those scenes are as electrifying as anything Cruise has
ever done before). When Frank realizes that his father is dying, he badgers the
man verbally and then lets out an emotional cannon that is as moving as Marlon
Brando's similar moment of realization in "Last Tango in Paris." 
Then there is the emotionally high-strung wife of Earl (Moore) who regrets
cheating on her husband and suddenly realizes that she loves him. A crucial
scene is when she stops at a pharmacy to get medicine for her husband. She is
questioned about her prescriptions, and Moore begins to curse the clerk,
shaming him for calling her a lady. It is so effectively unwatchable that it
will make you cringe. Along with "Cookie's Fortune," "The End of the Affair,"
and "An Ideal Husband," 1999 will be remembered as the year of Julianne Moore,
a gifted actress of extraordinary range. 
There are many performances worth mentioning but I will at least mention one of
our most unsung actors in America, John C. Reilly (who appeared in P.T.
Anderson's "Boogie Nights" and "Hard Eight"). He plays Officer Jim Kurring, who
prays quite often and is seeking a mate. He finds one in the quiz show host's
daughter (Walters) who plays her stereo far too loud. He is immediately smitten
and asks her out on a date, oblivious to her drug abuse and her high-pitched
personality. She does not realize what a klutz he is since he loses his gun and
nightstick quite often.
"Magnolia" is full of so many great scenes and acute moments of observation
that some of it will remind you of Robert Altman's classic "Short Cuts." The
similarity ends as far as the mosaic of characters (there were far more in
Altman's film) because writer-director Paul Thomas Anderson has a musical
structure in mind that is as unusual and breathless as anything I have ever
seen before. Never mind the various songs by Aimee Mann (written specifically
for the film), Mr. Anderson has also mentioned that he based the narrative
structure on the Beatles song, "A Day in the Life." There is even a moment
where each of the characters sings the lyrics to the Aimee Mann song "Wise Up."
"Magnolia" is surely the most musical of all films in a long time. 
It would not be fair to reveal more of the surprises in "Magnolia," since one
cannot predict what will happen from one scene to the next. The film builds
with so much power and tension that it leads to a climactic moment that you
will either love or hate (let's say that the "Exodus 8:2" signs are there for a
reason). Some will argue that this film is too strange, bizarre and exaggerated
to understand or comprehend. Those are the naysayers talking who do not wish
for cinema to take such leaps and bounds from the ordinary. "Magnolia" is one
of the most profoundly moving films of the 1990's with an ensemble cast that is
as uniformly brilliant as you can imagine. All great films are tough to forget
- this one will grow on you and get underneath your skin. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Titicut Follies (1967)
TITICUT FOLLIES (1967) - A Film Review by Jerry Saravia
How does one react to a documentary so honest and heartbreaking that one is 
compelled to turn away from its tragic outlook? Well, it is tough to watch 
Frederick Wiseman's cinema verite documentary, "Titicut Follies," a 
disturbing look at a mental institution fraught with impracticalities, but it 
must be seen. 
Wiseman frames the opening and closing moments of this film with a 
song-and-dance routine performed annually by the institution's residents - 
the name of the show is "Titicut Follies." Gradually, in almost bleached-out 
black-and-white, we see the conditions at the Bridgewater Correctional 
Institution where the patients are awakened each morning, strip-searched, 
shaven, and then interviewed by the doctors about their personal histories. 
They are then escorted back to their empty cells naked, and locked in with an 
unerring sense of closure and solidity. 
The patients are a mixed bag, some crazier than others. There are a few who 
babble on a variety of topics without interruption, a former teacher who 
incoherently screams at the guards, and one patient who feels that he is sane 
and wants to go to prison after a nearly one-year stay. This particular 
patient insists that the doctors are wrong, and tries to prove his case. 
This Massachusetts institute is like a journey through hell - one patient is 
forced fed with a tube through his nose while the doctor performs the 
procedure and smokes! Another patient is carried out in a coffin - the only 
one to get out of this hellhole. There is an effective scene where a group of 
doctors decide that increasing the dosage for one patient, who complains of 
sickness from the medicine, is the best solution. There is a lot more taking 
place, most of it disquieting in its immediacy and the atmosphere of such an 
environment. It is no wonder that a Massachusetts judge banned the film from 
being shown for many years because it invaded the privacy of the patients, 
housed in what looks like a prison facility. What the film really does is to 
show how the patients are treated - like slabs of meat, not people. 
"Titicut Follies" is virtually unwatchable and all too realistic - a document 
of sad times when mental illness was synonymous with animal behavior. With 
Wiseman's hand-held camera, we feel we are there witnessing one grueling 
event after another, unable to help except to bear witness to the patients' 
behavior. And it is to the director's credit that we see the glint of 
humanity within these patients - they are people like anyone else. 
Misunderstood, and possibly quite insane, but still human. "Titicut Follies" 
is a tough film to put out of your mind, and it will linger longer in your 
mind than any fictional film dealing with similar subject matter would. It is 
a haunting masterpiece that heralded the cinema verite standard for all 
documentaries to come. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general comments at 
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Star Wars (1977)
George Lucas' "Star Wars" is one of the great outer space fantasy movies of all
time - it was, and still is, a gleefully exciting popcorn movie full of
special-effects galore and chivalrous heroes, stubborn princesses, evil dark
empires, and two cute robots. The characters were Luke Skywalker, Han Solo,
Princess Leia, Obi-Wan Kenobi, Yoda and Darth Vader, to name a few. Now comes
the special edition of this special trilogy of movies and, despite some flaws
with the post-tinkering, they are a fond reminder of how groundbreaking these
movies were and how they changed Hollywood forever. They initiated the term:
blockbuster.
The original "Star Wars" was a major box-office success signaling the rise of
merchandising and the wave of Hollywood blockbusters to come. The main
difference between "Star Wars" and the so-called action entertainment of today
is that "Star Wars" had wit, style and imagination to spare, not gratuitous
action scenes and bloody violence at the expense of a story or characters worth
caring about (See "The Lost World" for proof). 
It is a sheer joy to watch this film restored to its original glory with its
blazing colors, beautiful cinematography and the uplifting Dolby Digital
musical score by John Williams. The special-effects are as awesome as they ever
were, including the classic battle on the Death Star, the plentiful laser gun
fights, and the lightsaber duel between Vader and Kenobi. 
The actors are also rather pleasing to watch after all these years. Harrison
Ford has as much fun here as when he played Indiana Jones and his constant
snickering and witty asides are as marvelous as ever. Ditto the youthful Carrie
Fisher as Princess Leia; James Earl Jones' eerie voice for the mysterious Darth
Vader; the comic biplay between the lovable robots C3PO and R2D2; Mark Hamill's
naive farm boy Luke Skywalker who eventually becomes a fighter pilot for the
Rebellion (Hamill's career never took off the way his co-stars did); the
masterful restraint of Sir Alec Guinness as the sage Obi-Wan; Peter Mayhew as
the hairy seven-foot growling Chewbacca; and notably Peter Cushing as the
commander of the Death Star station - he's almost as scary as Vader when he
blows up Leia's home planet Alderaan!
The additions to "Star Wars" are not as invigorating as one would hope yet some
of them are essential. The addition of a younger, less slimier Jabba the Hutt
who confronts Han Solo after Solo killed one of his henchmen, Greedo, is fun to
watch but nonessential. Firstly, Jabba seems friendly and warm when compared to
the evil, corrupt reptilian seen in Return of the Jedi. Secondly, Jabba
reiterates everything that Greedo says to Solo in the previous scene. Referring
back to the Greedo confrontation, moralist George Lucas decides to have Han
Solo defend himself by showing Greedo shooting Han, and missing (!), and then
Han kills Greedo. Originally, Han was to have shot Greedo in cold-blood - that
was the point because he was a daredevil pilot who would shoot at anything. But
by reversing and changing the scene, Lucas makes a different point all together
which is that some films are better left in their original format. 
Other additions actually work quite well. The introduction of the spaceport Mos
Eisley, where Luke and Kenobi find Han, is filled with more neat outside shots
of the city. There's also a terrific scene where Luke talks to Briggs, his
fellow pilot, before they take off for attack. The sequence where Luke and Leia
are shooting stormtroopers over an abyss is enhanced aurally with echoes and is
more magnificent than ever.
"Star Wars" is not the only one with a makeover - "The Empire Strikes Back" has
some finishing touches but most of it has been left intact. This is the best of
the trilogy and it also has more depth, humor and character development than
either one. Han Solo is more reckless and suffers a horrible fate; Luke
Skywalker learns the way of the Jedi from a nine-hundred year old wizened
creature called Yoda, and faces Vader; Leia falls in love with Han; there are
more special effects including a superb asteroid battle; a startling revelation
about Darth Vader, and a dark ending where neither the Rebellion nor the Empire
wins. It's a grand space opera with imagination and great storytelling to
spare. 
"Return of the Jedi" suffers the most from the changes, and it is also the
weakest of the three. Firstly, there's an embarrassing sequence redone with CGI
effects (and a new song!) in Jabba the Hutt's palace, which looks more like an
outtake from a Disney musical. Secondly, I noticed a bizarre trimming of the
Ewok celebration at the end - Luke's close-ups in recognition of the spirits of
Vader, Kenobi and Yoda seemed to have been cut, and the new Ewok song is less
joyful and more of a distraction than anything else. 
Needless to say, the effects in "Jedi" are the best of the three, including the
battle on the barge in Tattoine, and the battle on Endor with the flying bikes.
Harrison Ford seems stoned out of his mind and less heroic than usual.
Ironically, it is Mark Hamill and Carrie Fisher who give the better
performances. Luke is more mature and has progressed into a full-fledged Jedi;
Leia seems to finally know how to shoot lasers and has one tender scene with
Luke; and Chewbacca, C3PO and R2D2 are more annoying than ever. Revelations are
aplenty and we finally get to see what Darth Vader really looks like under that
mask. "Jedi" is not a great film but it is a worthy successor that could have
shimmered with improvements in the script department (And get rid of those
characterless Ewoks who resemble nothing more than teddy bears!).
The special edition of the "Star Wars" trilogy is not as great as it should
have been nor does it surpass the original versions. Still, nobody should pass
up the grand opportunity of seeing this fantastic space odyssey on the silver
screen. George Lucas should be proud of renewing interest in these
science-fiction classics for a whole new generation. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general comments at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Sick: The Life & Death of Bob Flanagan, Supermasochist (1997)
"Sick: The Life and Death of Bob Flanagan, Supermasochist" is the most
disturbing, nauseating documentary ever made about a man who I am grateful to
have never met in person. This film is probably the closest you'll ever want to
get to such a freak with a predilection for pain; a man with a debilitatingly
painful disease who needs more pain to endure his own. 
Bob Flanagan is indeed a supermasochist. From an early age, he was diagnosed
with cystic fibrosis, a disease that causes the lungs to fill with phlegm and
mucus. Most people who are diagnosed with such a disease die at an early age,
some reach the age of twenty-four. Bob lived to be forty-three, the
longest-known survivor of cystic fibrosis. His way of enduring such a disease
was to punish his own body - to show God that he can do worse things to himself
than the disease He had wrought upon him! Bob becomes a member of an S & M club
where he chooses different torturous techniques such as stitches, nails, steel
balls, and the list goes on. There's a truly unwatchable moment where he nails
his penis to a wooden board! 
The main impetus of the film is Bob's own masochistic relationship with his
girlfriend of fifteen years, Sheree Rose, a dominatrix. He agrees to be her
slave, and she takes full advantage of his submissive behavior. Whenever he
wanted to have sex, he would have to write about in his journal, at Sheree's
insistence,  or there would be no sex.         Bob Flanagan is a noted
performance artist and writer, and his masochistic rituals through video
installations have become well known in most art communities. In essence, his
body has become a decorative sculpture for others to look at, e.g., "Bob and
Sheree's Contract" where Sheree carves an S into Bob' chest. Bob even inspires
a teenage girl from the Make-a-Wish Foundation, also diagnosed with cystic
fibrosis, to meet him and...start some piercing. Sheree privately admits to Bob
that maybe the girl's supposed fantasies should be fulfilled. 
"Sick" won Best Documentary at the 1997 Sundance Film Festival, and it is the
most honest documentary I've ever seen. The irony is that its uncompromising
honesty is its main fault: we never get to know Bob as well as we should.
Here's a man who says that the masochism and body modification were a way of
containing the disease, but he never truly explains how. Why is the agonizing
pain of masochism (he deeply feels it in many scenes pleading Sheree to stop) a
method of relieving his own pain? And how does any of this constitute as art,
or his need to be viewed as an "art object"? The film's best, most powerful
scene is when a bloated Bob is nearing the end of his disease, and Sheree
wonders why he will not submit to her. This scene, however, says more about
their dependent relationship than anything about Bob's personal nature.
 "Sick" is certainly fascinating and involving, but it never truly reveals
anything about Bob Flanagan, or offer any insights into his behavior. Instead,
we get a major dose of "shockarama," and some slight tidbits on Bob's family
and his needy relationship with Sheree, but not much else. "Sick" is
occasionally haunting, elegiac and lurid, but it says nothing more about this
supermasochist other than that he is sick. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or
at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for 2001: A Space Odyssey (1968)
In my early childhood, two images stayed with me and frightened me for a long 
time. One was the Mona Lisa, a reproduction that was hanging in my bedroom 
wall. The other was the Star Child from "2001: A Space Odyssey." I am still 
not sure why the latter frightened me so but I think a baby inside a 
shimmering, circular sphere would be enough to impress any 6-year-old. "2001: 
A Space Odyssey" has many memorable images and, in my mind, it is still the 
best science-fiction film ever made - the only one to truly capture the 
essence of space travel, from Jupiter to the infinite where the ineffable 
mysteries of what lies ahead holds a certain fascination for many of us here 
on Earth. I think that we tend to forget that we're a small point of interest 
in the universe and "2001" makes us feel how insignificant we are. 
Based on Arthur C. Clarke's short story, "The Sentinel," "2001" begins with 
the famous "Dawn of Man" section where numerous apes are seen living in 
cavernous surroudings. Leopards are predominant and hungry in the horizon. 
The apes shield themselves from other animals or fellow apes by mostly 
growling...but their peaceful existence is out to be demolished in one swift 
stroke. One particular ape, the Moonwatcher, develops the intelligence to 
realize that a bone can be used as a weapon - not only to eat meat by means 
of hunting and killing animals, but as a defense against other irate apes.  
And so, while his group of apes growls at the others, Moonwatcher strikes one 
ape with a bone. The peaceful, vegetarian apes have learned that violence can 
be instrumental in establishing order and change. And so the slow-motion shot 
of the Moonwatcher triumphantly throwing the bone up in the air segues to a 
magnificent transitional cut to the Orion spaceship of the 21st century - man 
has evolved and now space, which was a
 sight for the apes who gazed at the bright moonlit sky, has become the new 
frontier for more discoveries and perhaps new signs of intelligence.
It is the year 2001, as we see ships gracefully travelling through space. One 
of them carries Dr. Heywood Floyd (William Sylvester), an American scientist 
travelling from earth to a lunar space station. At the station, Floyd 
discusses to other Americans about the discovery of a monolith at Clavius, a 
station on the moon. There is a wonderfully subtle scene where, prior to the 
meeting, Floyd is reluctant to discuss the situation at Clavius to a couple 
of curious Russian scientists - he claims to know nothing about it yet admits 
he is unable to discuss it. 
The Clavius excavation is followed by the mission to Jupiter where astronauts 
Dr. David Bowman (Keir Dullea) and Dr. Frank Poole (Gary Lockwood) are 
travelling in the Discovery ship. On board are three scientists who are in 
deep hibernation for the length of the trip and the HAL 9000 computer (voiced 
by Douglas Rain), who is the brains and the eyes of the ship. Bowman and 
Poole are unaware of the purpose of the mission but HAL knows - 
unfortunately, HAL may have committed an error in judgment on a supposedly 
malfunctioning antenna. Bowman and Poole feel nothing is wrong with the 
ship's antennae, according to their thorough observations as well as that of 
another HAL 9000 computer's test from the U.S. Mission Control. Is HAL wrong, 
or are the astronauts erroneous in their calculations? Can a supercomputer 
like HAL make a mistake or are the humans at fault? 
The final half-hour of the film is one of the most superbly suspenseful, 
thrilling, visionary moments in the history of film. After Bowman realizes 
that HAL has intent to kill before letting anyone jeopardize the mission, he 
quickly disconnects HAL and begins a journey into the infinite when a 
floating monolith makes contact with him. Thus, Bowman sees a dazzling array 
of formations of geometric shapes of lights, clusters of stars, an infinite 
number of colored rays and, finally, an eighteenth century bedroom where 
noises and laughter are heard bouncing along the corridors of the unique 
decor. It is here where Bowman sees himself as a dying old man and 
ultimately, becomes the Star Child - the last evolutionary step for mankind.
Most audiences and critics were understandably puzzled by the film since more 
questions are drawn up than answers (imagine how poorly this film would have 
fared if it played in theatres today where implication is always eroded in 
favor of explicating). Does Dave Bowman become the Star Child? Is the 
monolith an alien intelligence or an evolutionary step in mankind, or both?
In answer to that question, I interpret the monolith, as I always have, as 
the next step in the evolutionary ladder and a sign of evolving intelligence, 
as demonstrated in the Dawn of Man sequence. Strangely enough, I never 
thought of it as an alien intelligence, despite the fact that scientists in 
the film allude to it as such. Heck, they could be wrong since scientists do 
make errors. 
Did HAL 9000 plan to fool Bowman and Poole with the faulty mechanism in the 
ship's antennae or did HAL really think there was a malfunction, thus making 
us believe that computers can make errors? 
I am willing to go with the latter since computers can make errors. Why? 
Well, they are man-made, aren't they? Humans make errors all the time so it 
is conceivable that a computer, like HAL 9000, could make an error. 
Ironically, as Kubrick seems to indicate, HAL is about as human and 
compassionate, to some degree, as most of the human characters in the film. 
Of course, HAL is also a murderer but he can express emotion - consider his 
final lines in the film where Dave is frantically unplugging his memory units 
("Just what do you think you are doing Dave? Dave, I am afraid.")
"2001" was once considered the ultimate acid trip back when it was released 
in 1968. 
There are also some who felt the film was too slow-paced and boring (Although 
I have heard the quote that Kubrick wanted to show that space travel was 
boring). I must disagree with the slow-pace - sure, it move slowly but it 
needs to. This is not the kind of story that requires the fast-paced, 
action-per-minute theatrics of "Star Wars." Instead, Kubrick moves his story 
slowly to show the beauty and mystery of space, the vastness of it, 
accompanied by the waltzes of composer Richard Strauss. Also noteworthy is 
the soundtrack, which is silent when Poole and Bowman investigate the 
antennae on the Discovery - occasionally you'll only hear them breathing 
which heightens the suspense. 
"2001" is not my personal favorite of Kubrick's (that honor would go to "A 
Clockwork Orange") but it is an extraordinary film of sights and sounds, and 
certainly the purest, most poetic and electrifying science-fiction film ever 
made. In its story of the vastness of space and beyond the infinite, we 
realize that in the end, our planet Earth is only a microcosm of the big 
picture. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Affliction (1997)
Nick Nolte encapsulates the weary, average working man beautifully in a raw,
bristling performance in Paul Schrader's latest exercise in machismo,
"Affliction." Nolte is so ideal in this role that it becomes iconic - his bulky
physique and dark, cropped hair remains the most frustrating character of
suburban domesticity since Jack Nicholson's Bobby Dupea in "Five Easy Pieces." 
Nolte stars as Wade Whitehouse, a born loser in a small town in New Hampshire.
He is the sheriff, a schoolbus crossing guard, and performs some chores for a
local, hot-headed businessman. He is also a rotten husband and father who
doesn't have an inkling of how to treat his unctuous daughter. His ex-wife
(Mary Beth Hurt) hates him, his straight-arrow brother (Willem Dafoe) abandoned
him and the family, his father (James Coburn) doubly hates him, and the whole
town seems to have no respect for him. 
The only one he has left to support him is his girlfriend, a kindhearted and
loyal waitress named Margie (Sissy Spacek). Margie is a name synonymous with
any small-town tale. Wade does find an avenue of restoring some respect and
dignity when an accidental shooting occurs in the woods. He feels there is a
conspiracy, a cover-up dealing with the building of a ski resort. He becomes
more resourceful, and just as pathetic. 
He beats people, drags his daughter around like a rag doll, tries to sue his
ex-wife for custody of the daughter, and gives a speeding ticket to a grieving
son whose father has just died. Wade is convinced that the conspiracy, which
has riled up the town, will make him respectable. 
The underlying story in "Affliction" is Wade's relationship to his domineering
father - both are virile yet weak men with no other agenda than to abuse. Wade
is afflicted by his father's abusive past, shown in hand-held grainy footage
with a dark-haired Coburn spouting all kinds of obscenities. It is his
childhood and his mother's untimely death that drives Wade closer and closer to
the brink of madness. 
"Affliction" does not have the degree of depth of Paul Schrader's other
machismo portraits, such as "Raging Bull" or "Taxi Driver." Somehow, we see the
weaknesses and afflicted behavior of Wade, but we rarely get close to the
demons tearing him apart. In one shattering scene, he pushes his father against
a wall, threatening to kill him if he gets close to Margie. Another scene has
him pulling his bad tooth out of his mouth and shedding a tear. They are
individual moments of isolated violence, but they do not make for a cohesive,
full-bodied portrait. 
This has a well-rounded cast, including Nolte's raw, hard-edged personality
that still makes the character unforgettable, despite the ambiguities. There is
also James Coburn, in perhaps the finest, shrewdest performance of his career,
as the monstrous, unredeeming father with a cold, heavy heart - he does have
one moment where he appears dejected after his wife's death, though there is
nothing remotely sympathetic about this man. 
Mary Beth Hurt brings a warm glow to this brutally cold landscape as the
ex-wife. She has a stirring scene where she speaks kindly about Wade's dear old
mother (while 'Ases Death' from "Peer Gynt" plays on the soundtrack) - a
beautiful, poignant moment. Sissy Spacek is nicely understated as the patient
Margie, who finds that Wade can be too much to bear. 
"Affliction" has some dark, heavy blues in its cinematographic look that
embodies the snowy environment in Russell Banks' novel - he also wrote "The
Sweet Hereafter." The performances are solid and powerful. But it's Wade's lack
of logic and unmotivated actions that may leave viewers straining to put up
with him and his afflictions. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Bowfinger (1999)
Eddie Murphy's newfangled success post-"Nutty Professor" has not exactly been
inspiring. Missing from his last few films was the wisecracking Eddie from
"Beverly Hills Cop" and "48 HRS." who made us smile with his every maneuver -
gargantuan laugh, wide grin, and a rapid-fire exchange of dialogue like a
charged-up comic ready to make you howl over with laughter at every expense.
"Coming to America" and "The Nutty Professor" were among his finest
achievements, and among some of his best acting roles to date. Add his latest
film "Bowfinger" to the crop - an often wicked comedy where his sure-handed
personality shines thanks to a solidly good script by writer-actor Steve
Martin. 
Bobby Bowfinger is the name of a low-level producer/director (Steve Martin)
with big dreams of making a motion-picture with current action star, the
paranoid Kit Ramsey (Eddie Murphy). Problem is Kit turns him down, and now
Bowfinger comes up with an inspired plan, he will make a film by secretly
filming Kit. He has cameras hidden in bushes outside Kit's mansion, and films
Kit having lunch at trendy restaurants by having his actors sneak up to him and
deliver the lines. Essentially, wherever Kit goes, Bowfinger will be there
making him the unaware star of his film. The catch is that no one in his crew
is aware that Kit has not actually been cast.
Apparently, Bowfinger saved over $1500 since his childhood to make his dream
project called "Chubby Rain," which has a ludicrous storyline dealing with
aliens hiding in drops of water. The screenplay is written by Afrim (Adam
Alexi-Malle), a "damn good writer, as well as an accountant and part-time
receptionist," assures Bowfinger. 
In terms of casting, Bowfinger has an experienced drama queen, Carol (Christine
Baranski), who's been waiting an entire year for this opportunity, and wants to
meet Kit. He's also got Daisy from Ohio (Heather Graham) who walks into his
bungalow/office with aspirations to be a star. At first rejected, then accepted
for her great kissing scenes, she finds herself sleeping to the top of this
low-level group to get more scenes written with Kit. 
Enter another actor who tries out for a part, Jiff Ramsey (also played by
Murphy), a goofy, bespectacled man who not only passes for Kit's double but is
also Kit's real-life brother. "I am an active renter at Blockbuster," says Jiff
during his audition, who assures Bowfinger that he has had accidents cutting
his own hair.
There are two hilarious scenes that had me doubled over with laughter. One is a
parking lot scene where an unseen dog wearing heels scares Kit while walking to
his car. Another equally funny scene is when Jiff runs across a Los Angeles
freeway while evading all traffic and yelling "Hail to God!" 
"Bowfinger" does fall short of expectations even with its ingenious premise, a
semi-cross between "The Truman Show" and "Living in Oblivion." Steve Martin
fails to push the film itself further with comic bang...there are often more
whimpers than genuine laughs. He is still a hell of a writer, but he holds back
too often. Some scenes as directed by Frank Oz are too flat and lack the pizazz
that they need - a chase after Kit while hiding a camera in a tree planted on
Bowfinger's truck leaves a lot to be desired. 
If nothing else, most of the actors deliver juicy performances. Eddie Murphy
has two great roles - one as the nervous superstar who tries "to keep it
together" at a Scientology-type cult led by Terence Stamp as its calm,
spiritual leader, and the other as the dim-witted, naive Jiff who for the first
time in his life feels accepted. Murphy plays these roles with aplomb, and
proves that with a good script, he can flow with comic ease and be funny as
hell. His smiles and winks are priceless.
Steve Martin is, as always, good old Steve - and here he plays the ruthless and
scheming con artist as all desperate first-time directors usually are. He'll do
anything he can to make his film, even to the point of stealing Daisy's Ohio
credit cards. Morality is never an issue when making a production - desperation
is. 
The one actor who fails to deliver is Heather Graham as the ingenue Daisy. As
in "Austin Powers 2," Graham is lifeless and oblivious - she seems to show
little in the way of comic flair or energy. A sad state of affairs from a
dramatic actress with a powerful range as she proved to have in "Boogie Nights"
and "Drugstore Cowboy." Comedy does not seem to be her forte.
"Bowfinger" is uneven and does not have the breeze or whiz of director Frank
Oz's other efforts, such as "Dirty Rotten Scoundrels," but it is full of
surprises and contains moments of inspired lunacy. Martin and Murphy make a
great team for the world of comedy - let's hope they reunite in the future.    
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at
Faust667@aol.com 

Title
Review for Vrits et mensonges (1975)
Orson Welles had the effrontery to believe that this highly original
film on art and the act of creating would be released in the United
States. It never was and was only shown on television in the United
States and in Europe, and at some film festivals. What a shame because
"F For Fake" is one of the director's finest achievements (and by far
his last complete effort), a Byzantine rethinking of what a film
should be and what it could be. It is also a reconstructive essay on
art and the artists who manage to create the art in question in any
given media. Welles takes the approach of looking at the media of
painting, literature, architecture and films, and this film is a
testament and a labor of love to anyone who is involved in the arts.
"F For Fake" begins with Welles arriving at a train station showing a
magic coin trick to an awestruck boy. He is interrupted by a passersby
(Oja Kodar) who asks him, "Up to your old tricks again?" Welles is
then greeted by a film crew led by another director Francois
Reichenbach, and tells them that there is a fascinating story
involving that passersby. We then realize that this is not really a
film and not quite a documentary, so what is it? Well, there is
another shot of Welles except this time he is at an editing table
looking at shots of Oja Kodar walking on a crowded street surrounded
by dozens of onlookers. But who is she?  Welles then apologizes for
jumping around all over the place, and sets forth in motion a story
about the most famous art forger of all time, Elmyr De Hory (who
tragically committed suicide after this film was released). He paints
fakes so brilliantly that museums often mistake it for the real thing
(Modigliani, Picasso, Monet are some of his famous "fakes"). Another
story circulates around a notable biographer, Clifford Irving, who has
written a bio on De Hory, and has just been accused of writing a fake
one on Howard Hughes! He insists he met with Hughes, but who is
telling the truth? And is it possible that De Hory is not a faker, but
a fake faker?
This may all sound ambiguous and confounding, but one of the pleasures
of "F For Fake" is the constant parallels Welles draws between all
these interweaving stories. He comes up with theories on the
importance of the creator or creators: in one beautifully stylized
sequence, we see superimpositions of the many facets of the cathedral
Chartres. Astounding architecture (independent film director Stan
Brakhage once made a short film about it) but in the end, does it
matter who created this wonder of the world? Of course not, probably
dozens of skilled artisans and the like and we may never know their
names.
Welles draws another parallel with his own life and work (apparently,
this film was intended as an attack against film critic Pauline Kael's
verbal accusation that Welles shared none of the writing credit for
"Citizen Kane"). He gives examples of his famous hoax, "The War of the
Worlds" broadcast, and the fact that all his films, indeed all films,
are illusions, essentially fakes. So by exemplifying this idea, Welles
often shows his film crew filming him as he makes his case before the
camera wearing a hat and a cape and performing magic tricks.
"F For Fake" is not an easy film to digest, and it will take more than
one viewing since it is not told in a straightforward manner. But the
rewards are plenty, and the sight of Welles speaking in his coarse,
deep voice is a splendid pleasure already. He keeps us involved and
intrigued, and we start to question the validity of the importance of
the creator of an artistic masterpiece - of course, it adds to
historical lore to know who the artist is, but the work must also
speak for itself.
As Welles explains at the beginning, any film is likely to be some
sort of lie, and so he insists that the whole truth will be spoken for
the first forty-five minutes of the film. At the end, when we discover
that Oja Kodar, the passersby from earlier, is in fact not Pablo
Picasso's daughter nor did she sell any of the paintings of herself
painted by Picasso to a museum, Welles declares that he did lie his
head off.
In its constantly time-switching narrative, freeze-frames, and sense
of self-consciousness, Orson Welles made one of his greatest
achievements on film - a master class on experimentation with the
medium and the infinite possibilities presented with tackling the
film-within-the-film. It is a shame it was not discovered initially,
but some of its style and rapid cutting is evident in Al Pacino's
superb "Looking for Richard," an expose on Shakespeare and Richard
III. Francois Truffaut declared "F For Fake" as one of the best films
of the 1970's - he could not have been more right. Right up with
"Citizen Kane," "Touch of Evil," and "The Trial," "F For Fake" reigns
supreme.
Footnote: There are cameos by Joseph Cotten and film editor on "Kane,"
Robert Wise. There is also a brief sequence with Oja and late actor
Laurence Harvey at an airport "from quite another film," says
Welles. I wonder if this was footage for his uncompleted film "The
Deep" since Welles can be seen in his cape minus a beard.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with questions, concerns or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com 

Title
Review for Stigmata (1999)
It is a pleasure to see the horror genre back again with a keen interest in the
supernatural, eschewing any of the tired slasher routines since "Scream's"
wake. It is less pleasurable to see that filmmakers can become so misguided as
to make complete drivel like "Stigmata," a poorly conceived, beautifully shot
yet pointless rip-off of "The Exorcist." 
Patricia Arquette stars as Frankie Paige, a Pittsburgh hairdresser who
frequents clubs with her pals (she also has an unseen boyfriend who no doubt
finds her to be as irritating as I did). One day, she receives a rosary from
her mother in the mail, and suddenly finds thick nail wounds on her wrists
while taking a bath. Frankie goes to the emergency room but feels no pain, and
the doctors unbelievably feel the wounds were self-inflicted. Oh, please. I
don't think anyone would have the strength to drive thick nails through their
wrists. Nevertheless, Frankie seems undaunted by all this and still goes
club-hopping. Unfortunately, her customers want someone else to cut their hair
(understandable, I mean, would you want someone with bandages around their
wrists to cut your hair?). Frankie starts to see visions, such as a woman
dropping a baby on a street corner. She also suffers more wounds, like being
relentlessly whipped in a out-of-control subway car. 
The truth is that she is afflicted with stigmata, the supposed wounds that
Christ suffered during the crucifixion. So, yes, there are the whippings,
thorns penetrating her skull, nails driven through her wrists and feet, and so
on. But nothing seems to faze Frankie, she just becomes annoyed that such an
affliction would get in the way of her nightlife and sex life. Another truth
glossed over is that stigmatics are usually Catholic, but in Frankie's case,
she is atheist. But this rosary apparently came from a Brazilian priest who
passed the stigmata to the next available customer (Question: how come
Frankie's mother did not get it first?)
The Vatican (almost all of its members photographed in deep shadows) discovers
this particular stigmatic, and decide to employ Father Andrew Kiernan (Gabriel
Byrne), a scientist who determines the veracity of miracles around the world,
to investigate this woman and see if she is indeed a spiritual manifestation of
the Holy Ghost. Kiernan finds that she is, but he is also a man grappling with
his own faith (read Jason Miller's Father Karras in "Exorcist"). I was curious
about a scene where he almost decides not to pursue the case once Frankie
admits to being atheist. Of course, why any of these spiritual happenings would
affect an atheist is a question never posed by anyone in the entire movie.
Instead, we get intimate scenes between the girl and the priest, some moments
of brief possession, and a laughable fiery exorcism sequence that lifts whole
sections of dialogue from "The Exorcist." What any of this has to with stigmata
is beyond me.
"Stigmata" has certain ambitions to be either a spiritually cleansing exercise
or a psychological portrait of a self-destructive young woman grappling with
her spiritual beliefs. Instead, director Rupert Wainwright depicts Frankie's
life-changing event as if it were an inconvenience. Also, we get alot of talk
about how deeply painful it is to be stigmatic because there are so many
repercussions from different spirits, both good and evil. But Frankie is an
unchanged woman from beginning to end - a cipher with no inner life. She never
seems affected or truly afflicted, despite the numerous special-effects and
mili-second cuts of drops of water and horrid images of bleeding wounds. Those
are all devices constructed as if we were watching an MTV film with music by
Nine Inch Nails, and they detract from the character and the story. 
"Stigmata" has caused a haelstorm of controversy because it is seemingly
anti-Catholic. As written by Tom Lazarus and Rick Ramage, the film is not good
enough to provoke any such argument. The only committed heresy is how much of
it is borrowed from "The Exorcist." 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with questions, concerns or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at
Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Bis ans Ende der Welt (1991)
UNTIL THE END OF THE WORLD (1991) - Reviewed by Jerry Saravia
Wim Wenders' "Until the End of the World" is a fascinating, fractured, 
disconnected mess of a movie. Watching it recently for the second time, I 
found it less enthralling than I had initially. It is like watching a trailer 
for a film that is not quite complete. 
It is the year 1999 and an Indian nuclear satellite has spun out of control 
causing great alarm around the world. Claire Tourneur (Solveig Dommartin), an 
adventurous partygoer, could care less about a potential nuclear crisis. She 
loves to sleep endlessly and listen to rock and roll music, especially 
Elvis's "Summer Kisses, Winter Tears" (also sung in the film by David Lynch 
regular Julee Cruise). While traveling back home, Claire finds herself 
iadvertently involved with two bank robbers, a traveler wearing a fedora hat 
named Trevor Mcphee (William Hurt), who is being hunted by the government, a 
bounty hunter, and so on. This all takes them to a spiritual habitat in the 
Australian Outback where Farber's father, a crotchety scientist (Max Von 
Sydow), lives with his blind wife (Jeanne Moreau). 
I do not wish to reveal much more of the film except to say that the first 
half is brilliant moviemaking, exploring a world inhabited by videophones, 
digital video cameras, headsets that can record images, tracking devices, all 
told in an almost noirish, Godardian landscape (in fact, both Dommartin and 
Hurt seem to be doing variations on the characters in Godard's "Breathless" 
and "Pierrot le Fou.") Most of what the film shows has become a reality today 
in the year 2000, though videophones never took off. The ability to trace 
anyone anywhere is also a real possibility, even on the Internet. 
Once the characters settle in Australia, the film loses its urgency and 
potency. Basically, we are left with endless shots of people strapped to 
chairs while enduring dream hypnosis and other sleep-inducing phenomena so 
that a new kind of camera can record and visualize people's dreams. The 
characters in this section of the film become less interesting as well. Why 
the hell does Claire follow the listless Farber all around the world? Does 
she truly love him or does she want the money he stole from her? I think it 
may have been a mistake to show a femme fatale with a compassionate, sweet 
aura - the transition is simply not there and thus not believable. Dommartin 
seems to be playing the same angelic, melancholy character she played in 
Wenders' "Wings of Desire." Characters such as the devious bounty hunter, the 
sloppy government agent, the whimsical bank robbers, and Claire's boring 
boyfriend, an author (Sam Neill, who also narrates the film) all become 
ciphers literally kept in the background. 
Every sequence set in Australia feels disconnected and rushed, though the 
soundtrack and the sight of seeing the towering presences of Max Von Sydow 
and Jeanne Moreau keeps one glued as to what happens next. It all sort of 
feels choppy and not edited with smooth transitions from one scene to the 
next. The reason may be that Wim Wenders initially had a longer cut, 
reportedly five hours long and shown briefly at a university in 1996. I wait 
for the day when this cut becomes available and shown in cinema screens. 
Heck, if they did it for "Das Boot" and "The Last Emperor," they can do it 
for Wenders' film. 
Despite the flaws and narrative inconsistencies, "Until the End of the World" 
is brave, original, risky, full of ambitious ideas, and often a sight to 
behold (including the innovative use, at the time, of high-definition 
television). It is often compelling and moving enough to make one wish it 
were better. I am sure the longer, director's cut is the great film that this 
truncated version aspires to be. 

Title
Review for Chocolat (2000)
"Chocolat" is the kind of syrupy, mystical fable that audiences will able to 
fully ingest and come back for seconds. It is simple and simple-minded enough 
for mainstream audiences but for others, its ambitions point to something far 
more than what is delivered. 
As "Chocolat" opens, a brazen wind blows through the French countryside until 
it arrives in a small religious town where it settles upon thrusting open the 
doors of the local church. Inside the church are the locals, including Comte 
de Reynaud (Alfred Molina) who is a bit perturbed by the sudden whiff of air. 
Nevertheless, the wind brings in two nomadic, red-cloaked outsiders, Vianne 
(Juliette Binoche) and her daughter, Anouk (Victoire Thivisol). They arrive 
in town ready to open a delicious chocolate shop, though their timing 
couldn't be more off. Vianne is opening her shop during the Lent season, 
observed by most of the local denizens who intend on fasting. The problem is 
Vianne is atheist and causes turmoil with the Comte, who basically runs the 
town despite the fact he is only a historian. The Comte even revises the 
young priest's sermons to his own moralist liking!
What is Vianne to do? She has a wonderful shop full of Mayan chocolate 
recipes served with chili powder and whipped cream but thanks to Comte's 
rising intervention, she may not be able to keep any customers. It is bad 
enough that her darling Anouk, who has an imaginary kangaroo friend, is 
Vianne's illegitimate daughter. That doesn't seem to irk the crotchety, 
rebellious Armande (Judi Dench), Vianne's landlady, who favors Vianne's hot 
chocolates. Pretty soon the kleptomaniac Josephine (Lena Olin), physically 
abused by her cafe owner husband (Peter Stormare), moves into Vianne's shop 
and begins baking chocolate with her. And as luck would have it, a gypsy 
named Roux (Johnny Depp) arrives in town, ready to dazzle and court Vianne, 
causing rising temper tantrums in Comte and the town itself who oppose 
gypsies. 
Nothing in "Chocolat" occurs that can't be predicted on some level yet it is 
Lasse Hallstrom's assured direction that makes up for the film's too tidy 
climax and formulaic structure. Hallstrom also has a gift for knowing how to 
handle actors and make them luminescent. Nothing could be further from the 
truth than Juliette Binoche, who gives new meaning to the term 
"incandescent." Every shot with Binoche is bright and lovely beyond words, 
and I can't think of a better actress to play the seductive Vianne. She is 
delightful, witty, beautiful and tempestuous. Comte refers to her as Satanic, 
but her seductive charm is in guessing what kind of chocolate her customers 
prefer and thus tempting them to sample it.
Alfred Molina gives one of his most magnificent performances yet, teetering 
on the edge between cartoonish villain and a virtuous, righteous man. His 
subtle glances and grimaces are terrifically timed. Dame Judi Dench also cuts 
another beautiful performance as the snippy landlord who is estranged from 
her strict daughter (Carrie-Ann Moss). Lena Olin is at her most emotionally 
heartfelt since "Enemies: A Love Story" as the battered wife who tries to 
separate herself from her loutish husband. 
"Chocolat" is delightful but also fluffy, and ends with a sermon from the 
young priest that is superficial and preachy beyond words - the dialogue as 
said sounds written, not spoken. And isn't it possible that the film could 
have taken place in some other season besides Lent to accommodate the film's 
theme of how intolerance can corrupt yet can also prove to be incorruptible? 
Isn't it enough that a woman in a red cloak and red shoes with an 
illegitimate daughter comes into a Catholic town unveiling the repressed 
spirits of all the townsfolk with her Mayan chocolate? Still, "Chocolat" is a 
nice treat but it could have used the weight of films like "Like Water For 
Chocolate" or "Babette's Feast" to make for a richer dessert. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, complaints or general comments at 
Faust667@aol.com or at faustus_08520@yahoo.com

Title
Review for Stranger, The (1946)
Orson Welles tried for many years to get Hollywood financing for his films but proved unsuccessful, considering the omen following the disastrous reception for his beloved 1942 film "The Magnificent Ambersons." "The Stranger" was his first and only attempt at making a commercial film - if the film had been a success, it might have helped his career but the film flopped. It is a strangely disappointing film that, at its worst, is impersonal and cold-hearted. Even Welles called it "the worst film of my career." 
Orson Welles takes the title role as a Harper, Connecticut schoolteacher named Charles Rankin, who is in fact an ex-Nazi war criminal named Franz Kindler. Rankin is hiding out in a town where nobody would expect to find a Nazi, especially during the late 1940's. Another Nazi criminal, Meinike, is released from prison and comes to visit Kindler. Of course, a war criminal investigator (Edward G. Robinson) follows Meinike to Connecticut and what was once a tranquil town becomes fraught with danger. 
"The Stranger" is the kind of picture Hitchcock was known for, having all the necessary suspense and thriller elements in place. We know from the start that Rankin is a Nazi and that he is married to an innocent American girl (Loretta Young) and this invariably creates an atmosphere of tension - too bad Welles doesn't follow through with it. The faults lie with the numerous loose ends and all too neat-wrap trivializing the intriguing premise (the producers had forced Welles to make several cuts). For instance, how could Kindler's American wife be so forgiving when Kindler confesses to being an ex-Nazi? It doesn't help that Loretta Young as the wife overacts and her pitiful crying and pleas render her unsympathetic. Of course, the investigator realizes from the start that Rankin is Kindler, so why doesn't he have him arrested? After all, the police find Meinike's body in the woods (Rankin kills him in a chilling scene), Loretta's dog is killed by Rankin, etc - all this occurs i!
!
n the first act. Plus, there isn't a single character whom we can identify with (excluding Robinson's) because nothing believable or plausible happens to any single person in this movie. 
There are, however, some fine performances in this muddled mess. Welles plays one of his best villainous roles, and he plays it fairly straight with an icy interior and exterior - only a quiver of a smile hints at any semblance of humanity. Edward G. Robinson is wonderfully restrained as the investigator, and there's ample comic relief by Billy House as Potter, a checkers-playing owner of a drugstore. Only Loretta Young is pathetic to watch and she sinks the movie in the last half-hour with her incessant whimpering and melodramatic panting. 
"The Stranger" has some tour-de-force tracking shots through the woods of this amicable town, and there is a recurring emblematic use of shadows to build tension. Once Young enters the picture, though, all credibility goes out the window, and the film is so sloppily edited that the plot structure collapses. "The Stranger" is a flawed, suspenseless, campy thriller seemingly atypical of Welles's forte. See the far superior "Saboteur" and "Sabotage." 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Cecil B. DeMented (2000)
Author: Faust667@aol.com (Jerry Saravia)
Subject: Review: Cecil B. Demented (2000)
Approved: graham@ee.washington.edu
Newsgroups: rec.arts.movies.reviews
Organization: None
X-Questions-to: graham@jetcity.com
X-Submissions-to: graham@ee.washington.edu
Followup-To: rec.arts.movies.current-films
Summary: r.a.m.r. #28087
Keywords: author=saravia
I am not sure what to make of John Waters at this point. The witty Baltimore 
trash director who opened the world's eyes with the fabulously disgusting 
"Pink Flamingos" has followed that hit with more lows than highs. For every 
"Hairspray" and "Serial Mom," there were travesties to cinematic decency such 
as "Cry-Baby" and "Pecker." "Cecil B. Demented" shows me a director who is 
sinking to such a low extreme that I found myself trying to come up for air 
repeatedly. 
Cecil B. Demented (Stephen Dorff) is a no-budget film director/cult leader 
who along with his crew, known as the "Sprocket Holes," kidnap a famous movie 
star, Honey Whitlock (Melanie Griffith) and force her to star in their own 
demented production. Cecil's intent is to shoot a film titled "Raging Beauty" 
about outlaw filmmakers who bust in and out of multiplexes, production 
meetings and more multiplexes to proclaim their rant that Hollywood, 
basically, sucks! Their hostage, Honey with a peroxide hairdo, will help them 
fight their cause by threatening everyone with a gun and ranting their 
philosophies such as "Death to those who support mainstream cinema!"  
"The Sprocket Holes" are a motley crew of punkish, insufferably smug 
character types that include Cherish (Alicia Witt), an incest victim who is 
also a former porno star; a drug addict named Lyle (Adrienne Grenier) who 
consumes all substances and plays the leading man in Demented's film, and 
Rodney (Jack Noseworthy), the hair stylist, who hates being heterosexual. 
There is also a makeup artist, Raven (Maggie Gyllenhaal), a Satanic 
worshipper who adores Kenneth Anger and Aleister Crowley, and a butch female 
cinematographer and producer, and so on. None of these characters elicit much 
interest or inspiration. They come across as flat caricatures. 
In the end, that may be the problem with John Waters. His last excruciating 
film, "Pecker", was so flatly staged that it induced boredom more than 
anything else. There is no drive, no energy, no real sense of movement in 
this film either. You get the sense that Waters only filmed one take of every 
scene with no punch or irony. Of course, none of that would matter if the 
film was funny but it is decidely not. The fundamental question is: who is 
Waters really attacking in this film? It may seem like Hollywood but that is 
a moot point when you consider savagely funny satires such as "The Player", 
"Living in Oblivion" and "My Life's in Turnaround," to name but a few. Also 
consider how in the last few years, independent films have become almost as 
mainstream as Hollywood. Has Waters heard of Miramax, which is literally 
Hollywood in the East Coast, the same company that produced "The English 
Patient"? The term "indie" has been abused so often that the line between 
Hollywood and independent is very thin. And what company has produced Waters 
latest? Well, it is Artisan entertainment, the same company that puts its 
label on a new video edition of Schwarzeneger's "The Terminator"! 
"Cecil B. Demented" is simply not demented enough or savage enough to really 
attack its targets and so as satire, it fails miserably. The actors shout and 
rant but with little purpose or ingenuity. The film ends with a crowd forming 
around the drive-in showing of Honey's last Hollywood opus while Cecil and 
his demented group go around having sex with each other while the cops shoot 
at them. It may seem radical but I would call it desperate at best. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at 
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Stir of Echoes (1999)
Kevin Bacon is another one of our most unsung actors in the movies whose talent
is often unspoken of. This man has appeared in "J.F.K," "Sleepers," "A Few Good
Men," and "Apollo 13." He has also had his footing in the sci-fi/horror genre
in films like the original "Friday the 13th," "Flatliners" and "Tremors." It is
nice to see him back in this genre with the fitfully exciting and alternately
disturbing "Stir of Echoes." 
Bacon plays Tom Witzky, a telephone service repairman with a faithful, pregnant
wife (Kathryn Erbe) and a cute son (Zachary David Cope) who talks to himself in
his bedroom and in the bathtub. But who is he talking to? Some unseen force or
spirit, or is it the kids' imagination? Of course, a creepiness sets in when we
see that he is talking to us, and we are the spirits.
One night, Tom goes to a neighborhood keg party and is hypnotized by his
sister-in-law (the quixotically alive Illeana Douglas). Afterwards, he begins
to get headaches, drinks orange juice by the gallon, and feels the need to dig
his backyard searching for something. Tom also sees visions of the ghost of a
missing girl in the neighborhood, and every time he gets close to her, he feels
cold and sees frost in the air (shades of "The Sixth Sense"). Everyone thinks
he is going crazy except for his son who tells him not to be afraid.  
"Stir of Echoes" is great, intriguing entertainment for the first hour. Tom's
visions begin to get more bizarre and violent, and he also foresees the future.
We also see how this affects his wife, their sex life, and his son who seems to
embody other spirits (he is possessed briefly at one point). Unfortunately, as
written by Richard Matheson (based on his 1958 novel) and David Koepp, the
movie gradually stirs itself into a narrow corner. Too many plot threads are
left hanging and we are left with a movie about the spectre of a dead girl who
affects an entire neighborhood.
Once the film examines the mystery of this girl, "Stir of Echoes" never truly
builds on the psychological layers of Tom's character to see how this might
affect him. There is nothing here to suggest the implicit ironies of "The Sixth
Sense" or Roman Polanski's masterpiece, "The Tenant." And the anticlimactic,
mediocre ending lends little in the film's favor. 
There is still a lot to savor in "Stir of Echoes." Kevin Bacon projects anxiety
and fear in a nicely balanced performance - his cocky, tense behavior is
well-modulated but he could have done so much more with an in-depth script.
Illeana Douglas is a sprightly wonder and brings the film alive with her
charisma. A real shame that she is so underused considering she unleashes the
can of visions to Tom in the first place. I also enjoyed Kevin Dunn's brief
role as Tom's sexually lustful friend. 
There are some surprises but not enough to overcome the fact that "Stir of
Echoes" is nothing more than an extended "Twilight Zone" episode. It had more
potential than that, if only writers Matheson and director David Koepp stirred
all the elements to come up with a fruitier mix.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or
at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Being John Malkovich (1999)
For sheer audacity and outrageous invention, you can do no better than the 
truly extraordinary "Being John Malkovich," a bizarre, involving, strangely 
moving film experience. Putting it plainly, it is unlike anything I have ever 
seen before. 
John Cusack stars as a long-haired puppeteer named Craig Schwartz, an 
expressive, magical talent who performs his act on the streets. Most of his 
puppet shows contain sexual connotations, and thus are not always embraced by 
passerby. He lives at home with his animal-loving wife, Lotte (an 
unrecognizable Cameron Diaz), but the marriage is unexciting and their 
conversations do not merit much communication. When Craig is not performing, 
he sleeps most of the day until he gets the energy to look for a job. This 
leads him to an office vicinity located in the 7 1/2th floor of a Manhattan 
building (one has to crawl in between floors to get in) where he works as a 
fast file clerk. It is here where he discovers a mysterious portal that leads 
into the mind of John Malkovich! 
The portal changes Craig's life, as well as Lotte's (who forms a sexual 
awakening). Along for the ride is Craig's co-worker. a sexpot vixen 
(cunningly played by Catherine Keener) whom Craig is attracted to. To say 
much more is to ruin the fun of "Being John Malkovich," which takes its 
central idea through all kinds of delirious heights and lengths with one 
inventive twist after another. We are talking sexual connotations galore, 
celebrities, parentage, a one-hundred-year-old office manager, chimps, wooden 
puppets, a bald-headed Charlie Sheen and, of course, John Malkovich. 
Cusack's Craig is the perfect foible for this type of bizarre fantasy - the 
Everyman as the malcontent artist trying to make a name for himself any which 
way he can. We are led every step of the way of his unusual circumstance, and 
slowly the subjective stance of his character shifts to Lotte, back to Cusack 
and Keener, and Malkovich. This leads to an interesting question: whose life 
is it anyway? Anyone can live inside Malkovich's mind briefly before being 
deported hilariously into the New Jersey Turnpike, but when can a mind not be 
your own? Craig uses this portal as a portal into his own alternate 
existence, and the film grows more complex and darkly comic as Craig's 
ambitions grow.
Cameron Diaz is astoundingly good, and proves she is a fine character actress 
- look how well she disappears into the role of the sexually carnivirous 
Lotte. This is clearly her finest work since the comic powerhouse of "There's 
Something About Mary." Catherine Keener gives an acutely observant 
performance - her best scenes are when she tries to woo Malkovich (in and out 
of his brain) or when she seduces Charles and Lotte in their apartment. 
Malkovich is as always Malkovich, an elegantly stylish actor - he seems like 
the right actor for this kind of mind trip, though the running joke in the 
film is that most of the characters can't recall what films he has appeared 
in.
"Being John Malkovich" is directed by music-video director Spike Jonze, who 
often relies a bit too much on hand-held camerawork, but nevertheless has an 
efficient, straightforward style. Writer Charlie Kaufman must have had a 
wonderful time concocting all the different paradoxes and twists with such a 
novel idea - he runs with it and takes it from one extreme to another. It is 
not so much about being someone else as it is about losing your soul in the 
process. This is the first film I would literally call a mind trip of the 
first order. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com 
or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Men in Black (1997)
Do we really need more movies about aliens? Since the success of the mediocre
"Independence Day," the multiplex has been full of them. Television has "The
famous black-and-white footage of a supposed alien autopsy. We have also had
the marvelously witty and wicked satire "Mars Attacks!" but seriously folks,
the thrill is gone. "Men in Black" is an entertainingly engaging comedy, and is
full of whiz-bang effects galore, but it doesn't come close to the level of
"Mars Attacks!"
During the opening sequence, we see Will Smith as a cop chasing a remarkably
fast and superhuman killer who leaps from a high-rise building and disappears.
It turns out the killer is an alien, and the Man in Black (Tommy Lee Jones)
arrives on the scene and blasts Will's face with some kind of flashlight stick
called a "neuralizer." Pretty soon, Smith hesitantly joins Jones in a secret
organization called M.I.B., led by a big boss played by Rip Torn who "works 27
hours a day." Their job is to monitor the 1,500 extraterrestrials who disguise
themselves as humans and are mostly residing in Manhattan. Any human memory of
aliens is zapped by the M.I.B's neuralizers. The aliens themselves are not
really evil or monstrous, they are really annoying! One of them even disguises
himself as a dog. 
One evil visitor lands in a farmer's backyard. The bug-like alien kills the
farmer and assumes human form as played by Vincent D'Onofrio - he becomes a
decomposing zombie with an obvious limp. This becomes a sly, amusing joke and
it as wacky and overdone as you can imagine. Still, director Barry Sonnenfeld
("Get Shorty") has a commonplace flaw - he tends to take the spontaneity out of
all the numerous gags and jokes by presenting them one after another and
compressing them, and then giving us some dead space until the truly funny
climax. This become more overbearing than exhilarating, and you might forget
most of the jokes since they slip by so quickly. "Men in Black" runs by at a
full-throttle speed of 98 minutes, but it never truly takes off.
The performances hit all the right notes. Tommy Lee Jones and Will Smith have
great comic chemistry and seem to be having a great time. D'Onofrio is a real
riot to watch, although Linda Fiorentino is underutilized, as most female leads
are nowadays, as a doctor who is constantly neuralized. The biggest scene
stealer is an alien disguised as a dog ("You can kiss my furry little butt.")
that provides the biggest laugh in the entire movie. 
The visual effects are impressive, especially the final shot of an alien
holding the entire universe on the palm of his hand, and Sonnenfeld has a quick
directorial eye (his visual inventiveness since "The Addams Family," though,
has diminished). The movie is definitely fun yet somewhat dispiriting, and is
not half as clever as the original "Ghostbusters." Another flaw is that it
starts and stops frequently after a bright, rhythmic half-hour - a problem that
conflicts most box-office bonanzas. It's decent fun but, frankly, I've had it
with aliens and would prefer more dinosaurs any day.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with questions, concerns or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com 

Title
Review for Beavis and Butt-head Do America (1996)
They represent the ostensibly gross, stupid, stoned and horny teenagers of America. They are Beavis and Butthead, the popular animated duo from MTV (created and voiced by director Mike Judge) whose only form of vocabulary is "Huh, huh, huh, huh. That was cool." A half-hour of these two nitwits is one thing, but a full hour-and-a-half!
Now, I did watch a couple of episodes of their MTV show during 1994 when they were quite popular. Their act was mildly funny, but it was also an accurate portrait of the dumb and dumber set of teens in the 1990's. They were nihilistic to the max! They rarely went to school, and they didn't care about anything or anyone except...watching TV, particularly music videos. 
This movie has the duo looking for their stolen television set. They get on a "DreamAmerica" bus, and are inadvertently branded as hitmen by the media. The FBI is pursuing them trying to retrieve a stolen device hidden in Beavis's shorts! All the naive Beavis and Butthead want to do is score by bedding down with a tough chick named Dallas (voiced by Demi Moore). 
Beavis and Butthead Do America is repetitious and boring warranting only a few mild chuckles. The PG-13 rating defuses a lot of the jokes, and the movie suffers from too many bland gags and not enough social commentary on today's teens. The best scene is towards the end where Beavis overdoses on caffeine pills and coffee and, literally, goes berserk as he becomes "Cornhoolio." I also like the scenes with B & B trying to score with Dallas. It is also a pleasure to hear Robert Stack's voice as the FBI Agent Fleming, but he even he gets monotonous. Beyond that folks, there's not much more. Hearing and listening to Beavis and Butthead's limited vocabulary for an inordinate amount of time is not what I would call good comedy or good satire. Wayne and Garth rule, if you ask me. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
If you have any questions, comments or complaints, e-mail me at Faust667@aol.com or at jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Ninth Gate, The (1999)
Johnny Depp stars as Dean Corso, a goateed, unethical book dealer who
specializes in finding rare books for wealthy collectors (the kind of books not
available online at Amazon.com). One particular collector, Boris Balkan (Frank
Langella), requests Dean's help in locating two existing copies of "The Nine
Gates of the Kingdom of the Shadows," a guide on how to conjure the spirit of
Satan, reportedly written by Satan himself. But Satan could not have written
three different copies of the same book, now could he? Dean's job is to
authenticate the other existing copies, and to determine if Balkan's is the
real deal. At first hesitant, Dean decides to travel to New York, Paris and
Portugal on his search. He encounters twin booksellers, a feisty widow (Lena
Olin), a stringent baroness in a wheelchair (Barbara Jefford), and an
aristocrat who plays the violin (Jack Taylor) and lays out all his precious
books on the floor of his living room. Naturally there are mysterious deaths
along the way, and there is a mysterious woman, identified in the credits as
the Girl, with piercing green eyes (Emanuelle Seigner, Polanski's wife) who
happens to appear wherever Dean goes. 
"The Ninth Gate" has a smoothly refined, exquisitely moody feel to it, thanks
to the amber, murky tones in the cinematography. Every scene in the film feels
as if there are mysterious forces within waiting to be uncovered, and the pages
of the books evoke an elusiveness in Dean's close introspection of every single
detail - you just sense he will find something which may lead nowhere. That is
Polanski's gift as a storyteller, letting minute details flourish in our mind
but we must be quick to catch them. I like the way he makes us focus on the
Girl when she first appears at Balkan's lecture, he tilts the camera down to
show that her legs barely touch the floor where she sits. The other neat touch,
though incidental in theory, is when Balkan shows Dean his collection of books
guarded by glass doors where the password to open them is 666. I also found it
interesting that Dean never sees the Girl floating in the air whenever chaos
ensues. 
In the past, Polanski's atmosphere, mood and implicit horror always lead to a
dramatic, shocking finale, as in "Repulsion" or "Rosemary's Baby." This time,
the film sort of ends but in such an abrupt, wanting fashion that we wonder why
he went through the whole expense of involving us in the first place. To add
insult to injury, the film's final half-hour is submerged in absolute ridicule,
including a laughable Satanic ceremony, Langella yelling and screaming while
chanting to Satan, and a gratuitous sex scene that would make Hugh Hefner
chuckle with derisive laughter. 
I still enjoyed "Ninth Gate" overall but it is more of an exercise in style
than substance, and Polanski does not take the film as seriously as he should
have. It is as if he wanted to revisit the themes of "Rosemary's Baby" and
decided to end it all in a "Fearless Vampire Killers" mode. A guilty pleasure
for us, and probably for Roman as well.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or comments at faustus_08520@yahoo.com
or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Jurassic Park III (2001)
The ads proclaim that this is not just another a walk in the park. Indeed, it is
in fact a well-travelled path through the same damn park. Do not expect the
filmmakers of this latest snooze to know what it means to entertain the
audience. One, twice, maybe. The third time is not the charm. The diamond should
be cut ever so delicately so that it can still sparkle. Here, it is more like a
piece of charcoal. 
Let's consider the premise, if you wish to call it that of this latest sequel. A
kid is left alone in a Costa Rican island known as Site B or, to Jurassic fans,
Isla Sorna. Dr. Grant (Sam Neill), a survivor of the original "Jurassic" film,
is persuaded by a rich businessman, Paul Kirby (William H. Macy) and his wife,
Amanda (Tea Leoni), to go on a tour of the island, which happens to be infested
with dinosaurs. This is no ordinary tour since it turns out that the kid who is
HOME ALONE IN ISLA SORNA happens to be related to the Kirbys. Now Grant must
confront those sneaky velociraptors and other dangerous breeds of dinosaurs but
since he has field experience, he should have no problem. Only the Kirbys and
the other members of the tour (including Michael Jeter in a brief role who
brings some inkling of humor) are what Jeff Goldblum's Dr. Malcolm in "The Lost
World" referred to as "fruitcakes." 
That brief premise is a basic concept that can be described as a pitch to a
Hollywood studio executive. It is not the basis for a movie. It is just an
idea...but what else is there? Not much except countless scenes of dinosaur
carnage, loud Dolby-ized roars, hums and thumps, Tea Leoni overexemplifying her
screams and that is it. Some brief mention of genetic engineering holds some
interest but hardly enough since it is barely mentioned again. 
Joe Johnston ("The Rocketeer") takes over the directing chair but you, sir, are
no Steven Spielberg. Spielberg knew how much to show on screen and when to aim
for some brief over-the-top thrills. He also had the gift for imbuing us with
giddiness and a sense of wonder whenever a dinosaur popped up on screen.
Johnston, however, overdirects to the hilt as if he was back in "Jumanji"
terrain and he has a less than capable editor at the helm (where is Michael Kahn
when you need him?) Thus, the film feels disconnected and fruitless in the
second half as it shows a dinosaur attack, one-dimensional characters bickering,
another attack, more bickering, etc. In the last half-hour, the movie seems to
have one too many climaxes and never exactly arrives at a conclusion. Monotony
sets in early and it becomes a chore to sit through the movie, even at a
seemingly painless 90 minute running time. 
The first two "Jurassic Parks" were mindless monster movies to be sure but they
at least had a central theme and some sense of purpose. The first film was about
the danger of meddling with nature and packaging something unique to the masses
- it was a modern-day "Frankenstein" tale. The second film had a more ecological
theme, and an understanding of how animals nurture and care for their young.
This movie (not based on any novel by Michael Crichton) is about nothing. There
is no theme, no sense of purpose and little in the way of ingenuity except to
show how life-threatening it is to be trapped in an island of untamed dinosaurs.
Why are we back at Isla Sorna, the same island from the last picture? Why not
take the dinosaurs to New York City to be exhibited only to then run rampant
around the city? A more modern approach to "King Kong" would have ended the
series with a bang rather than a whimper. And why leave Laura Dern hanging in a
thankless cameo?
"Jurassic Park III" has one or two scary sequences that recall the thrill and
intensity of the first film. It is also modest fun for a while seeing William H.
Macy maintain a straight face throughout. Still, other actors are left to appear
as gaping idiots, particularly Leoni who grates the nerves and Sam Neill, who
seems to be coasting by with nary a trace of the humor or pathos he brought to
the original. In short, this is a soulless, joyless movie bereft of
three-dimensional characters or a strong, compelling story or theme.  It is
decidedly no walk in the park. 
Footnote: *SPOILER* Sam Neill and Laura Dern turn out to be divorced this time
out, though she has kids and is remarried. At the end of the first film, they
were happily married. What happened to them since? It could have provided some
illumination on Neill's Dr. Grant character at least. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, complaints or general comments at Faust668@aol.com
or at faustus_08520@yahoo.com

Title
Review for Jackie Brown (1997)
Aside from "Reservoir Dogs" and "Pulp Fiction," Quentin Tarantino has not
exactly grabbed audiences with some of his later work. Anyone care to remember
his minute directing bit for the awful anthology "Four Rooms"? Except for the
over-the-top "From Dusk Till Dawn," Tarantino was in danger of overexposure
since he appeared in dozens of less-than-wonderful supporting roles in other
directors' movies. Now, at last, comes Tarantino's first major film as writer
and director since "Pulp Fiction," and what a joy it is to see him back.
"Jackie Brown" is Tarantino at the top of his game - foul-mouthed, wickedly
funny writing with ball-of-fire performances by the whole cast. 
The titled character is played by glamorous, former blaxploitation star Pam
Grier as a 44-year-old airline stewardess who's carrying smuggled money from
Mexico to a suave arms dealer, Ordell Robbie (Samuel L. Jackson). Jackie,
however, is eventually apprehended and arrested by two ATF agents (Michael
Keaton and Michael Bowen) as she arrives in California. She doesn't want to
spend the rest of her days in jail so she cuts a deal with the agents to
double-cross Ordell (and, naturally, the agents) out of his remaining
half-million dollar stash. The switchover is to take place in a less
conspicuous rendezvous - a mall.         
Ordell's own life is always on the fringe. He has to contend with his beach
bunny, pot-smoking girlfriend Melanie (Bridget Fonda) who reluctantly answers
his business calls, and his sedate partner Louis Gara (Robert De Niro) who
continually smokes pot with Melanie. Ordell bails out Jackie by talking to the
taciturn, sensible bail bondsman Max Cherry (Robert Forster) who has been in
the business for far too long. When Max escorts Jackie out of jail, he becomes
deeply smitten by her. She loves the Delfonics, particularly on vinyl. He goes
out and buys the album on cassette, not understanding why she hasn't succumbed
to the "CD revolution." What develops is a sweet, subtle love story that is
quite unusual for Tarantino, but he handles it with grace and vigor.         
"Jackie Brown" is an unusual crime picture - it is slow, stately and handled
with refreshing restraint. There are no car chases, no heads are blown up and
there's not much gunfire. There are only four murders in the entire film and
they are handled discreetly. Did I say this was a crime picture? You bet. If
you're expecting the loud, pumped up volume of Quentin's earlier work, you'll
be sorely disappointed. Based on Elmore Leonard's solidly good crime novel "Rum
Punch," Tarantino's colorful, fast-talking writing is the movie's main star,
and his rhythmic dialogue has not failed him. 
Another major plus is the star-studded performances. Samuel L. Jackson is
terrifically engaging as the murderous, long-haired Ordell who is
simultaneously trying to support three different girlfriends and run a
business. He has a great scene, one of several, where he tries to coax "former
employee" Beaumont (Chris Tucker) into going in the trunk of his car. 
Robert De Niro does a great job playing the unbelievably stupid, oily Louis who
has a brief fling with Melanie. De Niro goes ballistic towards the end (during
the switchover) in one of the most riotous scenes in the movie. Bridget Fonda
is also cast against type as the flirty, naive Melanie who claims to "know as
much about guns as Ordell does."
Pam Grier and Robert Forster, however, are the main attractions of this film.
They both imbue the screen with a certain maturity and level of growing old
with grace that is both sweet and regaling. Grier exudes sex appeal, toughness,
charm and intelligence in various stages of distress and romantic interludes -
she has no qualms about sticking a gun at Ordell's privates. Forster gives a
beautifully modulated performance of understated humor and panache; it is one
of his best character roles since "Medium Cool." Academy Award nominations are
certainly in order here. 
"Jackie Brown" is longish and suffers somewhat from Michael Keaton's mannered
performance, but it is always entertaining and involving. It brims with many
pleasures and surprises, and there are the trademark pop-culture references and
sudden shocks of violence that are a major part of Tarantino terrain. Chock
full of snappy 70's tunes, "Jackie Brown" is Quentin's most accomplished work
by far - a twisty, exhilarating, revisionist take on film noir crossed with
pulp fiction. 

Title
Review for Dracula (1992)
The 1922 silent masterpiece "Nosferatu," and its 1979 remake by Herzog are
clearly the most lucid, atmospheric interpretations of the famous novel by
Bram Stoker. There have been several remakes and sequels in their wake, so
why keep remaking the oft-told story? We all know it by heart. Francis
Ford Coppola's "Bram Stoker's Dracula" is a visual mess - an overblown,
campy knock off of the legend. That's not to say that it isn't fun.
Coppola's "Dracula" starts off promisingly for the first half-hour
complete with silhouettes, shadows, irises, beautiful if ostentatious
imagery, and really fancy camera tricks, especially when we first visit
Dracula's castle. Some of this represents of Coppola's best directorial
work ever, but he screws up when he doesn't take the legend seriously.
The acting is uneven throughout. Gary Oldman ("J.F.K") plays Dracula
fairly straight with an astonishing array of body movements and language
(he's a bloodsucking, white-haired, venemous creature in the beginning) but his
performance lacks passion and verve. Keanu Reeves as Jonathan Harker is
merely incompetent and unbelievable in a period setting - he reminded me
too much of his Bill and Ted antics. Sir Anthony Hopkins overacts to the
hilt as Professor Van Helsing, and has a moment where he smells Mina's
fragrance reminding one of Hannibal Lecter. Winona Ryder, however, steals
the movie as Mina (Harker's sweetie), and she is appropriately passionate
and sexy, especially in the love scenes.
As incredibly flawed as "Dracula" is, it somehow works in the big
egostistical way that some of Coppola's lesser efforts have. At times
resembling more of a horror spoof, it is extraordinarily well-made and the
snowy climax at Drac's castle is terrific, suspenseful stuff.
Unfortunately, dear old Francis leaves so little to the imagination and
the gore is piled on scene after scene with none of the cold, chilling
atmosphere of "Nosferatu" or Lugosi's "Dracula."
Over-the-top, overstuffed, overdone and undernourished in character
details, "Dracula" is never boring and somehow fun in a crude way. This
Count does not suck, but he occasionally does bite.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or
at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Pledge, The (2001)
After seeing Sean Penn's latest directorial effort, "The Pledge," I am 
convinced that Penn can work equally well on both sides of the camera. He is 
an exceptionally superb actor but his first two films as a director, "The 
Indian Runner" and "The Crossing Guard," showcased his stunning ability to 
write sharply defined characters and to know how to get the most out of his 
actors. He has had the macho ethic of actors like Dennis Hopper, Charles 
Bronson, David Morse and, yes, Jack Nicholson diminished in favor of showing 
men grappling with the sins of their past. Nicholson is the star of "The 
Pledge," and it is his most gripping portrayal yet in what remains Penn's 
best film by far. 
Nicholson is the retired Nevada cop Jerry Black, a man torn by the latest 
savage murder of a little girl. The night of his retirement party is the 
night he chooses to investigate the case, despite the averse reactions of the 
hotshot detective Stan Krolak (Aaron Eckhart) and his former boss (Sam 
Shepard). A mentally challenged Indian (Benicio Del Toro) is seen at the 
scene of the crime and is forced to confess to the murder but Jerry doesn't 
buy it - he feels the real killer is still on the loose. And to temporarily 
relieve his retirement, Jerry makes a pledge to the dead girl's mother (a 
devastatingly fierce Patricia Clarkson) to find the killer. 
I know what you are all going to say - the same old story about a cop resting 
on his gut instincts to solve one last case. "The Pledge" stars off as a 
routine cop story but what unfolds afterwards is stimulating, haunting and 
unpredictable. This is no ordinary movie-of-the-week and it is no action 
thriller - it is, my goodness, an existential character study of one man's 
pledge and obsession leading to madness and despair. Sounds too depressing? 
Well, yes, but who says all movies need to end in happy endings? 
As the film progresses, Jerry buys a gas station following a hunch that the 
killer resides in a nearby county. There is also the suspected car model 
deduced from the dead girl's drawing of a tall man who gave her porcupine 
chocolates. I will not say much more except that Jerry meets the local town 
waitress (Robin Wright-Penn) and his intentions with her and her own daughter 
are not what they seem.    
"The Pledge" is full of symbolic montages, beautiful, lush scenery, and 
Penn's typical slow-motion scenes punctuated by moments of silence. One 
terrific moment is likely to be missed where a long shot of Jerry fishing on 
a lake with a rainbow in the distance mirrors one of the dead girl's 
drawings. I also love the scene where Jerry breaks the news to the girl's 
parents in a turkey farm - a typical scene powerfully executed. 
Nicholson uses admirable restraint as Jerry Black, in lieu of his trademark 
persona, for a complex portrait of a man who may be losing his marbles 
investigating a seemingly no-win case. He shares some great scenes with 
actors like Vanessa Redgrave as the dead girl's teacher, Helen Mirren as a 
child psychologist, Tom Noonan as the local Reverend, Harry Dean Stanton as 
the owner of a gas station, and Mickey Rourke in a heartfelt performance as 
the dad of one of the other murdered girls in town. 
"The Pledge" begins with Nicholson scratching his legs and muttering to 
himself, and the frustration the character feels at slaving away on this 
murder case is felt by the audience. "The Pledge" is a pessimistic, 
tough-minded film that stays on course through its existential journey. For 
the last year or so, I've been saying that in this postmodern world of 
cinema, irony has replaced existentialism and that stories are now bereft of 
the risks they used to take, particularly with characters as unsentimental as 
Jerry. "The Pledge" is proof that some directors are willing to take the 
plunge into the sea of despair without making compromises. Bravo Sean Penn!
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com 

Title
Review for Saving Grace (2000)
Wistful, cheery and eccentric are three words that come to mind while 
watching director Nigel Cole's "Saving Grace." This is the latest in the 
"eccentric villagers" comedy staple, set forth by "The Full Monty" and 
culminating in the endearing if uneven "Waking Ned Devine." The difference in 
"Saving Grace" is that the villagers are even more wistful, cheery and 
eccentric thanks to a particular type of plant. 
Grace (Brenda Blethyn) is one of those villagers, living in the overcast, 
affable fishing village of St. Issacs in Cornwall. Grace is a recent widow 
who gets a lot of emotional support from her fellow neighbors. The problem is 
that she is liable to lose her home and all her possessions, including a 
rented lawnmower, thanks to her husband's financially risky ventures and 
ploys. What can Grace do? She has no money and no job skills, but she is 
fairly adept at maintaining her garden. 
This springs an idea in her charming gardener, Matthew (Craig Ferguson, who 
co-wrote the film), who is something of a marijuana specialist. He grows his 
own pot plants at the vicarage, and decides to start a joint business venture 
with Grace by growing several plants in her greenhouse. This leads to the 
film's funniest surprise where the greenhouse is lit with dozens of bright 
lamps each night, leaving an ethereal glow in the sky that keeps the 
villagers entertained in anticipation. One of them mistakenly sees it as a 
sign from God.
Still, since marijuana is illegal, how does one escape notice from the local 
police chief? And what about the agency that is ready to buy out her precious 
house? And what about the shady drug dealers in London who are skeptical of 
Grace's economical enterprise, including the dangerous yet suave Jacques 
(Tcheky Karyo, memorable as the icy agent in "La Femme Nikita")? 
"Saving Grace" is mostly a one-joke comedy, and the ending is false and 
unnecessary. Still, there are enough bright moments, a generous dose of 
laughs, and some perfectly-timed one-liners to compensate for what is 
essentially a wittier take on Cheech and Chong. It is also a pleasure to see 
Brenda Blethyn more restrained than usual (considering her over-the-top turn 
in "Little Voice"), and always an undeniable pleasure to see Phyllidia Law 
(Emma Thompson's mother) as a giddy shopkeeper. The characters are all as 
wistful, cheery and eccentric as you can imagine, but they do deliver a smile 
on your face after it is all over. I suspect for most viewers who loved 
"Waking Ned Devine," a smile may be enough. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Heaven with a Gun (1969)
This small dialogue exchange is the opening sequence of "Heaven With a Gun," 
a strange western that somehow manages to work even if it shouldn't. The 
parts of the film do not make a cohesive whole but they do make a watchable 
film, if nothing else. 
"Heaven With a Gun" stars Glenn Ford as the gunslinger in that sequence, a 
man named Jim Killian who certainly doesn't like to see sheepherders, 
particularly Hopi Indian sheepherders hanged. Nonetheless, after burying the 
man and forcing two cattle cowpokes to make wave, Jim arrives in the town 
Vinegaroon, populated by the usual kinds of characters such as drunk cowboys, 
genial storekeepers, loose prostitutes who demand prompt payment for their 
duties, and so on. And, as always, there is a poker game involving high 
stakes with the former cowpokes Jim had confronted earlier. One of them is 
Coke (David Carradine), "the wild mustang," who is ready to kill Jim. And we 
get the obligatory scene of an impending act of violence at a poker table 
interrupted by the owner of the saloon/bar (known as the "Road to Ruin"). In 
this case, it is a breath of fresh air named Madge (the fabulous Carolyn 
Jones), who knows Jim from the past. 
Jim's intention is to start a church in town called "The Mission Church of 
the Good Shepherd." That's right, he is not only a gunslinger, he is a 
preacher! He is heaven with a gun, similar to the character Eastwood would 
later play in "Pale Rider." He hopes to bring faith and communion into the 
town, and also hopes that the sheep herders and the cattle herders will agree 
that both animals can graze on the same range. Naturally, Jim's plan is met 
with plenty of disapproval from the cattle herders, including the grizzly Asa 
Peck (John Anderson). And there are also other obstacles, such as a Hopi 
woman named Leloopa (an unrecognizable Barbara Hershey), who wants to cook 
and clean for Jim since he buried her father. And perhaps Madge is a little 
jealous of this woman, considering that she thinks Jim is the man for her. 
"Heaven With a Gun" does have its flaws. The introduction of a man named Mace 
(J.D. Cannon) who served prison time with Jim simply marks time - the 
character is evil yet has charisma and yet you wish there was more of him. 
Also there is a rape scene in the film that also feels extraneous, not to 
mention a near scalping of another character. The violence is so heavy and 
the sheep herders are so clearly without redeeming value that you wish there 
was something more than the ending that is given. It all feels anticlimactic 
but I will say this - it is a rare kind of ending for a western and must have 
been placed there because of the pacifist times in which it was made. 
On the plus side, Glenn Ford is in fine form, exuding toughness, sweetness 
and a tinge of humor - he also makes the character of Jim soulful and 
forgiving. Ford's scenes with the lovely Carolyn Jones are wonderful if 
short-lived. I also like Barbara Hershey, despite the fact she looks too 
pristine to be a Hopi Indian (check out those sparkling white teeth!). Scenes 
of a barn being turned into a church and a nude woman sitting outside a house 
are rarities in this genre, not to mention the ending. "Heaven With a Gun" is 
fine, two-fisted entertainment but it does ring a little hollow. Nonetheless, 
the cast makes it as close to heaven as a western could ever be. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Dream for an Insomniac (1998)
Roman Polanski once said that the best love stories are the tragic ones. I am
inclined to agree. I also think ambiguous endings in love stories work, as is
the case with Mike Nichols' fabulous "The Graduate." Then there are the forced
happy endings, notably the finale of "Pretty Woman." "Dream for an Insomniac" is
your standard, cookie-cutter formula crap where the happy ending is not only
forced but also downright shameful. 
The insomniac is Frankie (Ione Skye), an aspiring actress who has not had a
decent night of sleep since she was six-years old. Since this story is meant to
be a modern-day fairy-tale, I'll forgive that implausibility for the moment.
Frankie lives above a coffee shop run by her Italian uncle (Seymour Cassel), who
keeps Frank Sinatra pictures on the walls and constantly plays Old Blue Eyes'
music. Frankie is convinced that once she leaves for L.A. with her best friend,
Allison (Jennifer Aniston), she will find her dreamboat, someone with "the soul
of a poet and eyes like Frank Sinatra." That is until a new employee of the
coffee shop comes around named David (Mackenzie Astin), a wannabe writer with
the blue eyes of Sinatra. He also happens to be full of quotations from
Shakespeare and Sartre to pop-culture references. Frankie is instantly in love
but how can she leave for L.A. in four days since she met her dreamboat? 
I've never been in love but if I were, I would not fall so hard for someone like
Frankie. Her character is shown to be a pessimist, overtly cynical and smug so
how can she also be so optimistic about finding the right kind of man? And what
kind of man is that supposed to be? One who can quote endlessly from different
literary sources? The scene of Frankie and David's first meeting smacks of
sentimental implausibilites. I am not sure if I would be crazy about someone who
feels that if you can quote from the literary gods and can keep up with her
stream of quotes, then you are worthy. The whole scene as directed by Tiffanie
Debartolo is forced, romantic hogwash, as is most of the movie. The shift from
black and white to color only enhances the lack of credibility.
There are revelations that can be seen coming from miles ahead of the cinema
meter. Frankie's male cousin, Rob (Michael Landes) is homosexual but his father
does not know it - their inevitable scene where Rob has to confess his nature is
predictable. Then there is David's little secret, also foreseeable. And there is
the stereotypical Generation X-er who can drink and eat anything he wants for
free. And so on. 
The one comic surprise that often took me out of my dull stupor is Jennifer
Aniston. She plays the best friend, which is a considerable waste of her talents
since she does the exact same role on her famous sitcom. Anytime Aniston showed
up on screen, I was elated. Aniston is funny, engaging, sprightly - a real
fireball that enlivens the proceedings and makes us wish her role had more
development. If Frankie had been played by Aniston, I might have had more fun
watching the film. 
"Dream for an Insomniac" is fabricated, dull, formulaic, unsurprising, dishonest
nonsense. Dishonest in that it wants to reinforce the belief that love at first
sight still exists, even for two charismatic people who have no business being
together. Watching Cassevettes regular Cassel spouting cliche-ridden dialogue is
enough cause for a Cassevettes retrospective. And if you happen to be an
insomniac, then this film will prove to be a dream come true. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Small Time Crooks (2000)
Woody Allen continues to make films his own way, and that is a major feat for 
an artist who has yet to have a major box-office success since "Hannah and 
Her Sisters." I am not sure "Small Time Crooks" will change all that, but let 
me be the first to report that it is one of Allen's funniest and most 
endearing films since "Bullets Over Broadway." 
Playing a loser for the first time since I can remember, Allen stars as Ray 
Winkler, an ill-judged bank robber married to his manicurist wife, Frenchy 
(Tracey Ullman). Ray has a new plan to change his life from his current 
dishwashing activities - to rob a bank vault by tunnelling from an abandoned 
store's basement. The idea is that the store will be turned into a bakery and 
Frenchy will run it, along with her cousin, May (Elaine May). The surprise is 
that the cookies they sell become the talk of the town, and so successful 
that Frenchy and Ray become rich. Only problem is that their taste in clothes 
and furniture is garish at best ("Go on honey, show them your collection of 
leather pigs," quips Ray). Thus, Frenchy enlists the help of a British art 
dealer (Hugh Grant) who will teach her about class and elegance, and 
education. Naturally, Ray prefers the life he had and gets the impulse to 
steal all over again by scheming with May to get a priceless necklace. 
"Small Time Crooks" made me laugh from start to finish, and I must thank the 
great writer-director Woody Allen (a comic genius, in my view). His sharp 
observations about these colorful brand of characters inspires many memorable 
one-liners, particularly the droll humor involving the typically relaxing 
charm of Hugh Grant and the high-pitched Ullman (some of it recalls the naive 
Annie Hall's dedication to reading more books and taking college courses). 
Also worth noting is the early appearance of Michael Rapaport (who was also 
in "Mighty Aphrodite") as a bumbling crook, John Lovitz as a possible 
entrepreneur who has burned down buildings to support his children's 
education, and the pleasant air of Elaine May's presence (she last appeared 
on screen in 1990's "In the Spirit") - she gives her character May a rich 
array of nuances and perfect comic timing. Her character begs the question - 
is she really smart or is she as ditsy and naive as we might think? The 
naysayers who feel that the 64-year-old Allen has been dealing with much 
younger female leads, such as Elisabeth Shue, will applaud the choice of the 
60-year-old Elaine May. Frankly, this is of little importance to me - I would 
still love to see Allen use Sharon Stone as a lead or foil.
Scrawny Allen is as always scrawny Allen, but here he has a slight edge ("I'd 
like to flatten you, just once") complemented with the adoration of his wife, 
Frenchy, and makes his character the most magnetic he's played in some time. 
Tracey Ullman runs hot and cold for me, but she gets to play a trashy, 
talkative, sprightly woman with an affection for her husband - we somehow 
know that things will work out between them despite her affinity for the 
suave Hugh Grant.
"Small Time Crooks" is not laugh-out loud funny (though there are many
sidesplitting moments but I could have done without the faux news segment) 
but it is smooth and refined, as we might expect post-"Crimes and 
Misdemeanors" or "Husbands and Wives." It is far more relaxed and kinder than 
Allen's early slapstick comedies such as "Take the Money and Run" or 
"Sleeper." I would love it if Allen returned to his more serious Bergmanesque 
period but as sheer entertainment and pointed humor, it is far more lively 
and less overstuffed than "Sweet and Lowdown" or "Celebrity." Small time 
business, to be sure, but you will have a grand time. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com 
or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Frankenstein (1931)
Although Boris Karloff's makeup and performance have entered the pop culture 
realm, this "Frankenstein" version from 1931 is not the best or the most 
faithful of Mary Shelley's novel. Still, compared to most other film versions 
(there have been over 100), it is one of the most effective and perhaps, one 
of the most atmospheric. 
James Whale's "Frankenstein" stars the harsh presence of Colin Clive as the 
mad Dr. Frankenstein, slaving away at creating life from a corpse inside a 
remote watchtower. He gets assistance from Fritz (Dwight Frye), a hunchback 
who inadvertently steals a criminal brain from the local medical school. Once 
the creation, now with a criminal brain, is brought to life with the use of 
electrical devices and a brewing storm, it begins to wreck havoc, escaping 
his prison and tormenting the local villagers. Eventually, Frankenstein 
leaves the castle for more modest surroundings, and is ready to marry his 
adoring Elizabeth (Mae Clarke) until terror strikes again in the face of the 
wandering Monster. 
There are far too many inconsistencies in the film to warrant the heaps of 
praise it has received since it was initially released. Number one: how does 
the Monster know about Frankenstein's bride-to-be and why does he attack her? 
Number two: how is it that a villager knows his drowned daughter was murdered 
by the Monster? Could she not have just drowned? Number three: where does the 
film take place? Germany? Scotland? And what is with all the German and 
Slavic names when everyone speaks with an English accent? 
Such inconsistencies aside, "Frankenstein" certainly has a lot to recommend 
it. Karloff is menacing, tender, sympathetic, cruel, and pathetic as the 
Monster - his first appearance where he walks slowly facing Frankenstein and 
stares inertly still sends chills to my spine. I admire Colin Clive's 
hard-edged performance as the scientist - he shows the doctor's mental 
breakdown and exhaustion perfectly. Mae Clarke does not have a lot of screen 
time but she is sweetly innocent - her scenes with John Boles as Victor, 
Henry and Elizabeth's mutual friend, suggests that Victor has mutual 
affection for her. Edward Van Sloan (who appeared the same year as Professor 
Van Helsing in "Dracula") is the most watchable presence on screen as an old 
professor who has a keen interest in this creation, though he is nonplussed 
by it at the beginning. He also presents the film in a prologue, which had 
not been in all existing prints, where he warns the audience that it may 
shock them, perhaps terrify them.
"Frankenstein" had some major trims in its original release thanks to the 
Production Code. One was the deletion of Maria's drowning, as she is thrown 
in the lake by the Monster who expects her to float like the daisies. 
Originally, it had just shown the Monster smiling and reaching out its hands 
to the girl. This minor trim makes the preceding scene of her father carrying 
her lifeless body far more violent than intended. 
The other deletion was a line of dialogue said by Dr. Frankenstein after the 
first signs of life in the Monster. The deleted line - "In the name of God, 
now I know what it feels like to be God" - was certainly essential and in 
keeping with Mary Shelley's theme of man's attempt to emulate God. 
"Frankenstein" is not a perfect film and not nearly as unifying as a whole as 
the superior "Bride of Frankenstein," the latter in my estimation is the best 
damn version ever. If nothing else, Karloff still makes one shudder and that 
is enough to consider the film a horror classic - he makes the film his own.  
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com 
or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Clerks (1994)
"Do you know what the real tragedy of all this is? I am not even supposed to be
here today!" - Dante
That one line sums up Dante's life in a nutshell (well-played by Brian
O'Halloran). He is a Quick Stop convenience store clerk in Leonardo, N.J. with
no real ambition in life except to serve customers and whine all day long. If
only he could see how farfetched that life is since he obviously possesses some
potential and is generally a smart guy. It only takes his best friend, Randal
(Jeff Anderson), and Dante's girlfriend, Veronica (Marilyn Ghigliotti), to make
him see the light. 
I am of course describing the incredibly funny debut of director Kevin Smith,
known as "Clerks," a hilarious, obscene and unpredictable comedy that is
something of a classic in its genre. The fact that it was independent shows
where real talent for writing lies - from people like Kevin Smith, Quentin
Tarantino, David O'Russell, among others. They all got their start in low-budget
features and Smith's debut may be the most impressive of all since I have yet to
see a film of his that rivals "Clerks" for sheer audacity and sharp humor. 
The film begins at Dante's home where he is woken by his boss and told to show
up for work. It's his day off and he has a hockey game in the afternoon but
there is not much of a choice - Dante has a problem saying no to people. He
shows up at the convenience store, opens it, discovers gum in the shutter locks,
and begins his day selling various items to customers. The customers who come to
the store are certainly a colorful bunch. One is a guidance counselor who
peruses each and every egg in the cartons. Another complains that the video
store next door is closed. There is an older man who needs to read porno
magazines in the bathroom. And so on. Randal is the next-door video store clerk
who shows up late and berates and curses his customers. He is the fearless
leader of his domain, abusing his power as a clerk as an excuse to spit on and
shout at people. Randal hardly spends much time in his store, and always walks
in to Dante's store and makes his life miserable. 
Randal: "But I love gatherings. Isn't that ironic?" 
There are too many good scenes, almost all are side-splittingly funny and
truthful. Randal is a jerk, but also an understanding and sensible jerk - he
knows his life as a clerk is not much and that doesn't stop him from offending
each and every customer. My favorite moment is when a customer asks about the
quality of a couple of videos. Randal doesn't pay attention, makes no eye
contact and points out to her that her "cunning attempt to trick him" is futile.
It's funny and pointed humor, offering real-life clerks an opportunity to hear
the things they would love to say. 
Every scene with Dante is also brilliant, including a long scene where his
girlfriend, Veronica, confesses to have had oral sex with about 37 guys. Dante's
nauseousness sets in, questioning how she could not have slept with the guys
like a decent person. His own manhood is tested and for the rest of the film, he
whines about her oral abilities, though Veronica is a very sweet person who
brings him lasagna to work. 
And how can one forget the introduction of the drug dealer duo, Jay (Jason
Mewes) and Silent Bob (Kevin Smith), both who find smoking weed and getting laid
is all  that life has to offer. 
Director Kevin Smith employs a proper visual cue of stabilizing his camera,
occasionally going in for a close-up shot and then cutting to a long-shot. Every
scene is practically a long-take so that we take the time to invest in Randal
and Dante's running monologues about irksome customers, the merits of "Return of
the Jedi," ex-girlfriends, funerals, and so on. It's a technique that works and
doesn't call attention to itself. The irreverence of "Clerks" shines through
like a bright diamond and Smith's ear for dialogue becomes clear. This style of
direction helps during the wild, unbelievably crude twist in the film that is as
shockingly profane as anything Smith has done since.
"Clerks" has been hailed as a rarity for low-budget pictures for its extreme
low-budget - roughly 27,000 dollars. This of course does not add to the
advertising and marketing campaign, not to mention a re-recorded soundtrack. It
has also been one of the few films to have reversed its initial rating of an
NC-17 to an R for raw language. Yes, it is raw but also hysterical, deep and
truthful. We are not talking about an onslaught of potty-mouthed words with no
rhyme or reason - Smith is too good a writer to let it sink to toilet humor.
Some have professed to finding "Clerks" raw and offensive. This may be true but
it is a one-of-a-kind comedy that speaks the truth of its characters more so
than most movies of its ilk. It's not just about vilification. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Snake Eyes (1998)
Director Brian De Palma has finally done it - he's made the first empty
stylistic exercise of his career. Sure, there are bravura camera moves,
superbly edited climaxes and an astounding opening sequence that can stand on
its own as a classic, but what else is there?
"Snake Eyes" stars Nicolas Cage as an unctuous, loud, obnoxious cop named Rick
Santoro (wearing what appears to be the same snakeskin leather jacket from
"Wild at Heart") who always accepts bribes from cops and crooks, and strolls
through his Atlantic City casino turf as if he owned it. During a championship
bowling match, the U.S. Secretary of Defense is assassinated, and all chaos
ensues. Santoro takes charge of the investigation. But who killed the Secretary
of Defense? And who was the blonde sitting next to him? Was the boxing champ
who went down behind it? Or was it Santoro's best friend (Gary Sinise)? If
you've seen one conspiracy film, you've seen them all. 
"Snake Eyes" is an often visually inventive film - the extraordinary opening
sequence is one seemingly 20-minute long take (there is one match cut that I
caught) that introduces us to the main characters and everything leading up to
the assassination. And yet for all the tricks "Snake Eyes" has up its sleeve,
there is nothing for us to chew on afterwards. The unusually simple plot
(lazily written by David Koepp) relies on various implausibilities - e.g., how
could 14,000 eyewitnesses and various police and security officers not notice a
blonde woman with a blood-covered white dress? And I guessed who the
perpetrator of this assassination was before it took place. 
"Snake Eyes" is the type of film that is nice to look at, but you can
anticipate its every preconceived move.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with questions, concerns or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com 

Title
Review for Muse, The (1999)
The cinema of the 1990's will be remembered for two things: Quentin Tarantino's
revolutionary "Pulp Fiction" and its slew of rip-offs, and the spate of films
about filmmaking. It is no surprise that since "The Player," we have become
bombarded by several films about making films in many different avenues. We
have seen low-budget independent filmmakers (Living in Oblivion),
fillmaking-on-the-fringes (My Life's In Turnaround), bad low-budget filmmakers
(Ed Wood), porno filmmaking (Boogie Nights), Hollywood filmmaking (The Player),
mob-financed filmmaking (Get Shorty), low-level Hollywood filmmaking
(Bowfinger), and so on. I greeted Albert Brooks' latest film, "The Muse," with
delight because of its stellar cast and because of the cynical edge of Brooks.
I am happy to report that "The Muse" is among his funniest, lightest works,
always tinging with delectable wit from start to finish. 
Albert Brooks stars as Steven Philips, a comedy screenwriter desperate to sell
his latest script after winning a humanitarian award ("It's an award you win
when you don't win an Oscar."). The next day, he is anxious and meets with a
stiff, humorless studio exceutive, Josh Martin (Mark Feuerstein), and is told
none too subtly he's out of a job. "You've lost your edge. Take a vacation,"
says Martin. Steven is torn since writing for films is his life, and realizes
his office will be occupied by Brian De Palma. He tries to get an idea that
could reestablish him in the realm of Hollywood, as well as continuing to
support his wife (Andie McDowell), an ambitious baker,  and his two kids. 
Steven finds a surprise in the form of a woman in glittery blue dresses named
Sara (Sharon Stone) - she is introduced by Steve's friend Jack (Jeff Bridges),
a writer. Sarah turns out be the resident Muse of La-La Land - "I...inspire!"
declares Sara. 
Steven is faced with a barrage of responsibilities to keep Sara as his Muse. He
has to rent a luxurious room at the Four Seasons Hotel for her, provide
round-the-clock food and car service for her immediate needs such as a "Waldorf
salad," and he must always bring a boxed trinket from Tiffany's to her. And
this is all for her to provide inspiration for the struggling writer. I
question a comedy writer coming up with a half-baked idea like an aquarium run
by Jim Carrey, but that is of little consequence. 
"The Muse" coasts along Brooks's typically cynical, neurotic edge, Sharon
Stone's comic sparkle, and the relentless number of inside jokes that will
tickle people from Hollywood and movie trivia buffs. There are humorous cameos
by film luminaries such as James Cameron, Rob Reiner, Martin Scorsese, Jennifer
Tilly, Cybill Sheperd, Lorenzo Lamas, and several others. I enjoyed Scorsese's
frenetic moment when he announces he's making a remake of "Raging Bull" with a
thin, angry guy. Jennifer Tilly's bit is especially cute when Brooks refers to
her as a "doll like Chucky." Tilly was of course in "Bride of Chucky." 
The biggest, most sensational surprise is Sharon Stone, who I always believed
had a gift for comedy but was never allowed to utilize it. Outside of her small
comic parts in "He Said, She Said" and "Diary of a Hitman," this marks the
first time she is allowed to sparkle in a bigger supporting role based her
ability to deliver a bouncy charm. She sports a hairdo with bobbypins, wears
long blue "New Wave"-style flowing dresses, and makes do like a spoiled brat
who needs to be pampered. Of course, this Muse is not all she's cracked up to
be. 
Brooks has great fun lampooning Hollywood and its obsessive nature towards
making big bucks on big ideas. The difference is that in an era where gross
humor of the "Austin Powers" variety reigns supreme, audiences are not likely
to be susceptible to Brooks's low-key charm and natural evolution of character
progression, or in this case, aggression. He takes his time, and still has not
learned how to end a film with a major bang. Here it ends all too abruptly, as
it did in "Real Life," Brooks's first film. But that is a minor carp. 
I am still not clear of Brooks's point - a muse inspires a writer to choose the
muse within him or herself? Can't he seek that same inspiration from his close
friends or family? Unless we are led to believe that writers don't have friends
in Hollywood when they are considered washed-up and edgeless. 
Despite a few flaws, "The Muse" is amusing and has some showstopping laughs and
one-liners along the way. Brooks is a master builder of comic setup and payoff
- he knows that the art of comedy is allowing the audience to experience the
buildup before the punchline, and boy, the punchlines are smartly written and
pungent. Too many comedies rely on gross humor and repetitive gags left and
right with no rhyme or reason. Not Brooks, and he has not lost his edge.  
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with questions, concerns or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at
Faust667@aol.com 

Title
Review for Psycho (1998)
If anyone attempted to do a remake to the 1960 classic "Psycho," it should have
been the Master of Suspense himself, Alfred Hitchcock. He did that with "The
Man Who Knew Too Much." Hitch isn't around anymore and he's probably rolling in
his grave as director Gus Van Sant ("Drugstore Cowboy") attempts to step into
the limelight. This "Psycho" remake is a complete bastardization, a dull,
callous, near parodic film of little or no consequence. 
Granted, I am aware that they have used Joseph Stefano's original, excellent
screenplay (almost word for word), and Van Sant has adopted the same angles and
camera shots through most of the film. But this movie is a recreation, in the
literal sense, not a remake. It replicates the original, but with none of the
grace, stamina or conviction that the actors or the director brought to the
original. Anne Heche comes off best as Marion Crane, but we'll get back to her
in a minute.
              Anthony Perkins will always be Norman Bates, just as Harrison
Ford will always be Indiana Jones. Therefore, it is a shame to see another
actor step in his shoes. The shameful overacting by Vince Vaughn as Norman
Bates sheds no doubts in my mind. He has a self-deprecating type of laugh, but
he brings none of the wit, charm, or nervous tension associated with the
stuttering, sexually ambiguous Perkins. He's like a big baby who wouldn't harm
a fly, nor scare one either. 
              The marvelous cast on hand is a complete waste of time and
talent. There's Viggo Mortensen as Sam Loomis, originally played by John Gavin,
a hardware store owner who looks like he's poised to kill. Here's an actor
who's too seedy and animalistic to be normal, playing a boyfriend for the
second time in a Hitch remake, the first being the suspenseless "A Perfect
Murder." Julianne Moore is the biggest disappointment as the one-note
character, Lila Crane. I never imagined Moore to be faceless, unsympathetic,
and uninteresting, yet she manages all the same. Bring back Vera Miles! Worst
of all is William H. Macy as the flippant detective Arbogast dressed in a
blazing dark blue suit and wearing a ridiculous-looking fedora - how could
anyone take this guy seriously, including Norman? Macy's line readings are so
flat and antiseptic that I realized why the performers were so listless - they
brought no energy or conviction to their roles. They rattle through their line
readings quickly with no degree of nuance or diction. Ditto Robert Forster as
the psychiatrist in a final scene that was unnecessary in the original.
No one can blame the script, but you sure can blame Van Sant for
not recreating the feeling or the mood. There's no tension, no surprise. By the
time the marvelously sensual Anne Heche exits, the rest of the film flounders
searching for an identity. There is none. Philip Baker Hall is the only actor
who brings a sense of authority as Sheriff Chambers. Anne Heche brings class,
elegance and a wink of humor to Marion before she's offed. 
The original "Psycho" is one of the few great horror classics of all time.
I've seen and studied it at least thirty to forty times. I have committed most
of the camera shots and dialogue to memory. I can sense Van Sant's giddiness in
stepping in the Hitch's shoes, and seeing the film through his eyes. I wish Van
Sant would use that giddiness to make an original creation of his own. I just
don't see the justification in making a colorized recreation of a film that was
pitch-perfect. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 

Title
Review for Cider House Rules, The (1999)
"The Cider House Rules" is the kind of film that has every element in place:
strikingly good performances, beautiful cinematography, and solid art
direction. Considering this film is set in the 1940's, the period detail is
astoundingly vivid - the cars, the clothes, the houses all have the right look
and design. And so it is frustrating to see that when everything falls in
place, the structure of the film takes a dramatic left turn and leaves numerous
plotholes in its wake. 
The film opens at a snowy train stop in St. Cloud's, Maine where an orphanage
exists called the Cider House. It is run by Dr. Wilbur Larch (Michael Caine), a
fastidious doctor who performs abortions with the help of his young protege,
Homer Wells (Tobey Maguire). Larch's mission is to save women from the clutches
of amateur doctors in back alleys - he sees himself performing a service
unavailable to most women. His moments of solace and refuge is in his addiction
to ether. 
Homer assists Larch as often as he can, and his home is at Cider House since he
is an orphan and practically grew up there. But Homer feels cold and lonely
there, despite knowing all the young, parentless kids who look up to him. He
needs an exit to another world he has not seen, outside of what I like to call
"The Cider House Blues." He gets a chance one day when Candy (Charlize Theron)
arrives at Cider House for an abortion with her boyfriend, Wally (Paul Rudd),
who is preparing to go to war. Homer leaves with them, and goes to work at
Wally's apple-picking family farm with a group of African-American migrant
workers lead by Mr. Rose (the intense Delroy Lindo). While Wally fights the
war, Homer falls in love with Candy, and discovers that there are other movies
that exist besides "King Kong."  
"The Cider House Blues" has a subplot involving incest, and the question of
abortion comes up again, as Homer decides if he should perform such a
procedure. Unfortunately these episodes at Wally's family farm are less than
enchanting and cliche ridden. John Irving adapted his own novel for the screen,
but it is not dramatic enough to stimulate much interest. Although the romance
between Homer and Candy is sparkling and flavorful, it does not mix well with
the migrant workers and their crisis, or the Cider House subplot where Dr.
Larch forges an entire application on Homer and his medical background so he
can get him back to assist. Once the film ends, there are a lot of unresolved
situations and fractured relationships between characters. The final sequence
is anticlimactic, promising more than is actually delivered. 
"The Cider House Rules" is still a finely crafted and beautifully made film.
Michael Caine is as good as he has ever been, mimicking an American accent
flawlessly and creating a sympathetic character out of the saintly Dr. Larch.
Tobey Maguire reminds me more and more of a young Kevin Kline, sometimes
suggesting a cocky side with his eyebrows. Charlize Theron looks like a woman
of the 40's, sexy and sweet and troubled. But the film sort of ends abruptly
and loses us in the seeming construction of a final act that goes nowhere. It
is only half of a great movie, but at least, it is a decent half.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general comments at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Traffic (2000)
Is it me or does director Steven Soderbergh have something akin to a great track record? From "Sex, Lies and Videotape" to "Schizopolis" to "The Limey" to two fairly good Hollywood productions, "Erin Brockovich" and now "Traffic," the latter two released the same year. And "Traffic" is not merely good, serviceable Hollywood entertainment, it is damn near great. 
Soderbergh's "Traffic" is concerned with drug trafficking in America and in Mexico, and how the war on drugs from the top has outlived its purpose. Michael Douglas is Robert Wakefield, a Supreme Court justice becoming the newly appointed drug czar of America (an unfilled position in Mexico), who is taking steps to prevent this drug war from continuing. His ideas, however, are met with a cool reception from his staff. Why? Because the war on drugs is a fruitless one accompanied by far too many dangerous parameters - economic is one such factor of any such parameters. Wakefield eventually meets with General Salazar (Tomas Milian), who resides in Tijuana and appoints a clever border cop, Javier Rodriguez Rodriguez (Benicio Del Toro) to raise ire among the cocaine cartels. The questions is: does Salazar have something else in mind or does he really want to bust them and torture them? Is he as concerned about the manufacturing and exporting of cocaine as Del Toro is, or for that ma!
!
tter, the righteous Wakefield?
"Traffic" shifts from different characters and locales throughout, and gradually we see how others are affected by this chain of command in the U.S. and Tijuana. There is the drug lord, Carlos Ayala (Steven Bauer), who is arrested and sent to jail, leaving his pregnant wife (Catherine Zeta-Jones) to fend for his illegitimate business, something she was not aware of. We also see Caroline (Erika Christensen), a top-notch high school student who innocently becomes a sleepy-eyed cocaine addict - she also turns out to be Wakefield's daughter. Then there are the undercover DEA agents (Don Cheadle, Luis Guzman) who bicker and joke, even when arresting a mid-level trafficker, Eduardo Ruiz (Miguel Ferrer) - the job of the dual agents is to protect Ruiz who is likely to be rubbed out. This, of course, would allow the release of Ayala from jail. 
"Traffic" is at its most tantalizing when dealing with Del Toro's moral conflict of speaking out on the corruption in his own country, or of keeping his mouth shut in the face of inevitable tragedy. The Tijuana scenes are the most powerful, evoking the futility of drug warfare where no end is seen in sight. Del Toro realizes this, thus being a rat or staying loyal essentially makes no difference. He can only save his own skin.
This is also true of Wakefield's own job, which is put into question when he discovers his daughter's addiction. Wakefield himself is not a happy man, living a life of boredom as he calls it with his family and seeking an exit with alcohol. This upsets his wife (Amy Irving), but their relationship is really put to the test with their daughter's problems and the fact that she becomes a runaway. How can Wakefield save the country from drug warfare if he can't even save his own daughter?
Speaking of aesthetics for the time being, "Traffic" temporarily annoyed me with its visual look. As shot by Soderbergh himself, he uses filters for the sepia-drenched scenes in Tijuana and the cool blue colors of Washington, D.C. but these scenes stand out at first for being far too obvious. Just remember what notable cinematographer Nestor Almendros once said about filters: "Any movie that I see that uses filters, I shut off after five minutes because it is too easy." He may have had a point, but admittedly, once the film is on course and speeds along its multi-based narrative, I found the filtering less and less annoying. I still feel I should not have to be reminded where I am - Tijuana, by all accounts, is certainly different from Washington, D.C. A minor quibble.
Soderbergh's real strengths are with actors, and he has quite a stupendous cast on hand to work with. Del Toro is at his most blazingly understated ever, challenging us and keeping us guessing at every moment as to what his thoughts are in contrast with his actions. He is so unpredictable, funny, tense, dramatic, and emotional that it remains the most dynamic role I've seen in all of 2000. 
Major kudos also go to Zeta-Jones playing a charming housewife, also challenged by the lies from her husband and his business, and it is alarming to see the shift in her character from paranoid to ruthless (still, there is a missing transitional scene or two showing this transformation). Michael Douglas (who shares no scenes with his wife, Zeta-Jones) does his damnedest playing a man pressured by everyone from up above, yet showing a tender, sympathetic side when confronted with familial problems. 
Also noteworthy are Cheadle and Guzman performing their bickering byplay as if leftovers from a Paul Thomas Anderson flick, and they are so engaging and entertaining that it is hard to forget them. They seem to come from a mediocre action picture but their personalities infuse their characters with humor and sublime restraint. I love the scenes they share with Ferrer, who sees himself as an average businessman and reminds Cheadle that the DEA's job is not only fruitless but it also helps the drug trade. After all, if Ferrer has to pack up and go to jail, someone else can always take over. 
"Traffic," based on a 1989 British miniseries of the same title, is not an original crime epic but its treatment of an ongoing problem in America is breathlessly and magnificently executed by the wondrous Steven Soderbergh. Despite a lack of real insight into some of the characters, the film will leave you with a knowledge of how drugs are big business in this country and how many would like to keep it that way. All we can do is protect and nurture our own families from this increasingly hopeless and, yes, fruitless problem.   
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com 

Title
Review for Small Soldiers (1998)
"Small Soldiers" is director Joe Dante doing his latest Gremlins confection, and it's mean-spirited fun, once the movie gets its engines rolling. 
"Small Soldiers" stars Gregory Smith and Kirsten Dunst as two MUCH TOO CUTE kids with raging hormones who end up battling various reanimated toy soldiers. Chip Hazard (voiced by the typically gruffly Tommy Lee Jones) leads this platoon of robot action figures, and they are equipped to kill rival toys called Gorgonites, led by their soft-spoken leader, Archer (voiced by Frank Langella).
"Small Soldiers" begins badly with a lame introduction about how these toys are created and who their target audience is. The business meetings are led by Denis Leary as a rich tycoon, but all these scenes are unnecessary. What if we never knew how these soldiers were created or what their purpose was? Some things are better left to the imagination. 
Once the movie shift gears to suburbia where the toys are sent, it gets better and better with inventive gags and superbly staged cartoonish mayhem. Two of my favorite examples: Chip Hazard searching for the human characters in a helicopter with Wagner's "Ride of the Valkieres" playing in the background, and the Barbie-like dolls who are brought to life in Bride of Frankenstein fashion (complete with the original score) and uttering lines such as, "She's gone postal." 
"Small Soldiers" is light fun and frequently funny, though not at the same breath as "Gremlins." It says something about 90's kiddie fantasies, though, when the toy soldiers and monsters are more three-dimensional than the thin human characters on display here, including the late Phil Hartman as an obnoxious neighbor.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, complaints or comments at jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Halloween II (1981)
"Halloween" has its firm place in the horror genre, a classic shocker that
moved with the slow, creepy pace of menacing, inevitable evil. "Halloween II"
is nowhere in the same league as the original, but it also has an unstoppable,
menacing sense of movement - the killer moves slow and the victims are doubly
scared by the menace. 
"Halloween II" differs from most sequels in that it is a direct continuation of
the original. The original "Halloween" ended on the night of October 31st and
this sequel continues on that very same night. The wounded Laurie (Jamie Lee
Curtis) is taken to a hospital while Dr. Sam Loomis (Donald Pleasance) is
obsessed with tracking down this inhuman killer, known in the credits as The
Shape aka Michael Myers. "I shot him six times, and he got up and walked away,"
admits the good doctor. 
The Halloween of this town has all the hallmarks of a bloody evening waiting to
happen. There are kids dressing up in Michael Myers masks, lustful doctors,
kids biting into razor-sharp apples, irate dogs, and a largely nonexistent
hospital staff caring for the weak Laurie who mostly sleeps and has nightmares.
Laurie is taunted by Michael Myers (who may be her brother!) and teased by a
lovestruck ambulance driver (Lance Guest). During this very long night, each
member of the short hospital staff is murdered by Michael Myers in particularly
gruesome ways, while the nearly blind Laurie manages to escape from one room to
the other with a limp. And where is Loomis in all this? He is facing a
court-martial back at the institution. Towards the end of the film, he finally
pulls a gun on a state trooper when he realizes Michael is related to Laurie. 
"Halloween II" continues the same sense of dread and menace that the original
had, but the gore is accentuated making the goings-on less suspenseful than
they should have been. I could have lived without seeing a syringe inserted in
a woman's eyeball, or a half-naked woman scalded to death. These are not
necessities. These are merely distractions considering we don't learn much
about said victims. Another problem is the screenplay, which gives motivation
to the snail-paced killer Michael Myers by telling us that Laurie's sibling
status is the sole reason why he came back to Haddonfield! Sometimes not
knowing a murderer's motives is more frightening than knowing. 
If nothing else, "Halloween II" is a guilty pleasure because the ending works
so well, and Curtis is believably sympathetic as Laurie (despite an obvious
wig). She continues to be endlessly pursued by Michael - she hides but he finds
her. Eventually, Loomis and Laurie battle Michael to a fiery finale. The film
ends with Laurie escorted in an ambulance in the overcast morning day while
"Mr. Sandman" plays on the soundtrack - a reminder that the nightmare is over.
It is the opening scenes and the closing climax that come close to Carpenter's
original, evoking a real sense of terror. "Halloween II" is worthwile if you
can live through the distractions.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with questions, concerns or comments at jerry@movieluver.com or at
Faust667@aol.com 

Title
Review for Two Girls and a Guy (1997)
It's painful for me to witness three outstanding actors waste themselves on
slipshod material. That is the case with James Toback's "Two Girls and a Guy,"
a muddled comedy that pretends to be more than the sum of its parts. What it
lacks is the juice and vigor it needs to transcend its relatively stagy
premise. 
The story begins with two women standing on a typical New York street corner
waiting for their boyfriends. They are Carla (Heather Graham), a blonde,
sophisticated working girl type, and Lou (Natasha Gregson Wagner), a brassy,
streetwise brunette. It turns out that they are both waiting for the same
boyfriend, Blake Allen (Robert Downey, Jr.). "You are an unemployed, short
liar," as described in more obscene detail by Lou. Then why do the two women
hang around him and pester him in his glorious apartment? Why he is
irresistibly charming, of course. Blake, however, is a grandstanding
actor...and a pathological liar. He's always lying because as an actor, he's
entitled to it. Oh, really. And his other excuse is that he needs to check on
his mother who may or may not be sick, and whom he restlessly calls. In the
meantime, Carla and Lou try to discover what makes this guy tick, and I
discovered it after the first twenty minutes - the film drones for another
eighty. 
"Two Girls and a Guy" starts off quite well with some fine comic timing by
Downey - he steals the show. His delivery of lines is succinctly and flawlessly
executed. His body language is enormous, as evidenced by his Chaplinesque work
in the underrated Chances Are and Chaplin. But his being questioned and
pigeonholed by Carla and Lou makes for irritating viewing. They ask him crude
questions of little substance that yield little discovery. As played by Downey,
Blake is an arrogant S.O.B., who is full of himself and lives on being high and
mighty and dishonest with women. Didn't Carla and Lou suspect such mischievous
behavior from the start? 
I could live without certain elements in "Two Girls and a Guy" that downplay
its comical, dramatic rhythms. A gratuitous sex scene between Carla and Blake
is just marking time. That Blake doesn't touch Lou, except for a little peck on
the cheek, elicits discomfort at the screenwriting level since he claims to
love both women passionately. And then there's Lou's suggestion for a three-way
relationship that never builds to anything. Lou and Carla also turn the tables
on Blake by admitting their own sexual trysts - an uninventive method of
eliciting sympathy for Blake. The final dramatic conclusion feels unnecessary
and eradicates the film's central theme of deception. 
Robert Downey, Jr. is still superb to watch - look at the scene where he
stares at himself in the mirror and asks, "Why do you do this?" Heather Graham
is also a delight playing a mature, refined woman with class (very different
from her Rollergirl character in "Boogie Nights"). Only Wagner falls short
despite some hysterical scenes where she's describing the sincerity of Denzel
Washington and the dishonesty of Clarence Thomas. Nevertheless, she does start
to grate one's nerves after a while. 
"Two Girls and a Guy" is murkily photographed and unevenly scripted with brief
allusions to a superior, similar work, Truffaut's "Jules and Jim."
Writer-director James Toback ("The Pick-up Artist") seems afraid of dwelling on
the sexual, painfully honest questions that two women would have if they were
cheated on by the same boyfriend. The film careens out of control before we
realize that its pointless chit-chat aims to be nothing more than pointless
chit-chat. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 

Title
Review for Lethal Weapon 4 (1998)
Who would have thought that a decade later the "Lethal Weapon" franchise would
turn into an unfunny, Cosby-like comedy about family values with some
exploitative violence thrown in? Not only that, but remove all the elements
that made the first three films exciting and fresh. 
Let's consider the first "Lethal Weapon," a tough-as-nails buddy-buddy police
actioner with a badass Mel Gibson as the suicidal Martin Riggs. Here was a
ticking time bomb ready to die at any given moment - regardless of the
consequences. Let's also consider Roger Murtaugh (Danny Glover), a family man
who served in Vietnam and is getting ready to face old age. The two were an
unbeatable pair, and they also faced one of the best villains in the history of
action films, played by Gary Busey! The point was that a mutual camaraderie
existed between them.
The second film was purely action and laughs with the very funny and oily Joe
Pesci as the accountant, Leo Getz ("Whatever you want, Leo gets!"). It also set
the standard for one of the best, most explosive action scenes ever. The third
film went further with the comedy, and too much action. There was little or no
character development, and the introduction of the Internal Affairs officer,
Lorna (Rene Russo), resulted in one of the weakest entries of the series. 
So what's left in "Lethal Weapon 4"? Not much I am afraid. Riggs is now a
respectable citizen with short hair, ready to settle down, and no longer lethal
(Is this the same suicidal freak from the first film?). Chris Rock is shown
briefly and doesn't figure much in the story, except that he gets Murtaugh's
daughter pregnant. Murtaugh is unaware that Rock is the father, and thinks he's
gay. Riggs's girlfriend, Lorna, is also pregnant and wants to get married! 
Funny, indeed. Leo Getz is back as a private investigator, and he is unbearable
throughout with his continual "whatevers" and "okays." The thin story has to do
with Chinese gangsters conspiring in some threadbare plot about counterfeit
money, and led by a formidable villain (Jet Li), a martial-arts expert - a true
lethal weapon. And there are the requisite explosions, implausible action
scenes, and typically racist jokes aimed squarely at the Chinese. 
"Lethal Weapon 4" looks like it was assembled rather than directed. One car
chase here, one fist fight there, one obvious joke here, and so on. There's no
plot or story to speak of. No shred of acting skills either, despite the
high-powered cast, although Jet Li says a lot with one stare, here and there.
It's like a tired parody of the "Lethal Weapon" experience, and its ickily
sentimental, heavily overwrought last passage - involving Pesci's
unintentionally funny monologue and dual pregnancies - left me in a state of
dumbfounded shock. There's never any sense of danger or peril, and no sense of
communion or camaraderie between the characters. It's "Lethally Bland Weapon"
for dummies.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 

Title
Review for Election (1999)

Just when you thought that there was nothing more than brainless, insipid
teenager movies obsessed with sex and money comes a delectable treat known as
Election. It is one of the best, quirkiest, smartest and most outrageous movies
of the year - a bright, comical triumph from first frame to last. It also
boasts one of my favorite performances of the year - from the wondrous fireball
of energy known as Reese Witherspoon. 
Witherspoon stars as Tracy Flick, a scheming, energetic, overly ambitious,
overachieving high school student (how rare nowadays to witness such a person
in any movie) with dreams of running for office. Tracy tries so hard that she
makes muffins with the logo "Pick Flick" emblazoned on each one while seated at
her campaigning table. And campaign she does, as Tracy runs for the upcoming
high school election for school president. Only the civics teacher, Mr.
McAllister (Matthew Broderick), is not sure he wants Tracy to win, and she has
a hell of a chance since she's the only one running. So he encourages a dumb
jock, Paul Metzler (Chris Klein - a keen reminder of Keanu Reeves) into running
for the election, thus sending a chord of resentment through some principal
characters. Tracy is understandably furious thinking she's the only one who
should run. Paul's sister, Tammy (Jessica Campbell), is a rebellious loner with
lesbian tendencies, and decides to run for president as an attack against her
brother's girlfriend. What transpires are voting posters torn from walls,
countless affairs, inarticulate political speeches, bee stings, meditating
between power lines, lies, bitter jealousies, and enough catastrophic events to
make Monica Lewinsky blush with shock. 
"Election" is deftly written and imaginatively directed by Alexander Payne.
His first effort, Citizen Ruth, was a mild, uneven black comedy that
nevertheless raised issues about abortion rights - a touchy subject. With
"Election," Payne explores and deeply uncovers a cutthroat comic spirit in the
realm of politics , and there is an occasional mean streak - all the characters
suffer and pay for the consequences of their actions. Yes, even the righteous
Mr. McAllister, who knows the difference between morals and ethics but does not
apply them to his daily life. As played by Matthew Broderick, it is hard to
dislike him, but you can reject his ethical and moral choices. 
In "Election," it is impossible to know whom you should be rooting for or whom
you should sympathize with. And Payne cleverly shifts from one character's
point-of-view to another to the point where we at least hope everyone gets away
with their individual actions. We hope that Tracy gets the shot as president,
but we start to doubt her ethics (she wants to get ahead in the world, after
all). However, is she any worse than McAllister, who has an affair with his
friend's wife? Does it matter that his friend was a former geometry professor
who had an affair with Tracy and, as a result. ousted from the school? Or what
about the dumb, sweet Paul who can't give a speech to save his life? Or Tammi
who has ambitions beyond elections, and considers suspensions to be restful
vacations? 
The cast is uniformly perfect. Reese Witherspoon is a spunky, tense,
frighteningly ambitious creature who will do anything to get support (not
unlike her similar character in Freeway) - she is like a tight ball of energy
ready to burst. Broderick has his best role in ages - he adeptly switches from
an omnipresent, good-natured teacher to a repulsive-looking creature with a bee
sting aiming to destroy Tracy - an act Ferris Bueller's principal (the
memorable performance by Jeffrey Jones in Ferris Bueller's Day Off) would have
been fond of. Jessica Campbell goes against the grain of zit-free, attractive
teens with her braces and rebellious attitude towards the school - she would
have been a fitting replacement for Rachel Leigh Cook in She's All That. And
the cameo by Colleen Camp as Tracy's mother is a shrewd casting choice - she is
as ambitious as her daughter.
"Election" is a hysterical, wonderful movie guaranteed to keep you in stitches
throughout. It is original, offbeat, edgy and facetious. It is still early, but
the vote is in for me: "Election" is the best film of the year. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 

Title
Review for Family Plot (1976)
Whenever the last film of a great director's career comes forth, one reacts 
with trepidation due to one's unfairly great expectations. This may be why I 
avoided Alfred Hitchcock's last hurrah, known as "Family Plot," for so many 
years. I have long admired and become influenced by Hitch's work. We are 
talking about a career that spans 54 films in its output, producing such 
classics as "Psycho," "North By Northwest," "Rear Window," "Shadow of a 
Doubt," "Vertigo" and several more. During the 1970's, Hitch was less 
prolific with one exceptionally thrilling and graphic thriller, "Frenzy" in 
1972, and "Family Plot" in 1976. Strangely, I must say I was pleasantly 
surprised: "Family Plot" may not be one of Hitch's finest but it is one of 
his few light comedies that has a few laughs and fine performances. It is 
light on its feet and quietly good fun. 
Barbara Harris stars as a phony psychic named Blanche Tyler (she calls 
herself a "spiritualist") whose latest client, Mrs. Rainbird, is trying to 
locate her sister's long-lost son. The trouble is that he may be dead but it 
hardly matters - Mrs. Rainbird wants Blanche to find him for a ten-thousand 
dollar fee since he stands to be heir of a million dollar fortune . This 
naturally excites Blanche and her cab driver boyfriend, George Lumley (Bruce 
Dern), who masquerades as a private eye and a lawyer. His act, which doesn't 
fool anyone, is to smoke a pipe, and he stands out like a true amateur. 
This whole search somehow involves another couple, in this case a rich 
married couple (William Devane and Karen Black - both ably cast) who are 
involved in kidnappings for rare diamonds. But I would not dream of giving 
away the connection between these two couples except to say that it is fairly 
foreseeable if you have seen other suspense thrillers. 
The fun in "Family Plot" is in the clues and the gradual tension and suspense 
involved in finding this missing Rainbird man. We have cemetaries with 
strange plots, tremulous psychics, bishops kidnapped for ransom, Karen Black 
wearing a blonde wig, secret compartments in garages, and so on. 
What is especially interesting about "Family Plot" is how laid-back and 
involving it is. There are a few great scenes told with Hitchcock's mastery 
of letting long-takes unfold without dialogue. Two stand out in particular: 
overhead shot of George walking through the cemetery dirt trails as he 
pursues an elderly woman; and a quietly effective sequence where George 
enters the rich couple's house through a garage window (shades here of Cary 
Grant entering a rich man's home in "North By Northwest"). There is also a 
very good chase scene where George and Blanche drive unable to stop their car 
due to faulty brakes. 
The performances are also low-key and intriguing. William Devane (who sounds 
like a smoother Jack Nicholson) does some of his best work here as a jeweler 
whose mind is always working creating dangerous schemes. I also love Karen 
Black, who has one greatly funny scene where she tries to warn Devane at his 
jewel shop of danger while pretending to be a customer. Bruce Dern is snappy 
and fitfully engaging as the somewhat dim-witted George, who's disinterested 
in Blanche's sexual pleas. Only Barbara Harris tends to go a bit over-the-top 
as Blanche, especially her seance scenes which provoke more groans rather 
than laughter. 
All in all, "Family Plot" is genial, lighthearted, clever nonsense - probably 
just a walk in the park for Hitch who was near the end of his health. All I 
can imagine is that Hitch must have been all sunny smiles while making 
essentially a parody of the suspense genre he helped create and perfect. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Contact (1997)
What is this I hear about summer movies in general? They are all brainless and
plotless? Excuse me, people, but don't forget that the smaller films are
usually the smarter ones. It's true that Hollywood rarely delivers anything
beyond the dumb and dumber set during the summer (or the year, for that
matter). The summer of 1997 had not been as horrendous as most, and one of the
smartest and most thought-provoking films of that summer was "Contact." 
Jodie Foster stars as Dr. Ellie Arroway, a serious-minded scientist who studies
extraterrestrial life. She believes life exists in some distant galaxy, and
studies chiefly with the world's largest radio telescope located in Arecibo,
Puerto Rico hoping to establish some alien contact. When her research project
is terminated, she persuades the government to fund a project to investigate
the possibility of extraterrestrial life. Ellie ends up in Socorro, New Mexico
where they have a field of 27 huge disc-shaped radio telescopes where she might
get some signal. And she does, and the whole world, including the government,
the CIA, the FBI, and the National Security counsel, is eager to know what it
is about. At first, Ellie hears deep vibrating signals. Then she receives an
alien signal in the form of the first televised image - Hitler's appearance at
the 1936 Olympic Games. Then she gets another visual signal that may be
instructions to build a ship.
"Contact" is based on the 1985 novel by the late Carl Sagan, and the film
doesn't betray Sagan's beliefs or his ambiguity. There are no green-eyed
Martians, no Men in Black with big guns, no laser shows, and no mother ships.
"Contact" presents us with the possibility of intelligent life in other
galaxies or stars namely Vega - Ellie makes contact with the signals but not
with the life forms (unless the ending of the movie suggests otherwise). When
the ship is built, there's controversy as to who should be sent aboard - a
believer in God, or a non-believer like Ellie? If the universe reveals God
doesn't exist, then where does civilization stand? If God does exist, should
Ellie be the one to go for the 2001 ride through the cosmos? 
"Contact" lumbers a bit with two needless subplots: the introduction of Matthew
McConaughey as a religious scholar who has a brief affair with Ellie, and a
bald Timothy Leary-like scientist (John Hurt) who has been supporting every
move she makes. McConaughey appears and disappears too soon before he reappears
in the last half of the film - his function is to let Ellie know that if she
stands by her beliefs, she should not be travelling in space. However, I was
struck by Ellie's decision in the first half not to speak to him after their
affair - it seems McConaughey forgot they ever had one. The Hurt character also
has little function except to imply he may have created all the mumbo jumbo
about alien ship designs to Ellie just to get the ship built. Hurt's
performance is too over-the-top for this film and he seems to have drifted in
from "Even Cowgirls Get The Blues" minus the long fingernails.         
Nevertheless, "Contact" works quite well for two reasons: Jodie Foster's
strong, fully realized performance, and the credible, well-written script.
Foster makes Ellie into an independent, vulnerable, tough-minded, no-nonsense
heroine still harboring deep feelings for her father (David Morse) who passed
away when she was young. Ellie's emotional clinging to her father is questioned
by McConaughey at one point when she wants proof of God's existence: 
The screenplay by James V. Hart and Michael Goldenberg huffs and puffs
frequently, providing as much information as possible. It is quite ambitious
covering Ellie's place as a scientist and as an atheist, and her relationship
with her father; the government and the rest of the free world's involvement in
what may be a revolutionary moment in science or mere hocus pocus; the
religious cults who try to take action against building an alien ship; and the
final trip itself that may leave you thinking for days as to what is truth and
where are the boundaries between time and space. The script is certainly well
devised and constructed but as aforementioned, there are too many subplots that
distract from Ellie's ascension or descent as an important scientist. I could
live without director Robert Zemeckis's "Gump"-ist attitudes by digitally
showing Bill Clinton's opinion of this alien contact. There also too many
scenes of real-life CNN anchors commenting on the action - one or two would
have been sufficient, but the whole staff? Ellie's hard-working staff is not
given much screen time making it seem as if she's doing all the hard work
alone. 
"Contact" is clunky but it is still fine entertainment and briskly directed by
Robert Zemeckis ("Forrest Gump"). The opening sequence pulls back from earth
through the galaxies, the stars and other planets hinting that something else
might be out there while we hear various pop songs and then utter silence. It
is eye-opening and breathtaking, including the last twenty minutes where Ellie
makes her rickety voyage into space in an alien pod that will take her to,
presumably, the alien designers. The film benefits greatly from the astounding
supporting cast including Tom Skerritt as David Drumlin, a scientist who wants
to go in the pod mission; James Woods as an edgy (what else?) National Security
Advisor; and Angela Bassett as a straight-arrow debate official. It is really
Jodie Foster who makes the movie her own - ambitious, stubborn, scrupulous,
skeptical. Carl Sagan should be proud.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general comments at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Wes Craven's New Nightmare (1994)
Freddy Krueger is a horror icon on the same level as Dracula, Frankenstein's
monster, King Kong, among others. The character is Wes Craven's invention and
it still is an imaginatively created character. Freddy has a burnt face, glove
with four sharp razors, a red and green sweater, a fedora hat, and an attitude.
The original "Nightmare on Elm Street" is among the best and most original
horror films ever made - a scarefest that examines the psychological dreams and
the subconscious of unruly teenagers living on Elm Street who are being pursued
in their dreams by a child killer named Freddy. If he kills you in your dreams,
you'll wake up dead. The inevitable sequels were not quite on the same league
as the original but they were creative, visual tour de forces with excellent
special-effects and a jocose Freddy. Wes Craven was not involved in any of the
follow-ups but he came up with a new idea in 1994 - a film-within-the-film
treatise on the danger of the "Nightmare" movies and how they affect the cast
members. It is a noble idea but it doesn't quite deliver any new themes or
ideas. 
"Wes Craven's New Nightmare" stars Heather Langenkamp as herself, an actress
whose life dramatically changed since she completed the "Nightmare" movies. She
has a nice house in L.A., a faithful husband (David Newsom) who works on
special-effects, and a seemingly disturbed young son named Dylan (Miko Hughes)
who watches scenes from the original "Nightmare" movie and even speaks like
Freddy (he also loves to read "Hansel and Gretel"). Not all is well as we
discover something ominous is happening in the Langenkamp residence. There are
the numerous phone calls from an obsessed fan (maybe Freddy); several
earthquake tremors; Dylan screaming at the top of his lungs; her husband killed
in a car accident (could be Freddy's fault); and so on. Heather meets with
several of her movie co-stars (John Saxon and Robert Englund as themselves) to
determine what is happening. My feeling is that she dotes on and is overly
protective of her son, Dylan, but that's just a thought. Perhaps Dylan
shouldn't be watching any of those movies. What do you think, Heather?
It turns out that Heather is being offered a new role in a new "Nightmare"
movie, hence the movie we are watching. Wes's new script had been devised to
get rid of the demon who has been unleashed into the world after killing off
the fictional character in Freddy's Dead. As Wes explains in one of the best
scenes in the movie, this demon is more powerful and more evil than Freddy and
Heather must try to stop him from getting her and her son. It is art imitating
life in the broadest sense, and this is possibly the best and most twisted idea
in the whole series by far. 
Unfortunately, Wes screws it up because he doesn't allow the screenplay to play
for some clever thrills and psychological meanings. Instead, he opts for clever
inside jokes and unwarranted hysteria. Being a confessed Freddy fan myself, I
enjoyed seeing all the puns and jokes, and I liked seeing some of the actors as
themselves (look quickly for Tuesday Knight from "Nightmare 4"), the agents,
New Line president Robert Shaye, etc. The movie plays like a docudrama and
that's when it works best. It's the dramatic, personal stuff, that doesn't
work.
The biggest flaw is the crucial casting of the Dylan role: he's played by Miko
Hughes who overacts to the hilt and delivers fake screams. This kid is so
intolerable and so unlikable that it is difficult to build any kind of sympathy
for him or his plight. Heather Langenkamp does a relatively fine job of playing
herself (not Nancy) and she is at her best in the opening scenes where the
phone continually rings and her son continually screams - her dazed, agitated
behavior is superbly realized. For the rest of the movie, though, she seems to
be playing the character Nancy and not herself. Of course, she may be dreaming
the whole film that we are watching but that's a moot point. I like the scenes
where Heather is more relaxed such as when she meets with John Saxon at a park,
or when she converses with Wes at his house.         Some of the obligatory dream
sequences are excellent, including the magnificent (and overlong) inferno
ending where Freddy nearly swallows Dylan! I also liked the terrifying sequence
where Dylan walks across a highway where dozens of cars and trucks nearly hit
him. But most of the movie tries, and fails, to build suspense through
countless earthquakes, and numerous telephone rings as in Craven's "Scream."
Nothing in the film is particularly thrilling or compelling - it just becomes
repetitious and numbing after a while. 
I saw this film three times because the critics thought so highly of it, and I
thought maybe I missed something. The first time I saw it, I hated it - it
seemed nothing like the previous films. The second time I saw it, I thought it
was just plain awful. The third time, I saw it on a TNT "Monstervision" special
(hosted by Joe Bob Briggs) and I appreciated some of the minute subtleties, and
the performances  were a lot better than I had anticipated. Director Wes Craven
just missed the mark by not investing the psychological, real-life horror of
horror movies taking over the lead actors' lives and their families. 
"Wes Craven's New Nightmare" is not a terrible movie but it is unfocused and
mediocre - just being self-reverential is not enough. Still, if you're a Freddy
Krueger fan, you should check it out for the clever puns and the infrequent
brilliant nightmare scenes, but not for any other reason. Stick with the
original "Nightmare." 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with questions, concerns or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Meet the Parents (2000)
Ben Stiller is playing the kind of character Adam Sandler should be playing. 
Not an idiot savant, mind you, but a grown-up jerk who has his heart in the 
right place. Stiller is still flirting with disaster and it is a joy to watch 
him in "Meet the Parents," a chaotic yet thoroughly restrained howler in the 
tradition of "Father of the Bride." When I think of Stiller in this film, I 
think of Murphy's Law - whatever can go wrong will go wrong. 
Stiller plays Greg Focker (!), a Jewish male nurse who is ready to propose to 
his sweetly precious girlfriend, Pam (Teri Polo), a schoolteacher. Problem is 
she catches him at the wrong time when she mentions that her father, who is 
hard to please, has agreed to her other sister's wedding proposal to be 
married on their front lawn. Naturally, Greg and Pam go to meet her parents 
on Long Island, NY, to attend the wedding. Enter Pam's father (Robert De 
Niro), who pretends to be a retired florist to cover for his ex-CIA 
activities, and Pam's mother (Blythe Danner) who has a tender smile, even in 
the midst of chaos. Everything goes wrong from the start of what should be an 
enjoyable weekend. Greg screws up the family prayer at the dinner table when 
he hilariously mentions how to milk a cat (he also tells bad jokes). There is 
the running gag of De Niro's prized pet, a cat named Mr. Jinx, whom De Niro 
considers as much a family member as anyone else. Mr. Jinx has been trained 
to relieve itself in a toilet, though Greg suggests at one point that the cat 
could probably flush too. Then there is the whole septic tank incident, not 
to mention Pam's ex-boyfriend (Owen Wilson) who lives luxuriously and invites 
them to his home to show off. An excruciating lie-detector test followed by 
the usual misunderstandings about marijuana, and the constant use of Greg's 
last name ad nauseam. 
Stiller is pitch-perfect as Greg - every scene he is in made me laugh louder 
than most comedies this year (and his resume is not bad either, from his 
roles in "Reality Bites" to "Flirting With Disaster" to "Mystery Men"). But 
what makes Stiller such a natural at being made a mockery is his 
vulnerability, whether it is seeing him dressed in pajamas when walking into 
his possible future in-laws at breakfast time or his slow burn leading to a 
completely frazzled condition in front of De Niro's hidden video cameras - he 
is the clumsy nerd with a core of humanity. We may not always understand his 
motives but we can't help but feel sorry for him, even if he spray paints a 
cat's tail!
De Niro is at his comical best relaxing with smoothness and calmness, the 
likes of which we have not seen since "Wag the Dog." De Niro does not force 
the audience to laugh with him, he merely plays it straight and has great 
comic timing. I cannot imagine a more suitable foil than De Niro's coiled 
charm to Stiller's maddening anxiety.
The Pam character and the ex-fiance are two characters that do not fit in to 
the frothy mix. Teri Polo is so bland and forgettable as Greg's girlfriend 
that she hardly seems worth all the trouble - that may be cruel but consider 
what someone with far more personality and range could have done with this 
role, say Lisa Kudrow or Uma Thurman? Owen Wilson also seems tired and flat 
as the ex, and it is generally a wasted, unnecessary role considering there 
is no payoff - he might dislike or disapprove of Pam's new love but there is 
not a single scene where he expresses that emotion. 
I would have loved more intimate scenes between Danner and De Niro (the most 
unlikely pair of actors to play a married couple), but "Meet the Parents" is 
quite a laughfest from start to finish. And watching De Niro come up against 
Stiller is a marvelous sight and a true laugh riot to witness. Let's see 
those two again on screen soon, and Mr. Jinx too.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com 

Title
Review for Jurassic Park III (2001)
Steven Spielberg is one of the few directors that can produce real movie 
magic on screen. Consider the magic wand he waved in such classics as 
"Raiders of the Lost Ark", "E.T.", "Jaws" and "Close Encounters of the Third 
Kind." "Jurassic Park" is no exception and though it is no classic by any 
means, it is a thrill-happy, terrifically exciting action picture bringing 
back Spielberg's whiz-bang intensity that the otherwise middling "Always" and 
the overblown "Hook" lacked. 
Based loosely on Michael Crichton's novel, "Jurassic Park" focuses on a group 
of scientists (Sam Neill, Jeff Goldblum and Laura Dern) visiting a 
fantastical park in a South American island populated by live-breathing 
dinosaurs, including a vicious Tyrannosaurus Rex, quick-tempered, meat-eating 
velociraptors, and cuddly Brontosaurus specimens. According to John Hammond 
(Richard Attenborough), the owner of the park, the dinosaurs were genetically 
engineered by dinosaur blood found in mosquitoes, which were preserved in 
amber! Essentially, Hammond is like Frankenstein, bringing back dinosaurs 
from the dead!
"Jurassic Park" is a thrill ride from start to finish. Spielberg and writers 
Michael Crichton and David Koepp are not interested in character development 
- they simply know that audiences are too interested in seeing dinosaurs. You 
have to remember that the year 1993 was a revolutionary year for cinema - the 
term CGI was born. This  meant that creating believable creatures and 
landscapes with the use of computer-generated images was a true possibility. 
Thus, this film was the first to ever show the most realistic dinosaurs ever 
seen in film history and that was the draw for audiences. Today, CGI seems 
like an afterthought but back then, it was an astounding achievement. 
Spielberg uses CGI to his advantage. There are two exceptional Spielberg 
sequences: one is a scary, horrifying sequence in which the T-Rex attacks two 
kids trapped in a car, and the other is when the velociraptors trap the same 
kids in a kitchen. There are lots of dino chomping scenes but then there are 
some purely amazing moments that evoke a sense of wonder and joy. The first 
glimpse of a dinosaur is the brontosaurus as it tries to reach a tree branch 
- Spielberg shoots the scene from a low-angle so that we get the feeling we 
are witnessing a majestic, prehistoric creature too grand and mysterious for 
our eye level. The T-Rex itself is astounding, and the impressive soundtrack 
(recorded in DTS, digital sound, for the first time ever) enhances the 
credibility and realism of these creatures. 
So much talk about the dinos, what about the humans? Well, they recede in the 
background because any movie with creatures, especially dinos, will steal 
scenes from others, no holds barred. Still, this is a helluva good cast. 
Attenborough is appropriately and equally gleeful and stubborn as the 
gullible owner, unaware of what he has created. Sam Neill, an actor I 
dislike, gives a pleasing performance as Dr. Grant who seems to have a 
dislike for children. Laura Dern is wasted as Grant's wife, capable of much 
more than screaming fits. The actor who upstages them all is Jeff Goldblum as 
Ian Malcolm, a chaos theorist and mathematician who wears funny sunglasses 
and a rock n'roll leather jacket - he seems to have stepped out of "American 
Graffiti." His one-liners and his ridicule of this dangerous theme park bring 
a level of irony that Spielberg could have carried further than he does. 
As a story, "Jurassic Park" lacks much thrust or significance, though it can 
be construed as a modern-day Frankenstein tale where the act of creating 
rests solely on whether something should be created, particularly when you 
meddle with nature. The characters are thin but they remain watchable 
personalities (including Samuel L. Jackson in a small role as a computer 
expert and Wayne Knight as another computer expert who decides to steal some 
specimens). But for undeniable thrills and escapist entertainment, nothing 
can beat Spielberg's exciting dinos and kinetic action sequences. As Pauline 
Kael once remarked, Spielberg doesn't just thrill you, he spooks you with 
giddiness and exhilaration. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Your Friends & Neighbors (1998)
Neil LaBute is a talented writer and director and I noticed it right away when
I saw his directorial debut, "In the Company of Men," a lacerating black comedy
about man's inhumanity towards women, and men. I've seen the film twice and I
was both shocked and gratified by the film's depiction of its characters,
especially the insensitive, insulting Chad, marvelously played by Aaron
Eckhart. "Your Friends and Neighbors" is LaBute's second effort, and it is less
angry and less intoxicating than it should have been. I am shocked to say this,
but LaBute has crafted a fairly, dare I say, tame and flat film of little
consequence. 
The film begins with people who have no interest in developing healthy
relationships with each other. We see the contemptuous, masculine, arrogant
Cary (Jason Patric) who prepares for a date by practicing his lines in bed
while writhing with faux pleasure. There's also Man (played by Ben Stiller) who
tries desperately to please his wife (Catherine Keener) but she doesn't like it
when he talks while copulating - "F---ing is not a time for sharing". When she
has an affair, she coldly states that the best part of sex is the silence. In
retribution, Man pursues another guys wife (a bland Amy Brenneman), who wants
desperately to find a man who can maintain an erection. Brenneman's husband
(played by a porcine, mustached Aaron Eckhart) can't seem to satisfy his wife
so he masturbates, even while she's in bed - he gets more pleasure from himself
than with anyone else. However, when they go shopping together, he insists that
the best method of resuscitating their sex life is to "treat each other like
meat". 
"Your Friends and Neighbors" is LaBute's attempt to show that relationships
have no saving grace, and that the partners gradually grow bored with each
other. Unfortunately, his characters lack sting and depth - they are glamorous
nobodies wafting through their existence with no desire or interest in each
other. This is quite a cynical point to make, but LaBute infuses this tale with
a static charge that renders everything as flat and monotonous. The movie is
devoid of color and humor, and the characters emerge as vapid ciphers. Compare
this to Woody Allen's "Manhattan" and "Deconstructing Harry" and you'll see
that Woody goes well beyond the primary cynicism - he explores what makes his
characters tick. 
As a writer, LaBute does have some witty, anarchic moments, though. There is
the running gag of an art-gallery assistant (Nastassja Kinski) who stares at
the same unseen art object with each of the main characters - they ask her the
same questions with the same exact responses. Then there's the undeniably
well-cast Jason Patric (doing some of his best work since "After Dark, My
Sweet") as the meanest, least likable character since Chad from "In the Company
of Men." Patric has two virtuoso scenes: one set in a locker room with his
friends where he confesses that a homosexual encounter in high school was the
best lay he ever had, and another scene where he mutilates Keener with such
piercing words that she is reduced to tears - an interesting scene because it
shows that Keener may not be such a frigid woman after all. 
Beyond some frank sexual talk and manners, Your Friends and Neighbors is dull
to sit through and the characters are ill-defined and impossible to care about.
LaBute is still a talent to watch for but he needs to imbue his characters with
some degree of humanity so that his dialogue can cut some fairly deep wounds in
all of us. "In the Company of Men" could have been a sick joke about teasing a
deaf woman and then dumping her for the sake of revenge, but LaBute was after
bigger game and revealed some strong character personalities. "Your Friends and
Neighbors" is about people who screw each other with no rhyme or reason. It's
just a sick joke. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with questions, concerns or general comments at jerry@movieluver.com
or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Viva Las Vegas (1964)
An Elvis Presley movie has to be approached as entertainment, nothing more. 
His best films, "King Creole" and "Jailhouse Rock," offered more than 
entertainment - they had meaty stories and well-drawn characters. "Viva Las 
Vegas" is one of Elvis's most popular movies but when all is said and done, 
its mere novelty is that it is nothing more than a pictaresque travelogue 
with Elvis and Ann-Margret chewing up the screen with their songs and dance 
moves. 
Elvis stars as Lucky Jackson, a cocky race car driver with aspirations to 
race at the Grand Prix in Las Vegas. The trouble is that there is a powerful 
engine he needs to buy for his precious car. Lucky tries his luck at a Vegas 
casino and actually wins the money. Unfortunately, the engine is bought by 
someone else, and through a series of misadventures, namely falling in a pool 
while making courtly advances to a fellow employee, Rusty Martin 
(Ann-Margret), Lucky loses his money and finds himself working as a waiter at 
a hotel. 
In the meantime, there are a series of montages involving Lucky and a rival 
driver, Count Elmo Mancini (played by singer Cesare Danova), who spend about 
twenty minutes searching for that pretty redhead Rusty at every single Vegas 
casino and showplace on the Strip (which leaves about one hour of more 
repetitive montages). There are also the requisite songs sung by Elvis and 
Ann-Margret - my favorites are the title tune, "The Lady Loves Me," and 
"Appreciation." And Cesare does not get to perform one song...how cruel!
To criticize "Viva Las Vegas" is to ask for trouble. How can you argue 
against a movie that hardly has a story or credible characters, and is just 
concerned with being silly and fluffy nonsense? The movie is mostly an 
advertisement for Las Vegas, offering scenic beauty and plenty of helicopter 
shots of the horizon in Cinemascope color. And there is Elvis and 
Ann-Margret, two dazzling, sexy, charismatic stars who unfortunately have 
little in the way of chemistry. And the final race car competition results in 
two deaths (though one of them survives relatively unscathed if you check out 
the final wedding sequence), and apparently starts at midnight though it 
seems to last through the next day!
There are some electric moments with the dynamic Ann-Margret, a fabulous 
singer and dancer and a better actor than Elvis. Elvis himself has one high 
comedic point where he splashes champagne all over Cesare, who is trying to 
woo Ann-Margret. Beyond that, I expect much more than pretty scenery and a 
few good songs, but why carp? People seem to love this movie, so be it.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
Faust667@aol.com or at jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Manhunter (1986)
"Manhunter" is based on Thomas Harris's scary novel "Red Dragon," the first book
to introduce Dr. Hannibal Lecter who later resurfaced in both "Silence of the
Lambs" and "Hannibal." Though Michael Mann's film adaptation is not nearly as
good as the novel, nor as good a film as "Silence of the Lambs," it is
occasionally gripping, absorbing stuff. 
This early film does not focus on Clarice Starling, the heroine of the later
entries in the series. Instead, we have a male lead who has one or two screws
loose thanks to his unnaturally intense study of how serial killers think. He is
Will Graham (William Petersen) who has left the agency after being attacked by
Lecter (this time played by Brian Cox) and had to be committed to a mental
institution to recover. But the FBI Sector Chief Jack Crawford (Dennis Farina in
this one, Scott Glenn in "Silence") wants Graham's extraordinary ability to be
put to work on a new serial killer. Apparently, this one killer kills families
in their homes in excruciatingly brutal ways. The FBI has no suspects and no
leads but Graham might be able to find out who the killer is, branded by
policemen as "The Tooth Fairy." And there might be clues related to the killer's
dreams of being loved and an association with the poet/painter William Blake
(dealt with more specificity in the novel). 
Most of "Manhunter" is absorbing, particularly the scenes where Graham
investigates the crime scenes where he notes details of the executions and the
direction in which the blood was spilled (some of the family members were
injured or harmed postmortem). Other scenes with Graham and his wife, Molly (Kim
Greist), lack much thrust or purpose - the character of Molly is so
underdeveloped that we forget he is even married to her. Other characters like
Crawford drift in and out of focus, though Graham does have one or two finely
written scenes with Crawford where he shows his level of attention at all the
details. There is also a superb scene where Graham explains his past condition
to his son at a supermarket - except for some cutaways of his son's reaction,
the camera trains itself on Petersen and he is quite watchable. 
Still, "Manhunter" feels oddly unmoving and closed-off, much like the main
character. There is none of the richness or depth that the book provides. Its
main killer maintains some interest but is saddled with just a shotgun at the
end as the police circle his house - his creative desires and motives are
scantly mentioned here. It is a Michael Mann picture alright, complete with an
electronic score (some distracting songs by Iron Butterfly) and a shootout right
out of his superior "Thief." If nothing else, it is often enticing enough but
not at the level of the book or at the level of "Silence of the Lambs." 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Amityville Horror, The (1979)
At the tender age of eight, my mother took me to see "The Amityville Horror" 
in a movie theatre. I remember being exceptionally scared by it, and recall 
quite vividly some of the movie's scary and eerie moments like the black 
liquid oozing from a toilet; the pig with the red eyes; the Red Room scene, 
and so on. I had not seen the film since 1979 until recently on DVD. Well, 
looking at the film now more objectively than when I was eight, I have 
concluded that "The Amityville Horror" is only occasionally effective but it 
also mostly silly, dull, and frightfully cold and emotionless. 
The story, based on a now debunked "true story" novel by Jay Anson, centers 
on the Lutzes, a couple who move in to the dreaded Long Island house with 
their three kids. The house is sold cheaply, mainly because a killing spree 
took place a few years earlier involving the DeFeo family - they were killed 
by their teenage son with a shotgun. I would never move into a house where 
murders had taken place - nowadays, such houses are usually boarded up though 
not always. Anyway, the Lutzes love the house and buy it. George Lutz (James 
Brolin) begins to feel the curious need of chopping wood for the fireplace 
through most of the film. The wife feels neglected, especially since he won't 
help with carrying the groceries. The daughter starts talking to her new 
friend, Jody, who is invisible, and has a habit of locking her babysitter in 
the closet. A frantic psychotherapist/priest/exorcist (Rod Steiger) comes to 
bless the house one day until he is chased out by flies and a voice saying, 
"Get Out!" A nun comes to the hous
e and feels so sick upon entering that she vomits on the Lutzes's driveway. 
Either the house smells and needs to be fumigated or it is haunted. 
"The Amityville Horror" is chock full of "shock" moments, and some of them 
are effective (the babysitter pounding on the closet door with her bloodied 
hands is disturbing). The film, however, has no momentum. It sort of labors 
along at a snail pace pausing occasionally for some weird occurrences and 
rappings in the house (my favorite being the case of the missing 1500 
dollars). The main flaw is that the Lutzes are presented as less a family 
than some annoying neighbors I could hardly care about - no attempt to 
develop sympathy for them has been made. Mr. Brolin comes off as demented a 
madman within the first few minutes as Jack Nicholson did in "The Shining." 
Margot Kidder, a reliable actress of dignity, comes off best but not enough 
to save the film. Steiger overacts shamefully, supposedly trying to match the 
towering performance of Max Von Sydow in "The Exorcist." As the realtor 
should have said at the beginning of the film: No sale.
P.S. The Oscar-nominated musical score by Lalo Schifrin was originally 
composed for "The Exorcist" but it was rejected by director William Friedkin. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Mission: Impossible II (2000)
I have no personal agenda against action movies in general. If they are 
entertaining, even in a remotely campy manner, then I will not complain. God 
only knows that we should not expect much more in this digital, impersonal 
age. So "Mission: Impossible 2" hardly has much going for it except 
straightforward action scenes to dazzle and numb the brain. Incredibly, the 
film is no fun at all - a never-ending trailer for what might look like a 
cool, sleek action picture that never comes to fruition. It is vapid and 
joyless - two words that should not be associated with thrill rides. 
Ethan Hunt (Tom Cruise), the htoshot superspy from the original, is back, 
this time trying to prevent a bland villain, Ambrose (Dougray Scott) from 
buying the antidotes to a deadly virus. From what I gather from the plot, 
this ambitious nut hopes to gain billions by unleashing this virus upon the 
world, and since there will be millions of dying, infected people, he will 
have access to the antidote which he can sell in multitudes. Just sounds like 
another business proposition that Bill Gates should pursue. The only way to 
stop this madman is for Hunt to hire a beautiful jewel thief, Nyah Hall 
(Thandie Newton), to charm the pants off of her former love, Ambrose, so that 
the IMF team can trace his every move. Sounds like an update of Hitchcock's 
classic "Notorious" eh? And I assure you that is where the similarities end, 
since this "M:I 2" possesses not one syllable of greatness from its far 
superior inspiration. 
In fact, this movie is one of the worst sequels in years, embodying 
absolutely nothing that made the first "Mission: Impossible" a passable 
success. It is not witty, funny, exciting or engaging at any given moment. 
For pure excitement, we have an echo of Cruise's famous suspension from a 
ceiling from the original (which echoed the caper "Topkapi"), and a tense, 
believable opening plane crash followed by Cruise dangling 2000 feet up from 
a cliff. Outside of that, director John Woo overdoes the slow-motion 
technique in his action scenes...even using this technique when Cruise and 
Newton make goo-goo eyes at each other. I felt like I was watching a 
commercial for one of those cologne ads.   
Cruise slums and preens with not a trace of his personality coming through - 
he sleepwalks through this movie. Thandie Newton just looks beautiful, a 
shame considering this is the same actress from "Beloved." Ving Rhames barely 
reprises his role from the original, and looks just as bored. The villains 
would barely threaten Adam Sandler. The whole film feels like a bland souffle 
- it is sour and mechanical. Woo does nothing to enliven the proceedings - he 
is on automatic air pilot with dozens of shots of motorcycles, kicks, flips 
in the air, gunfire, oh, and a dove (another Woo trademark). None of this is 
remotely close to his purely visceral and intoxicating "Face/Off." 
Apparently, Tom Cruise fans want him to do more action-oriented/romantic 
comedy fare, and less of his exalting turns in offbeat films such as 
"Magnolia." Perhaps this was just a ride to the bank for Cruise, and now he 
can pursue more challenging roles. My recommended mission, should you choose 
to accept it, is to avoid this movie at all costs. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com 
or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Fright Night (1985)
An undying pleasure awaits for those who like comedy-horror done with style
and wit. One of the best vampire flicks in ages, "Fright Night" is grand
entertainment - rollicking good fun with an expert cast and a daintily
enjoyable script. 
William Ragsdale stars as Charlie Brewster, a high-school student who suspects
that his new next-door neighbor, Jerry Dandridge (Chris Sarandon), is a
vampire. He sees Jerry luring prostitutes and call-girls to his house, even
undressing them and biting their necks! Charlie is ever the voyeur, watching
these acts of violence with his trusty binoculars, and is less attentive to his
girlfriend, Amy (Amanda Bearse). Of course, when Charlie reports the unholy
vampiric duties in the neighborhood to the police, he is disbelieved, even by
washed-up actor, Peter Vincent (Roddy McDowall), a former host of vampire
flicks. Charlie's giggling, posturing, Jack Nicholson-like friend, Evil Ed
(Stephen Geoffreys) is no help either.
There is an element of Anthony Perkins to William Ragsdale as Charlie in the
way of his gestures, his frightened, sweaty face, and his aw-shucks mentality -
they mirror Perkins completely. Ragsdale would have been a fitting replacement
in the "Psycho" remake.
The vampire, Jerry, as played by Chris Sarandon is suave, handsome, romantic,
whistles "Strangers in the Night," and eats apples. He is not like any
traditional vampire, but he has charm, elegance, and is believably frightening
at times. Jerry even has a roommate, Billy Cole (Jonathan Stark), who is not a
vampire yet not entirely human either. 
The camaraderie between Charlie, Amy, Evil Ed, and the older, wiser Peter
Vincent is at the heart of "Fright Night" - without them, the film would be a
futile exercise in gruesome special-effects. Their exchanges and witticisms
make this a cut above the norm. There are the usual cliches about vampire lore,
but all done with great humor. Consider the scene where Charlie seeks advice
from Ed on how to destroy a vampire - Ed explains all the rules but with such
relish that it seems all new and fresh. There's also a great early scene where
Charlie meets Peter and tries to convince him that vampires do exist. McDowall
brings a level of poignance to the scene, addressing how nobody believes in
vampire movies anymore - "They prefer men in ski masks hacking up young
virgins." 
"Fright Night" also has its share of frightful scenes and some bloody,
tongue-in-cheek special-effects. There are wolves with red eyes, female
vampires with grotesquely big mouths, erotic club scenes (the dance between
Sarandon and Bearse builds with sensual energy), skinless bats, hidden coffins,
gallons of neon green blood, gothic houses surrounded by fog, and the usual
brand of crosses, stakes, and vials of holy water. It all leads, of course, to
the inevitable question of faith. 
"Fright Night" becomes over-the-top towards the end and repetitious, but it is
a consistent balance of fright and fun. Sarandon and McDowall are perfectly
cast - rising above all the horror with splendid, memorable performances. 1985
was not a bad year for comedy-horror and vice-versa. This film along with the
cult classic "The Return of the Living Dead," "Critters," among others showed
how much fun filmmakers could have with the genre. This show is a real treat to
savor.
For more reviews check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 

Title
Review for Orson Welles: The One-Man Band (1996)
There are directors who never get noticed and those who have one major hit only
to have a slew of flops follow them. Then there are directors who have one major
masterpiece and a host of films that follow, never quite matching the brilliance
of their initial masterwork. Orson Welles falls in this category, though I have
found that "Touch of Evil," "The Trial" and "F For Fake" are brilliant films
that arguably surpass his most famous film, "Citizen Kane." This wonderful
documentary, "Orson Welles: The One-Man Band," traces Welles's last twenty years
of his life where he desperately tried to find financing to complete his films
only to be turned down again and again. 
Most people think that there was not much to Welles beyond "Citizen Kane" and
some other studio efforts, not to mention his slew of acting jobs left and
right. After "Chimes at Midnight" and "F For Fake," it is assumed that Welles
was a has-been left to his acting in any and every film, narrating
documentaries, and performing in wine commercials. He was a genius who was no
longer the shining star of the past. This is, of course, not true at all. Welles
was very busy and never got dismayed from lack of funds. He would finance some
of his projects with money he obtained from acting. According to his partner and
collaborator, Oja Kodar, Welles would travel everywhere with his 16mm camera and
an editing table. He was filled with ideas and wanted to explore them all. 
Some of his projects include the unfinished Hollywood satire, "The Other Side of
the Wind," "The Merchant of Venice," "The Deep" and "The Dreamers." In some
cases, the incomplete status of some of these films was a result of either poor
business entanglements or financiers who feared Welles's lack of wanting to
finish anything, thus based on his reputation. In the case of "Other Side of the
Wind," a relative of the Shah of Iran helped to finance the project and then
pulled out holding the footage of Welles's 3 hour opus hostage. "The Merchant of
Venice" was to be made for television and the film was actually completed but
the negative was stolen! "The Deep" is based on a novel by Charles Williams III,
which later became the basis for "Dead Calm" starring Nicole Kidman. Film was
almost completed until the main lead, Laurence Harvey, died. "The Dreamers" was
a project that began in the early 1980's and was shot in his own L.A. home, but
financing was harder to come by at that po!
int. A "King Lear" project was p
lanned but no one was interested.
Some other footage shown is interesting though whether the films themselves were
ever completed remains a mystery. A short clip about tailors measuring Welles's
girth is good for a few laughs. An even funnier clip is shown of Welles playing
a lord of the manor interviewed by a bearded Welles! There is also a
seven-minute long trailer for "F For Fake" that makes most trailers today look
positively unimaginative in comparison. Powerful film fragments of Welles
performing a one-man show of "Moby Dick" sans makeup or costuming show what a
grand, majestic actor he was, and what an enthralling voice he had! There is
also a clip from "Swinging London" which shows typical Welles impersonations of
a Chinese ticket-taker, a housewife, a police inspector and a one-man band
player. 
Oja Kodar held all these fragments and incompleted films in a storage room until
one day she decided to release them as part of this documentary. What we witness
is a fallen giant who had gone from a Hollywood director to an independent film
artist who never got the financing he so desired and deserved (his last
Hollywood film as a director was 1958's "Touch of Evil"). Director Vassili
Silovic, however, fails to make us understand why Welles had so much trouble.
One possible reason is that Welles languished for an eternity making his films.
According to author Joseph McBride's book on Welles, "The Other Side of the
Wind" was a project that lasted from 1970 to 1976. In this film, there is a
scene where Welles is interviewed by a college class.  He tells them that his
dormant project from the 50's, "Don Quixote," will be finished in his own time,
just like an author works on an unfinished novel. But why was the negative of 
"Merchant of Venice" stolen? Did Welles perhaps forget !
to pay the lab bill, as did Ed W
ood with "Bride of the Monster"? Or was he overextending his finances? And how
does one explain "F For Fake" and "Filming Othello," both from the 70's and both
of them completed? 
The main treat of "Orson Welles: The One-Man Band" is watching what the master
was up to in that 20-year stretch. Clips from "Other Side of the Wind" prove to
be extraordinary and way ahead of its time. One scene shows John Huston as a
film director greeted by the press and there are dozens of fast cuts and jump
cuts from different angles that anticipate MTV by more than a decade! Another
clip shown from "Wind" is a sex scene in a car with Oja Kodar that is as erotic
as anything I've ever seen. Curiously, clips from "The Deep" are shown minus a
soundtrack. We only hear Welles's booming voice explaining the action that is
occurring on screen. There are also clips of his magic shows with the Muppets,
his crowd-pleasing acceptance of his Lifetime Achievement Award from the very
industry that shunned him, and so much more. 
"One-Man Band" is plain evidence of a man who had unfulfilled his legacy of a
legendary film director - for his detractors, this film will prove to be quite
illuminating. It is sad and upsetting to watch what might have been. I heartily
recommend Frank Brady's book, "Citizen Welles," which covers Welles's whole
career, including his last few years where he could not get financial help from
Steven Spielberg and the inability to procure a Hollywood star like Jack
Nicholson for his completed screenplay, "The Big Brass Ring." It will serve to
amplify the sadness of a man who remained obsessive and forthright, determined
to keep making films at any cost. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com 

Title
Review for Shaft (2000)
Back in 1971, "Shaft" was a revolutionary film - it introduced an
African-American hero who bed countless women a la James Bond and
could be as mean and relentless as most other private detectives, such
as Philip Marlowe. Not just that, the film also showed an
African-American who preened and walked the streets as if he owned
them. He meant business and held no prisoners - a true fighting
machine. The other significance of "Shaft" is that it launched the
blaxploitation genre with popular hits such as "Superfly" and "Foxy
Brown." Though the genre eventually died out, it resurged somewhat
with Tarantino's take "Jackie Brown" in 1997 and now the Samuel
L. Jackson revisionist take by director John Singleton. With Jackson
in the title role and a super cool, sleek style, this new "Shaft"
delivers.
Jackson is Shaft, though he does not replacing the original actor,
Richard Roundtree. Instead, he plays his nephew and Roundtree is back
reprising his famous role, now a weary uncle who still has his way
with women. This new Shaft is also not a private detective but a New
York City cop (watch out Guiliani). At the start of the film, he is
investigating a racist yuppie, Walter Wade Jr.  (Christian Bale, in
his "American Psycho" mode), who killed an African-American man (Meki
Phifer) in cold blood.  Wade gets away scot-free and is deported to
Switzerland. Meanwhile, Shaft, sensing a gross injustice, quits the
police force. He does so in an unbelievably funny scene where he
tosses his badge across a courtroom as if it was a Chinese star. There
are various comic-book moments like this, especially when a runaway
drug dealer breaks through one building window and lands safely on the
other side by breaking through another building window. Jackson's
reaction makes the scene priceless!  .
Several years later, Shaft is still pursuing Wade and finds a way of
trapping him. Apparently, Wade has employed a Dominican coke dealer,
Peoples Hernandez (Jeffrey Wright), to kill a scared bartender (Toni
Collete), the sole witness who can pinpoint Wade to the murder. The
price is $40,000 for the hit, but of course Shaft tries to obtain the
cash and succeeds leading to a series of double-crosses, car chases
and lots of violence.  In other words, what else do you expect from an
action picture, right? True, but it is rare to see a fun, exciting,
truly spirited action picture like this one, and Jackson makes it more
so with his titanic presence and his unduly sarcasm.
Director John Singleton stages the car chase scenes with such panache
that it almost supersedes the similar velocity of car stunts in
"Ronin." They somehow feel new again, and the reason is in the
character development and the less-is-more policy. Most action
pictures overdose on action paranoia (see "Lethal Weapon 4") but this
Shaft proves to be a strong, durable hero with more than enough reason
for payback - he is no angry cartoon like Mel Gibson's Riggs. Shaft
shows no fear and little mercy, especially when roughing up a couple
of teen gang members or using Bale as a punching bag. "Oh, you are
firing me, for that?", as he knocks Bale out yet again.
The villains are also very effective - the golden rule in any action
flick is that the villains must be threatening and scary. "Mission:
Impossible 2" is a bad example of providing a villain that would not
even scare Barney the Dinosaur. In "Shaft", we have two villains, both
a major match for the hero. Bale as the mean, racist, impulsive Wade,
and the near-stereotypical yet vibrant turn by Jeffrey Wright (yes,
the same guy from "Basquiat") as the smooth Peoples who wants to use
Wade's clientele to up the ante on his drug sales. There is one tense,
frighteningly real scene where Peoples lets his emotional guard down
when he finds his brother dead - he literally stabs himself in protest
and sheer anger. Powerful stuff that you rarely see in a movie of this
type.
"Shaft" is not a great movie simply because the plot is too mediocre
to inspire much excitement (corrupt cops, drug couriers, etc.) but its
style is several notches above the original classic. One other minor
quibble is that I would loved to have seen more of Collette, who plays
a largely underdeveloped character. Still, I am no big fan of the
original "Shaft" but this new film has the spark and vivid persona of
Samuel L. Jackson to make up for everything else. He is the man, and I
can dig it.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at jerry@movieluver.com 

Title
Review for Gladiator (2000)
"Gladiator" is the bloodiest, nauseating, dullest and most old-fashioned
gladiator flick in ages - a big thud in director Ridley Scott's career. It is
beautifully shot and appropriately murky but also hopelessly, terminally
monotonous.
The indefatigable Russell Crowe stars as the stoic Spanish-born Maximus,
general of a Roman army, who in the film's brutal opening sequence, lavishes an
attack against multitudes of barbarians - his command is "Unleash hell." That
phrase sums up the film in a nutshell. 
Later, Maximus is praised by Emperor Marcus Aurelius (Richard Harris - looking
more haggard and drunk than ever) for vanquishing the enemy. The dying Emperor
also wants Maximus to succeed him, which causes dissent from the Emperor's
devious son, Commodus (Joaquim Phoenix). It is no surprise that Commodus, a
weakling who has never seen the gruesome reality of war, kills his father and
almost has Maximus killed and guess who becomes the new Emperor? 
After Maximus escapes, he is sold as a slave and prepared for death as a
gladiator by Proximo (Oliver Reed), a supplier and instructor of gladiators who
has seen all kinds of savagery in his heyday. Maximus survives several battles
to the death, enough to go to the paramount level - the Colosseum where
Commodus is often seen in attendance. Dispensing one of the few clever notions
in the screenplay, the Colosseum recreates famous battles yet Maximus ends up
beating the odds, to the enormous applause from the audiences who love this
kind of spectacle. 
"Gladiator" is at heart a revenge story since Maximus wants to kill Commodus
for having killed his family and all his friends. But Maximus embodies lots of
grunts and excessive moroseness - none of this merits much in the way of
empathy or sympathy. His Maximus is a study in complete stoicism from beginning
to end but there is not much beyond that - Crowe, an excellent actor, offers no
hints of humanity, only vigor. I may be bold for saying this but even
Schwarzeneger's Conan had a sense of humor in between his vicious
sword-wielding moments.
The action scenes are another problem. In this age of super MTV-split-second
edits, the battle scenes in the Colosseum and in the opening sequence are cut
so frantically and with such headache-inducing movement that it is difficult to
tell what is happening on screen. I suppose director Ridley Scott considers
this an experimental approach post-"Saving Private Ryan" but at least in
"Ryan," you had some clue as to what was occuring from one shot to the next
(both films are from the company Dreamworks). The similarly old-fashioned,
silly "Spartacus" was also cohesively shot and edited so that you never lost
sight of who was killing whom. Here it is all a jumbled collage of rapid
movements causing headaches more than excitement. 
"Gladiator" has some decent performances, the best of which is the intense
presence of the late Oliver Reed, but the film meanders at such a languid pace
that it is often to difficult to stay awake while watching it. Its joyless,
somber tone and thin characters makes it a chore to sit through. This may be
the first summer blockbuster for the year 2000 but the outlook is not too
promising.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or concerns at jerry@movieluver.com or
at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Pillow Book, The (1996)

Peter Greenaway is the supreme film stylist of the 20th century. He creates
tales, not stories in the conventional narrative sense, of our erotic desires
and murderous impulses within the context of literature and art history. He
said recently that films are more concerned with pop culture than with art. I
couldn't agree more with the current schlock in cinemas nowadays. Arguably, his
most profound work was the controversial "The Cook, The Thief, His Wife and Her
Lover," a savagely funny tale of revenge and sex in a decadent restaurant. It
was not for all tastes, but then who says art is? "The Pillow Book" is his
latest film, and it is enticing, sexy and alluring though Greenaway often shies
away from his basic premise. 
"The Pillow Book" stars Vivian Wu as Nagiko, a flamboyant fashion model who is
obsessed with calligraphy. Her first husband had no interest in her obsession
and, as a result, their house was burnt down. Several years later, she develops
a certain sexual obsession: she wants to find the perfect lover who can also
paint calligraphy all over her body. Her obsession emanates from her childhood
when her father painted words on her face. Her latest lover is a bisexual
translator, Jerome (Ewan McGregor from "Trainspotting"), and she insists that
he write all over her body. If man can make perfect love to her, then he also
must be able to write perfect letters.
Peter Greenaway's gift as a director is his visual flamboyance - an ability to
layer several images together to convey the erotic feeling of where mind and
body integrate. He beautifully executes scenes of passion from the lovingly
choreographed close-up shots of men painting on Nagiko's skin to lighting
effects of Chinese symbols flashing and dissolving on the walls - the effect is
grandiose yet thrilling. The technique of rectangular frames subdividing the
screen and changing from black-and-white to color is marvelous to behold - this
style of editing originated in Greenaway's "Prospero's Books." No other
director can match the love and care that he puts into every shot of his films
(except for Scorsese and Lynch). In the end, though, it is really more about
Greenaway's own obsession of literature and art than it is about Nagiko's
personal odyssey. 
"The Pillow Book" becomes somewhat melodramatic in the last half when it
erroneously stays away from the character of Nagiko. Greenaway (who wrote the
film) devises a revenge plot involving Nagiko's father's employer - a
homosexual whom Nagiko feels had destroyed her family. After Jerome begins to
get involved with this character, a spooky and, literally, revealing thing
happens to Jerome's skin. But instead of focusing on Nagiko's obsessive
behavior, the movie opts for elements that negate the first half of the film -
the sexual connection of flesh and writing. The revenge plot is typical of
Greenaway but here, he loses the themes he explored beforehand and so the film
becomes distracting and laborious. There are several scenes of naked bodies
covered in writing confronting the evil homosexual, but they become repetitious
and meaningless. However, when Nagiko plans to keep her lover, the idea of
flesh and text is restored. 
"The Pillow Book" is better seen than described. It is purely a filmic
exercise in exploring themes rather than placing them in a narrative structure
or plot. Greenaway should be commended for trying to push the boundaries of
film structure in an age of homogenized hogwash. Nagiko is wonderfully
performed with genuine emotion by the sensual actress Vivian Wu (her lovemaking
sessions with Jerome are truly sexy). If only Greenaway chose a more internal
frame of mind when exploring Nagiko instead of coldly pulling her out towards
the end. "The Pillow Book" is a masterpiece of filmmaking but it is not as
intricate or as intimate as Greenaway's other works. 
For more reviews check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 

Title
Review for Up at the Villa (2000)
"Up at the Villa" is a strange movie experience, possibly because such a polite film of manners and delicacy switches gears and becomes something other than what you might expect. It has the grandly theatrical look and feel of 1999's "An Ideal Husband" but it develops into something akin to an Agatha Christie mystery.
Kristin Scott Thomas stars as the widowed, highly composed Mary Panton who locks herself inside a beautiful villa, often contemplating her lack of passion while sitting out in her garden (my, my, how great it must be to rich). Mary is unsure of whether she should accept a marriage proposal from a courtly diplomat (James Fox) but she has to have an answer soon since he is going on a trip (and gives her a gun to protect herself from the roaming refugees on the streets). She leans more towards a married, debonair American (Sean Penn), though she resists him at first due to his honesty. Then there is the pity she feels towards a young, poor Austrian violinist (Jeremy Davies) who is also a refugee. One thing leads to another and when she tries to resist the young, passionate fellow, things get rather awry. 
This is where the big switch in tone and style comes in, and "Up at the Villa" becomes more of a moral tale where immorality takes the day. Yes, immoral, considering the choices Mary makes when confronted with danger. A film like this would not have existed during the Production Code days where protagonists had to be punished for their crimes. Mary and the American get involved in a crime that evolves into a highly political situation - even the Italian police are corrupt. 
The performances deliver for the most part, all very classy acts to be sure. Kristin Scott Thomas has a difficult role, exuding sensuousness, duplicity and beauty all in one package, often at the most inappropriate moments. Still, she has class and elegance and maturity - though not at the same breath as in "Angels and Insects" (directed by Philip Haas who helmed this one as well). Anne Bancroft is the gossip-mongering neighbor married to Italian royalty who is as freewheeling and flirtatious as they come. Sean Penn is the added sparkle to this fine cast, his nuance and diction are as far removed from "Fast Times at Ridgemont High" as you might expect, and he is far more restrained than he usually is. He also has the right flair and chemistry in any scene he shares with Scott Thomas. Kudos must also go to Derek Jacobi's brief role as a flamboyant tour guide of sorts.
"Up at the Villa" is an uneven film, never quite finding the consistent tone that it needs, but it is slick and involving enough. Sometimes, pictaresque settings and Kristin Scott Thomas wearing any colorful wardrobe she chooses is often enough for me. "Up at the Villa" has plenty of both.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for What Lies Beneath (2000)
Director Robert Zemeckis ("Back to the Future") describes the
screenplay of "What Lies Beneath" as "written in the language of
Hitchcock." I am not sure if that is as insulting as Gus Van Sant's
abominable "Psycho" remake but it comes close. Not only does such a
statement make me want to vomit, but it further illustrates how
audiences today might be compelled to agree, since they will accept
anything with two glamorous movie stars. Actually, it is written in
the language of "Scream" and every slasher flick post-"Halloween," and
the truth is that all of those films are superior to this monotonous,
suspenseless and incredibly silly thriller.
Let's look at what lies beneath the episodic structure. The beautiful,
luscious Michelle Pfeiffer plays Claire Spencer, the morose wife to
Norman Spencer (Harrison Ford), a successful geneticist. They live in
some country house by a lake in Vermont, and their daughter has just
gone away to college. Claire misses her tremendously, and is beginning
to feel the effects of loneliness and isolation, especially since her
husband is working late hours. At home, she finds there are problems
with the electrical outlets in the bathroom (well, she gets a little
shock occasionally). Soon, she finds the front door to her house opens
by itself. Then picture frames begin to fall by themselves. But
wait!!! Who is the bearded gentleman living with his wife in the house
next door? And could the wife have been killed by her husband? And is
the possibly dead wife a ghost who is haunting Claire? And is this
another remake of "Rear Window," but without Christopher Reeve?
So far, so good. I must say that this is a fine setup for a possibly
supernatural thriller. And Pfeiffer plays her role straight, lending a
sympathetic hand for this melancholy heroine. Is she seeing things, or
is there really a ghost in the house? But, oh my, does Zemeckis and
writer Clark Gregg screw it up by installing one too many red
herrings. If you are one of the unlucky few who saw the trailer for
this movie, you know the inevitable denouement and everything that
leads to it. Suffice to say, I will not disclose much more except to
say that the setup is completely ruined and fabricated, leading to a
hodgepodge of other movies entirely.
Basically, "What Lies Beneath" is a hybrid of Hitchcock, "Sixth
Sense," "Stir of Echoes," "The Stepfather" and anything else you can
think of. Ask yourself this one question: are we seeing a thriller, a
drama about a potential tryst, a ghost story, the latest slasher
picture, or all the above? Apparently, Zemeckis and Gregg have no idea
so they copy and paste it all together hoping it will make sense and
surprise audiences. No sale.
I must say that I enjoyed the climactic, tense bathtub scene
(recalling "Fatal Attraction's" bloody climax) and the lovely
Pfeiffer's performance who invests more weight in the role than is
necessary. There is also James Remar as the suspicious, curt neighbor
(worth mentioning because he gives the best performance in the film,
and he also bears an uncanny resemblance to Harrison Ford's bearded
Richard Kimble in "The Fugitive") Unfortunately, Ford is left in the
sidelines, barely registering any chemistry with Pfeiffer, and
director Zemeckis is intent on throwing in the "fake scares" cliche,
one after another, not to mention the old "the killer is never really
dead" syndrome. From Ford, Pfeiffer, and Zemeckis, all that lies
beneath is a lack of purpose.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at jerry@movieluer.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Halloween: The Curse of Michael Myers (1995)
It has been over twenty years since the original "Halloween" film which spawned
several terrible imitators and endless sequels. The Michael Myers character in
the first film was shrouded in mystery since we didn't know what his motivation
was or why he chose to revisit his hometown of Haddonfield where he killed his
sister. Michael was unspeakably evil - an inhuman monster walking at a snail's
pace and seemingly indestructible. The John Carpenter original remains a
classic, scary, imaginative, low-budget independent film with a great, heroic
role by a very young Jamie Lee Curtis. After "Halloween II," however, the series
became repetitive and unnecessarily gory - a never-ending spectacle for
witnessing the numerous methods Michael employed in killing his latest victims.
1995's "Halloween: The Curse of Michael Myers" is so awful that it defies
description and also wants to offer explanations for Michael's behavior -
questions better left unanswered. 
The opening scene is promising. A young woman carries her baby outside of a dank
hospital and drives away in rainy weather. She stops at an empty bus station. A
shadow appears and a white mask emerges from the shadow. It's of course Michael
with a big, glinting knife! Oh, well, it seemed promising. The woman in this
opening sequence is Michael Myers' niece from the last two "Halloween" pictures,
but who cares? 
Michael goes back to Haddonfield since the Halloween season is around the corner
again. A dysfunctional family has the misfortune of living at the former Myers
house where Michael killed his sister. Wait a minute. If the house was boarded
up and considered haunted by the townsfolk, why would anyone want to renovate it
and resell it? Haven't these people heard of Amityville before? The plot
thickens. If you are one of two people who has seen "Halloween 5," you'll recall
the mysterious character with a black cloak and hat who rescues Michael from
prison in the ludicrous finale. That mysterious stranger (no doubt, a homage to
the Shadow) is back, and apparently runs the ominous hospital we see at the
beginning and, get this (*spoilers ahead*), Michael Myers works for him! 
Paul Rudd ("The Cider House Rules") appears as the little kid whom Laurie
babysitted in the original film. Now he's all grown-up and looks rather creepy.
He claims to know why Michael Myers is indestructible and is aware that Myers'
wrath is about to be set off again, thanks to complex charts that revolve around
the Druids! Poor Donald Pleasance in, sadly, his last role as Dr. Loomis returns
as a man who has retired and is living in isolation. Still, he decides to get
rid of Michael one more time thanks to Mr. Rudd. What for? The monster couldn't
be killed after five sequels so what makes Loomis think he can kill him now. 
"Halloween" The Curse of Michael Myers" exists in two versions, one is a
producer's cut that has forty minutes of restored footage, an alternate (and
sillier) ending and new music. It is considered the superior version but all I
can say is that it is as poorly made, amateurishly acted, unscary and
unsuspenseful as the theatrical version. The fact is that this "Curse" should
have ended the franchise for good and ever but no. One more sequel with Jamie
Lee returning surfaced in 1998 not to mention yet another upcoming sequel with
Jamie Lee again! Probably the scariest element of "Curse" is that Donald
Pleasance saw it fit to reprise his Dr. Loomis role. A curse, indeed. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Evil Dead, The (1982)
In 1982, Sam Raimi's first tongue-in-cheek horror film, "The Evil Dead", was 
released in theatres, and proved notable in receiving a rave review from 
Stephen King after its premiere at the Cannes Film Festival. The concept 
behind it was that a hidden force was unleashed in the woods, ready to devour 
anything in its path, including a group of young people staying in a remote 
cabin. The film was successful enough as a low-budget sleeper to spawn two 
sequels, each with a bigger budget than the next and all directed by Sam 
Raimi. What we have is a trilogy of horror, growing more tongue-in-cheek and 
goofy with each sequel. Below is a brief look at each film. 
The Evil Dead - I will not say that "The Evil Dead" is one of the best horror 
films ever made - it is not - but it is often repulsive, humorous and full of 
major shocks to the system to make any true horror fan happy. 
Bruce Campbell plays Ash, one of the group of college students who travel on 
an Oldsmobile to some remote cabin in the desolate woods of Michigan. In the 
opening sequence, a whirlwind force travels through lakes, swamps, and trees 
ready to attack the Oldsmobile. Things careen out of control briefly, yet the 
students manage to make it to the cabin, even going through a decrepit 
bridge. But nightfall comes, and one of them makes the mistake of reading 
from an old copy of the Book of the Dead (entitled "Necronomicon," a nod to 
H.P. Lovecraft) and before you know it, evil spirits are unleashed and 
zombies are made. The only way to kill these things is by dismembering and 
decapitating these ugly, evil spirits that possess everyone in the group. 
Naturally, Ash is the one that makes it out alive. 
There is plenty of blood and gore, and there is an inventive use of a pencil 
as a weapon. The film certainly is cheap-looking and barely audible in 
certain scenes, and some of the makeup and special-effects are practically 
garden variety. The strength of "The Evil Dead" is in the straightforward 
directing by Raimi and the astoundingly good cinematography by Tom Philo - 
the latter makes every shot eerie and menacing. There is a sense of 
claustrophobia to the film, a sort of latter-day "Night of the Living Dead" 
where hiding in an isolated cabin can prevent one from dealing with unseen 
forces. Naturally, these forces find their way in the cabin.
"The Evil Dead" also has some superb moments of horror and humor, 
particularly the scene where one girl stares into a window (we only see the 
back of her head) as she is able to read all the cards that her group is 
playing before turning around and screaming...well, you get the idea. I also 
like the vines attacking one girl in the forest and being dragged across 
thousands of twigs, while one of the "shemps" inserts itself in an 
area...well, you know the scene, need I repeat it? Some of the sexual 
connotations I could have lived without but still there is enough going on 
here to make anyone squeamish about going into the woods again. "The Evil 
Dead" is goofy horror to be sure, but fun nonetheless.
Evil Dead 2: Dead by Dawn - Here is an example of not so much a sequel, but a 
remake of the original. With a bigger budget and even better special-effects, 
Raimi continues where the original left off, and brings us even more gore and 
humor. 
At the end of the original, Ash was pursued by that evil force in the woods. 
Now he is back in the cabin enduring more torture by these unseen forces. 
There is a moment where his right hand takes on a life of its own, and Ash 
chops it off with a chainsaw. Needless to say, the hand scurries, hides and 
makes fun of Ash in ways that are so funny that the film's haunting momentum 
pauses and becomes more of a horror-comedy than a pure horror film. We see 
Ash's reflection in a mirror having a life of its own, dancing skeletons by 
the pale moonlight, giggling deer heads, heads being squashed in vises, lots 
of blood spilling into the screen from every direction (though nothing like 
the distasteful "Dead-Alive" by Peter Jackson from 1993), and ghouls and 
zombies yelling things like "I am going to take your soul!" 
Though relentlessly inventive and often inspired, "Evil Dead 2" begins to 
slack off a bit towards the end, especially with the inclusion of an 
archaelogist's daughter searching for her father who happened to live in the 
very cabin that is possessed. She thinks Ash may have killed her father, I 
mean, what would you think if you saw a man draped with blood and holding a 
chainsaw? But Raimi continues to make us feel the claustrophobia of being 
isolated and facing demonic forces beyond our own control. The humor and 
horror pays off, and the final sequence is certainly a doozy. 
Army of Darkness - Ash is back again, now he is stuck in the 13th century 
fighting Deadites and more ghouls and zombies! Huh? Well, you see at the end 
of "Evil Dead 2," Ash was transported back into time before being able to 
finish an incantation       that would have ended the evil spell. He and his 
beloved Oldsmobile landed in some foreign land in the 13th century, and now 
he is subject to the physical torture of some medieval lords. Ash does so 
well battling Deadites to the death that he is considered by the people to be 
their savior against the armies of darkness. Ash's goal, however, is to 
retrieve the Book of the Dead and get back home to his S-mart job where they 
"shop Smart!" There is also a love interest, a medieval damsel-in-distress, 
Sheila (Embeth Davidtz, who later appeared in "Schindler's List"), who 
convinces him to help her people.
"Army of Darkness" is hardly horror, it is an out-and-out campy comedy with 
plenty of thrills per second, and less blood and gore than the previous 
entries. It is practically a new version of Ray Harryhausen's "Jason and the 
Argonauts," albeit less sophisticated in its content if not its form. Ash is 
like Marty McFly in "Back to the Future," saying such anachronistic lines as 
"Groovy!" or "Give me some sugar baby." There are still some moments to 
treasure such as the Evil Ash sequence, the evil Ash Liliputians formed by 
reflective shards of glass, and Ash screwing up the simple line from "The Day 
the Earth Stood Still" ("Klattu Barada Nikto") while trying to choose the 
real Book of the Dead in a scene that echoes Indiana Jones. 
It is a fun-filled 82 minutes, but some of the gags are desperate and 
repetitive, and we start to get the feeling that Ash has had enough of 
battling demons, ghosts, and the vast army of skeletons. Probably Raimi has 
had enough as well, considering the ending has been changed radically from 
its more downbeat finish. Still, if nothing else, "Army of Darkness" led the 
way to more anachronistic, self-aware medieval stories, especially the recent 
TV series "Hercules" and "Xena," both winking at the audience in its complete 
absurdity and anachronisms.  
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Evolution (2001)
The beauty of comedy is that there are no rules and, quite simply, rules are
made to be broken in the comedic arena. Director Ivan Reitman is often aware
of this, as evidenced by his crude though subtly funny "Junior" and, his biggest
hit, "Ghostbusters." Both films redefined the boundaries of good
taste by imbuing crudeness with cleverness rather than cheap, desperate gags
a'la "Austin Powers" that only serve to make the audience puke. Consider
Arnold Schwarzeneger as a pregnant man in "Junior," a premise that is otherwise
ripe for gross-out humor.  Instead that film built its premise with wit and
engaging repartee between Schwarzeneger and Danny DeVito. 
"Evolution" does the same thing, imbuing crudeness with cleverness. The premise
deals with a community college science teacher (and former scientist), Ira Kane
(David Duchovny), who partners with a sharp, jocose
scientist, Harry Block (Orlando Jones), to investigate a flaming meteor that has
burned a hole through the ground into an underground cavern. Kane's class
goes on a field trip to discover and study this meteor only to find some strange
atmosphere has developed at an accelerated rate, not to mention some expanding
and evolving wormlike creatures. Kane and Block realize this is no ordinary
meteor - it is a fertile ground for alien creatures. At first, the creatures
seem harmless in the form of butterflies until they later evolve
into flying dinosaurs, raging blue monkeys and some shapeless matter in the form
of large intestines.
The only way to approach "Evolution" is by checking your brain at the entrance
door of the cinema before the first reel is projected. It is a one-note joke
movie to be sure but it has moments of eye-opening
special-effects, shrewd one-liners and moments where you will literally jump out
of your seat. It mostly pokes fun at "Independence Day" right down to the
climax involving those humongous intestines where a central digestive tract is
the target for destruction - the expansive mass even looks like a spaceship.
Mostly, the screenplay by David Diamond, David Weissman and Don
Jakoby focuses on bodily functions and sexual entendres, as well as creepy
monsters hiding inside harmless looking alien slugs and such. Many of the
sexual entendres center around Julianne Moore as an assistant to a
soldier-scientist (Ted Levine) - she is regarded at one point as an "icy goddess
in desperate need of some humping." Speaking of the ravishing Moore,
it is nice to see her as a clumsy woman who keeps tripping over objects every
once in a while. 
"Evolution" is cutesy nonsense and often quite funny and engaging. It is
actually a breath of fresh air as compared to the gross-out humor so reminiscent
of most comedies nowadays - wit and some dry humor are this
film's virtues. As for performances, Duchvony and Jones make a delightful pair
and Moore is lots of fun to watch - nice to see her handle comedy for a
change in contrast with her dramatic roles. Only Ted Levine seems a little out
of his element as the straight-faced soldier scientist, Dr. Woodman, who
doesn't want Kane anywhere near these aliens. 
"Evolution" is not as frantically funny or as visually inventive as Reitman's
"Ghostbusters,"  but it will suffice in what has been a dry couple of years
of laughless comedies. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at Faust668@aol.com
or at faustus_08520@yahoo.com

Title
Review for Bent (1997)
Turning a stage play into a film is almost always a recipe for disaster. There
have been the exceptions: David Mamet's adaptations of his plays such as "House
of Games" and "Oleanna" come to mind. A film is a visual medium, whereas a play
is an actor's, and writer's, medium. "Bent" is based on historic facts
surrounding the Holocaust, but the two main characters seem to be stuck in a
stage setting where they have to speak a great deal of dialogue. 
Playwright Martin Sherman adapted his groundbreaking play "Bent" that focuses
on a rare subject: the persecution of gays and lesbians who were the first
rounded up under Hitler's regime in 1934. The main character is Max (Clive
Owen), a Jewish homosexual who comes from a wealthy family. At the beginning of
the film, in a wonderfully bizarre backdrop, we see Max cavorting with other
homosexuals in a wild, all-night Cabaret party that includes Mick Jagger as a
singing, black-stockinged transvestite on a swing! This particular night was
known as the Night of the Long Knives, when homosexual Nazi commander Ernst
Rohm and other bent Nazis were cleansed. The handsome Max and his lover Rudy
(Brian Webber), a dancer at the club, escape and are accommodated by Max's gay
uncle (Ian McKellen). Eventually, the two lovers are apprehended and taken on a
horrifying train ride to Dauchau. 
During this trip, Rudy is severely beaten and thrown from the train by the SS
commanders. Max survives and finally arrives at Dauchau - it is there that he
develops a relationship with Horst (Lothaire Bluteau) who wears the Pink
Triangle. Max has to choose between wearing the Jewish Yellow Star or the Pink
Triangle, a statement of gay pride - he sticks with the Yellow Star. The two
end up working together in a mindless, excruciating job of moving rocks from
one area to another. This is an attempt to drive them into madness and possibly
suicide.        "Bent" is basically an existential film about the determination
to live, rather than to survive, in such a demographically undesirable
environment. The problem is that the film resembles a Samuel Beckett play where
the characters are stuck in one area and talk to each other endlessly. The
setting is a bare area surrounded by walls and dozens of rocks, and it is the
same setting for the rest of the film. The characters speak in quiet phrases
(which makes sense since the SS is watching around the corner), but writer
Martin Sherman and director Sean Mathias make no attempt to transcend the
play's origins by making it visually arresting or compelling. And since the
locations have an anonymous quality, it could therefore take place in any era,
not necessarily the Holocaust. 
Another flaw is the casting of Clive Owen as Max: he doesn't possess much in
the way of charisma or interest, and is mostly portrayed as a cipher. The rest
of the cast is splendid, but they appear in mostly fleeting cameos. Mick Jagger
is bitchily perfect as Greta, the transvestite owner of the club, who resorts
to betrayal, and his old business suits to escape. Ian McKellen is remarkable
as the closeted Gay Uncle - his one scene speaks volumes more than anything
else in the film. Lothaire Bluteau gives a touching performance as the weak,
sickly Horst who begins to love Max though they can't touch each other. It
would have been better if Bluteau had a more interesting co-star: how about
Jagger as Max? 
"Bent" is a fascinating and important story and therefore it should be seen for
that reason - I would have preferred, however, to see the unique play since it
works better on the stage than on film. The end result is that "Bent"
trivializes the Holocaust and, although, there are some superb visual pieces,
including the Cabaret club, there's precious else to hold one's interest. An
explosive ending made me wish that what preceded it was just as potent.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general comments at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for In the Company of Men (1997)
Men and women are likely (and understandably) to be disturbed by the acidly
amusing and intoxicating "In the Company of Men,"  a new film about how
pernicious and hateful men are towards women, and men. The film is a devilish
surprise: a morbidly comical and terrifyingly real expose on what happens
between men and women in today's society.
 Newcomer Aaron Eckhart (resembling a young Harrison Ford) stars as Chad, a
malignant office worker who continually shares his hateful views on other
workers and women to his bumbling colleague, Howard (Matt Malloy). Chad hates
everyone, hates his job and especially hates women. One night at a restaurant,
Chad proposes an idea to Howard: they will find an insecure, sweet woman whom
they will woo and then dump with a major thud. The idea is that they must be
complicit in their wounding an innocent woman, which leaves Howard unsure
whether to proceed with such a plan. Chad finds the right victim - a fragile,
deaf secretary named Christine (Stacy Edwards). Chad's only objective in this
game is to inflict emotional injury by only pretending to love Christine.
Howard, however, really starts to develop feelings for her, and feels that this
game is immoral. 
There are many ways in which "In the Company of Men" makes us see how complex
this triad is. Chad is eminently lethal and hateful whereas Howard is more
caring and has some shred of humanity. The film doesn't make Christine a
complete saint, though, considering she dates both men simultaneously until
Chad tells her he really loves her. Essentially, Christine dumps Howard for
Chad. Then Howard becomes envious and feels he has to do something to prevent
this false union. But does Howard suddenly care because she's deaf, or because
he loves her? And is Chad really doing more damage to Howard than to Christine?
"In the Company of Men" is both darkly comic and scathingly serious in its
treatment of a curious subject - it is written by first-time writer-director
Neil LaBute, and at times, you won't know whether to laugh or cringe. A major
reason for this imbalance is the depiction of its characters who are acutely
performed by all three leads: Eckhart is brilliantly effective as the insulting
and obnoxious Chad; Matt Malloy makes Howard as pathetic and cumbersome as you
can imagine; and Stacy Edwards is a revelation as the flattered Christine
unaware of her doomed relationship with Chad; she projects sympathy and
heedfulness.
 "In the Company of Men" is a film you're not likely to forget and shouldn't -
it is profound, shrewdly written and masterfully directed. LaBute composes this
world in bland, colorless ways such as the anonymous offices; the employees
dressed in white shirts; the dreary cafes, restaurants and rental cars; and
roofs that seem to offer no discernible view. What will stay with you, though,
is Chad's malice thereby evoking the most uncommon and complex behavioral
portrait of the year. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with comments, suggestions or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or
jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Sixth Sense, The (1999)
Good horror stories are a dime a dozen mainly because writers and directors
have lost the imagination to tell them - gore and dismemberment have stood in
the way of cohesive storytelling elements. "The Blair Witch Project" is a great
horror film whereas "The Sixth Sense" is merely a good one - a sensitively
written, well-directed story of a journey into the world of ghosts. This film
along with Bruce Joel Rubin's "Ghost" play with the idea that ghosts inhabit
the earth for a reason - to complete some unfinished business.
"The Sixth Sense" begins with Dr. Malcolm Crowe (Bruce Willis), a psychologist
who at the start of the film is shot in his home by a deeply disturbed patient
of his. A year later, the seemingly recouped Malcolm finds a morose, quiet boy
named Cole (Haley Joel Osment) suffering from similar problems as Malcolm's
former patient - Cole becomes Crowe's latest study. It turns out that Cole can
see ghosts in his own home, though nobody else can. One is a nervous, evidently
abused woman in a pink robe, the other is a girl who brings Cole some
mysterious box, and so on. Crowe is mystified and intrigued by Cole's visions,
yet he does have problems of his own. Crowe's forlorn wife, Anna (Olivia
Williams), suffers from depression and is ostensibly having an affair, which
angers him enough to throw rocks through storefront windows. They seem unable
to communicate, and she leaves hastily when he is late for a dinner date. He is
consumed by work, she is consumed by sadness. 
"The Sixth Sense" is mostly told through the point-of-view of Cole - we see
these visions through his eyes. No adult can see them, but the good doctor
begins to believe him. The best scenes are when Cole is scared and tense about
some of the ghosts intruding in his home, or when he senses something
unspeakable in a dungeon-like room at a friend's house. There is also a scene
where Cole sees a car accident victim while trying to convince his mother (Toni
Collete) that he "sees dead people." 
There are some effective scenes of controlled tension, and without the
minimalist strength of Willis's performance or Osment's whispered innocence,
"The Sixth Sense" might have fallen apart from lesser hands. It is only when
dealing with Cole's and Crowe's inner lives that writer-director N. Night
Shyamalan ("Wide Awake") fails to lend much weight. 
Olivia Williams, the incandescent co-star of "Rushmore," is given little to do,
and her role lacks development or impact. Somehow, we know she does not listen
or communicate with Crowe, but we learn little about her and her feelings. 
There is also scant development regarding Osment's mother - we get mostly
reaction shots and a big emotional scene but little in the way of knowing how
she relates to her tense son. She almost seems to avoid him, or not pay much
mind when she finds the kitchen's drawers and doors open a second after leaving
them intact while her son is eating. 
"The Sixth Sense" has a haunting sense of menace through its controlled level
of mood and pace (the city of Philadelphia never looked so daunting and
overcast), but it is off-kilter in its emotional context. Its surprise ending
pays off nicely, but there is none of the unifying breadth or tension of the
similar, dream-like "Jacob's Ladder." Still, Willis and Osment keep you
involved and guessing as to what will happen next. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments, or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Raiders of the Lost Ark (1981)
The late Pauline Kael once said that a film is only worth seeing once and that
the initial viewing is usually the best - one's impressions are often correct
upon seeing a film the first time. When I first saw "Raiders of the Lost Ark" in
1981, I could not wait to see it again. And again. And again. The film is a
thunderous assault on the senses and a wonder to behold but more than that -  it
is a roller coaster ride that you want to keep visiting again and again. It is
thrilling, scary, adventurous, spooky, amusing, nerve-wracking and the kind of
movie that will literally keep you on the edge of your seat. 
By now, everyone knows who Indiana Jones is. He is the resourceful, stubborn,
educated archaeologist and adventurer seeking unusual artifacts around the globe
in the era of the 1930's. The first sequence, notably the most gripping opening
sequence in the entire action-adventure genre, has Indiana in Peru entering a
dangerous cave where a golden idol is kept. He must endure several booby-traps
before acquiring it. The action never lets up as he faces a rolling boulder,
poisonous darts, collapsing walls, ugly corpses and so on. It is a continuous
action serial where we wonder if the hero will make it out of one mishap after
another. He always does, of course. 
Harrison Ford is pitch perfect as Indiana Jones, showing sly changes from a
bespectacled professor who is admired by his students to an action hero with a
felt hat and trusty bullwhip who never thinks twice about shooting a swordsman
(easily the best joke in the film). In fact, it is a shock after the opening
sequence to see Indiana teaching an archaeology class - who is this guy, we
wonder. When he is asked to find the Lost Ark of the Covenant, a relic being
sought by Adolf Hitler, the gleam shows in his eyes as he is ready for adventure
all over again. 
Indiana's first stop in this adventure is Nepal where an old flame, Marion
Ravenwood (Karen Allen), has a  medallion that is a key to finding the Ark. She
denies having it, and punches him in the face for ignoring her for so long
(turns out that Indiana had deflowered her when they were younger). The villains
enter as he leaves, threaten Marion since they also seek the medallion, and a
shootout in a bar turns into yet another thrilling action setpiece. Other stops
around the globe include Cairo and some fortress where the Ark is to be unveiled
on some unnamed island. Indiana rescues Marion and the medallion from Nepal, and
they confront a variety of dangers and pratfalls along the way. There are mean
Nazis, bare-chested, bald fighters, slithering snakes, rotting temples,
poisonous dates (the fruit that is), clever monkeys, naval ships, trucks,
rotating planes, and so much more that you feel you have entered a museum of
1930's memorabilia come to life. It is a pulp fiction world that director Steven
Spielberg
 loves as does most people and it shows. And the action never stops, though it
is not as headache-inducing as say "Indiana Jones and the Temple of Doom."
Spielberg knows when to quit, when to let us breathe. It is only fitting that
there is even a scene where Indiana sleeps instead of making love to Marion. He
needs his rest. 
What makes all this silliness work is Ford's charismatic performance - he makes
us believe in him and makes the hero vulnerable enough to make us hope he will
make it out of every single jam he is in.  Also noteworthy is a hissable
villain, one who is as credible as Ford is as a hero. Belloq (Paul Freeman), a
French archaeologist, also has a gleam in his eyes and wants the Ark for his own
needs - "a radio for speaking to God." Both of these men are in pursuit of a
magical relic and will do anything to get it. 
Steven Spielberg is at his very best here, making every event as cinematic as
possible and accentuating all the visual gags with flair. The action scenes are
tightly edited and frightening in how explosive they are, especially the
climactic truck chase where Indiana rides horseback to get inside the truck
holding the Ark while dozens of jeeps and trucks go after him (as if this was
the beginning of World War II). The gags come from everywhere but are never
obtrusive, even if at one point a monkey does the Nazi salute! But what makes
"Raiders of the Lost Ark" wonderful is Spielberg's sense of fun and his surefire
direction, which somehow makes all the old cliches seem new again. The old
marksman versus the swordsman joke is old-hat but Ford's sense of desperation
makes the scene seem wondrous all over again, and one understands his reflexive
action of shooting the swordsman. Every scene tingles with excitement and
tension. The first time I saw the famous opening sequence, I was literally
grabbing the arms of 
my seat. I am not sure how Spielberg does it exactly but it works in ways most
action movies have not since - it is witty and there is an element of surprise
that engages us. The rousing, memorable musical score by the incredible John
Williams lends support and enhances our enjoyment.
The cast is superb and, surprisingly, there is little in the way of overacting
or exaggeration as say in "Romancing the Stone" or "Jake Speed." Harrison Ford's
secret is that he plays it straight, as if he believed what was happening all
around him. It is not easy for an actor not to wink at all the chaos and mayhem
but he succeeds admirably. Karen Allen is a great choice as the also stubborn,
tough, romantic interest in Indiana's life - a shame she did not appear in any
of the other entries of this series. She is clearly the woman for Indiana and
knows how to match his wits, and delivers a knockout punch. For some good belly
laughs, there is John Rhys-Davies as Indy's Cairo sidekick, Sallah. And for a
charming yet insane villain in the grandest of traditions, there is Paul Freeman
as the sympathetic Belloq who even has a thing for Marion. 
"Raiders" does not end on an uplifting note. Instead it sort of ends abruptly as
Indiana reclaims the Ark (what did you expect?) and brings it back to the United
States yet it falls in the hands of the government rather than a museum for
research and study. There is no sense of victory. And yet this remains one of
the best action-adventure films ever made, as rousing and engaging as any film
ever made. The sequels and numerous rip-offs can't do it justice. "Raiders of
the Lost Ark" showcases Spielberg at his kinetic best, bringing us into a world
we can only dream of. After all, isn't that what great movies are all about?
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at faustus_08520@yahoo.com
or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Notorious (1946)
Of all of Alfred Hitchcock's love stories, "Notorious" is one of the most
romantic and truly illuminating. Illumination is the key to the film's success.
With a plot centering on Nazis and uranium, the heart of the film is really the
electric chemistry between Cary Grant and Ingrid Bergman, and a suspenseful
final act that will leave you breathless with excitement. 
"Notorious" begins with a fabulous shot of Ingrid Bergman as Alicia Huberman,
who is having a party after learning of her father's conviction for Nazi
spying. She tries to forget, and we notice the back of a stranger's head seated
at the party but we don't who he is except perhaps Alicia's possible suitor.
Later, she is drunk and recklessly drives with the man (Cary Grant), who turns
out to be a CIA agent named Devlin. Devlin has a job for her, and she is
reluctant to participate and is annoyed she did not get a speeding ticket. The
job entails Alicia getting intimate with a former lover of hers, Sebastian
(Claude Rains), who runs a spy ring and may be involved with hiding uranium in
wine bottles (a substance used in making bombs). Eventually, Sebastian deeply
falls in love with her and marries her. Devlin grows jealous, realizing he
loves her. Unfortunately, Sebastian watches Alicia like a hawk, and Hitchcock
is brilliant at showing that subjective sense of looks and stares as he does in
the party sequence.. 
"Notorious" has a special degree of illumination provided by its lighting
schemes, and by Bergman's iridescent beauty. Along with Catherine Denueve,
Bergman is indeed one of the most beautiful women in film history and Hitchcock
exploits that beauty to great effect. Whether she is seated at a cafe or in bed
writhing with pain due to the effect of arsenic in her tea, she never looks
less than glamorous. 
Cary Grant is the straight man, and more subtle than in his other films - he is
passive and grows jealous but it is his dialogue that speak great truths of his
emotions. At one point, while hearing about the CIA's plans, he refers to
another agent's bridge-playing wife as boring in contrast to Alicia's looseness
and promiscuity. Devlin holds his emotions in check, acting stern and
disapproving of Alicia and her immediate marriage. 
Claude Rains is one of the finest most astute actors ever, and here he is also
restrained - his looks and glances suggest everything. There is also the sense
that he does care for Alicia...and perhaps is more trustworthy than Devlin even
after learning her secret. 
Hitchcock has a tremendous number of tricks up his sleeve, and some shots are
astounding in their impact - they greatly help build tension and suspense. The
three-minute kissing scene between Grant and Bergman is as sensual and sexually
charged as any scene from today's steamy thrillers - what makes it so luscious
is the interruption of the kisses and the embraces. At that time, the Hollywood
Production Code would not allow for kisses to last longer than three seconds.
This scene foreshadows the final moments from the bedroom to the staircase
where Grant descends while helping the sickly Bergman - the spy ring and
Sebastian watch. There is also a superb zoom-in shot from the top of the
staircase to a close-up shot of Bergman's hand holding the key to the wine
cellar where the uranium is hidden. The wine cellar sequence is also bewitching
- Grant carefully removing bottles that obstruct the view of a wine schedule
while one slips away and breaks revealing uranium particles - and it also
builds to a great kissing scene. This film is definitely one of Hitchcock's
prime examples of visual elegance.
"Notorious" is not as densely complex as "Vertigo" or "North By Northwest," but
it is packed with suspense and thrills galore. And its emotionally romantic
love story shows the Master knew how to deal with human relationships. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail with concerns, questions or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or
jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Scorpio Rising (1964)
Kenneth Anger's "Scorpio Rising" is one of the most revolutionary films of 
the past forty years. It set a whole new precedent to filmmaking in general, 
in terms of its fast cutting style, rock n' roll montages, rebellious allure 
of motorcyclists, sex, death, and so on. In fact, I may be so bold as to say 
that this is the first sex, drugs and rock n' roll movie ever made. And Anger 
did it all in less than half-an-hour of film time. 
As director Anger recently explained about his most famous (or infamous) 
short film, "Scorpio Rising" is an ironic take on "The Wild Bunch," the 
latter being a fairly tame motorcycle movie next to this one. In fact, 
"Scorpio Rising" is all about irony, and yet it says something rather 
disconcerting about the world in America before the love generation and the 
decadence of the 1970's set in. At times, "Scorpio Rising" seems to be an 
ironic take on the 1950's yet commenting on the growing motorcycle cult of 
the late 1960's. Anger even dedicated the film to the Hell's Angels. 
"Scorpio Rising" begins with average men in their late teens or early 
twenties polishing and fixing their precious bikes (or as Anger referred to 
them as "Christmas tree versions of motorcycles".) They are inside their 
garages, and we hear lovely pop songs in the background as the camera tracks 
back and forth between the bikers and their bikes, wind-up toys of 
motorbikes, and a prominent visage of a skull in the background. Later, we 
see the bikers dressing up in their uniforms, a combination of leather 
jackets and straps to the tune of Bobby Vinton's "Blue Velvet." The irony 
begins again, as the song has the lyric, "She wore blue velvet," yet we see a 
blonde biker dressing up wearing a blue shirt and a black leather jacket. As 
photographed in close-up, along with subliminal shots of a barechested biker, 
there is a definite homoerotic subtext occurring here, as there was with 
Anger's first film "Fireworks" where Anger played a 17-year-old kid who 
dreams of being sodomized and beaten by Navy officers. There is one shot in 
"Scorpio" of the barechested biker standing over a cone pointing to his 
crotch. Most of "Scorpio Rising" has sexual connotations in every shot, 
especially the Halloween party where costumed, masked guests stand around 
having sex with their genitalia clearly exposed (the version I saw had such 
moments blotted out since it was from a Japanese laserdisc). 
"Scorpio Rising" combines elements of teen rebellion, popular culture, Nazi 
ideology, the motorcycle cult, sex, rock n' roll, religion, and death and it 
twists such elements around to form a rather haunting collage about the 
inevitable decline of the western civilization as we know it. And every 
sequence has a rock and roll song or some sentimental ditty playing on the 
soundtrack. "Scorpio Rising" is the first film to ever build a montage of 
shots with songs, and to do so ironically. If you are wondering where Martin 
Scorsese, Quentin Tarantino, Paul Thomas Anderson, Wes Anderson and any 
filmmaker since, not to mention MTV, got their ideas for their famous use of 
ironic pop songs as subtext or montage, look no further back than "Scorpio 
Rising." Another ironic fact is that the film was brought up on obscenity 
charges back in 1964, yet no one noticed the use of songs in the soundtrack 
which Anger had no permission to use. Since then, the film has been tough to 
find in video stores because the rights to such songs are still in a legal 
tangle.
"Scorpio Rising" is a frenetically charged, highly potent piece of cinema and 
it is guaranteed to still provoke anger (especially the use of the swastiza 
symbol). It was a sign of things to come, long before the advent of the 
post-60's youth rebellion in films such as "The Graduate," or youth violence 
in "A Clockwork Orange." There is of course the nineties equivalent of both, 
"Natural Born Killers." It all began with Anger's film, and we can either be 
grateful or unforgiving. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
Faust667@aol.com or at jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Limey, The (1999)
I don't know about any of you but I can live without seeing another crime
picture, especially in this post-Tarantino age. A story about a criminal
avenging the death of his daughter from other criminals should not inspire much
thought or excitement. But in the hands of the extraordinary director Steven
Soderbergh ("Out of Sight," "Sex, Lies and Videotape"), "The Limey" transforms
its paper-thin premise into pure excitement and examines it up close with an
extraordinary actor at its center, Terence Stamp.
Stamp stars as the "limey" (slang for a British person, particularly a sailor)
otherwise referred to as Wilson, a former criminal released from prison who
comes to L.A. in search of his daughter, Jenny (introduced in Wilson's
voice-over at the beginning). She is presumed to be dead, possibly killed by a
former record producer named Valentine (Peter Fonda, thriving on his "Ulee's
Gold" streak). Stamp is relentless in his pursuit, actively waging a war to
find the truth. He is lean, mean and vicious...and apparently ignorant of
modern society. There's a wonderfully sly scene where he discovers that the men
outside of Valentine's grand palace are not bodyguards but valets. 
"The Limey" could be a late-night movie of the week or an HBO drama at best if
it were not for Soderbergh's flashy direction or Stamp's vulpine charms. He is
the heart and soul of the film, supplying both subtle humor and crafty,
suggestive mannerisms. Stamp has one great scene after another: whether he is
smoothly speaking to an old flame, bashing heads at a factory, throwing people
over balconies, or having flashbacks of his daughter, or trying to explain in a
thick Cockney accent the turmoil of his life to a police investigator. There is
nothing this man can't do - he makes the film eminently watchable. 
As in "Out of Sight," Soderbergh cleverly and astutely flashes back and forth
between one scene to the next, utilizing freeze-frames and different backdrops
while whole conversations take place. This is not a new feat of cinematic
interpretation - think back to Godard's wildly jump-cutting scene-shifting in
the groundbreaking "Breathless." It is also an added plus to insert footage
from  Stamp's 1967 film "Poor Cow" throughout, not to mention allusions to
Peter Fonda's "Easy Rider" by playing "Magic Carpet Ride." "The Limey" is all
about allusions to the past, as we follow Wilson on his path to discover the
truth of his daughter's possible demise.
"The Limey" also benefits from a great supporting cast, always a necessity in a
L.A. noir story. There is the Lesley Ann Warren as the old flame, the
terrifically funny Luis Guzman, and, aging like fine wine, Barry Newman as a
corrupt aide to Valentine. With a stirring conclusion, wonderful compositions,
and a full fledged character study at its center, "The Limey" stands along side
"Jackie Brown" as an exemplary look at the seedy, laid-back lifestyles of Los
Angeles.   
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with questions, concerns or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at
Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Mars Attacks! (1996)
The absolute worst is expected when a celebrated Hollywood director is given
the reins to a multi-million dollar project after having helmed a small-scale
cult film like "Ed Wood." I hate discussing what the budget of the film is but
"Mars Attacks!" cost $80 million to make, and was expected to gross over $120
million (which it didn't) - in other words, it should have been a financial
blockbuster. Truth is that when you hand the reins to a dark, twisted genius
like Tim Burton, anything goes. "Mars Attacks" did not fare well at the
box-office and it is just as well - it is a hilarious, witty, nihilistic satire
of those old Martian invasion movies from the 40's and 50's. This is not
"Independence Day." Its tongue is firmly placed in its cheek. 
"Mars Attacks!" begins when a flaming herd of cattle makes its way into a
typical all-American small-town - a flying saucer has just had an accidental
run-in, but are they here for peace? When the Martians land in the middle of
the Nevada desert to be greeted by The President of the U.S. (Jack Nicholson)
and other gleeful citizens, the aliens begin blasting everything in sight. When
the President decides to greet them at the White House sensing that this was
all a misunderstanding, the Martian ambassador proclaims, "We come in peace."
Unsurprisingly, the ambassador and his cohorts zap everyone with laser guns and
burn all Congress officials into toast. 
"Mars Attacks!" doesn't just end there. Burton brings on his magic bag of
tricks by mocking all those alien-invasion disaster movies and adding his own
bizarre sense of humor. Based on the gory Topps "Mars Attacks!" cards that were
banned in the 1950's, the movie is an assemblage of in-jokes, cheeky dialogue,
offbeat gags, dozens of special-effects, and sheer comic mayhem and
destruction. Nearly the whole cast is demolished but it filled me with
cartoonish delight to see how they are demolished. Watch Michael J. Fox melt
while trying to reach Sarah Jessica Parker's hand! See the incredible sight of
a dog's head being grafted on Parker's body! The movie reads like an
outrageously zany comic-book with amazing sights, indeed.
The cast is first-rate for this material. We have wicked Jack Nicholson as not
only the straight arrow leader of the U.S. but also as a sleazy, leering Vegas
businessman; Glenn Close as the nervous First Lady; Annette Bening as a New Age
freak obsessed with meeting the Martians; Danny DeVito as an unctuous lawyer
who tries to reason with them; Jim Brown as a former boxer who takes them on;
Sarah Jessica Parker and Michael J. Fox as unctuous media reporters; Lisa Marie
as the memorably slinky alien in disguise who woos Martin Short; and the
hilarious (alien-like) Sylvia Sydney as the elderly grandmother of the trailer
park family. There are dozens of other cameos, but the aforementioned actors
are the most facetious. 
What's most outrageous in Burton's fantasy are the Martians themselves - they
are green, skeletal aliens with large brains and bulging eyeballs protected by
a shield so they can breathe on Earth. They zap everyone and everything in
sight, laughing like gremlins at the expense of human lives. All they have to
say is "Ack, ack, ack, ack, ack." 
"Mars Attacks!" doesn't start off well. For one, the Martians grow tiresome
after awhile - all that "Ack, Ack" business is not very imaginative or funny.
But then, the movie incredibly gains a fast-paced, inventive comic spirit and
gets funnier by the minute. There are also some great lines, such as Lukas
Haas's response to the Martian's interpretation of earth: "Hey. He made the
international sign of the donut." I also like the President's heartwarming
"Can't we all get along" speech to the Martians. And seeing Tom Jones playing
himself in Vegas and confronting the aliens causes one to smile despite the
ridiculous scenario. 
"Mars Attacks!" is not Tim Burton's best film but it is more savagely funny
and subversive than "Beetlejuice" or "Batman." Burton has fun with the sci-fi
genre and cleverly attacks it at the same time. This is definitely no ordinary
studio blockbuster film.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or
Faust667@aol.com 

Title
Review for House on Haunted Hill (1999)
It is a telling sign of how times have changed when the William Castle horror 
flick from eons ago, "House on Haunted Hill," passes for restraint in this 
jaded, anything-goes era of cheap thrills and gory violence. Sadly, this 
gore-laden remake of the original classic is another example of why the 
horror genre is dying - bloody thrills are never a substitute for character 
or plot. 
Set in the 90's, we now have Stephen Price (Geoffrey Rush), a rich amusement 
park expert who knows how to draw screams from his customers, and relishes 
and prides himself on the visceral thrills he creates. His beautiful yet 
conniving wife, Evelyn (Famke Janssen), is having a birthday and Stephen 
plans to hold the bash at the House on Haunted Hill, formerly a mental asylum 
where the bloodiest, most savage murders took place this side of the Charlie 
Manson moon. Evelyn is not receptive to Stephen's morbid plans, nor to his 
inviting five unknown guests to spend the night at this house for 1 million 
dollars each. The catch is that they have to spend the entire night, no 
matter the consequences. 
A splendid premise, as it was in the original, but the five-person group is 
hardly inviting company. There is Eddie Baker (Taye Diggs), a former athlete, 
Melissa Marr (Bridgette Wilson), a videographer who is fascinated by the 
house and its interiors, Donald Blackburn (Peter Gallagher), a doctor with a 
hidden agenda, and Sarah (Ali Arter), impersonating her boss with an agenda 
to just get the dough. 
Since these five characters barely ignite our interest, we are left with 
Price and his wife, but their obscene shrewdness is a far cry from Vincent 
Price. Put simply, Rush overacts to the nth degree yet Janssen at least would 
have a field day if she was cast in a remake of "Double Indemnity" - she has 
fire, passion and a heart of coal. The dynamic Famke puts the rest of the 
cast to shame. 
The house at least has some character but the shots of the interiors and the 
hallways are rendered so darkly that it may as well be Freddy Krueger's 
boiler room. Contrast this house with its 1958 counterpart, and at least the 
latter was somewhat inviting yet a sense of dread enveloped the place. Oh, 
my, how I miss the glory of black-and-white.
The biggest difference between the original and this remake is the 
introduction of the asylum and the horrors that once inhabited it. There is a 
curious 1931 prologue with Jeffrey Combs ("Reanimator") as some mad doctor 
who conducted grisly experiments, shown in docu-style, black-and-white 
footage. Sadly, none of this is really followed up on. Instead, we get 
high-pitched screams and fits, lots of canted angles, and a few gory deaths, 
not to mention a highly laughable special-effects monster that would barely 
scare Sigourney Weaver's Ripley. No wit, no scares, no purpose, and as with 
most recent remakes, no need.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com 
or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Clockwork Orange, A (1971)
"A Clockwork Orange" has created more diverse reactions in audiences and 
critics alike than in any other Stanley Kubrick film. Even Kubrick himself 
was outraged at how the film induced copycat incidents in Great Britain, 
causing him to ban the film until his death (now it has been re-released 
since Stanley died in March of 1999). Despite how others feel about the film, 
in my estimation, this is the greatest film ever made about the nature of 
violence, and the nature of behavior and moral choice in a clockwork society. 
It is as relevant and awe-inspiring and as intellectually charged today as 
any other film since on the subject.
Alex, the punk, the Droog, remains the most ironic, complex, and sympathetic 
antihero in the history of the cinema. As played by Malcolm McDowell, he is 
vicious, murderous but also a lover of Beethoven's Ninth Symphony. He also 
has nude paintings in his bedroom, has masturbatory fantasies to the tune of 
Beethoven with images from the movies (and himself as Dracula). Alex loves 
his working-class parents, his boa constrictor, and supposedly goes to school 
- he seems like a delightful lad you would see in your neighborhood on an 
"azure sky of deepest summer." There is only one difference - Alex has a 
knack, a love, for sex and violence. He has a creative imagination but it is 
fueled by his violent-proned rages - he seems to take delight in killing 
people. 
At the beginning of the film, in stunning close-up, we see Alex at the Korova 
Milkbar with his fellow Droogs drinking some milk substance that can "sharpen 
you up and get you ready for a bit of the old ultraviolence." Their nightly 
activities consist of beating up old winos in dark alleys, attacking people 
in their homes, driving like madmen on the roads, having sex with women they 
pick up in record stores, and it is usually all to the tune of Beethoven's 
lovely Ninth. These Droogs dress in white, have ripped-out eyeball 
ornamentations on their cuffs, and often wear masks with phallic, Pinocchio 
noses. Kubrick shows us quite a bit of violence in the first half-hour but he 
has more up his sleeve as the film continues. 
Alex is eventually caught by the police after being betrayed by his fellow 
Droogs (he is hit in the nose with a milk bottle). Once in prison, he gets 
wind of a "Ludovico technique" where a prisoner is subjected to a 
rehabilitative process that results in getting out of prison in no time at 
all. Alex wants to do good or he says, "one act of goodness." The prison 
chaplain (Godfrey Quigley) tells Alex that the technique has not been tested 
much and is considered dangerous. As the chaplain explains, "Goodness comes 
from within - goodness, is chosen. When a man cannot choose, he ceases to be 
a man." Alex doesn't comprehend such ideas, and decides to take part in the 
technique at all costs. He gets his chance when the Minister of the Interior 
(Anthony Sharp), who is looking for criminals to participate in such a 
technique, chooses Alex whom he considers ruthless, smart, and enterprising. 
In what remains surely the most perfectly realized scenes in the film, Alex 
is strapped to a chair with clamps that keeps his eyelids pried open as he is 
forced to watch violent film footage - at first, he enjoys it but slowly he 
becomes nauseous and sickly. Alex is becoming conditioned not just against 
violence but everything else he enjoys, including Beethoven's Ninth. 
So what is Kubrick trying to say? That in a clockwork, mechanized society, we 
have no rights - we must remain aligned with what is expected? All people who 
rebel are killers? Alex does not fit into society, he is in fact a rebel, 
allowing himself to choose violence over nonviolence because that is what 
makes him tick. Removing his instinctive behavior is not human - it is the 
result of a dehumanizing society and Alex is as human, direct and joyous as 
anyone else in the film, including the victims. 
Even in today's jaded world of ubiquitous sex and violence, "A Clockwork 
Orange" is still potent stuff - as disturbing now as it was in 1971. The 
reason is threefold: we, the audience, can't help but like Alex because he is 
so charming and ruthless despite his murderous ways. We are also asked to 
identify with him because we feel he is wronged by society and by the 
higher-ups who are abusing him and using him for political ambition. And yet 
Alex is not really cured, we sense he will go back to his violent self. 
The violence is both stylized and realistic. It is shown in slow-motion, 
time-lapse motion, and sometimes "viddied with the red, red vino on tap." 
When Alex kills his victims, it is shown at a remove, a distance from which 
we become observers particularly the attack on Alex (Patrick Magee), the 
Leftist writer, and his wife (Adrienne Corri), to the tune of "Singin' in the 
Rain." When Alex is attacked by his own droogs (who ironically become 
policemen) or by other higher-ups, it is realistic and bloody, with none of 
the enjoyment of "action and performance" that Alex feels when he inflicts 
pain or kills. 
Lastly, the film suggests that Alex cannot be changed by the Ludovico techniqu
e - his survival instinct is violence, it is what makes him a person. A moral 
choice cannot be made, as the prison chaplain says, because you cannot change 
a person's behavior. A liberal view to be sure but a justifiable view 
nonetheless.
"A Clockwork Orange" is terrifying, scary, witty, exciting, funny, and 
exhausting. It is Kubrick's most cinematic odyssey: beautifully shot and 
choreographed with almost monochromatic tones, and occasionally bursting with 
some bright, vivid colors of red and black justaxposed with blue and white.  
Malcolm McDowell gives what may be the seminal performance of any Kubrick 
film - exuding charm, arrogance and cleverness in the face of a callow, 
youthful killer. What's disturbing and provoking even today about the film is 
that Alex wants to retain his moral right to be bad. And we can't help but 
feel he is right.  
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
              Here is director Steven Spielberg at his best, and at his worst.
"Saving Private Ryan" contains some of the best war battle scenes in motion
picture history, thrillingly realized by Spielberg. This movie is also
gratuitously mawkish - a flaw that has not conflicted Spielberg's earlier works
as much as this one does. 
"Private Ryan" begins on D-Day at Omaha Beach, amid a flurry of bullets and
cannon blasts, as the American troops approach the beach to fight the Nazis.
The graphic, brilliantly choreographed footage shows dismembered bodies, in all
their blood, guts and glory. Tom Hanks plays Captain Miller, the leader of his
troop that underwent the furious Omaha assault. Along with the members of his
troop (Edward Burns as the Brooklyn-accented, arrogant soldier, Tom Sizemore as
the tough, devoted Sergeant Horvath, Barry Pepper as the Bible-quoting sniper
Private Jackson, Giovanni Ribisi as the pale medic Wade, and Jeremy Davies as
the bony, scared Corporal Upham), they go on assignment to find a Private Ryan
from another platoon stationed in the French countryside. It turns out Ryan is
the sole surviving brother of the enlisted four who died in action. As one
soldier remarks, "This Ryan better be worth it" - he better be if they are
going to fight more Nazis.
"Saving Private Ryan" is terrifically frightening and compelling in its battle
scenes, particularly the final epic battle in Normandy amid rubble and wobbly
tanks. It's the dramatic scenes between the platoon soldiers that reeks of
clichs and sentimental hogwash - Oliver Stone could have given Spielberg a
couple of pointers on how to frame these talented actors against such a hellish
landscape. The movie's framing device, involving a prologue and coda set in a
cemetery in remembrance of D-Day, is nonessential considering the genuine power
of the story itself. 
What works extremely well in "Private Ryan" is the maturity and frailty of
Captain Miller, wonderfully played by Tom Hanks. Miller's trembling hand and
sorrowful glances suggests that he's only human and can surely fail in such a
mission. Hanks also suggests that even in an apocalyptic frenzy, a heroism can
still exist, however unwanted considering he's an English teacher, not John
Wayne. 
My other favorite character is the arrogant soldier played by Edward Burns
("The Brothers McMullen") who refuses to play by the rules. I also enjoyed
Jeremy Davies ("Spanking the Monkey") as the cowardly Corporal Upham who loves
hearing Edith Piaf on the radio, but is choked with terror by the possibility
of picking up a rifle. 
"Saving Private Ryan" brings us as close to the mechanics of battle as any
other war film, but Spielberg and screenwriter Robert Rodat seems to think that
any war, no matter how unjustified, still warrants a hint of heroism and
bravery. By now, we know that any war is not worth dying for, even for your own
country - a sentiment I thought had long died with the heroics of John Wayne
and the Green Berets and all those romanticized propaganda films. Just look at
the war on Vietnam broadcast to millions in the 60's that left a bitter taste
in every American's mouth. For a true look at the dehumanizing effects of war,
check out "Platoon," "Paths of Glory," "Manchurian Candidate," and "Full Metal
Jacket." 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with questions, concerns or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com 

Title
Review for 15 Minutes (2001)
Something shocking happens in "15 Minutes." It is so shocking and unexpected 
that it will leave you coming up for air wondering why the filmmakers went 
through such lengths to shock the audience. And yet its shocking twist 
results in a final half-hour of ridiculous implausibilities squandering its 
initial premise. 
Robert De Niro plays Eddie Flemming, a New York City homicide cop who loves 
to be surrounded by the media (he also dunks his head in ice water to sober 
up). Eddie is a celebrity cop, having had his hide splashed on the covers of 
People magazine. The latest murder in town involves arson, and Eddie is there 
ready to mingle with the press while solving the crime. Trouble is that an 
arson investigator Jordy Warsaw (Edward Burns) has solved the crime first, 
realizing it was actually a homicide than an accidental arson case. Eddie 
knows it too and gets all the credit. You do not have to be a film buff to 
know that Eddie and Jody become partners in what appears to be a buddy-buddy 
cop flick, only Jody is no cop and realistically, he would not have been 
allowed to follow Eddie everywhere since the subsequent murders do not 
involve arson! We will allow logic to be suspended for now since their banter 
is occasionally intoxicating. 
The latest string of murders are committed by two European thugs. One is 
Olgen (played by Olgen Taktarov), a bald-headed and grins uncontrollably and 
his partner, Emil (Karel Roden), who also grins and shoots their murders with 
a stolen digital camera. Their motives remain unclear at first but 
afterwards, their intent becomes clearer - they want to publicize their snuff 
videos on television and become celebrities. Olgen's idea is that in America, 
nobody is blamed for what they do and everyone is a celebrity for at least 
fifteen minutes. Andy Warhol might have wished his words were not used 
synonymously with murder.
"15 Minutes" is nothing new, and its theme of how amoral and devalued our 
country (and the media) has become has been explored in everything from 
Sidney Lumet's "Network" to Martin Scorsese's "The King of Comedy" to Oliver 
Stone's "Natural Born Killers" to the blackly comical "Man Bites Dog," which 
this film so closely resembles. But what the film says is that someone crazy 
enough would be willing to create a snuff film and try and sell it to the 
media in return for some exposure. Sure there is jail time served but who can 
say no to book rights, movie rights and the right lawyer who can negotiate a 
percentage of the profits (Olgen's lawyer is played by real-life Gotti lawyer 
Bruce Cutler).  
Most of "15 Minutes" has a jazzy, immediate feel to it, and there are some 
terrifically choreographed scenes. One involves a gruesome murder seen from a 
witness's point-of-view. Another involves a shootout on the streets near 
Central Park that is hair-raising and frenetic. I also liked a long scene 
involving an escape from a burning building. But "15 Minutes" lacks much 
thrust or purpose. It seems to evolve from one type of genre to another. 
First we get some harrowing scenes of violence from a camcorder's 
point-of-view. Then we get the buddy schtick of De Niro and Burns at odds 
with each other. Then there is a developing romance between De Niro and a 
reporter (Melina Kanakaredes from TV's "Providence"). Then there is the brief 
satire of the media (such a cliched attack at best) where Mr. Frasier himself 
(Kelsey Grammer) plays a famous TV tabloid reporter whose sole purpose in 
news is summed up in one line, thanks to actress Kim Catrall: "If it bleeds, 
it leads." At this point, I was confused since the film doesn't stick close 
to any consistent tone or style. 
De Niro has some bright, lively moments but it is mostly a thankless role for 
someone of his stature. He does have a touching scene, however, where he 
fills out a card to his possible bride-to-be written in a different language. 
Edwards Burns is not always up to the task and I had a hard time believing 
him to be an arson investigator (ironically enough, De Niro did wonders with 
a similar role in "Backdraft"). The two thugs are so inhuman, callous and 
pathetic that nothing registers them as anything but cartoonish, jocose 
villains whom I did not care for in the slightest. 
"15 Minutes" has that unexpected twist in the middle (which will not be 
revealed here) that leaves the rest of the film without much soul or 
interest. Let us just say that another pile of cliches follow, including the 
obligatory turn-in-the-badge scene and a host of other predictable scenes 
from the "Dirty Harry" school. And the ending is so melodramatically silly 
and over-the-top (similar to the finale of the remake of "Shaft") that it 
ruins its thought-provoking premise. This is the kind of film possibly 
written by one person that is then run through a full-scale committee turning 
it into your average Hollywood run-of-the-mill thriller, satire, commentary, 
or whatever the heck it is.  
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, complaints or general comments at 
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Waking Ned Devine (1998)
Irish villages in the movies are becoming as common as actors sporting Irish
accents, such as Tom Cruise and Brad Pitt. "Waking Ned Devine" is a harmless,
pleasant black comedy that aims at the funny bone in delicate, sophisticated
ways and, oh, the actors really seem Irish, too. 
The movie begins with Jackie O'Shea (Ian Bannen) clutching a lottery ticket
and claiming that he's won millions. Truth is he just wanted to tease his wife
into bringing him dessert while watching TV. Later, it turns out that in the
cozy, rainy village of Tully More, Ireland (actually the Isle of Man, which is
not quite Ireland), somebody has won the lottery. Jackie, along with his best
friend, Michael O'Sullivan (David Kelly), aims to locate the lucky winner. In a
place with a population of 51, it can't be too difficult. But who could it be?
Is it the smelly pig farmer or the single mother he pines for? The witch-like
eccentric woman? The lucky winner is actually a Ned Devine, who died while
holding the winning ticket. Jackie decides that the ticket is his, and basks in
the glory that the money will bring him. 
"Waking Ned Devine" doesn't quite end there since there are many surprises and
delights that unfold along its merry way. There is also a wicked sense of humor
throughout, particularly involving naked motorists, prying a dead man's mouth
open, a funeral for a living person, and some hysterical business involving a
telephone booth. 
The supporting characters could have used more depth (the pig farmer is a good
example), but the film is a breezy triumph of comic spirit and laughter. Ian
Bannen and David Kelley have the kindest faces I've seen at the movies in quite
some time - they linger long after the movie is over. When these two appear on
screen, "Waking Ned Devine" becomes a frolicsome dinner party that you don't
want to end.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 

Title
Review for O Brother, Where Art Thou? (2000)
I sat watching the Coen Bros. latest film, "O'Brother, Where Art Thou?" in 
stunned silence. I certainly watched with admiration that the Coens would be 
interested in the Depression era. I liked the art direction and the 
cinematography by gifted cinematographer Roger Deakins, who also photographed 
"Fargo." The film has a sense of time and place, and it has all the hallmarks 
of a wonderfully crafted period piece. The problem is that there is no 
attitude, no edge, no life. In fact, this remains the most lifeless, 
laughless comedy I've seen in years, and the Coens are to blame entirely for 
this misfire. 
The film begins promisingly enough with the shot of a chain gang working on a 
railroad. Three prisoners escape and keep ducking across an open wheat field, 
unseen by the prison guards. They are Ulysses Everett McGill (thin mustached 
George Clooney), Pete (John Turturro), and Delmar (Tim Blake Nelson) - three 
fools with not one brain cell to their name. Nevertheless, Ulysses considers 
himself the leader of the group as they try unsuccessfully to hop on a 
freight train. Later, their chains are cut by a local who turns them in to 
the cops. The trio escape, finding themselves in one comical situation after 
another. Ulysses's intent is to find some secretly stashed money that they 
can split among themselves. Along this journey, they encounter trigger-happy 
Babyface Nelson (Michael Badalucco) who hates to be called Babyface, a 
one-eyed, vicious Bible salesman (John Goodman), members of the Klu Klux 
Klan, a remote radio station man (Stephen Root) where the trio cut a record 
as the Soggy Bottom Boys, and three sirens by a river who luxuriate their sex 
appeal in one of the most surreal setpieces the Coens have ever devised in 
their career. 
And yet I was mortified by how little any of this made me laugh, much less 
chuckle. I sat watching all these events unfold on screen yet none of it 
engaged me on any level. Every sequence is flat and joyless, including a KKK 
rally that is neither ominous nor remotely funny. There is one brief segment 
involving the possibility that Pete has turned into a horny toad but it never 
leads anywhere. The sequences hang loosely with no weight or substance. 
The actors do not help in the least. Clooney, Turturro and Nelson merely 
react with artifical expressions that seem less alive than those found in a 
Norman Rockwell painting. The Coens refuse to invest any humanity in these 
characters so that every single situation, every actor, every line is 
reinforced with a robotic mentality that produces no chemistry, no interest 
and no imagination. Holly Hunter shows up in a throwaway cameo as McGill's 
previous lover who finds him to less than "bona fide." She shows some 
strength and vitality and refuses to come off as an automaton or a cartoonish 
caricature, unlike the rest of the cast. 
"O'Brother, Where Art Thou?" reminded me of the frenetic road comedy by the 
Coens known as "Raising Arizona," which has become something of a cult clas
sic and which I less than admire. I suppose their over-the-top brand of humor 
of the anything-goes school of comedy doesn't click with me at all, as I was 
also one of the few supporters of "The Hudsucker Proxy." I admire their 
intentions in creating a zany comedic period piece (and thus basing it on 
Homer's "The Odyssey") but I found nothing here to connect with me on any 
level. Perhaps it is time for them to go back to their film noir roots, 
"Blood Simple" and "Fargo," two of my favorites by the Coens.  Here, the 
Coens seem to be dangerously close to traveling nowhere. 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Big One, The (1997)
THE BIG ONE (1997) - A pleasurable comedy, masquerading as a documentary,
focusing on Michael Moore's attempts to focus on the truth surrounding the
layoffs in Michigan and around the United States. We see unemployed people
barking at Michael Moore and at the cameras about their poverty, Borders
Bookstore employees complaining about tax cuts on their paychecks, a woman
crying to Moore at one of his booksignings about her inability to find work, and
the penultimate moment when Moore confronts the Nike chairman and asks him why
people in Mexico are working for 80 cents an hour. 
"The Big One" has lots of scattered moments of truth, and plenty of it is just
hearsay - the scene where the workers yell to Moore is obviously staged. I
enjoyed the scenes where Moore and his video crew enter places of business and
are threatened to leave, or when he gives some associates and bigwigs a big, fat
check for 80 cents to the Mexican workers because "we want to help them out."
All of this will be very familiar to anyone who's seen "Roger and Me" or his TV
series "TV Nation." 
Moore has a lot of good arguments about what's happening to hard workers around
the country who work for candy companies or GM - if these corporations are
making so much money, why are there so many layoffs? One word: competition, so
they can be ahead of the others. That is why they pay so little to Mexican
vagrants or children in Mexico and other countries - it is cheap labor for
maximum profit. And then there are the airline workers who ! 
"The Big One" is very funny throughout and is more tightly edited than "Roger
and Me." Moore could have a career as a comake flight reservations - nothing
unusual about that except some of them are prisoners in jailmedian, but he is
after bigger game - to expose the truth through nuggets of humor. Some may say
he is just exploiting the workers he's documenting. I would say he's exploiting
the exploiters. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Memento (2000)
"I can't make new memories. Everything fades, nothing sticks. By the time we 
finish this conversation I won't remember how it started, and the next time I 
see you I won't know that I've ever met you before." - Leonard.
Thus, the above quotation says it all for "Memento," one of the most 
electrifying of all postmodern noir thrillers in years. Whereas "Run Lola 
Run" and "Pulp Fiction" revelled in irony, hipness and fractured timelines to 
tell their stories, "Memento" is a more eager return to what makes noir what 
it is - the purely existential. Martin Scorsese dared to go through such 
existential leaps minus the irony in "Bringing Out the Dead" as did Sean Penn 
in the brilliant "The Pledge." "Memento," though, will be remembered as the 
most disorienting and fatalistic of the new century, linking to the most 
frightening ordeal man could ever face, the inability to make new memories. 
Such is the case with Leonard (Guy Pearce), a former insurance claims investi
gator who suffers from a rare disorder defined as "anterior grade memory 
loss" (also known as Korsokoff's syndrome). You see Leonard can't make new 
memories and the only way he can remember anything is by writing it down or 
by tatooing his body with written messages. After a few minutes, if he fails 
to write down important information or clues (usually on a handy Polaroid he 
shoots of any person he meets), he will forget as if the incident had never 
occured. 
At the beginning of the film, Leonard kills an unarmed man named Teddy (Joe 
Pantoliano). Teddy's murder seems cold-blooded and, like most noir films that 
deal with a central narrator (that being Leonard), we expect flashbacks to 
see what led up to this event. A strange thing happens, though, in "Memento." 
Rather than seeing typical flashbacks in a convential, linear fashion, the 
story is told backwards thus the ending of the film is really the beginning 
and the beginning of the film is really the ending. Now the audience is faced 
with the daunting task of keeping all the facts straight in their minds as 
the events unfold on screen. I did not find it daunting as much as 
challenging and this Harold Pinter approach serves the purpose of the film. 
It would not be fair to reveal much of "Memento" because the thrill of the 
film is in its surprise factor. This much can be said about the plot: Leonard 
is investigating the death of his wife by some character named "John G." His 
investigation leads to a sour, sweetly morose barmaid, Natalie (Carrie-Anne 
Moss), who has gone through a similar loss and can help him out of pity. 
Naturally, as the film regresses, we learn Natalie is not quite the sour, 
kind woman we thought she was - your typical femme fatale. Then there's 
Teddy, the smiling cop or drug dealer (depending on your interpretation) who 
may be trying to help Leonard or may be trying to kill him. Add to the mix a 
local drug dealer, Leonard's memory of Sammy Jankis who supposedly suffered 
similar memory loss (and was part of Leonard's insurance claims), and co
nstant betrayals and backstabbing ploys. There is also a motel clerk who is 
nonplussed to learn that Leonard never remembers any conversation they have 
had, and thus tries to jokingly cheat Leonard out of a better motel room. No 
one is ever what they seem in this morally ambiguous universe and by 
structuring the film backwards, we learn the evolution of each character 
through Leonard's point-of-view. This also serves a more finite attraction: 
when we learn new information about a character as the film regresses, we 
realize the character's prior behavior and begin to see that Leonard may have 
the wrong idea or wrong motive for his later actions. This nonlinear 
breakdown of the story will no doubt lead to further viewings just to keep 
the characters straight.
"Memento" has a great, meaty story but if it were not for the beautifully 
restrained performances from the cast, the film would not work the same way. 
Guy Pearce is fierce and alive in every scene he is in. He is vulnerable and 
yet impulsive, no doubt due to his constant memory loss. He is not quite your 
typical hero, more of a disillusioned antihero. In a sense, Pearce undergoes 
a rather strange dilemma - if he does not remember what a person had done to 
him, he can just easily hurt the person who may have tried to help him. The 
Polaroids and the tattoos are messages that could lead to dangerous avenues 
if he is not quick enough to jot down finite details. All he does remember is 
that he has a condition (though that often escapes him as well) and he knows 
his wife was raped and murdered and he is aware of his former job. But as the 
film comes to a surprisingly fatalistic finish, we also sense that Leonard 
may have mixed up certain facts or perhaps he is in denial about his own 
mysterious past. Pearce brings Leonard to life in such an intoxicating manner 
that he becomes something of a human mine - don't step on him or you will 
explode.
Carrie-Anne Moss gives her first truly great performance here as the 
mysterious, duplicitous Natalie, exuding both toughness and sincerity with 
equal aplomb. She has a memorably frightening moment where she takes 
advantage of Leonard's condition and taunts him. Joe Pantoliano (who 
co-starred with Moss in "The Matrix") gives one of his funniest, quixotic 
performances in years as Teddy, and his character remains as much an enigma 
as Leonard does. Teddy may seem trustworthy but could he be using Leonard as 
well? 
Harold Pinter's "Betrayal" was a tale of divorce told backwards and probably 
the first to use such a complicated device. There was also the hilarious 
"Seinfeld" episode that was told backwards and succeeded in delivering its 
punchlines with more gusto than usual. But "Memento" uses a gimmicky device 
to its advantage. We, the audience, only know as much information as Leonard 
knows thus his short-term memory loss is accentuated by telling the story 
backwards, especially since he can't make new memories. When Leonard is 
unsure of something, so are we. When he is disoriented, so are we. It is rare 
for a noir tale like this to make us feel the internal anxieties and fears of 
its main character. Watching "Memento" is like enduring an endless nightmare 
where our memory is a constant illusion in search of the truth. In the case 
of Leonard, his search for the truth may be fruitless and all we are left 
with are mementos to remind us of his own journey. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at Faust668@aol.com or 
at faustus_08520@yahoo.com

Title
Review for High Fidelity (2000)
Ingrid, Renee, Jackie, Stephanie, Susan. Those names I can rattle off my mind
like shards of lightning, and they are at the top five of my list of breakups
in my life. And so I could identify with Rob Gordon's unique ability to not
only remember the names of past loves and the extent of their relationships,
but to also know which pop/rock and roll songs were playing at the time,
exclusively on vinyl. Music is an identifiable factor for me too, and for my
sweet miseries of the past, it includes Huey Lewis and the News performing
"Small World" in 1988 and "Shakedown" by Bob Seger from the summer of 1987. For
Rob, it includes a different era of Fleetwood Mac and Paper Lace, and that is
at the heart of Stephen Frears's delicately oddball romantic comedy "High
Fidelity," which is more oddball comedy than romantic but it delivers all three
in nearly equal doses and that is part of its charm.
Based on Nick Hornsby's 1995 cult novel of the same name, John Cusack plays the
record-loving Rob who owns a small Bohemian-like record shop in Chicago called
Championship Vinyl, which specializes in selling records wrapped in plastic
(vinyl has not lost its touch since it is still sold in record shops,
especially in New York City or Princeton, N.J.). Rob speaks directly to the
camera, ruminating on his past top five breakups, most recently Laura (Iben
Hjehle), while giving us the pop history of each breakup - the song that played
and where it played as a reminder of that misery. Or as Rob puts it, "I don't
remember if I was miserable when I listened to pop music or if listening to pop
music made me miserable." 
Laura has left Rob's pad but he loves her too much to just let go. She lives
with a sexual hippie (hilariously portrayed by Tim Robbins) who is a
martial-arts master. We get more than a few scenes of Rob dripping wet like a
madman in the rain while calling Laura from outside her new home - this almost
seems like an extension of the classic "Say Anything" by director Cameron Crowe
that also starred Cusack. All Rob has left in his life, minus Laura, is his
record store and two employees, the geeky, apologetic Dick (Todd Luiso) and the
musically encyclopedic, irascible Barry (Jack Black) who is ticked off by
anyone who does not share his music tastes. I love the moment when they discuss
"Evil Dead 2" and its "great soundtrack" or Barry's recommendation to use "You
Can't Always Get What You Want" at Laura's father's funeral:
Dick: 'That is an immediate disqualification on the grounds of it being used in
"The Big Chill".'
Besides his listless life without Laura, Rob is a part-time DJ and briefly beds
a sexy singer (Lisa Bonet) who shares Rob's lovelorn disappointments and sings
Peter Frampton songs. And we get glimpses of Rob's obsession over his past
loves, shown in brief flashbacks. He is so obsessed that he arranges to meet
all five and figure out why he has failed them. Most memorable of these
ex-girlfriends include Lili Taylor as an unhappy yet sometimes cheerful woman
(only Lili can credibly play such a part) and Catherine Zeta-Jones as a rich,
wild woman who is confused by Rob's need to explain why she left him. 
"High Fidelity" is familiar turf, a lot of is reminiscent of some of the best
parts of "Singles," one of my favorite comedies of the 90's. Still, thanks to
director Stephen Frears's offbeat direction and Scott Rosenberg and Cusack's
writing, the laughs come in with terrific precision, mainly due to Cusack's
dead-on, quirky line readings. The cast is richly entertaining to watch,
including the histrionic, energetic Jack Black, and a marvelous Joan Cusack as
Rob's friend who is shocked to discover how Rob treated Laura thanks to Laura.
I also enjoyed the presence of Hjejle - for once in these comedies, a real
human being of the opposite sex shows how deeply hurt she is by a man's
transgressions. Though the film loses momentum in the last half hour building
to the predictable final act with Laura, "High Fidelity" has oodles of charm
and a consistently jerky funny bone. It's uneven, like Cusack, but you expected
that. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or comments at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Analyze This (1999)
This is a mob movie parody that actually delivers more laughs per minute than
most straight comedies. "Analyze This" is a pleasurable movie experience, and a
real hoot; a grandly hysterical comedy that pokes fun at all the expected mob
cliches, and is guaranteed to offend everyone (including some mobsters). 
Billy Crystal stars as a psychiatrist, Ben Sobel, who offers therapy to
divorcees and couples. One day, he has an accidental fender bender with a
mobster's car - Crystal offers his business card in case the guy changes his
mind about filing a suit. "Forget about it. I said forget about it," snarls
Jelly, the mobster (Joe Viterelli). Of course, Jelly does not forget when he
notices that his boss, Paul Vitti (Robert De Niro), is suffering from headaches
and is not performing up to par on the job. After all, he's Don Vitti, one of
the major crime bosses in New York City. 
Jelly suggests that Paul visit the psychiatrist. Once he's there, the Don
intimidates Ben by telling him that he didn't see his face in the papers and
doesn't know him. Ben agrees but his life turns upside down when he starts to
counsel Paul. Analyze This steals ever narrative device you can imagine from
classic mob films like "The Godfather," "GoodFellas," and "Casino." There's the
voice-over delivered by De Niro, the typical mob kisses and hugs, shoot-outs in
restaurants, several comical "whackings", and Tony Bennett songs playing all
the while. All of this is done with style and grace. 
Just as graceful and ingratiating as ever is De Niro, a proven potent comic
force ("We're No Angels" and "The King of Comedy") who steals every scene he's
in. He mugs mercilessly and whimpers incessantly - there's one touching scene
where he sobs over his father's death. De Niro is as fit, trimmed, and handsome
as he was in "Casino" - no wonder he originally wanted Martin Scorsese to
direct. 
Billy Crystal has been on the sentimental bandwagon ever since "City Slickers,"
but here he learns a vital lesson: less is more. With a bespectacled look and a
curly beard, Crystal lightens up the screen with his pleasing charm and nuanced
timing. He learned the great trick - to pause with a glance before delivering
the punch line. Here he is pitch-perfect in one of his most memorable screen
roles to date. Crystal's last scene as he mimics a swaggering, posturing
Italian mafioso will leave you incredulous with laughter. 
Unfortunately, there is one major flaw: the casting of Lisa Kudrow as Laura,
Ben's fiancee who keeps getting interrupted at every wedding opportunity by
Paul's henchmen. Kudrow does well, but isn't given enough to do. This is a real
shame, considering there could have been some winning byplay between De Niro
and Kudrow, but the three or four writers listed seemed to have nixed the idea
of supplying more than one scene between them. Still, there are enough comic
zingers, one-liners, and subtle humor to compensate. Besides, you have the prim
Chazz Palminteri as the rival mob boss, Primo Sindrone. 
"Analyze This" may not be great shakes or worthy of being placed in the annals
of great comedy classics, but it is as satisfying and entertaining as any other
comedy I've seen as of late. And that's that. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or
at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Silence of the Lambs, The (1991)
When I first saw "The Silence of the Lambs" on Valentine's Day in 1991, I found
it chilling and intense but not much more than a sophisticated slasher film
"with a little taste." Now, in the year 2001, ten years later after its release,
I find it is far smoother and tighter than I thought. This is more than a
chilling, intense thriller - it is a psychological thriller and character study
that often resembles an unusual love story. Let me explain further. 
As the film opens, we are introduced to a young, virile woman running in the
woods, training to be an FBI agent. She is Clarice Starling (Jodie Foster), an
ambitious woman eager to study criminal psychology and behavioral science. FBI
Section Chief  Jack Crawford (Scott Glenn) wants Clarice to run a test on Dr.
Hannibal Lecter (Anthony Hopkins), a psychiatrist who also happens to be a
cannibal and is being held in a Baltimore prison surrounded by thick glass
walls. 
Crawford: "Do you spook easily Starling?"
Clarice is determined to question Dr. Lecter and decipher any knowledge he might
have about a serial killer on the loose known as Buffalo Bill aka Jame Gumm (Ted
Levine). This killer likes to skin the humps of heavyset girls and may possibly
be a transsexual. Apparently, Lecter knows him very well. 
The initial meeting of Lecter and Clarice is enough to give people goosebumps
and nightmares for weeks. We enter a cavernous prison underground surrounded by
some obscenely red lighting and red gates, as if we were entering Hell (a heavy
murmur that gets louder and louder is heard on the soundtrack). She meets Lecter
who stands motionless in his cell whispering, "Good Morning." Their conversation
is so memorable that it stands as one of the most classic introductions of evil
characters to grace the silver screen since Bela Lugosi's Dracula. Lecter
analyzes Clarice to the fullest, fully aware of her second-rate shoes, the
disguising of her West Virginia accent and knowing she would do anything to keep
away from her homely existence by going so far as to join the FBI. In this
scene, we see how Jodie Foster's Clarice works - she maintains her cool and
composure without crying, though she wants to. Then she turns the tables on
Lecter, asking if he has the temerity to look at himself and analyze his own
behavior.
 This gets to Lecter who has finally met his match in the form of an ambitious
FBI trainee, who also happens to be a woman. 
Based on Thomas Harris's novel, "Silence of the Lambs" involves and engages us
from the start, closing in on an investigation of murders in the midwest of
women found in ditches or lakes with their skins removed. It is all part of the
Buffalo Bill murder spree and Clarice needs Lecter to provide crucial details,
such as Buffalo Bill's real name and whereabouts. An exchange has to occur as
she fools Lecter into thinking he can be moved from Baltimore to a pleasant
island known as Plum Island where he can roam the beach freely "under Swat team
surveillance, of course." But the film is not just interested in grisly details
of murders or scamming jailed killers. Each passing event and sequence invites
us to see how Clarice Starling is affected and changed by them. And we also see
how she is affected by Lecter and how he gets inside her head. After their
initial meeting, Clarice walks to her car, reminded of memories of her father
and cries. 
Clarice Starling is also the focus of "The Silence of the Lambs" as we see how a
woman lives and breathes in a man's world, and how she copes with her slain
father who was a cop killed on the line of duty. We see two brief flashbacks of
her as a child, one where she is greeted by her father and another where she is
at his funeral. They pinpoint to a woman who has her emotions in check but is
unable to forget her past thanks to Lecter's intervention in her psychological
makeup. 
And how can a short, ambitious, sincere woman survive in a man's world? Several
scenes indicate that her every encounter with a man results in romantic
interest. For example, there is her initial encounter with Dr. Chilton (Anthony
Heald),  Lecter's psychiatrist, who reminds Clarice that the town of Baltimore
is fun "if you have the right guide." One entomologist asks her to go out for
"cheesburgers and beer." 
More often than not, Clarice is reminded that she is a minority. There are
several examples such as when Clarice enters an elevator of tall, imposing men.
At the mortuary where a slain victim of Buffalo Bill's is being autopsied,
Crawford tells the sheriff that certain elements of the sex crime should not be
discussed in front of Clarice. Yet she maintains her cool and shows
determination and persistence, no matter who gets in her way. It is doubly
ironic that Hannibal Lecter is the only man who shows her some level of respect.
The film is directed by Jonathan Demme ("Beloved," "Melvin and Howard") and he
has a fascinating device in the film that is also used sparingly in
"Philadelphia." He shows us mostly close-ups of his characters and shifts in
reverse angle shots by showing another character off-center. Often the
characters seem to be looking straight at us - a subjective device that would
often seem distracting is cleverly used in the film, particularly the meetings
between Clarice and Lecter. The subjectivity forces us to study their faces and
understand what they are thinking and feeling. 
The casting is impeccable. Jodie Foster is unequivocally seamless as Clarice
Starling - tender, tough, sincere, argumentative, vulnerable. She has her flaws
but shows fierce ambition and all the characters in the film know it. Anthony
Hopkins (thankfully not typecast, though he might have been) is sheer excellence
as Lecter. He has remarkable stillness and a quiet, calm voice that carries a
sense of understated malice - he has a way with words and can tell what kind of
fragrance a woman wears. More than that, he can get inside your skin and rattle
your nerves. Lecter also has a way with biting people's cheeks while listening
to Bach's "Goldberg Variations." Amazingly, Hopkins is only on screen for twenty
minutes but his presence looms large throughout. Both actors won deserved Oscars
for their roles.
There are so many memorable moments in its 118 minute running time that remain
etched in one's memory. Clarice's meetings with Lecter are all exceptionally
shot and edited. I love her story of the screaming lambs and the one lamb she
tried to save (not to mention the priceless shot of Lecter's tears after hearing
her story). The moment when Clarice shakes Crawford's hand after getting her
official FBI badge. The intricately shot scene at a building where Lecter makes
his extraordinary escape while FBI agents circle his cell. The unquestionably
suspenseful climax where Clarice hunts for Buffalo Bill in his subterranean lair
(look closely at shots of moths and swastikas). The autopsy scene of the slain
girl which is quite heartbreaking to watch, thanks to Foster's controlled yet
emotional observations. And there is so much more. 
Another exceptional aspect as to why "The Silence of the Lambs" works is because
it chooses to be uniquely disturbing without showing much gore. A film about a
cannibal and a serial killer with a predilection for skin could very well show
plenty of gore and bloody executions. Instead, director Demme implies as much as
he shows, forcing us to imagine certain unseen events. My favorite moment is
when Dr. Chilton shows Clarice a picture of what Lecter did to a helpless nurse
- a close-up of her reaction to the photo says so much more than what is
actually in the photo.   
At heart, "The Silence of the Lambs" is really about the relationship between
Lecter and Clarice, resulting in a love story of sorts between a monster and his
mate. "People will say we are in love," says Lecter. Of course, it is more of a
mutual respect for one another, not a literal love story of a sexually
attractive couple. Clarice and Lecter both test and size each other up, and
continue being personal and up close. It is only fitting that this film was
released on February 14th. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for American Beauty (1999)
Watching Sam Mendes's "American Beauty" is like taking a roller coaster tour
through suburbia - gleeful yet observant that something awry may be happening
in each house of each neighborhood. "American Beauty" is the latest 90's view
of dysfunctional families of America, a fascinating, complex, irritating,
grandiose and finally (and purposely) uneven satire. 
Kevin Spacey stars as the hapless, droll Lester Burnham, a magazine writer for
a bland organization run by bland businessmen who seemed to have emerged from
the offices of the film "In The Company of Men." He is unhappily married to his
frantic wife, Carolyn (Annette Bening), a real-estate agent whose sales have
depleted due to the new local hotshot honcho in town (Peter Gallagher). They
both have a smug, obnoxious daughter, Jane (Thora Birch) whose sole intent in
life is to have augmented breasts. 
Their new neighbors are not any less strange or threatening to suburbia. There
is the intensely coiled former Marine (Chris Cooper) and his catatonic wife
(Allison Janney, in an atypical role), and their son, Ricky (Wes Bentley), a
video camera freak with a steely gaze in his eyes - he has the ability to see
the beauty in things. 
There is a dichotomy in the breakdown of these two families. As far as the
Burnhams are concerned, Lester and Carolyn (their sexually frustration always
in check) listen to dinner music while eating, and Jane (who hates her parents)
brings her best friend, a seemingly teenage blonde nymphette named Angela (Mena
Suvari), for sleepovers. Angela admits that Jane's father is cute, and claims
she wants to have sex with him.  
Ricky's family has deep seated hatred towards Jews and homosexuals. His Marine
father does not want his son Ricky to resort to drugs use anymore, and
regularly beats him if he touches his belongings. Ricky draws more attention to
his video camera and films Jane and the rest of her family through his bedroom
window - it is his means of escape. And his mother never says a word and seems
to live a life of sadness reflected in her endless stares. 
By comparison, the Burnhams are living a life with more zest. Lester is drawn
to his daughter's sexy friend and has a regressive awakening. He quits his job,
starts lifting weights and jogging, and frequently postures and rants about his
newfangled freedom. Lester also starts smoking pot, listens to his collection
of 70's songs, and tells his family what he really thinks about his life and
his marriage. In other words, he is driving them further apart than they were
already.
There are many more revelations in the richly designed tapestry of writer Alan
Ball's screenplay, and it is unfair to say more because nothing in this film
can be predicted. I have been saying for a long time that Hollywood films
should take the initiative of relying on character-based narrative to unveil a
slice of Americana. Most recent Hollywood films rely on plot to drive the
characters forward in motion (see "Pushing Tin")  whereas Ball instead lets
these characters live and breathe by their passions and hungers - they are not
dictated by cumbersome plot points. Essentially, these people are not at all
what they seem to be, and slowly other attributes start to evolve in their
personalities. 
Lester undergoes the most thrilling transformation from a jerky, ironic
three-piece suit bureaucrat to a t-shirt wearing, posturing, reborn, virile man
with lots of attitude to spare, more so than his cheerleading daughter. He is
the anchor of the film, and basically underscores all the tension within his
family and his next-door neighbors with his rampant, rebellious slant on life. 
"American Beauty" scores heavily with Spacey's beautifully modulated, magnetic
performance - it is clearly his best work by far. Annette Bening finally has
her zestiest, most radiant role since "The Grifters" - here she accomplishes
the rare feat of being sympathetic while simultaneously being pathetic and
annoying. Thora Birch also does solid work as the cranky Jane (she certainly
grew up since her work in those Harrison Ford/Tom Clancy movies). 
One performance that deserves some recognition is the underrated Chris Cooper
as the violently abusive Marine. Cooper also played a dad earlier this year in
the gentle "October Sky" and has had decent parts in some John Sayles films.
Here he demonstrates an intensity that is nearly unwatchable, and his
rain-drenched scene with Spacey will make you squirm. 
More kudos are deserving of Mena Suvari as the blonde cheerleader friend of
Jane's - her role says more about the plight of teenage girls in high school
than most teen movies of late. She could give Rachel Leigh Cook a run for her
money.
As much as I like newcomer Wes Bentley, his enigmatic Ricky left me
unsatisfied, partly because we know so little about him. One critic described
him as evil (which he is not) but there is a disarming, almost Norman Bates
aura about this kid that is creepily inconclusive. Ditto Ricky's mother who is
left in the sidelines, though I imagine we can draw our own conclusions as to
why she is virtually catatonic.
"American Beauty" is not perfect or as harrowingly honest as last year's
undeniably great "Happiness," but it is entertainingly wicked, insightful and
satirical in its unfolding of this slice of suburban life. Once it is over, you
will get an urge to drive through the suburbs of any town in America and try to
take a  peek at what is happening in those family homes.  
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with questions, concerns, or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Gods and Monsters (1998)
I know very little about the late James Whale, except that he was a fine
director and he was very open about his homosexuality. His films also reflected
his way of life, and his need for companionship. These ideas about Whale come
through in the well-acted, if disjointed "Gods and Monsters," a fictional story
of Whale's last days before mysteriously dying in a swimming pool in 1967. 
The exceptional Ian McKellen plays the silver-haired, colorfully attired James
Whale, living in luxury at his house with his harsh housekeeper (played by an
unrecognizable Lynn Redgrave). He's a forgotten movie director who revels in
the glorious Hollywood days of the past, and is immersed in painting and in the
painful memories of serving in the war. 
One day, a new gardener named Clayton (Brendan Fraser) begins working on
Whale's lawn, and Whale immediately becomes transfixed by his physique. He
offers his pool as a welcome respite from work and asks Clayton to pose for his
drawings. Clayton is a dim-witted but kind man who is a little slow to
understand Whale's advances and intentions, even when asked to remove his
shirt. 
"Gods and Monsters" is a smooth piece of entertainment, yet it is
unimaginatively directed by writer-director Bill Condon. Whale's nightmares are
filmed in Gothic blue tones that undermine any sense of real drama or tension
in his own life. There are the silhouetted figures against a night sky (shades
of Whale's own Frankenstein pictures) that say little if anything about the
man. 
The rest of the picture is too stilted and dry; moments that require some sense
of movement are too inert. I admire restraint, but Condon could have framed
certain scenes in more interesting ways. The dinner party is especially
awkward, where Whale reunites with his old-time friends, Boris Karloff and Elsa
Lanchester. The actors who portray these horror legends are convincing, yet we
barely see enough of them. 
Though the filmmaking lacks pizzaz, the performances do not. Ian McKellen is a
remarkable actor and brings such an uncommon blend of sensitivity, wryness,
wit, and nobility to James Whale - thereby evoking the man's own personal
demons. He also brings a delicacy to the man (his looks, gestures, etc.) that
makes us want to watch his every move. At the very least, Condon had the good
sense to feature this titanic actor in nearly every scene. 
Brendan Fraser can't compete with McKellen, but he does bring something to
Clayton that makes us sympathize with him. Still, it is difficult to believe
Fraser as a dumb, hulking man who doesn't catch on to Whale's charms and
subtleties. And Clayton's brief relationship with a waitress (thanklessly
played by Lolita Davidovich) drags the narrative and becomes unnecessary in
context. 
Lynn Redgrave is nutty and uproarious as the housekeeper - a servant to Whale
for almost twenty years. She sees through Whale and resents his routine
advances towards young males. Her reactions to a nearly nude male reporter in
one scene is hilarious to watch, and I liked her comments about "Bride of
Frankenstein": "Your film is not my cup of tea". 
"Gods and Monsters" wants to be a celebration of life and art. This theme,
however, doesn't resonate with the richness or importance of the similar "Love
and Death on Long Island" or "Ed Wood." What one does take away from this movie
is McKellen's delicately sublime, incredibly understated portrayal of the
emotionally ailing James Whale. He shows us that his own monsters were not his
creations. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general comments at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Dr. Strangelove or: How I Learned to Stop Worrying and Love the Bomb (1964)
As cynical satires go, there is nothing as audacious, thought-provoking and 
scary as "Dr. Strangelove," Stanley Kubrick's superb film on what if the 
United States and Russia were involved in an accidental nuclear attack, and 
what if it was the fault of the U.S.
The unstable, loony General Jack D. Ripper (played by the commanding, 
towering presence of Sterling Hayden) is the C.O. of the Burlepson Air Force 
Base who has access to the code that can send an SAC (Strategic Air Command) 
wing on its way to bomb Russia. The general initiates the order to bomb 
Russia, but the irony is that no immediate war is taking place and Russia has 
no intention of bombing the U.S., though they have every intention to 
counterattack with their prodigious Doomsday Machine. This is cause for 
concern at the Pentagon where the President of the U.S. (Peter Sellers) has a 
meeting in the War Room trying to pinpoint why this unplanned attack was 
initiated. The President is joined by an ex-Nazi strategic adviser, Dr. 
Strangelove (again played brilliantly by Peter Sellers), and the stubborn 
General Buck Turgidson (George C. Scott), the head of the Joint Chief of 
Staff, among other officials. General Buck sees no harm in destroying the 
Commies and risking the lives of innocent people whereas Dr. St
rangelove sees a future where mine shafts will have to be utilized to 
accomodate the population before being affected by radiation ("Ten women to 
every man.") In the meantime, the President calmly explains to the Soviet 
Premier that it all boils down to a crazy man who went and "did a funny 
thing."  
"Dr. Strangelove" was released back in 1964 at the height of the Cuban 
Missile Crisis when nuclear missiles were a worlwide threat - a "Fail-Safe" 
error could possibly happen and there is nothing in the film that exaggerates 
that possibility. That is why it was so controversial - the satire in it bit 
everyone loud and clear. In fact, outside of 1983's "Testament," "Dr. 
Strangelove" is one example of what can go wrong in a nuclear crisis and why 
all nuclear weapons should be disarmed. We may be at peace with Russia now 
but back then, the potential for such a disaster was a strong reality (in a 
sense, it could happen today since nuclear weapons still exist).    
The suspense builds and becomes wire-tight in the hands of director Kubrick, 
who helmed the similarly chaotic, suspenseful "The Killing" - both films 
dependent on time as a factor in a crisis. Here, it becomes a chaos for the 
audience since the attack is inevitable unless the code is revealed to recall 
the several nuclear-armed planes. One of them is led by the B-52 pilot, Major 
"King" Kong (Slim Pickens), who reminds his crew that medals and promotions 
will be handed out when all is said and done. Naturally, Kong has his 
reservations about the deliberate attack, but his questioning it is reserved 
in favor of his patriotic duty, even if it means to literally ride on one of 
those bombs himself. 
General Ripper, however, has no intention of revealing the code, especially 
to the British military attache (also played by Sellers), and they have a 
couple of humorous scenes together where Ripper explains that distilled water 
and preservation of bodily fluids is essential in the face of the Russians 
who want to control everything. 
"Dr. Strangelove" is an anti-war, anti-nuclear weapons statement done with 
biting humor and bitter irony, but it is more effective than Sidney Lumet's 
serious "Fail-Safe" because it takes such a no-holds-barred approach with its 
satirical pull. As Kubrick said while writing the film with Terry Southern 
("Candy"), "the things you laugh at most are really the heart of the 
paradoxical postures that make a nuclear war possible." From its phallic 
symbols of B-52 planes to the sexual connotations of Ripper's philosophies 
and General Buck's relationship with his secretary ("Of course, it is not 
just physical") to the hysteria and absurdity in the War Room (a memorable 
set piece), "Dr. Strangelove" pokes fun but remains scarily real - the threat 
and the inevitable doom of nuclear fallout is felt from first frame to last. 
Like Kubrick's  "A Clockwork Orange," you are left unsure whether to laugh or 
to take it seriously. But when you hear Vera Lynn's "We'll Meet Again," you 
can feel Kubrick's pathos of a world at war 
with itself.  
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Flawless (1999)
Robert De Niro never bores me as an actor, and is always trying to make a fresh
cut out of every character he plays. In "Flawless," De Niro plays a paralyzed
cop, and this echoes memories of the mental patient he played in "Awakenings,"
yet surprisingly his role here is overcome by the dazzling Philip Seymour
Hoffman. 
Hoffman plays a drag queen named Rusty, who considers "herself" to be an artist
- a showgirl with dreams of having a sex operation. Rusty is a show-off -
always entertaining any and everyone including a group of drag queens who sing
together loudly at his, or, um, her apartment. This infuriates a cop named Walt
(De Niro) who lives across the courtyard. Walt is an aching homophobe who also
has a low opinion of certain women. When one asks to tango with him, he
replies, "You are a whore. She is a lady." One night, Walt gets a stroke when
he hears a shooting, and is paralyzed on the right side of his body. It does
not take a rocket scientist to know that these two opposites will come together
in some way - how and why is the reason of most of these movies with generic
buddy-buddy formulas exist in the first place. When we think of this formula,
Eddie Murphy and Nick Nolte come to mind in "48 HRS." or De Niro and Charles
Grodin in the fabulous "Midnight Run." I almost want to pair "Flawless" in the
same company, but it is a near-miss. 
In a matter of speaking, the thrust of "Flawless" is the developing
relationship between Rusty and Walt, as Walt reluctantly takes singing lessons
from Rusty to correct his speech impediment. This relationship is often
threatened by a subplot involving a secret stash of money and some gangsters -
somehow, this feels out-of-place and seems to come from another movie entirely.
There are not enough scenes of Walt's inner life, or his relationship with a
tango dancer or with his cop buddies. Director Joel Schumacher obviously has an
affection for Rusty and the circle of drag queens - this may be very personal
terrain for Joel but he never takes it as far as one would hope. Instead, we
get more gangster threats involving stolen money and drug deals that make one
squirm at the screenwriting level. Does a dead parrot and a kidnapped mother
merit any attention in a character study like this one?
What is particularly invigorating about "Flawless" is Philip Seymour Hoffman -
his performance is on par with Terence Stamp's subtle drag queen character in
"Adventures of Priscilla, Queen of the Desert." Hoffman makes the smart choice
of not infusing any of the stereotypical cliches often associated with such a
character - he makes her human and compassionate and appropriately effeminate.
There are some scenes between De Niro and Hoffman, particularly when playing
the piano and singing, that will take your breath away. Hoffman can easily add
this character to his memorable turns in "Boogie Nights" and "Happiness" - this
is an actor I will keep an active watch for the in the future.
De Niro lends another fine character role to his oeuvre - it is a difficult
part to play because he has to play it with a speech impediment (sometimes it
is difficult to comprehend what he is saying). De Niro is essentially second
fiddle to Hoffman, who has the showier part, but his character is too
underdeveloped. The transition from homophobe to a compassionate human being is
less credible than Nicholson's transition in "As Good As It Gets," but at least
De Niro makes Walt touching in his frailness and inexpression.
"Flawless" has its share of flaws - the deletion of the gangster subplot would
have improved things greatly - but it has a certain poignance and there are
delightful zingers along the way, courtesy of Hoffman. And it is Hoffman's
performance that is really flawless - he makes his affinity for Hollywood
starlets very inviting. You feel like singing and dancing along with him.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or
at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Billy Elliot (2000)
To be honest, I approached this movie with a certain dread. The 
advertisements called it: uplifting! Oscar-worthy! Finally, a bloody good 
film about the human soul and the triumph of the human spirit! Well, a bloody 
good film about the human soul is "Taxi Driver" but I know what people want 
from the cinema nowadays. Sentiment and in equal doses with a touch of heavy 
syrup added to make you feel not so much uplifted but weepy. I resent when 
manipulative tearjerkers exist because there is rarely much soul or humanity 
in them. Think of the countless Lifetime TV movies-of-the-week, or for that 
matter, the absurdly awful "The Evening Star," which led us to believe that a 
huge mortality rate equals emotion. Not so. But I digress. "Billy Elliot" 
could have been a contender for most sentimental hogwash of the year but it 
is not: it is a humane, positively uplifting film guaranteed to at least 
place a smile on your face. 
Billy Elliot (the extraordinary Jamie Bell) is a young boy living in the poor 
section of Northern England with his tough-as-nails father, Jackie (Gary 
Lewis), and Billy's older, rougher brother, Tony (Jamie Draven). Billy takes 
care of his grandmother, who also lives with him, while his father and 
brother are mining strikers. This means they are unemployed at the moment, 
and the last thing they need to hear is that Billy is thinking of becoming a 
ballet dancer!
But the macho ethic of Jackie and Tony does not allow for fairies or swans, 
so to speak. Billy actually takes up boxing but lacks the drive and the 
attitude. One day, he observes a ballet class taking place in the same 
gymnasium where he boxes. Billy is transfixed and decides to learn ballet. 
Why? Even he doesn't know but it does bring some energy and enthusiasm to the 
kid - he feels alive when he dances. The gum-chewing teacher (Julie Walters) 
instructs the boy, despite stern objections from Jackie and Tony. Billy loves 
ballet and the movement of the body swaying to the strains of Tchaikovsky's 
"Swan Ballet" - it is definitely an escape for the boy from the horrors at 
home. The teacher is so impressed with the boy that she tells him to audition 
for the Royal Ballet School in London. 
"Billy Elliot" is essentially the well-traveled road about a kid from a poor 
town who plans to make a difference by following his dreams. The tale is 
nothing new but of course, what matters is how it is told. What remains 
questionable is the amount of time invested in Jackie and Tony's lives, which 
breaks the tension and charisma of watching Billy practice his ballet. Jackie 
and Tony are grim-faced strikers, and they are fed up with life and all it 
has to offer - Jackie is also widowed. This no doubt affects Billy, but the 
movie follows the formula to the hilt without ever following its heart. Sure, 
Jackie is disapproving of his son's artistic intentions but he comes around. 
He has a change of heart and becomes a scab, choosing to go to work to 
support his son's travel expenses to London. The gritty realism we are given 
about a father torn by his love for his long-lost wife and by his desire to 
not work doesn't wash, nor does Tony's sudden change-of-heart (if I am not 
mistaken, he even wears an apron in one scene!) These plot changes do not 
qualify as spoilers because if you've seen "Rocky" or "Flashdance," you've 
seen this same tale woven by many. 
What does wash are the beautifully choreographed ballet scenes - this Jamie 
Bell is one hell of a dancer, and a fine actor to boot (Haley Joel Osment, 
watch out!) He is charismatic, soulful, determined, enthusiastic, and a 
fighter - he will not quit until he gets those dance moves right. It is sheer 
bliss to watch any scene with Bell, and his moments with Julie Walters are 
awe-inspiring (not as good though as the similar tale with Shirley MacLaine 
in "Madame Sousatzka"). There also some wonderful scenes between Billy and 
his best friend, Michael (Stuart Wells), who wears his mother's clothes. I 
also like the tender scenes between Billy and the teacher's daughter (Nicola 
Blackwell). But whenever the film dwells on the mine strike, it is as if we 
were watching another film entirely. One has the grit and the other has the 
fantasy, and the two do not mesh evenly. 
"Billy Elliot" doesn't succumb to the overt sentimentality of typical 
Hollywood fare by reminding us when to weep. It builds on the charismatic 
Jamie Bell, who uplifts us in spite of the cliches and uneven subplot 
surrounding him. He reminds us of how we can follow our dreams wherever they 
take us.  
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Dogma (1999)
"Dogma" is unashamedly a pointless, crude comedy attempting to justify its
existence with writer-director Kevin Smith's dogmatic principles. Knowing the
controversy over the its portrait of catholicism and its ideals, I found
nothing offensive or demeaning or needlessly cruel about "Dogma." At the same
time, that is precisely its problem. 
"Dogma" begins with two Wisconsin angels named Bartleby and Loki (Ben Affleck
and Matt Damon) as they watch people arriving at an airport, noticing how many
of them arrive happy and content. The twosome are stuck in exile, and thus
lavish a plan to make their mark at a church in New Jersey, which has adopted a
new way of looking at God - it is called "Catholicism NOW!" with a statue of
Jesus winking and holding his thumb up.  Their hope is to reclaim their spot as
God's avenging angels, thus causing havoc and murderous rampages on their quest
- they kill all the sinners of the world. So far, so good. This stuff is funny,
clever and smart - pure vintage Smith.
Unfortunately, the movie then switches gears as it introduces a lonely abortion
clinic worker named Bethany (Linda Fiorentino) who has lost her faith, or
perhaps her faith in men! Enter a pale-looking seraphim (the droll Alan
Rickman) who convinces her she is the chosen one - she must stop the angels on
their trek to New Jersey. The two prophets who will accompany her are regular
stock characters Jay and Silent Bob (Jason Mewes and Kevin Smith), the crude,
sex-starved stoners with nary a thought in their heads. Oh, yes, and out of the
sky falls the forgotten 13th apostle named Rufus (Chris Rock) - he was left out
of the Bible because he was black. "Jesus owes me twelve dollars," argues
Rufus.
I will say that Kevin Smith has some good ideas and juggles dozens of
characters around with some ease...but the tone is all wrong. Quite simply, the
staging and pacing of the film is as flat as the Kansas plains. There are jokes
but there are no real punchlines  - there is no conviction in the delivery of
dialogue. The acting is mostly stale and shoddy, not to mention the film's
cruddy, muddy look. Kevin Smith has never been known for visual flair because
his dialogue often saved the day - not this time. I think Linda Fiorentino is
the key to the film's faults. 
Fiorentino, an invigoratingly sexy and alluring actress, is given precious
little to do - her character exists solely for the purpose of salvation. By the
end of the film, you will wonder what was her real purpose. During Fiorentino's
first appearance, Janeane Garofalo makes a choice cameo as her fellow worker
and there is more wit and dry asides in her brief scene than in all of Linda's
scenes put together. I would have preferred Garofalo as Bethany any day.
However, every scene featuring Fiorentino is weak and drags the film downhill.
A real shame considering this is the same actress from "After Hours" and "The
Last Seduction."
Another big minus are the two avenging angels played by Damon and Affleck, two
actors of dubious talent at best. To be fair, I've enjoyed Ben Affleck in the
past but here, he takes himself too seriously resulting in a ludicrously
blood-drenched climax where he dons a pair of wings and initiates a massacre.
Matt Damon has the same blank stare throughout the film, and has no sense of
comic timing. His personality is nonexistent, merely a bland, bickering angel
attempting to make us laugh with his annoying wisecracks. He might better off
writing another film with his pal Affleck. 
Most of the film is full of bickering and theological discussions on the
virtues of faith in a faithless world, but hardly any of it is funny or
engaging. Though there are some shining moments of glory supplied by Chris
Rock, George Carlin (as a hip Cardinal), and the reliable Jay and Silent Bob,
there are also soporific moments by Jason Lee as a demon, Bud Cort in a
relatively mute role, Salma Hayek as Serendipity, a muse, a purely grotesque
monster called Golgotha, and three anonymous ice hockey minions of the devil
who barely cause a rift. None of this merits anything more than a mild chuckle
or two. By the end of this interminable stupidity, the shaky dogmatic
principles outweigh the comedic output.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with questions, concerns or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at
Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Brave, The (1997)
Johnny Depp's directorial debut hardly caused much of a rift when shown at the Cannes Film Festival in 1997 and briefly at a film festival in Taos, New Mexico. Basically, it was cooly received. Ostensibly a snuff melodrama, "The Brave" is far more than that, and this elegantly snail-paced drama may not win any new Depp fans but those that appreciate this kind of Jim Jarmusch-style may want to check it out. 
Depp not only directs but also stars as Raphael, an American Indian living in a depressing, garbage dump area with his wife and two kids. He is unemployed and a drunk, having missed out on most of his kids' childhood . Trying to set himself straight, he decides to work at a job that pays $50,000 plus a cash advance. The catch is he will be murdered for the money, though how is not exactly clear. For a snuff film production? We are never sure and the film never makes it clear (the word snuff is never actually uttered). And why would Raphael go through with such a plan to support his family? How brave a man is he really? 
"The Brave" works on a more fundamental level - it makes us see how Raphael changes his disorderly ways with his family once he gets his advance. He buys a crudely arranged playground, a big-screen TV, and new clothes for his kids and his wife, who is at first dismayed by his sudden wealth. We are not sure of Raphael's intentions - will he actually go through with this literally dead-end job? Will he consider the consequences? And what about his pseudo partner, a local thug (Luis Guzman, of all people) who wants to share in Raphael's wealth? 
"The Brave" merely rests on Depp's shoulders, and as fascinating and watchable an actor as he is, I felt the character was far too thinly drawn. What possessed Raphael to take such an opportunity? Depp never brings us any real insight or depth to the character - we just see that his mind is at work and we observe the changes he starts to make, but to what end? Did he ever consider that his life is worth more than 50 G's? 
"The Brave" has some strange characters such as the father-son junkmen (Frederic Forrest, Max Perlich) who are trying to drill a hole through the ground to get oil, Clarence Williams III as the concerned priest, Marlon Brando in a short cameo as a wheelchaired boss of Raphael who explains the meaning of death, and a throwaway cameo by Iggy Pop who attends Raphael's big fiesta for the poverty-stricken community. Finally, there are scenes in a bar populated by geeks and freaks that seemed to have stepped off the set of Lynch's "Wild at Heart." 
Beautifully photographed and generally decently acted, "The Brave" is nothing if not a fluffy time-waster. Its haunting ending, however, will leave you thinking for days as to the nature of Raphael's purpose in getting himself killed. Perhaps he is not as brave as he thought he was. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Making 'The Shining' (1980) (TV)
Stanley Kubrick is one of the great enigmatic directors of the 20th
century. Who was this genius that produced such masterfully realized
works of art such as "2001: A Space Odyssey," "A Clockwork Orange," or
"Barry Lyndon"? This rarely seen documentary, shot by Kubrick's
daughter, Vivian, documents some of the events of shooting the uneven,
controversial horror flick "The Shining." It may not shed much light
on the legendary director, but it does offer a glimpse of what he was
like behind the scenes.
The beginning of the documentary (now on the video and DVD re-released
versions of "The Shining") plays like a home movie with Vivian
following Jack Nicholson into the bathroom while he brushes his
teeth. We see Jack prepping himself for a scene where, as Jack
Torrance, he tears through a door with an axe, pursuing his family,
and taunting them with quotes from "Three Little Pigs." Then there is
Kubrick, wearing a winter jacket, yelling cut during a scene where
Danny (Danny Lloyd) hides inside a compartment from maniacal Jack. To
me, it was a pleasure to hear this man speak with an ever-so-slight
English accent (hardly a trace of his Bronx roots).
There are strong revelations for what must have been an arduous, long
shoot for a horror movie. There is the sense that Kubrick is
tough-as-nails on Shelley Duvall, always taunting her and acting
totally unsympathetic to her mood swings (at one point, she pulls out
strands of hair, showing them to Stanley whose only response is, "I
have no sympathy for Shelley.") There is one tense scene where Shelley
misses her cue when they yell action during a faux snowstorm scene and
Stanley races frantically and argues with her vehemently.
Kubrick is apparently respectful of Jack and only suggests he acts
wilder and meaner (I have heard reports of Jack being used for
lighting tests when in fact a stand-in is ordinarily used). A scene
shows Kubrick's mother seated at a table with Stanley and Jack as they
discuss the constant script revisions from day to day. Naturally,
Shelley is nowhere to be found. She does freely admit that she admired
him for his tenacity and perfectionism, claiming to have learned more
from him than from any other prior film production. Meanwhile, Jack
concludes that working with Stanley is exciting for him as an actor
because the director has his own agenda for making personal films,
even if Jack does not always agree with him.
There are also brief, pointed interviews with Scatman Crothers (who of
course played Halloran, the cook), shown weeping for joy as he
mentions how beautiful the crew was to work with and how he saw Danny
as his own child, and the tyke Danny Lloyd who mentions how he is
smart and likes to make home movies with his less-than-receptive
friends. Kubrick himself is not interviewed but it is fun to see him
at work, especially when he devises a low-angle shot of Jack to
enhance the tension of the scene where Jack tries to con Shelley into
letting him out of a storage room.
"Making 'The Shining'" could have been longer and shed more light on
the master director at work, but it is a fitting, exemplary
documentary of a man whose impeccable sense of craft and direction
exemplified his status as one of America's leading cinematic
artists. Essential viewing for any film buff or aficionado of Kubrick.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Bringing Out the Dead (1999)
It has been more than two decades since the world has witnessed the
frighteningly prophetic "Taxi Driver" and its vision of a hellish New York
courtesy of director Martin Scorsese and writer Paul Schrader. Now Scorsese and
Schrader revisit those same mean streets to tell us they are just as mean and
almost as hellish. "Bringing Out the Dead" is the latest in the sin, guilt,
redemption and paranoia of the gritty side of Scorsese's New York and its
inhabitants, but the approach is less lean and more listless. Still, it is
often strangely compelling.
The almost gaunt-like Nicolas Cage stars as Frank Pierce, an exhausted
ambulance paramedic who mostly works nights. He has not saved a life in months,
and is starting to feel weary and sleepless - he cannot function in this crazed
city anymore (this story is set in pre-Guiliani New York). Frank sees visions
of an asthmatic girl he could not save in the past - he feels he has killed her
and sees her in the faces of others walking the streets. 
Frank is haunted by these visions, and resorts to drinking gin and eating junk
food on the job. He works with three different medics. One is a detached,
overweight slob, Larry (John Goodman), the other is a Motown-Biblical-preaching
individual named Marcus (Ving Rhames) who flirts with dispatchers and is high
on saving lives, and lastly there's a vicious medic, Tom Walls (Tom Sizemore)
who uses a baseball bat on drug dealers and lives on "the blood spilling on the
streets." 
There is one life he almost saves, an elderly man who nearly dies of a heart
attack. The grieving daughter, Mary Burke (Patricia Arquette), an ex-junkie,
seeks consolation from Frank and hopes that her father will stay alive. This is
the kind of news Frank wants to hear - the blood, the loss of lives (including
a stillborn baby), the stench, the homeless are all reducing Frank to the level
of a saint who lost his powers of healing. As Frank explains, "I was a grief
mop." He can't even get fired from his job because he is needed, even in the
midst of failure. 
"Bringing Out the Dead" is based on an autobiographical book by Joseph Connelly
(a former medic), and the film's episodic structure focuses on three hellish
nights in Frank's life. As always, director Martin Scorsese knows these mean
streets all too well and with cinematographer Robert Richardson, they create a
New York of neon lights, red flashing sirens, sordid, shadowy  environments
such as unsanitized underground dwellings, punkish nightclubs, inviting drug
dens, crazed, overcrowded hospital rooms, etc. In other words, this New York is
not so different from the one depicted in Scorsese's finest film, "Taxi
Driver." But whereas one felt that the New York of Travis Bickle's was an
extension of his own paranoia, this New York feels strangely remote and bland,
much like the title character. 
Nicolas Cage turns in a mostly flat, restrained performance, bereft of any
emotion or significance. Sure, his eyes give the impression of being haunted
but there is little to suggest a sense of individuality. Who is Frank Pierce
anyway? Why does he cling to a job in desperation of saving lives when he needs
to save his own? These are all complex questions but Cage's dignified stare in
two hours running time will make the viewer wish Robert De Niro had been cast.
Cage has some loopy moments with Rhames but not enough to make the character
three-dimensional and introspective. 
I liked Patricia Arquette's performance as the frail Mary and her soft-voiced,
angelic presence that seems almost magical in quality  - her performance is
marginally more interesting than Cage's. There is a moment when Scorsese and
editor Thelma Schoonmaker exchange a series of dissolves between Arquette and
Cage that establishes a connection between them. I also like the final image of
Cage's head resting on Arquette's shoulder while a shade of white fills up the
screen in a reverential manner. 
The best performances are by Ving Rhames, John Goodman and Tom Sizemore as the
fellow medics with different takes on what a job like this entails. Goodman is
credibly detached, Rhames is delightfully sweet and uplifting especially when
he fakes raising a punk rocker from the dead, and Sizemore is creepy and
nervously tense giving us goosebumps each time he appears. 
Other honorable mentions must go to real-life singer Marc Anthony as a
Rastafarian drifter who drinks too much water, New Zealander Cliff Curtis as a
suave, smoothly serene drug dealer (recalling Harvey Keitel's lizard-like
smoothness in "Taxi Driver"), Mary Beth Hurt as a stern, honest hospital
worker, Arthur J. Nascarella as Captain Barney, Frank's boss, and Aida Turturro
as a nurse. 
Scorsese also has employed new techniques in film grammar, which are more often
seen in Oliver Stone's films. The fast-motion, stroboscopic, neon-lit sequences
recall "Natural Born Killers," a technique Scorsese has never used before. It
is no accident that the fast and loose cinematographer is Robert Richardson,
who has lensed many of Stone's films. 
There is a lot to admire in "Bringing Out the Dead," but not much to savor. It
is a curiously flat, messy film with more lows than highs. Cage often fails to
bring the movie out of its dead spots. Still, moments like the impaling of the
drug dealer or Rhames's brief interludes with dispatchers and Cage evoke a
power unprecendented in any film seen this year. "Bringing Out the Dead" is the
kind of Scorsese film that makes you want to go and see a truly passionate
Scorsese film that comes from the gut. Here, he feels like he is cavorting in
shallow waters. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
If you have any questions, complaints or general comments, e-mail me at
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for House on Haunted Hill (1958)
After recently watching William Castle's spooky, funny classic "House on
Haunted Hill," one is instantly reminded of the innocence that existed in
horror films of the past. Director William Castle pushed for publicity and got
it by promoting wild gimmicks in theatres. In the case with this film, a
plastic skeleton would emerge from above the screen and terrorize the audience
- the gimmick was known as "Emergo." Kids would toss popcorn at the skeleton
but Castle's brilliance was in attracting an audience and he did. "House on
Haunted Hill" does not need such external effects because it does succeed on
its own merits. 
This quaint horror item stars the benelovent Vincent Price as Frederick Loren,
a millionaire who invites a group of selected guests to stay at a haunted house
for one night for $10,000 - the trick is to spend an entire night in the house.
Unfortunately, once the servants leave at midnight, there is no way to leave
the house, no electricity (candles are in abundance) and the phone line is
dead. 
The guests include Elisha Cook Jr. (the Steve Buscemi of his day) as Watson
Pritchard, a believer in ghosts who has a disturbing family history in the
dreaded house, Carolyn Craig as Nora Manning, a secretary who needs the money
to support her family, Richard Long as a suave, brave pilot who thrives on big
thrills, Julie Mitchum as a gossip columnist aiming to pay back some gambling
debts, and Dr. David Trent (Alan Marshal), who uses the opportunity to do a
study on hysteria. And the coup de resistance is not a walking skeleton but a
lovely, duplicitous blonde, Mr. Loren's young wife (Carol Ohmart) - afraid that
her husband will poison her as he has the former wives. 
The movie begins with lots of wicked, black humor touches such as the hearses
that arrive in unison at the house, the delicacy of Price's line readings when
offering booze to the curious guests and explaining the strategy of the long
evening, the chandelier crashing down on some guests while Price looks on with
amusement, the first conversation between Price and Ohmart as they talk about
poison, death and jealousy, and so on. 
The first half of "House on Haunted Hill" is chock full of moody atmosphere and
shock effects, some of it surpassing even 1963's "The Haunting." After a while,
director Castle can't resist the obligatory "who's there?" routine and the
seemingly ghostly, floating apparitions appearing outside windows and darkly
lit rooms. Oh, and there is an awful lot of screaming courtesy of Nora (a
whiner if I ever knew one, and why does nobody ever hear her in the entire
movie?). There is also a surprise ending that is more anticlimactic and
illogical given the numerous plot holes preceding it. For instance, what is the
deal with the caretakers? Why is one blind woman who seemed to be a ghost
involved in scaring the bejesus out of everyone? Was she part of some master
plan? And how does one keep a vat of acid in a basement for so long?
Of course, I am nitpicking a movie that should not be picked out for logic or
narrative cohesion, nor is director Castle the kind of man to care as long as
people are entertained (imagine what he might have done with "Rosemary's Baby"
if Polanski was not hired to direct). If you want an innocent, good old time at
the movies with some spooks and occasional scares and the pleasing presence of
the reliable Vincent Price, then by all means go and enjoy. If you are
expecting the seriousness and chilling air of "The Haunting," look elsewhere.  
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail with any questions, complaints or general comments at
jerry@movieluver.com or at FGaust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Billy Elliot (2000)
To be honest, I approached this movie with a certain dread. The 
advertisements called it: uplifting! Oscar-worthy! Finally, a bloody good 
film about the human soul and the triumph of the human spirit! Well, a bloody 
good film about the human soul is "Taxi Driver" but I know what people want 
from the cinema nowadays. Sentiment and in equal doses with a touch of heavy 
syrup added to make you feel not so much uplifted but weepy. I resent when 
manipulative tearjerkers exist because there is rarely much soul or humanity 
in them. Think of the countless Lifetime TV movies-of-the-week, or for that 
matter, the absurdly awful "The Evening Star," which led us to believe that a 
huge mortality rate equals emotion. Not so. But I digress. "Billy Elliot" 
could have been a contender for most sentimental hogwash of the year but it 
is not: it is a humane, positively uplifting film guaranteed to at least 
place a smile on your face. 
Billy Elliot (the extraordinary Jamie Bell) is a young boy living in the poor 
section of Northern England with his tough-as-nails father, Jackie (Gary 
Lewis), and Billy's older, rougher brother, Tony (Jamie Draven). Billy takes 
care of his grandmother, who also lives with him, while his father and 
brother act as scabs - they protest the town's ongoing mine strike. This 
means they are unemployed at the moment, and the last thing they need to hear 
is that Billy is thinking of becoming a ballet dancer!
But the macho ethic of Jackie and Tony does not allow for fairies or swans, 
so to speak. Billy actually takes up boxing but lacks the drive and the 
attitude. One day, he observes a ballet class taking place in the same 
gymnasium where he boxes. Billy is transfixed and decides to learn ballet. 
Why? Even he doesn't know but it does bring some energy and enthusiasm to the 
kid - he feels alive when he dances. The gum-chewing teacher (Julie Walters) 
instructs the boy, despite stern objections from Jackie and Tony. Billy loves 
ballet and the movement of the body swaying to the strains of Tchaikovsky's 
"Swan Ballet" - it is definitely an escape for the boy from the horrors at 
home. The teacher is so impressed with the boy that she tells him to audition 
for the Royal Ballet School in London. 
"Billy Elliot" is essentially the well-traveled road about a kid from a poor 
town who plans to make a difference by following his dreams. The tale is 
nothing new but of course, what matters is how it is told. What remains 
questionable is the amount of time invested in Jackie and Tony's lives, which 
breaks the tension and charisma of watching Billy practice his ballet. Jackie 
and Tony are scabs, and they are fed up with life and all it has to offer - 
Jackie is also widowed. This no doubt affects Billy, but the movie follows 
the formula to the hilt without ever following its heart. Sure, Jackie is 
disapproving of his son's artistic intentions but he comes around. As a scab, 
he chooses to go to work to support his son's travel expenses to London. The 
gritty realism we are given about a father torn by his love for his long-lost 
wife and by his desire to not work doesn't wash, nor does Tony's sudden 
change-of-heart (if I am not mistaken, he even wears an apron in one scene!) 
These plot changes do not qualify as spoilers because if you've seen "Rocky" 
or "Flashdance," you've seen this same tale woven by many. 
What does wash are the beautifully choreographed ballet scenes - this Jamie 
Bell is one hell of a dancer, and a fine actor to boot (Haley Joel Osment, 
watch out!) He is charismatic, soulful, determined, enthusiastic, and a 
fighter - he will not quit until he gets those dance moves right. It is sheer 
bliss to watch any scene with Bell, and his moments with Julie Walters are 
awe-inspiring (not as good though as the similar tale with Shirley MacLaine 
in "Madame Sousatzka"). There also some wonderful scenes between Billy and 
his best friend, Michael (Stuart Wells), who wears his mother's clothes. I 
also like the tender scenes between Billy and the teacher's daughter (Nicola 
Blackwell). But whenever the film dwells on the mine strike, it is as if we 
were watching another film entirely. One has the grit and the other has the 
fantasy, and the two do not mesh evenly. 
"Billy Elliot" doesn't succumb to the overt sentimentality of typical 
Hollywood fare by reminding us when to weep. It builds on the charismatic 
Jamie Bell, who uplifts us in spite of the cliches and uneven subplot 
surrounding him. He reminds us of how we can follow our dreams wherever they 
take us.  
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Mummy, The (1999)
The trouble with remakes is that unless you have not seen their forefathers,
you will think you are witnessing cinematic artistry at its lowest. I cannot
advise someone retouching a classic, understated horror classic like "The
Mummy" (1932) which starred the incomparable Boris Karloff, or one of its best
remakes with Christopher Lee in 1959. This overheated, 90's version of the
Mummy attempts to throw everything into the mix including the kitchen sink. As
a result, it sacrifices its original storyline entirely, and what we have is a
Mummy for the Indiana Jones mindset - one of the film's many unforgiving
faults. 
The film begins promisingly with the Egyptian prince, ImHoTep, punished for
having an adulterous affair with the pharaoh's daughter. His tongue is cut, and
he is consequently buried in bandages in a tomb full of scrappy, ugly scarabs
(beetle-like bugs). We flash forward thousands of years later where ImHoTep's
tomb is uncovered by a team of explorers seeking the Book of the Dead (If I
recall correctly, there is more than one version in the catacombs!). One of the
explorers is an ambitious Egyptologist (Rachel Weiz), who has trouble
preventing bookcases from toppling at the Museum of Antiquities!
Once the Book of Dead is discovered and the forbidden sayings are uttered, all
hell breaks loose as ImHoTep rises from the dead and slowly regenerates his
human form. His objective is to bring back his beloved from the dead after
commanding all the thunderstorms and sandstorms in his wrath - all in the name
of love. 
"The Mummy" tries to be a fusion of Indiana Jones and horror cliches, and
attempts to tell a tragic love story as well. None work or blend easily. For
one, casting Brendan Fraser as a bland, stock Indiana Jones hero who's barely
shocked or scared by the Mummy is not wise - he does not have the integrity or
fierceness of Harrison Ford. Rachel Weiz is too cute and shrilly as the female
lead - she is more appropriate for a screwball comedy than a film of this type.
Arnold Vosoloo is the mean Egyptian mummy but his cold smile and angry eyes
are overshadowed by the whirlwind special-effects - this mummy does not even
wear bandages! He just evaporates and blows like a twister from one place to
another. Where is the sense of menace and succinct body language of Boris
Karloff? Whatever sense of loss emanated from ImHoTep's love affair is trampled
by an exceeding number of special-effects and histrionic action sequences. But
wait a doggone minute: Is this a horror film or an action picture?
"The Mummy" is a mindless blockbuster...but there are no delicious quips, no
sense of adventure, and no peril. Some of it may be considered serviceable fun
for young minds and there are some spellbinding sequences (the face-like
formations on the sand are fabulous). But it's a joyless enterprise - more of a
promo for extraordinary digital special-effects like "The Matrix" than a movie.
All you'll receive from this parched Mummy is a headache.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 

Title
Review for Boys and Girls (2000)
"Boys and Girls" is the kind of teen movie that has been done repeatedly to 
death - boy finds girl, boy becomes best friends with girl, boy finds new 
girl, girl finds new boy, original boy and girl have sex, boy and girl see 
mistake in this, boy and girl decide to be together, etc. If it were not for 
the entertaining, credible performances by the leads, I would have said: skip 
this! 
Freddie Prinze, Jr. is Ryan Walker, a nerdy, high-school whiz with prospects 
of majoring in structural engineering. Claire Forlani is Jennifer Burrows, a 
bright girl who aspires to major in Latin and then go to Italy for graduate 
studies. Ryan doesn't like to be called dumb and doesn't go out much. 
Jennifer does not believe in commitment, and uses Latin phrases constantly. 
There is no reason in the world for Ryan and Jennifer to be together, but 
they keep running into each other every few years before finally becoming 
best friends in college. 
Ryan's college roomate is Hunter aka Steve (Jason Biggs), a foolhardy court 
jester whose idea of humor is to stay locked inside a trunk and surprise 
people. He has trouble finding girls, no doubt due to his repeatedly dyed 
hair. Jennifer's college roomate is Amy (Amanda Detmer), who grows jealous of 
Jennifer's friendship with Ryan since Amy had dated him. Amy also sees a 
psychiatrist. 
Okay, so how could I possibly like this film at all, you may ask. It is after 
all the tired cliche of how friends of the opposite sex can't be friends if 
they have sex - the critics were right in calling this a junior league "When 
Harry Met Sally." Of course, and I am not sure I would call this a spoiler 
alert, they do stay together as more than just friends. But what if they 
didn't? What if director Robert Iscove (who helmed the atrocious "She's All 
That") chose a different path? What if the filmmakers proceeded along 
uncharted territory, along the lines of the penultimate twist that occurs in 
the film between Jennifer and Amy? Unfortunately, that twist is settled in an 
awkward dialogue exchange that is too safe a solution to inspire much drama. 
Still, how could I like this film? Well, much to my surprise, I found genuine 
chemistry between Prinze and Forlani. Freddie Prinze may be a hottie to 
teenage girls of today but he strikes me as being so mild-mannered as to make 
Clark Kent jealous. Yet in "Boys and Girls," he comes alive thanks to his 
rapport with Forlani and especially Hunter. Not casting Rachael Leigh Cook in 
this film was beneficial indeed. 
Forlani has not interested me in her choice of movies lately but she does 
well here, exuding radiance and true beauty as she did in "The Last Time I 
Committed Suicide" and "Basquiat." Another plus is that she does not look 
like Ally McBeal and there is something to be said for that. 
As for Jason Biggs, well, he is on his way to major movie stardom if he wants 
it. He had a great lead performance in "American Pie," and here, he delivers 
his one-liners with enough energy and subtlety to rival even Ben Stiller. He 
is such a comic force that I wish there were more of him (though we get a 
further glimpse during the end credits).
"Boys and Girls" is virtually free of all the current trends in teenage fare 
- there are no sexually scatalogical jokes, no gross-out humor, and hardly 
anything too juvenile. The film is often sensitive and emotionally true, 
though there are some melodramatic lulls at the end. Nonetheless, "Boys and 
Girls" is sweet, innocent fun that makes you wish it were so much more. 
Note: In this age of postmodernism, "Boys and Girls" does feature a scene 
where the lead characters enter a movie theatre showing "Sixteen Candles" and 
"The Breakfast Club," which this film resembles in both cases.
For more reviews, visit JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com 
or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Road Scholar (1993)
Time and again, someone tries to discover America and its nether regions, 
hoping to make the definitive cultural statement about this country. The 
problem is that no one can make the definitive statement when America 
continually grows from one year to the next. Even the state I live in, New 
Jersey, is full of stories and historical backgrounds, going back several 
decades and centuries (read the cult magazine "Weird N.J." for a better 
perspective). The narrator of the film "Road Scholar" even states how times 
have changed in America in the last twenty years. "Now Spanish is spoken as 
much as English," the narrator observes. 
The narrator is Andrei Codrescu, a Romanian-born Jew who became an American 
citizen in 1981. He is best known as an NPR commentator for the program, "All 
Things Considered," and is a well-known poet. He is witty, urbane, sarcastic, 
and shrewd. Andrei uses his satiric prose and poetic sensibilities to come up 
with his own interpretation of America by way of a cross-country road trip. 
He gets a driver's license, and is off in a cherry-red '68 Cadillac 
convertible to explore America. Andrei comes up against a community of 
Christian Communists in upstate New York, accustomed to poverty on the 
margins despite a profitable business; New Age mysticism, religious militant 
groups and Native American habitats in New Mexico; the virtually empty, 
economically ravaged city of Detroit; homeless, crack-addicted Haitian 
immigrants in New York City; last-minute marriages in Las Vegas (including 
drive-thru marriages!); a Vietnamese author in San Francisco who is aching to 
go back to his homeland; an artist who lawfully places a car in her lawn 
proclaiming it as a piece of art; and so on. 
"Road Scholar" has enormous fun in arriving at these different locales and 
points of interest in America, and it is continuously absorbing in 
investigating different patterns of life. My major complaint is that certain 
vignettes could have benefited from more screen time, such as the Detroit 
artists who place shoes and sneakers on the streets as a reminder of people 
who once populated a sparsely populated, poor neighborhood. There is also too 
much time invested on New Mexico mystics and healers - I used to live in 
Santa Fe and have had enough exposure to them. They are pure "kitsch," as 
Codrescu often refers to certain aspects of life or to the Statue of Liberty. 
Other moments show the loss of innocence in America, as in the traveling bus 
of peace-loving denizens who want to bring back the 60's free love ideals and 
such without benefit of drugs. I also found a strangely melancholic passage 
in the depiction of lost dreams in Detroit. One example is the movement of 
Motown sound from Detroit to the big leagues and how it affected an entire 
community who felt the music was theirs. In fact, the Detroit section of the 
film is the most astute as one gathers understanding of how America can let 
go of one of their cities in times of economic hardships. 
If this were just an ordinary documentary about America in the 90's, it would 
have worked just fine with its look at people of different nationalities. 
Alas, using Andre as a witty commentator on the scene enlivens the 
proceedings enormously - he is sometimes sardonic but he also identifies with 
most of the people, particularly the immigrants who came to this country in 
hopes of fulfilling their dreams. Some did, and many did not. Andre became a 
poet and wrote books, and was allowed to have the power of freethinking 
without getting arrested. His story is just as insightful, and proves just as 
entertaining. He also recognizes, as reminded to him by the late poet Allen 
Ginsberg, that America is "an Indian thing." For a relatively fast-paced, 
inspirational tour of America, you can do no better than "Road Scholar." 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Omega Code, The (1999)
"The Omega Code" gets my vote for one of the best, cheeriest comedies ever 
made. It is often so damn funny that I could not hold back my laughter - a 
deliberate hark back to the kind of spoof that Mel Brooks used to make. 
The film stars Casper Van Dien as Dr. Gillen Lane, a mythology guru who 
believes he has unlocked the secrets of the Bible Code that tells of 
prophecies, past and future. Yes, these codes foretold of Princess Diana's 
demise not to mention the assassination of Kennedy, and so on. I wonder if 
any mention was made of the rape of the Central Park jogger back in the 
1980's, or the recent Colombine massacre, or how about the Oklahoma bombing. 
But never mind, obviously, it dictates events among the rich and famous only. 
Enter the wealthy businessman, Stone Alexander (Michael York), who wants to 
rule the world and needs to find the key to the ancient city of Jerusalem - 
he just needs the good doctor to unlock the remaining bible codes to 
determine the future. Or something like that. And what can we make of the two 
prophets, who appear and disappear at will? And will the overworked Dr. Lane 
fix his marriage to the sweet, lonesome Jennifer (Devon Odessa)? And is 
Alexander's trusted emissary, Dominic (Michael Ironside), intent on 
double-crossing his boss? 
Okay, so "The Omega Code" is not a comedy, it is a timely biblical thriller 
that is too unintentionally funny to really score on a dramatic level. I knew 
the movie would not work as soon as Casper Van Dien's overacting began when 
he explains on a talk show, with his motivational speaking skills intact, the 
veracity of the Bible Codes. Amazingly, no one in this film questions whether 
such codes exist. Of course, there is controversy over such codes in today's 
world but wouldn't we be more interested in what those codes say about our 
future rather than the accidental death of Princess Diana? 
"The Omega Code" is not humorous enough on a good bad movie scale to sit 
through, and hardly thrilling for one second. It is preposterous and dull 
with garden-variety special-effects that are equalled on the level of the 
defunct "Mystery Science Theatre 3000" show. The film also has the kind of 
hammy performances that would have delighted the "MST" crowd. The funniest 
thing about this movie is that it was financed by the Trinity Broadcasting 
Network - such funding should have been used for more worthwile endeavors. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for American Psycho (2000)
Patrick Bateman is not your typical serial killer. He is obsessed with
consumerism, and has an affinity for music by Huey Lewis and the News and
Whitney Houston, not to mention Phil Collins. He also happens to work at a firm
in Wall Street. Patrick is a handsome, young man who is ruthless and arrogant -
a yuppie who just happens to love killing people.
I was initially miffed to hear that Christian Bale was going to play the title
role, but then I guess I had forgotten his smugness and arrogance in the
wonderful "Little Women." Bale is the perfect choice because he encompasses the
soulless, excessive period of the 1980's integral to the character of Patrick
Bateman better than any other actor would have.
Bateman's life is not all that exciting. He works in merger and acquistions
(which is slyly referred to as "murders and executions"), though we mostly see
him listening to his walkman in his office. He has a pretty secretary (Chloe
Sevigny) and has a group of friends whose main concern is where they will be
eating dinner and if there are reservations available at any one of the top
restaurants. Bateman's day begins by applying several lotions and creams to his
body while taking a shower, working out by doing a thousand push-ups a day, and
in general, planning his evening with his dates, including a socialite
girlfriend (Reese Witherspoon). Sometimes Patrick picks up some prostitutes and
then kills and dismembers them. Other times he will kill someone he knows, such
as an ex-girlfriend or a rival co-worker (who has mistaken him for someone
else) by using an ax or a nail gun. But who is Bateman really? Is he so devoid
of identity that murder is all he needs to bring spice to his life? Or has he
lost his soul and thinks that his identity is defined by his consumerist
ideals, or the specific type of business card he carries?
I have read the controversial, infamous book by Bret Easton Ellis, though I am
fuzzy on recalling certain details. Naturally, the big shocker of the book was
the relentless, graphic violence against women - how they were dismembered and,
well, you get the idea. For about the first hour of director Mary Harron's
adaptation (she co-wrote it with Guinevere Turner), "American Psycho" has great
fun with all the minute details of Patrick's life and his circle of friends.
There is a classic scene set to the music of Huey Lewis's "Hip to be Square"
where Bateman invites his rival (Jared Leto) to his home while explaining the
brief history of the rock group and their gradual artistic integrity - the
scene is especially tense considering that one can smell murder in the air. But
the film loses its grip after a while mainly because Bateman seems to lose his
mind, and we can't fathom why. Has he realized the errors of his murderous
ways? We are never sure and though I would not expect a motive necessarily, his
reasons can't be any more silly than that he feels his life has become a void -
empty and unidentifiable. Many other Wall Street types may feel the same way
without having to kill anyone. Somehow, this rings false, as in the book, and I
wish that the twist ending was removed. It feels like a cheat and makes the
whole affair more surreal than it should have been. 
"American Psycho" is often fun and at times, surprisingly funny and on-target.
Thanks to Harron's almost monochromatic visuals, such as Bateman's apartment,
there is a Kubrickian coolness to it, detached and grayish, as if life meant
nothing. Even the restaurants look like science-fiction artifacts from "2001" -
this is the alternate reality of the 1980's where money and greed were all that
mattered. But the film also feels cold and remote, and since we follow Bateman
in his violent streak, we never come close to understanding him one bit.
Despite some satirical touches and Bale's superb performance, this "Psycho"
needed a little more savagery to really hit the mark.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
Faust667@aol.com or at jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Indiana Jones and the Temple of Doom (1984)
Sequels come and go but how many prequels have their been? A prequel is
basically a story that takes place before the events of the original film.
Spielberg's masterful "Raiders of the Lost Ark" was set in the year 1936.
"Indiana Jones and the Temple of Doom" takes place in 1935, one year before the
events of "Raiders." Not that it matters because this entry retains the flavor,
if not the subtlety, of the original. "Indiana Jones and the Temple of Doom"
remains the most exhausting action film ever made, building on one clever
surprise and predicament after another and never letting up for one second.
"Raiders" had momentum and moments where the audience could breathe. Spielberg
goes so over-the-top that it seems we are watching a manic cartoon on overdrive
where we can hardly brake for a single breath. 
The film begins with an explosive opening sequence set in Shanghai that
practically outdoes "Raiders" famous opening. We see Indiana dressed in a
tuxedo, entering a ritzy nightclub where he meets some nefarious Chinese
gangsters. Before you know it, Indiana is poisoned, seeking a vial with the
antidote, while evading bullets, a Chinese gong, dancers performing "Anything
Goes," balloons, rickshaws, and so on. It is a tense, almost spooky action
sequence in that the intensity level is so high that you feel you are in a
roller coaster that never ends. That is the spirit of the movie. Anyways,
Indiana leaves Shanghai almost unscathed from harm with a floozy singer in tow,
Willie Scott (Kate Capshaw), and a smart-mouthed Chinese kid named Short Round
(Ke Huy Quan) who wears a Yankees hat. They travel by plane until they discover
there are no pilots! Then we are in another tense sequence where Indiana tries
to fly the plane but fails, gets an inflatable raft (!) and off we go! Before
you can say "whew," our weary 
travelers are in India. It turns out that a small village is suffering thanks to
the loss of some precious, magical stones. Of course, Indiana has to travel to a
palace where the stones supposedly reside and bring them back to the village.
But isn't he a professor and shouldn't he be heading back to America? 
Inside the palace, it is discovered that a secret, ancient ritual is performed
where hearts are ripped out from unlucky villagers yet they still manage to
breathe! Yes, it is a gross moment among many. "Indiana Jones and the Temple of
Doom" has been criticized for its heavy, graphic violence and intense action
scenes. It was so intense that it led to the creation of the PG-13 rating (that
summer saw the mean "Gremlins" which also helped to create such a rating). The
film piles on the gross gags including the eating of monkey brains, oozing
liquids and other disgusting creatures in every single crevice of the
underground palace, whippings galore, beatings aplenty, abuse and some
occasional blood and gore. Some of it is layed on so thick that Spielberg feels
he may as well give it all - what the heck, audiences will eat up anything for a
sequel or a prequel. Some gags go a long way and others do shock, particularly
the infamous heart-ripping scene. 
Still, "Temple of Doom" is about doom, not "the temple of roses," as Spielberg
once said. For thrilling action and incomparable fright, nobody can do it better
than the Spielman. We have a room of collapsing walls with spikes, cavernous
hideaways, mine cars, waterfalls, planes, collapsing rope bridges, chains,
leather, whips, and so on. And our hero even repeats the old marksman versus the
swordsman joke only this time, there is no gun!
Ford plays it straight as usual, and is more muscular than before (thanks to
Body by Jake in the credits). Kate Capshaw remains a bore in the film, far too
whiny and insipid to inspire much sympathy. Still, she has a few bravura
moments, especially the "five minute" scene where she waits for Indiana to make
love to her. She has some pizazz and comedic energy but hardly enough, and is no
comparison to the feisty Karen Allen in the original. Ke Huy Quan is also a bit
of a whiner but also has his inspired moments (like the Buster Keaton gag of
climbing onto a mine car by using someone else's body) and a few good
one-liners. 
The dastardly villain is  Mola Ram (Amrish Puri), the leader of a Thuggee cult
who is determined to find the lost Sankara stones in the mines. He is
cartoonishly evil, lacking some of the depth and personality of the Nazi
villains from "Raiders" yet he is a formidable opponent for Indy. At one point,
after hearing of Mola Ram's plans to rule the world, Indiana exclaims, "What a
vivid imagination." Indeed. Nice bit of trivia: Mola Ram was also a villain in
the excellent "Gunga Din."  
Possibly the darkest film Spielberg has ever made, "Indiana Jones and the Temple
of Doom" hardly has the sunny disposition of "Raiders" but it is a fierce,
unrelenting often humorous action film that often parodies itself and "Raiders."
Its action scenes are so grim and of such a roller-coaster-ride mentality that
it gives new meaning to the word "breathless." 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Nightmare on Elm Street 3: Dream Warriors, A (1987)
In light of the recent resurgence of horror movies instigated by the success of "Scream" and more respectable fare like "The Sixth Sense," I felt it was necessary to take a trip back in time to my nostalgic years, particularly 1987. This was the year of the Freddy Krueger craze, and everyone was talking about the latest "Elm Street" sequel. I saw it with a friend in Douglaston, Queens, New York, and I was immediately caught up in the hype. Granted, I saw the original "Nightmare on Elm Street" years earlier and it was scary stuff, but this one was so tongue-in-cheek and goofy and thrilling that I found it predated "Scream" by a decade. It was a self-parody but never over-the-top, and it was the first time Freddy was jocose before using his talon glove to slash the sleeping kids. 
The heroine who put Freddy away in the original, Nancy (Heather Langenkamp), is back as a psychiatrist visiting the last of the Elm Street kids at a mental hospital. They all have seen Freddy, and now Nancy will try to help them control their dreams, prescribing sleeping pills much to the chagrin of the hospital staff (which includes Craig Wasson and Laurence Fishburne!). There is also Patricia Arquette on hand (in her debut role) as Kristen, a supposedly suicidal patient who can kick ass when needed. Oh, and how can one forget Jon Saxon reprising his role of Nancy's father, a police captain too keen on alcohol. But Freddy has a way with words...taunting them any way he can.
The first Elm Street is still the best and the most original, but the third has moments of humor mixed with horror and satire that elevates it above similar movies. And do check out Patricia Arquette as the saintly, sweet Kristen - beautiful, dreamy, but she can fight like a true Dream Warrior. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Apostle, The (1997)
Sonny Dewey is the most richly enigmatic character Robert Duvall has ever
played - a Pentecostal preacher from Texas who sees himself as God's messenger,
yet he's also a sinner, a man prone to violence. "The Apostle" is Duvall's
third directorial effort, and it is an uncompromising effort but it is not as
successful a portrait of a torn man as I had expected.
At the start of the film, we see Sonny stopping to see the severe wreckage from
a bad car accident. He runs over to a badly wounded driver and tells him that
the Lord will save him. Somebody better tell Sonny that the Lord should save
him, too. Sonny's wife (Farrah Fawcett) is about to divorce him, although he
doesn't want to be separated from his kids. Eventually, Sonny takes out his
anger on his wife's lover, a pastor, whom he knocks out with a baseball bat at
his kids' baseball game. Knowing that he may face prison, Sonny skips town and
decides to rebaptize himself as E.F., the Apostle. In the process, he leaves
behind his old mother (country singer June Carter Cash) and his two lovely
children in Texas. 
Sonny migrates to a chiefly black bayou town called Lafayette in Louisiana
where, within minutes, he casts a spell on the entire population. A DJ already
knows him as "The Apostle," and lets Sonny advertise on the local radio station
about finding some followers, as long as he doesn't speak in tongues. A young
mechanic lets Sonny stay at his house and gives him a sports car. Sonny
eventually convinces a retired local minister (John Beasley) to rebuild a
church, and persuades many black churchgoers to join his congregation by giving
away food supplies and by chanting with great energy on the air waves. He's a
man impossible to resist and to dislike - a man eager to please God and all who
follow Him. A secretary (Miranda Richardson) is also struck by his charisma,
and begins dating him. 
Sonny's past, however, continues to intrude upon his escape. His mother is
dying, and his wife is ready to send the police after him since the pastor he
conked in the head is in a coma. But Sonny is not going to down without a fight
- he's on God's side and always asks Him for advice. 
The one question we're left with in "The Apostle" is just who is Sonny? As Kris
Kristofferson once put it, he's a walking contradiction. Sonny loves God and
seeks to carry out his Word, but he doesn't necessarily practice what he
preaches. For starters, he's a man prone to violence considering he knocks out
his wife's lover, and has a fist fight with a redneck racist (Billy Bob
Thornton) at his new church. There are obviously demons that Sonny has to
grapple with, but what are they? Where does his violent behavior stem from? I
have known some ministers to do wild things and go to prison as punishment -
they are only human, after all - but what kind of man is Sonny beyond his wild
acts of faith and his sermons? 
The problem lies not with Duvall's performance, but with the various plot holes
in the story. For one, why is he thrown out of his congregation in Texas when
everyone seems to love him? Did his wife actually run it? And why does his wife
leave him? There is something to suggest that Sonny is a philanderer but
writer-director Duvall never dwells into it, or Sonny's past.
"The Apostle" is an accomplished piece of filmmaking; it is well-acted and
well-staged. The scenes in the churches where everyone preaches and sings to
the Lord are dazzling and enticing to witness. An interesting sideline to the
film is that most of the supporting players are actual churchgoers in Lafayette
bringing a level of authenticity that Hollywood rarely reaches. Particularly
compelling is Robert Duvall who brings a certain dignity and humanity that
should not go unrewarded or unnoticed - he's always on the move, and always
dancing and praising the Lord with vigor. Also worth mentioning is the
ubiquitous Billy Bob Thornton as the redneck who has an incredible scene where
he threatens to bulldoze Sonny's church and, right before our eyes, Sonny
manages to convert him.
"The Apostle" is a fine film made in the same spirit and atmospheric look as
Billy Bob Thornton's own directorial effort "Sling Blade," another tale set in
the South. Both films succeed in documenting the people in the South without
condescending them or presenting them as stereotypes. "The Apostle," however,
is more likely to be remembered for Duvall's tour-de-force performance than
anything else. Like "Kundun," another film about a spiritual leader, "The
Apostle" leaves you with more questions than answers. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with questions, concerns or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Croupier (1998)
A croupier is a dealer in charge of a gaming table. As simply put, a
dealer who is there to watch you win or lose. The dealer's main
concern is that you lose. In director Mike Hodge's latest crime caper,
"Croupier," Jack is one of those dealers, keenly aware of every move
you make, including the people he knows outside the casino.
Clive Owen plays Jack as a cool, detached wanna-be novelist, told to
write a book on soccer. He is living with his uncouth girlfriend,
Marion (Gina McKee), whom he only "half-loves." Marion is a store
detective with vaguely romantic notions about writers. But Jack is
virtually bankrupt on any story ideas - he needs inspiration. It
finally comes when his gambler father (Nicholas Ball) advises him to
take a job at the Golden Lion, a London casino. Jack is interviewed
and gets the job, much to the disappointment of Marion who prefers for
him to stay home and write, and sleep the same hours she does.
Jack is an expert on counting cards and counting money - he is quick,
smart and clever, nothing can escape him. He also never gambles. As we
are told in narration by Jake, Jack's literary alter-ego (the basis
for the book he is writing on his own experiences), the croupiers are
there to watch you lose. There is also the complete detachment
expected from croupiers towards other clientele, or
clients. Nevertheless, Jack's alter-ego takes over and breaks all the
rules he so steadfastly held. He has a brief affair with Bella (Katie
Hardie), a drug-addicted croupier, and parties with another croupier
who is stealing from the casino. Jack also gets involved with a femme
fatale, Jani De Villiers (Alex Kingston from TV's "E.R."), a regular
player at the Golden Lion who sees, literally, a wealth of
opportunities with Jack, if he complies to her plans.
"Croupier" never makes a wrong move in plotting or characterization,
but its main strength is the character of Jack. My favorite films are
usually the most subjective, and this is also true of "Croupier,"
which features Jack in every single scene. Every move he makes is seen
from his point-of-view, or heard by the reliable use of
narration. Jack is at firsthand unlikable, and perhaps untrustworthy,
but slowly we start to sympathize with him, understanding that he is
doing a job he does not like solely for creative inspiration. A great
scene is when Marion reads the first few chapters of his book and says
she does not like it, claiming it has no hope and that the character
is a zombie. Jack counterattacks, asking her if her job as a store
detective makes her happy.
If the film does not quite strike the vivid chord of film noir or
neo-noir at its best, it is largely due to the casting of Alex
Kingston as the conniving, sexual predator Janni. She is meant to be a
seductress but is too homely and innocent to make the character
convincing (imagine Anne Archer as a seductress and you may know what
I mean). Don't get me wrong, I love Kingston, and her work in "E.R."
is extraordinary, but she is better suited to less dangerous character
parts.
One other minor gripe is that I wish I saw more of Marion - a
character who understands Jack all too well. She knows what he thinks,
how he behaves, and she is aware that she cheats on her with Bella,
but she still loves him and wants to marry him. Marion is a complex
character to be sure, if only there were more of her to do Jack's
character real justice.
Otherwise, "Croupier" is an exciting, lean, and electrifying film -
atmosphere and style are essential to noir landscapes and this film
has it in spades. Clive Owen shows remarkable chaste and suaveness in
Jack, exuding double the charisma and coolness fo someone like Pierce
Brosnan. Finally, Owen shows us that Jack may think he knows every
trick in the book when playing cards, but he also finds that life
plays its own tricks as well.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Still Smokin' (1983)
Cheech and Chong have never been favorites of mine in comedies. I remember
liking "Nice Dreams" and "Up in Smoke" but basically their act consisted of
getting stoned and scoring some babes while certain hijinks would ensue. "Still
Smokin" is nothing different except that during its entire 90 minute running
time, I hardly smiled or chuckled while watching it. It is one of the unfunniest
pictures I have ever seen, so desperate to make us laugh that it even includes
stock footage of animals mating!
Cheech and Chong play themselves as they mistakenly arrive at a film festival in
Amsterdam to promote their comedy routines. Apparently, Burt Reynolds and Loni
Anderson were to attend the festival. How did Cheech and Chong end up going?
Well, the film festival director gave out the wrong tickets, or something like
that. Nevertheless, C & C arrive at a ritzy hotel where they are introduced as
Burt and Loni and the onlookers cheer them on, believing they are Burt and Loni!
This stupid joke is repeated again and again that I swear a half-hour had passed
by before the next joke. 
Meanwhile, Chong gets the bright idea of saving the financially troubled
festival by raising a dope-a-thon and performing live for the festival
attendees. So we get scenes from their own live act and a few snippets of other
routines shot as movie in-jokes that would have greeted more groans than laughs
on "Saturday Night Live." All of it so cheaply produced and poorly directed, not
to mention rottenly written, that it leaves a sour taste in your mouth. 
The idea of two comic stoners coming to Amsterdam where marijuana is legal seems
like a good idea but the film never follows suit. It is so boring and insipid to
sit through that I began to wonder if I ever really liked Cheech and Chong in
the first place. Maybe I was too young when I saw "Nice Dreams." To be fair,
there are some moments of acceptable humor during the last ten minutes such as
watching the twosome bark like dogs. Otherwise, you may as well keep smoking
that joint than watch such a painful movie experience.  
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Everyone Says I Love You (1996)
Of all of Woody Allen's movies, his latest work, "Everyone Says I Love You," is
his most typical and, paradoxically, his most atypical. It is modern-day New
York mixed with the typical romanticized love story parallels and heartaches.
There's one crucial difference, the cast members break out singing different
songs and ballads from the 30's and 40's at the most inappropriate times.
Allen's hybrid of musical and romantic comedy is not a complete success, but
who cares? It is so funny that you'll forget and forgive its faults. 
Woody Allen stars as Joe, a writer living in Paris who constantly migrates to
New York to visit his daughter, DJ (Natasha Lyonne), and his ex-wife (Goldie
Hawn). DJ lives with her mother and her stepfather (Alan Alda), along with some
half siblings, on Manhattan's Upper East Side. Joe is a lonely guy (a typical
Woody egoist) until he meets the woman of his dreams in Venice (she's played by
the luminous Julia Roberts). DJ is visiting her father at the time and
instantly recognizes her - she's a psychiatric patient of her mother's. When
Joe realizes he shares no common interests with her, DJ feeds him all the
details of her life by eavesdropping on her psychiatric sessions. 
Another major subplot in the film involves Holden (Edward Norton) who is
engaged to Skylar (Drew Barrymore), one of the offspring of the East Side
family clan. He wants to propose to her in a restaurant, and proceeds to give
her the engagement ring which he hides in a custard pie. Skylar takes a bite of
the pie, and what occurs thereafter is one of the most laugh-out loud moments
I've experienced in the movies in quite a while. 
As a movie, "Everyone Says I Love You" is heavily disorganized and messy, but
never boring or uninspired. The deftly funny musical numbers are what gives
Woody's oft-told tale of romance and neurosis an added texture of wit. And yes,
all the cast members sing, and they sing badly but who cares? This is a comedy
musical that makes a mockery of the musical form by having everyone burst into
song at the most inappropriate moments. It's not meant to be "West Side Story."
One of the highlights is Edward Norton (clearly the best singer in the cast)
crooning "Just You, Just Me" at the start of the film, or when he's shopping
for Skylar's engagement ring and sings "My Baby Just Cares For Me." Less
effective (and downright embarrassing) is Woody Allen mumbling the words to
"I'm Thru With Love" (he thankfully cuts the singing short). Two of the most
side-splitting numbers are: "Makin' Whoopee," a production number performed by
hospital doctors and patients with crutches, and "Enjoy Yourself (It's Later
Than You Think)," which is sung by ghosts in a funeral home (When was the last
time you saw ghosts singing a tune?). The true comic highlight is the
effervescent Goldie Hawn doing a flying duet with Woody reprising "I'm Thru
With Love" - it is the one number that shows the absurdity in the charming,
romantic silliness of those early 30's and 40's musicals. 
Beyond the sheer comic inventiveness of the musical strategy, "Everyone Says I
Love You" is too thinly plotted and structured for my taste. The notion of
having the irritating DJ serve as the narrator is dubious and tiresome at best.
It should have been Woody narrating (as he did memorably in "Annie Hall" and
"Radio Days") - he can deliver dialogue with delectable comic timing and
energy. Some characters drift in and out of focus so quickly, you'll be hard
pressed to figure out their purpose. There's too little of Edward Norton and
Woody Allen, and too much of Drew Barrymore unconvincingly smiling and flirting
with Tim Roth, who plays an unrefined criminal.
On the whole, the performances are terrific, and I especially enjoyed the
Woodman's relationship with Julia Roberts (she shines more brightly here than
ever before). I also liked the fast-talking Alan Alda and the sprightly Goldie
Hawn in the best and shrewdest role of her career. And let's not exclude the
siblings of the East Side clan, including Natalie Portman, who has a sobbing
fit and hilariously starts singing, and the wide-eyed Lukas Haas as the
dogmatic Republican son of the family ('The American people should have a right
to bear arms').         "Everyone Says I Love You" is one of the most endearing
of the experimental films of Woody's career. At the ripe old age of 61, he is
still the funniest and most original comic writer of the 20th century. Nobody
else could have tackled a concoction like this, and make it work. Or make it as
funny and strangely moving.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with questions, concerns or comments at faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at
Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Summer of Sam (1999)
Has he lost his mind? Has Spike Lee lost all sense of reason or purpose in
making a film? After the greatness of a disturbing, provocative documentary
like "Four Little Girls," Spike made a noisy, pretentious, overheated
basketball drama called "He Got Game." Its chief merit was Denzel Washington's
controlled performance. Now we have the noisy, melodramatic, overheated,
overbaked and needless retelling of the "Summer of Sam" - a hot, noisy New York
summer of 1978 when the Son of Sam killer was loose in the streets and made
media headlines. I assume the latter is Spike Lee's intention as well with each
film he makes. 
Make no mistake, "Summer of Sam" is not an introspective character study of
Samuel Berkowitz. Instead, the writers Michael Imperioli, Victor Collichio and
Spike focus on the sweltering summer itself - the paranoia and the decadence
that surrounded the frenzy of Sam's murderous rampages on the city of New York.
For a while, "Summer of Sam" works and keeps us on guard. We see the local
Italian gangs rallying against Sam by keeping track of everyone who comes and
goes in the neighborhood, the brunettes wearing blonde wigs to escape Sam's
wrath upon blondes, the all-night disco clubs, the promiscuous activities at
Plato's Retreat, an orgy club, the swagger and sweat of the macho, sexist
Italian men, the constant hurling insults, the cops vying for a local Mafia
boss (Ben Gazzara) to help in the murder investigation, and...wait a second. I
know where I have seen this type of anthropological view of New York's boroughs
before. I've seen it in Martin Scorsese's mob dramas, and I could not wait to
see one of those films again as opposed to Spike's stereotypical portrayal. 
The main story in "Summer of Sam" deals with the rocky relationship between the
endlessly posturing Vinny (John Leguizamo), a hairdresser, and his darling,
faithful wife, Dionna (Mira Sorvino), a waitress at her father's restaurant.
Vinny is a philanderer and unfaithful - he will have sex with anything that
crosses his path. After witnessing one of Sam's murder victims, he decides to
mend his sinful ways, though it is short-lived since we are treated to a
needlessly long sequence involving the infamous Plato's Retreat. 
The most interesting characters in this overlong effort are the punk rocker,
Ritchie (Adrien Brody), who sports a thick British accent, and his sexy
girlfriend, Ruby (Jennifer Esposito) - their scenes are electrifying and
stimulate the senses. I wish Spike focused on this couple since their scenes
have no clichs and rivet our attention. In marked contrast, the Vinny and
Dionna marriage becomes repetitious and tiresome after a while, and the actors
bring no dimension or spin to their characters. There is only so much of
Leguizamo's swagger I can stand.
There are a couple of sequences that do work mainly because they involve the
racial parameters of a community - Lee's forte ever since "Do the Right Thing."
There's a sequence involving the Mafia boss talking to the police officers
about trapping Sam, and the boss rightly pointing out that there are murders in
Harlem every day and nobody reports them. I also like the subplot where the
gang is convinced that Ritchie is Sam because of his deviant activities, such
as his nightly gay dancing and punk rock sensibilities (he also lives in a
garage). The idea of needing a scapegoat in a community that is lost with
desperation to find the killer is timely and profound - this is all pure
vintage Lee.
Beyond that, we get heated scenes of marital discord, hurling obscenities (Joe
Pesci was never this obscene), and countless scenes of burly Sam roaring with
pain in his bedroom and close-ups of his shoes pounding the pavement as he
approaches his victims seated in parked cars. Since the film is not truly about
Sam Berkowitz, do we need countless shots of gunfire? Do we need to see a
ludicrous scene of a dog speaking to Sam? Has Spike Lee become too
literal-minded? Has he forgotten how to draw insight from his characters? 
In terms of visceral filmmaking, Spike Lee is still a demon of a filmmaker, but
he is no visionary. The film is exceedingly well-shot and edited (many
high-contrast shots; delirious montages) but it all serves little purpose,
meaning or significance. What we learn about the fervent summer of 1978 is that
there were power outages, the weather was hot and humid, and people cursed and
had sexual escapades. Spike has forgotten how to do the right thing within all
the madness - to forge drama and insight from it all.. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 

Title
Review for My Science Project (1985)
I recall going to my neighborhood theatre in Queens, New York back in good old
1985 to see "Back to the Future." As I was perusing through the hallway theatre,
I noticed they were showing "My Science Project." The scene I took a gander at
featured some kids dressed as the stormtroopers from "Star Wars." I always
wondered what that scene was about. Sixteen years later, I finally watched the
actual film for the first time. I wish I had not bothered finding out. 
A teenage car mechanic (John Stockwell) is failing his science class. His wild
hippie teacher (Dennis Hopper) warns him that he better get his grade up or he
will fail him for the semester. The kid goes on a date with a four-eyed blonde
nerd (Danielle von Zerneck) to a missile base where he discovers a crystal
sphere. He decides that this is his science project since the sphere looks,
well, cool and it emits a phosphorescent glow! With the help of his Fonzie-like
best friend (a very young Fisher Stevens) and his date, they inadvertently
unleash a time-travel force from this sphere where dinosaurs, gladiators, the
Vietcong and other figures from the past run rampant inside the local high
school! 
This is not a bad plot to speak of, just rottenly executed. The characters are
unappealing and uncharismatic - Stockwell as the lead exhibits no personality
whatsoever. The jokes are juvenile and putrid at best (Stevens humming the
"Mission: Impossible" theme is the best the writers can do). The romance between
Stockwell and von Zerneck is a joke in itself (at least von Zerneck fared better
as Richie Valens' girlfriend in "La Bamba" two years later). The special-effects
are bland and forgettable (laser blasts are better handled in "Star Wars"). The
T-Rex has precious little screen time. Only Dennis Hopper saves the day as the
hippie teacher - his last scene is hysterical as he is dressed in the same garb
from "Easy Rider" and ecstatically mentions revisiting Woodstock! And as for my
memory of those stormtroopers? Well, all I can say is that George Lucas should
sue. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Sexy Beast (2000)
I have declared my distaste for the postmodern Tarantino crime genre ad nauseam
so I feel no need to continue voicing it. Nevertheless, a film like "Sexy Beast"
usually comes marching along to ignite the genre beyond the usual expectations
and boy, does it ever. "Sexy Beast" is a firecracker thriller, as intense and
entertaining as "Reservoir Dogs" and about as menacing as "GoodFellas." 
The opening scene sets in a different tone than expected. We see a man basking
in the hot sun as he is lying on a chair near the pool. He starts using synonyms
for his peace of mind and relaxation. Before you know it, a boulder comes
crashing into his pool almost killing him in the process. His relaxation is
over, as is the audiences'. 
The man at peace in his glorious house and pool is Gal Dove (Ray Winstone), a
retired gangster who is trying to sooth his nerves. Those nerves become jangled
as the imminent arrival of a Don Logan (Ben Kingsley) is announced by Gal's
close friends, an ex-gangster sidekick (Cavan Kendall) and his exotic blonde
wife (Julianne White). Don Logan is feared by these people and rightly so. Logan
has come to recruit Gal for one last heist in London, a job commisioned by a
crime lord known as Teddy (Ian McShane). Problem is that Gal has no interest but
boy, does Don try to persuade him. Persuasion and insistence are Don's codes of
coercion - he will not take no for an answer. Don verbally and physically
attacks everyone in his sight, including Gal and his former porn star wife
(Amanda Redman), not to mention Gal's aforementioned friends. Never before have
I witnessed a cliched plot device delivered so brilliantly in terms of
desperation and sheer persuasion as shown here. 
Eventually, Gal ends up in London to perform the complicated heist, which
involves a highly secure bank and a Turkish bath! Teddy is the mastermind of
this heist and also inquisitive and persuasive, particularly involving the
mysterious disappearance of Don. This all results in one of the most conniving,
cunning and surprising climaxes I've seen in eons. 
Ben Kingsley is clearly the marvel of the film, a supreme scene-stealer. His
startling, piercing eyes and thick East End London accent will drive you bonkers
wishing he would just disappear. It is a performance of amazing intensity, all
the more amazing coming from Kingsley who has played bona fide saints in
"Gandhi" and "Schindler's List." He did play a suave gangster in "Bugsy" and
left a haunting impression in "Death and the Maiden," but neither role can
prepare you for what is easily the toughest villain since Joe Pesci's
trigger-happy act in "GoodFellas." 
Ray Winstone is also as assured as the quiet, implosive Gal. He wants out of the
crime world but one gets the sneaky suspicion that he craves the leisure and
laid-back living it can provide. Only someone like Don has given him reason to
quit for good and ever. 
One final performance that left me riveted was Ian McShane's icy, cold-blooded
Teddy - a character that is as dangerous and steely-eyed as Don. Combining these
two magnificent performances in one film can create terror in everyone's mind
for months on end. They would make James Bond's heart palpitate. 
"Sexy Beast" is directed by first-timer Jonathan Glazer, whose background is in
directing music videos. One would expect jump cuts galore and lots of loud rock
music from the Guy Ritchie crime school. Glazer eschews the in-your-face style
for a more formal, stable palette of fixed compositions (the swimming pool even
looks menacing at times). His focus is also on the characters, and the best
scenes are when Don and Gal are sitting by an umbrella table by the pool as the
sun sets its glow on Don's bald head. It is moments of that nature that bring an
unsettling tension to the film. No one-liners or clever postmodern,
wink-it's-only-a-movie moments that would cut away from the tension. Glazer is
as graceful and composed as most seasoned directors. 
"Sexy Beast" is not as much a heist film as it is about people involved in an
emotional crisis and mood swinging tempos, especially Gal's wife who loves her
husband dearly yet feels threatened as does everyone in the film. Exceptionally
performed, directed and photographed, "Sexy Beast" is like no crime film I've
seen before - a surreal, sometimes mind-bending trip into the allure of crime
and the leisure it offers. There are unforeseen obstacles and sometimes it is
less than glamorous in the underworld. When someone like Don Logan comes along,
there may be no way out. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Game, The (1997)
David Fincher's "The Game" is quite a mind-bending trip to endure, and it is
fitfully labyrinthinian and complex enough to give Kafka nightmares. It is
manipulative, thrilling, exciting, nerve-wracking nonsense designed to give you
a volatile charge every few minutes, and it certainly succeeds. 
Actor Michael Douglas gives us a solemn portrait of a wealthy investment
banker, Nicholas Van Orton, who lives in a luxurious mansion complete with a
forgiving maid (Carroll Baker) and little else. Nicholas lives in solitude with
just a television and a remote to occupy his time when he isn't working. One
day, he meets his smart-aleck brother, Conrad (Sean Penn) who gives him a pass
to CRS (Consumer Recreation Services) for his 48th birthday. This company
offers grand entertainment and big thrills - "It'll change your life," says the
grinning Conrad. 
It certainly does. Nicholas is initially reluctant for excitement but goes
along with it anyway. He undergoes an extensive, all-day application process
answering feeble-minded questions, enduring various psychological tests,
fitness exercises, etc. Eventually, though, his application is rejected but by
then it is too late, the game has already started. 
This is an intriguing premise for a movie because the "game" itself depends on
unpredictable surprises, and sometimes Nicholas is unaware when the game is
real and when it isn't. A waitress (Deborah Kara Unger) accidentally spills a
tray of drinks on him, but was it really accidental? Could there be a plot
against Nicholas perpetrated by a rival (Armin Mueller-Stahl) to take away his
fortune? Is Conrad behind all this considering he was a former CRS player? Are
people trying to kill him or is this just a game gone too far?
Without the right actor in the lead role, the movie's double twists and red
herrings would have been hard to swallow. Douglas is, however, perfectly (and
credibly) cast - he brings pathos to this cold, emotionless Gekko-type who we
learn to care about, and whom we believe may be in danger. This threatening,
terrifying game slowly brings Nicholas out of his repressed shell to confront
his feelings, his emotions and his desires. Douglas, a veteran of shattered
male egos from "Fatal Attraction" to "Basic Instinct," fully encompasses
Nicholas's fears, flaws, and horrible memories specifically his father's
suicide that we see in flashbacks. 
The rest of the cast does as well as they can with such a mentally puzzling
screenplay. Deborah Kara Unger (the siren from "Crash") is the obligatory femme
fatale - an enigmatic, voluptuous woman who is fired from her waitress job and
accompanies Nicholas to determine the extent of the game he's playing - she is,
of course, not what she seems. Nobody in the movie is. Sean Penn has a brief,
electrifying cameo as the tense (what else?) Conrad, and veteran actor James
Rebhorn is the sly CRS executive who vaguely explains the nature of the "game."
There's also a nice bit by Carroll Baker (Baby Doll) as the maid who tells
Nicholas stories about his father's past.
The movie "The Game" is not completely successful due to a cop-out finale that
renders the rest of the film as insubstantial - let's just say that Kafka was
never accused of being a sentimentalist. Still, director David Fincher
("Seven") imbues the screen with his shadowy angles and low-key colors making
the "game" as mysterious and frightening as possible. Michael Douglas makes the
film his own inhabiting every single shot of the film - we, in effect, are
playing the game along with him. "The Game" is not as daring or as original as
Welles's "The Trial" or Lynch's far more enigmatic "Lost Highway," or as much
fun as the Kafkaesque "U-Turn," but it is a finely acted, occasionally
thrilling diversion. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general comments at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Truman Show, The (1998)
The notion that television is corrupt and that it corrupts minds is as old as
the invention of television itself. There have been a plethora of films
concentrating on this technological theme from the classic "Network" to the
recent successor "Wag the Dog." Both films are indictments against the idea
that television is the medium containing the message. "The Truman Show" is a
startlingly original, comically engaging portrait of a world where the medium
is not only the message, but it encapsulates an entire town. 
Rubber-faced clown Jim Carrey plays Truman Burbank, an insurance salesman who
has a beautiful, almost too beaming wife (Laura Linney) whom he says good-bye
to before leaving for work. Every morning, Truman is greeted by his neighbors
and the townspeople to whom he responds with the catch phrase "Good morning.
Good evening, and good night." This Connecticut-style town where Truman lives
is Seahaven, a polished, "Father Knows Best" community completely and yet not
so completely removed from reality. It is reminiscent of a huge shopping mall
where there's no traffic, no noise, and no problems - everything is picture
perfect. Before you can whisper "The Stepford Wives," we gradually discover
(before Truman does) that nothing is what it seems. Apparently, Truman is the
unknowing star of a 24-hour television program where he is the main attraction
(and has been since birth), and his home in Seahaven is actually a giant,
dome-like television studio! To make matters worse, he is the star of the
biggest hit on television. 
The film's idea is like something out of "The Twilight Zone," but writer Andrew
Niccol fleshes out this story with care and humanity, as in a Ray Bradbury
novel. What could have been a one-joke premise becomes a deep, philosophical,
unusually poignant film. The humanity emanates from Jim Carrey's uncanny
Everyman character affected by the very people in his life - his mother who
reminds him of an ersatz Mount Rushmore vacation, his wife who may or may not
be a nurse and always wears a red sweater, his best friend (Noah Emmerich) who
brings a six-pack along every time Truman has a problem, a former girlfriend
(Natasha McElhone) hauled away by her father never to be seen again, and the
general townsfolk who try to put him in front of advertisements hung in the
town square. Truman's whole life is a fabrication - a lie for the sake of
entertaining millions of viewers on television, and the TV cameras are at every
corner of Truman's existence documenting his daily life. 
Jim Carrey is in super tip-top form here playing the bewildered Truman with
admirable restraint and complete assuredness. Don't expect fart jokes or
scatological humor of the "Ace Ventura" kind here; this is Carrey's first
dramatic role and he does wonders with it. At every turn, he suggests and
implies Truman's innocence, even when Truman starts to get suspicious about his
surroundings. It is a role Charlie Chaplin could have played with the same
degree of panache and heartbreak. My favorite scene is when Truman has an
argument with his wife and notices that she is addressing someone other than
himself when she utters:
And before I forget, there's the crucial role played by Ed Harris, who excels
like no other actor from movie to movie, and here he is at his unqualified best
as Cristof, the God-like creator of the show who barks orders such as "Cue the
sun!" or "Bring out the rain! Make the thunder louder!" Harris's final moments
where he discloses Truman's life, from his birth to his childhood memories, is
deeply touching and as emotionally discreet as this actor has ever been on
screen. 
"The Truman Show" is directed by Peter Weir ("The Last Wave," "Dead Poet's
Society") and he does a remarkably acute job of showing the world Truman
occupies which is not that different from what America is now becoming - a
Rockwellian nightmare where everyone pretends to be what they aren't. If Truman
is not real in his own eyes because of the part he unknowingly plays on
television, then who is he? 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general comments at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for A.I. Artificial Intelligence (2001)
The safest way to approach "A.I." is to understand it is a Steven Spielberg film
of a Stanley Kubrick production. Kubrick himself decided to not direct the film
while he was alive, thus handing the reins to Spielberg. A noble and satisfying
choice. "A.I." is Spielberg's best and most uncompromising film since
"Schindler's List," deserving of any and all accolades. It is brave, risky,
emotional, disturbing, complex and entrancing. 
Haley Joel Osment plays a mecha named David, a child robot of the future. He is
adopted by two kind, loving, troubled people, Monica and Henry Swinton (Frances
O'Connor and Sam Robards). Their own real son is barely kept alive in a coma.
Henry Swinton sees this as an opportunity to alleviate his and his wife's pain
by having a mecha in their house as a replacement until their own son gets
better (Henry happens to work for a cybertronic company that specializes in
mecha technology). Monica is initially angry and hesistant but eventually gives
in to the idea. She ignores David, hides from him and he only thinks it is a
game - David cannot sense or reason that Monica is suffering. Eventually Monica
"imprints" David by turning on his switch to learn and to love. David does learn
to love but does not know how to use it - he loves Monica, whom he refers to as
his "mommy," unconditionally. But regret begins to figure in the situation when
Monica's real son starts to come out of his c!
oma. There is a clash of sorts b
etween David and the real son unfolding in a series of eerie scenes where David
is seen as a threat, a hindrance to the Swinton's sense of serenity. 
Monica eventually abandons David in the woods due to his innocently destructive
nature. Thus begins David's quest to become a real boy since he feels that if he
becomes real, his mommy will take him back. Along the way, David lands in a
decadent, sinful city called Rogue City where he meets Gigolo Joe (Jude Law), a
male prostitute mecha who has the ability to conjure the appropriate romantic
mood by twiching with his head which automatically plays Astaire or Sinatra
tunes. Gigolo and David are eventually captured by anti-mecha rebels who destroy
mechas for sport in a stadium of cheering denizens. David gets away in the nick
of time since he is deemed too human to be a mecha and his search continues for
the Blue Fairy (a character right out of "Pinocchio") whom he feels can make him
into a real boy. 
"A.I." was shrouded in secrecy for years before being unveiled in theatres, a
rare event in this day and age of Harry Knowles and the overhype machine.
Kubrick was known for utmost secrecy, particularly for the misunderstood "Eyes
Wide Shut" which was erroneously advertised as a sexual thriller. It is a
pleasure for once to see a film and not have a clue as to how it will turn out.
"A.I." is unpredictable in a way Spielberg has not been since "Close Encounters
of the Third Kind." The mood and atmosphere do not shift as much as one expects,
though it is a structure comprised of two acts and an extended epilogue. Strange
structuring indeed but you only need to look back to Spielberg's "The Lost
World," which had a fitting climax only to begin again with the setting changed
to San Diego where the T-Rex runs rampant in the city. "A.I." has a deliberate
point where it could have ended with David pleading and pleading to become a
real boy. I will not give away much except to say tha!
t it ends instead with one of th
e most spiritually moving and saddest climaxes I've seen in a long while. 
The performances are all pleasurable to watch. Osment shakes his cutesy persona
for a more subtle twisting of moods and facial expressions from an impersonal
mecha to a mecha with an emotional side that threatens to explode with pure love
and violence. Jude Law is damn near perfection with his cockiness and sexual
allure, though I would loved to learn more about him. Frances O'Connor blends
sensitivity with despair flawlessly as the conflicted Monica. And William Hurt
also displays curiously similar fragmented emotions as Professor Hobby, who is
as close to David as one can expect - only the reasons never seem clear. 
"A.I." begins as a Kubrick film with a chilly air of doom throughout the first
half of the film. The second half veers into Spielberg territory as does the
epilogue (this explains why Kubrick chose Spielberg to make the film since its
Pinocchio antecedents coincide with the latter's sensitivity). But something
strange occurs - Spielberg has told a tale of sentiment without manipulating the
audience's emotions. He is not overtly sentimental, as he has been in later
films. It is a return to Spielberg's confidence and assuredness with the
unsentimentality and harshness of "Duel," "Jaws," and "Close Encounters" - he
chooses to detach somewhat from the main characters so that we can see how the
emotional crescendos in the film affects them. Thankfully the musical score by
John Williams is not syrupy but rather enthralling in its minimalist tone and
style comprised of what sounds variations on a slow murmur. 
So what does "A.I." finally have to say about a mecha like David? Do we have a
responsibility to love a robot even though it is not real? What is Monica's
responsbility since her husband only bought the damn robot which could be easily
disposed or discarded like an older computer model? Is David any closer to
understanding a human's emotions since he has his own, or are his emotions
fabricated based on an imprint in his design? If he can love, can he rationalize
that love? Does he not see that his "mommy" did not love him as he thought she
had? Such moral questions invite lots of answers but can mostly result in
ambiguity, as it should be. Kubrick revelled in disorder, pessimism and
ambiguity. Spielberg revels in order, optimism and clear resolutions. That
Spielberg remained faithful to Kubrick's original plans and storyboards shows a
certain maturity on his part. "A.I." is as intelligent a film as one can expect
- a marvel to witness, and a feast for the eyes and the ears. Br!
avo Spielberg!
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Title
Review for Bride of Frankenstein (1935)
1935's "The Bride of Frankenstein" remains one of the great horror films of all
time. It is cheerful, dark, mysterious, comical, compelling and quite
frightening at times. It is the sequel to 1931's "Frankenstein," which starred
Boris Karloff, and is significantly superior in every aspect. 
The opening prologue is set in 1816 with Elsa Lanchester as the lovely author
of the "Frankenstein" novel, Mary Shelley, who tells her close admirers, Percy
Shelley, her husband, and Lord Byron, "London's greatest sinner," how her story
didn't really end. Thus, we get the sequel with the Monster (Karloff again)
escaping from the burning windmill and wrecking vengeance on everything and
everyone who crosses his path. He attacks village women, gypsies, peasants and
so on. He encounters a blind old man in one of the most famous sequences in
history as the old man teaches him the virtues of fire, smoking, music ("Ave
Maria"), and how to speak. Of course, two men (one of them is played by John
Carradine) find the Monster and try to kill him. The Monster escapes again and
is caught by all the villagers, tied to a pole in crucifixion-style, and
eventually chained in prison before escaping yet again. 
Dr. Frankenstein (Colin Clive) managed to survive the fiery debacle of the
original, and is all set to marry his sweet Elizabeth (Valerie Hobson who was
only 17 at the time) before being convinced to create a mate for the Monster by
the evil Dr. Praetorius (Ernest Thesiger). Naturally, they create a mate with
the help of a drooling assistant, Karl (Dwight Frye in reportedly a combination
of two roles) who memorably shrieks "It's a very fresh one," after killing a
bystander on the street to get a fresh heart. The Monster finally has a new
mate (Elsa Lanchester) who memorably shrieks herself and turns her head in
jerky, robotic movements recalling Brigitte Helm in Metropolis. The film ends
with the fiery explosion of Praetorius's castle, and the good doctor and
Elizabeth manage to escape and embrace in a happy ending devised to let the
good doctor live. 
"The Bride of Frankenstein" has some oddball moments although I can't say I
know what era the film is set in. At one point, Dr. Praetorius lets
Frankenstein communicate with Elizabeth through a voice transmission device!
However, the villagers and every other citizen travel by horse and carriage, so
is it set before the 1900's? And there's an abrupt finale where simply pulling
a lever causes an explosion (this is how most mad scientist movies would end). 
Still, "The Bride of Frankenstein" is a great film with some horrifying
moments and some weirdly funny ones such as Dr. Praetorius's own creations
which are life-like dolls in glass containers, including a smitten king, a
ballerina, and a mermaid. "This is not science. This is black magic," says the
dumbfounded Frankenstein. The scene is darkly comic yet there's something
fundamentally horrific about it too - it shows a man who has gone at extreme
lengths to give life to dead beings for his own pleasure, like Frankenstein
himself. There are also several religious symbols throughout, especially during
a quixotic moment when a crucifix shines brightly in the background while the
blind man weeps after finding a companion in his home again. The entrance of
the Bride towards the end is one of the loveliest sights in history as we see a
ravishing beauty given life to please a monster whom she despises. 
The performances are top-notch. Colin Clive is credibly and constantly uptight
- he gets to yell the immortal line "She's alive! She's alive!" Ernest Thesiger
plays the most evil villain in eons, and is unmatched in its baneful nature
until Henry Fonda's cold killer in Once Upon a Time in the West. Thesiger has
some delicious quips throughout and appears to be more frightening than the
Monster itself. Karloff is given more to do this time as he's allowed to speak
threateningly to Frankenstein, and even laugh! Elsa Lanchester is grandly
beautiful and tremendously adept playing two roles: first as a delightful Mary
Shelley in the wonderful prologue, and then in an extended cameo as the shrilly
Bride with Nefertiti-shock hair and piercing eyes (if only screenwriters John
L. Balderston and William Hurlbut gave her more to do). Also noteworthy is Una
O'Connor who is hilarious as Frankenstein's maid servant, Minnie, who screams
every time she sees the Monster - I love the way she utters "Dr.
Praaeeetttorius!" when the doctor enters the house. Her role is quite similar
to her equally delectable parts in "The Invisible Man" and "The Adventures of
Robin Hood." Another small but significant role is the pompous burgomaster
played by E.E. Clive with a big mustache - he was also cast in "The Invisible
Man." 
Other pluses in "Bride of Frankenstein" are the moody, evocative
cinematography by John Mescall, including the justly famous graveyard scenes
populated by fog and crucifixes; the creepy music score by Frank Waxman that is
among the greatest ever composed for the silver screen and was used in many
films since; and James Whale's fine direction and his extraordinary feel for
the supernatural and the monstrous ironies in Shelley's text. There is simply
not a better film about Frankenstein to see and, although it doesn't follow the
novel too closely, this is among the finest and most visually spectacular
Universal horror films ever made. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with comments, suggestions, or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com 

Title
Review for Haunting, The (1999)
While watching this remake of "The Haunting," I began to wonder how this film would fare if it was not a remake, but just another haunted house story. In other words, what if this was the first film adaptation of Shirley Jackson's 1959 novel, forgetting that the 1963 Robert Wise classic ever existed? 
Let's look at the particulars. Independent film queen Lili Taylor is Ellen, the morose, mousy woman invited to Hill House where a special study is being conducted by a doctor (Liam Neeson) on insomnia. The other guests, or subjects, are the blonde surfer dude Luke (Owen Wilson - who looks like a surfer dude even if he isn't one) and the sexual cat, Theo (Catherine Zeta-Jones), a bisexual who comforts Ellen and is thus teased by Luke. Oh, and did I notice the quick departure of Todd Fields as another subject? I suppose, I did. Maybe he was called in for some reshoots in Kubrick's "Eyes Wide Shut." 
I am sorry but this film hints at disaster from the get-go, and if this had been the first adaptation, it would have surely spelled doom for future fright fests. The fact is that "The Haunting" is directed by Jan De Bont, who helmed the exciting "Speed" and "Speed 2," the latter of which I have avoided. To be fair, the first hour of "The Haunting" captures a sense of spookiness and quiet calm that made the original so memorable. I mean, there are actually no special-effects! The characters are somewhat interesting if buffonish and detached. Zeta-Jones makes a sparkling entrance as she proclaims with a luscious, breathless voice upon entering Hill House: "Don't you just love it here? You don't get this from a Martha Stewart catalog." Neeson shows a little gleam, and shows interest in Taylor's Ellen who has her own demons to confront. Wilson has a few one-liners to offset the creepy dimensions of the inevitable haunting. Dare I say, this movie was starting to look like a classic!
!
 ghost story. But then...all hell is unleashed. 
De Bont unleashes one special-effects gimmick after another, never alluding to or insinuating the mysterious forces within the house. Instead, he shows us everything and anything. The final half-hour is especially laughable as the main demonic spirit crashes the house in a digital FX blowout of collapsing frames, cracked windows, contorted beds, split floorboards - it is all so outrageously banal that it makes the locust finale of "Exorcist II" look frightful by comparison. 
Since De Bont shows us only gaping actors staring at FX galore, we never feel as if this house is truly haunted - it feels like William Castle put on an expensive light show at Universal Studios. Sure, the art decoration and set design of the house is spectacular but hardly suggests that lurking shadows or ghosts inhabit it. And with scarce insight into any of the characters, "The Haunting" becomes an interminable void of faux fright cliches. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Nosferatu a Venezia (1986)
The greatest vampire film I have ever seen was Werner Herzog's masterful remake
of F.W. Murnau's 1922 classic "Nosferatu," which starred the grandly theatric
Klaus Kinski as the ratlike Dracula (the silent film starred the creepy menace
of Max Shreck). The remake was a triumph of atmospheric decay and melancholy
mood, a tragic tale of a Dracula who wanted to end his suffering of living
century after century. "Nosferatu in Venice" is a sequel I have heard of before
though it is not currently available on video in the United States - I managed
to secure a copy through the Chiller Theatre convention in New Jersey since I
was anxiously curious to see it. The end result is a beautiful bore, an utterly
senseless sequel with no significant purpose for its existence. The late Klaus
Kinski was the sort of actor who would appear in almost any kind of film no
matter how awful - he was not exactly selective and probably needed the money
to finance his dream project "Paganini," which I have still not seen.
Kinski returns as Nosferatu, though actually referred to as Dracula in the 1979
original (Nosferatu really means the "undead" so why is he referred to as
Nosferatu?) This vampire is no longer rat-like or venomous looking - instead he
resembles a lost hippie from a Grateful Dead concert with long white hair and
threatening black eyes. There is some story involving Christopher Plummer as an
expert on vampires who takes part in a seance to bring back Nosferatu from the
dead! Why??? Not sure. Donald Pleasance appears occasionally as some bickering
holy priest, and there are lots of terrific, nocturnal shots of the streets of
Venice (seemingly unoccupied) and some gypsies who hail the name of Nosferatu,
not to mention a ballroom full of people dancing with Venetian masks. Oh, we
also see a tomb that is locked by iron straps where some creature resides,
ready to pounce.
Nothing in "Nosferatu in Venice" makes much sense, though the central theme
seems to be that the vampire wants the blood of a virgin so he can remain dead
forever - he is still in desperation to die but continues to torment female
victims on the streets of Venice. And there are some briefly erotic, almost
softly pornographic sex scenes between Kinski and the virgin and some other
woman who may be the reincarnation of a lost love. Maybe...who knows since
there is no real clarification of who any of these people are. 
For gore fans, there are two scenes of impalement on a courtyard fence, and
some fang work on female necks with blood gushing from their wounds. For those
who favored the atmosphere of the original, there are some murky shots of
Venice and a final scene of the vampire carrying a naked woman in long shot
while birds fly through the air. Other than that, this film is silly, hardly
terrifying, and contains distracting synthesizer music - Plummer is the sole
saving grace with his wonderful, commanding voice. "Nosferatu in Venice" is
hardly the worst of the vampire flicks, but it serves little purpose as a
sequel or as a vampire flick. Just another cheaply-made horror flick out for a
fast buck.
Footnote: The video version I saw contained Japanese subtitles, which are a
distraction, and the voices of the Italian actors seemed to have been dubbed
whereas Plummer and Pleasance are obviously speaking in their native tongue.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
Faust667@aol.com or at jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
Review of Star Wars Episode I: The Phantom Menace
I can't even begin to tell you what a big Star Wars fan I used to be. The "Star
Wars" movies were terrific entertainments, full of sound and fury and
encompassing great characters, who by the end of "Return of the Jedi" became
our own best friends - we knew them as if they were family. Han Solo, Princess
Leia, Luke Skywalker and those two witty robots have become a permanent fixture
in our pop culture psyche. "Star Wars: The Phantom Menace" has to be the most
anticipated blockbuster event in the last decade or so. The prognosis: It's
thrilling but never truly involving. 
        Episode I marks the beginning of the Star Wars saga, and it is a world only
Lucas could have conceived. During the rousing title sequence following the
familiar 20th Century Fox logo, we learn that the Trade Federation wants Queen
Amidala (Natalie Portman), ruler of the planet Naboo, to sign a peace treaty.
Her refusal sparks a war between her planet, which includes the Galactic
Republic, and an Empire-of-sorts regime ruled by Darth Sidious and his
apprentice, a red-faced, anti-Jedi named Darth Maul (Ray Park). It is up to two
freelance ambassadors (!) named Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson), a Jedi master, and
his apprentice, good old Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor) with a ponytail, to
rescue the Queen and take her to the relatively safe planet of Tatooine. It is
there where the fate of the Jedi lies with a young, precocious boy named Anakin
Skywalker (Jake Lloyd), the future Darth Vader, who has a way of repairing
machines such as pod racers, and creating droids like the unfinished C-3PO! He
also has this dream of becoming a Jedi.
        The movie unfolds with one amazing sequence after another. We see vast
landscapes of different planets and underwater cities. We watch in extreme
derision an explosive pod race, presided by good old Jabba the Hutt, where
these flying race machines make accelerated turns through rock formations and
narrow tunnels resembling Monument Valley - they are too fast for the eye to
catch. We see dozens of digitally created creatures, including wildly ferocious
sea animals, and there are the bland-looking battle droids that easily come
apart. The most distracting of the creatures is a floppy-eared, amphibious
Gungan animal named Jar-Jar Binks, who speaks with a Jamaican accent. We
witness many battle sequences, and the most electrifying is a lightsaber duel
between Darth Maul and the two Jedis that is pulse-pounding and superbly staged
and edited. 
        George Lucas certainly went out of his way to create a world unlike anything
we have ever seen before, even as far as the previous "Star Wars" films. This
time, however, he has invested less interest in the human characters. Lucas may
have never been a great storyteller but he always paid great attention to
character details and subtleties. The most profound and memorable character is
the Jedi Master Qui-Gon, nicely underplayed by Liam Neeson, who resorts to
having too much faith in the young Anakin - he wants to train him despite the
Jedi Council's objections. MacGregor's Obi-Wan mostly nods and obeys his
master, but he may be a more prominent character in Episode II since he
reluctantly becomes Anakin's trainer in the Jedi arts. Portman's Queen Amidala
is to be the future mother to Luke and Leia, yet here she seems cold and
distant - very uncharacteristic of her future daughter's stubbornness or sex
appeal. And there are fleeting cameos by Samuel L. Jackson as Jedi council
member, Mace Windu; Ian McDiamid as Senator Palpatine, the future evil Emperor;
Terence Stamp as a Supreme Chancellor; and the exquisitely restrained Pernilla
August (from "The Best Intentions") as Anakin's mother, a slave to some
floating bug named Watto. These characters are so noble and fascinating that
you wish Lucas gave them more screen time, and less to all the sluggish,
superficial exposition given to the Trade Federation and their plans. And I
would have loved to seen more of the nefarious Darth Maul - one of the best,
most enigmatic villains since Boba Fett. 
        "The Phantom Menace" is still one helluva show and definitely a treat for all
Star Wars fans, including myself. I loved the experience of watching it, and it
was great to see brief appearances by C-3PO and R2-D2 again, not to mention the
great Yoda and the hysterical cameo by Jabba the Hutt. But the movie does not
have the freshness, sense of wonder or magic that the other films had - some of
it is too plodding and superfluous. You'll come away wanting more (and wish
there was less of Jar-Jar Binks). Perhaps that is what Lucas had in mind all
along.
You can find more reviews at JERRY AT THE MOVIES located at 
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 

Title
Review for Night Falls on Manhattan (1997)
We've been accustomed to seeing Al Pacino play loud, unruly lawyers so it is
quite refreshing to see Andy Garcia as a smart, tough lawyer in one of his best
roles since "Internal Affairs." The movie may not be great but it is a
well-crafted, watchable piece of entertainment.
Garcia stars as Sean Casey, a tough New York City lawyer who has been trying
minor cases such as freak accidents, drug dealers, petty thieves, etc. He's no
ambulance chaser but he's trying to get ahead by playing the rules, and he was
a former cop so he "knows the streets." His father, Liam Casey (Ian Holm), is
an undercover cop trying to catch a big-time heroin dealer and is subsequently 
shot while on a stakeout. Sean is upset by this and so is the whole city since
two cops were killed by this psycho dealer. The D.A. Morgenstern (Rob Leibman)
screams bloody murder and wants the dealer found who managed to escape in an
NYPD car! The D.A. makes Sean the leading prosecutor, much to everyone's
chagrin, but he's also risking his political future when the defense attorney
turns out to be a brilliant shyster, Sam Vigoda (Richard Dreyfuss). It is,
theoretically, an easy case and one that could launch Sean's career, but is
there police corruption at the core? What do you think? Have you seen movies
about corruption before or is this something entirely new to you? 
"Night Falls on Manhattan" is not an original film nor should you think that
director Sidney Lumet hasn't made similar films before. This time, Lumet has
made it fresh by instilling a sense of humanity and making his characters
invigorating and real. Garcia's Sean Stone is the moral center of the film - a
lawyer who uncovers a hotbed of corruption and lies and people who mask the
truth. Could his father, Liam, be concealing evidence? And what about Liam's
partner, Joey (James Gandolfini)? And how did all three precincts manage to
arrive within seconds after Joey calls for backup during the stakeout? If you
haven't heard the disturbing news of New York City cops lately, then you must
be residing on a mountain top in Tibet somewhere. 
Lumet's problem as a writer is his frequent lack of credibility. For example:
why would a psychotic dealer turn himself in to a defense attorney when he
could have skipped town? Why would the D.A. assign such a media crazed event
over to a small-time lawyer who has no experience trying such cases? Because
the lawyer's father is a cop who was badly injured? I don't think such cases
occur in New York City but what do I know. This movie was written for the
screen by Lumet and based on a pulp novel by Robert Daley. Maybe that explains
it. 
As usual, Lumet's casting is impeccable. Garcia is strong and believable as
Sean, a lawyer who by chance becomes D.A. in a movie full of miraculous
chances. Richard Dreyfuss is superbly witty as the Alan Dershowitz-type who is
trying to reveal the corruption himself. The great British actor Ian Holm is
quietly understated as the wise old cop who may or may not be involved, and
adores his bewildered son and his partner. James Gandolfini, who has appeared
in a slate of mediocre movies, shines brightly and evocatively as Liam's
partner - his scene with Ian Holm and Garcia crackles with energy as he begins
to admit his involvement. This is an actor to watch for in the future. Veteran
actor Rob Leibman shouts and spews with relish in several great scenes as
Morgenstern, the D.A. who is always looking for a fight. The one performance
that doesn't ring true is Lena Olin ("Unbearable Lightness of Being") as Peggy,
a legal assistant to Sam Vigoda. Her frivolous romance with Sean exudes little
charisma or excitement and takes up too much screen time. 
"Night Falls on Manhattan" falls short when compared to Lumet's great,
intelligent police movies such as "Prince of the City" and "Serpico."
Nevertheless, it is a fine film and uniformly well acted but it ends with a
silly anticlimax that diminishes the power of the first three-quarters (a
similar problem pervaded Lumet's "Family Business"). Still, how can you resist
a great cast in a generally vivid, exciting picture when we are mostly
bombarded by superfluous hogwash nowadays. Don't resist.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with questions, concerns or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at
Faust667@aol.com

Title
Review for Shining, The (1980)
There are horror films that come with expectations, namely to spook
and scare us with the unknown. And then there is Stanley Kubrick's
misguided though definitely spooky "The Shining," a horror film that
is unaware of what it wants to say or how to say it. I admire Kubrick
greatly, he is one of the finest directors in the history of cinema,
but this film is definitely on a lower standard than some of his other
works.
The problem is mainly Jack Nicholson, playing the wild-eyed, seemingly
mischievous Jack Torrance. He has been hired as the caretaker of the
Overlook Hotel, stationed in a highly remote, isolated area of
Colorado. There is definitely something wrong with Jack from the
start, he rolls his eyes and hardly flinches when hearing a past story
of a graphic murder that took place at the hotel. His wife, Wendy, (a
frail-looking Shelley Duvall) and their son, Danny (Danny Lloyd), who
talks to his finger referred to as "Tony," come to stay with Jack at
the Overlook for several months so of course, something will go
wrong. There are several hints of this at the beginning of the film,
most telling example is when Jack is driving the family to the hotel
and mentions a cannibalism that occurred in the area. Wendy looks at
him in disbelief, and Danny, seated behind them, says "it's okay
Mom. I saw it on television." Jack replies, "You see. He saw it on the
television."
"The Shining" is essentially about those long, wintry months spent at
the Overlook, and the isolation is clearly felt from frame to
frame. Most the months are broken up by titles that indicate the days
of the week. Jack's madness begins to settle in, as he screams at
Wendy for intruding while he is at work on a novel. Then he begins to
see ghosts, such as a beautiful naked woman in a tub in one of the
rooms of the hotel, and a bartender from the 1920's whom Jack tells
about his fears and insecurities with his family, casually mentioning
his wife as the "sperm bank upstairs." Then something grows wild
within him, an animal is let loose and before you know it, the ax
comes out and he is ready to kill his family.
"The Shining" could be a conventional horror film but there are enough
eerie moments to make it a cut above the rest. But from Kubrick, I
expected so much more than the conventional route it takes. There are
the expected bloodlettings, blood that runs like a geyser from an
elevator, a decomposing, laughing crone with sagging breasts, several
ghosts, and so on. All of this is what one would expect from a Hammer
horror flick but under this master's hands, it all comes off as
typical shock tactics rather than real scares.
The other problem is the over-the-top performances that undermine
credibility and cause us to lose sympathy with the characters. Jack is
typical Jack, wild and insolent, seeming like an insane madman from
the very start rather than a character study of a man slowly losing
his sanity. Shelley Duvall tries her best I suppose but her screams
and gaping looks are grating and cumbersome - she does better in her
quiet scenes, such as the first scene between her and Danny discussing
the trip to the Overlook. Danny Lloyd comes under the rule of why kids
should not be cast in horror films - he simply stares into oblivion
during his "shinings" and makes rather offputting gestures with his
finger, mimicking the voice of "Tony." I know that this is all in the
Stephen King book, but that is why adaptations exist - to change
material that is often best left to the imagination rather than making
it literal.
There are several virtues to "The Shining." The film has an ominous,
otherworldly quality that is well-suited for such a disturbing horror
tale. There are the particularly ominous opening helicopter shots of
the roadways leading to the Overlook. The colors of the hotel are
mostly gold and pink, thereby evoking the 1920's atmosphere of the
ballroom. There are the point-of-view shots of Danny riding in his
bike through the corridors and hallways, all accomplished with a
Steadicam (one of the first films to use such a camera). There is one
truly horrifying scene where Danny sees twin girl ghosts who ask him
to come and play, immediately realizing they were the girls who were
killed in the hotel by the former caretaker. There is a brilliantly
edited and shot chase through the hedge maze outside the hotel where
Jack torments poor Danny. In terms of production design, art
direction, cinematography and sheer atmosphere, "The Shining" is
triumphant in all departments.
But it is a horror film without the horror - more like a mystery with
lots of hidden meanings in every shot (the haunting final scene
justifiably asks more questions than answers). Its histrionic
performances and overdone chilling musical score negates the horror
and turns it into a freak show with occasional moments of terror.
It's passable Stephen King horror but from Kubrick, one expects
something much more challenging and thought-provoking.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at jerry@movieluver.com

Title
Review for Natural Born Killers (1994)
"Natural Born Killers" is the kind of over-the-top nonsense only Oliver Stone 
could make. He is a brilliant director and, throughout his fine career, has 
crafted fine films  such as "J.F.K," "Wall Street," "Platoon," "Talk Radio" 
and "Born on the Fourth of July." "Natural Born Killers" may be his weakest 
film by far and his most self-indulgent, a film where he claims to have not 
censored himself. Nothing in Stone's kaleidoscopic imagery from "The Doors" 
can begin to describe the superfluous flourishes of what is essentially the 
most controversial film of 1994. 
The "Killers" in this movie are two white-trash kids named Mickey and 
Mallory, played respectively by Woody Harrelson and Juliette Lewis. The 
blonde-haired, vicious Mickey is in prison for grand theft auto but he still 
has the hots for the young, sexy, alluring Mallory Knox who frequently visits 
him in prison. Through pure intervention or "fate" (Mickey's own philosophy), 
he escapes from prison on horseback during a tornado and proceeds to rescue 
Mal from her vile parents by murdering them. How vile? Porcine Rodney 
Dangerfield plays Mallory's incestuous, blubbering wrestling fanatic of a 
father who is beaten to death and drowned (the mother is tied to a bed and 
burned to a crisp and Mal's brother is left as the sole survivor). After this 
already cartoonish sequence of violence, the two lovebirds go on the run, get 
married by an enormous New Mexico gorge, and indulge in a murderous spree all 
around the West killing at least fifty people. Naturally, Mickey and Mallory 
are branded as celebrities by another cruel force of nature, the media! The 
two killers are depicted as sexy criminals admired by globally by 
desensitized twentysomething fools who call them, "the best thing to happen 
to the media since Charles Manson." One grungy character ironically admits 
that if he were a serial killer, he would be Mickey and Mallory!
The Bonnie and Clyde pair are eventually caught by a crazed cop/writer, Jack 
Scagnetti (Tom Sizemore) who specializes in writing about the minds of serial 
killers and in breaking women's necks. Tommy Lee Jones is the prison warden 
who is nearly as loony as any inmate in his prison where M and M are kept. 
And let's not forget Robert Downey Jr. as Wayne Gayle, an Australian TV host 
for the high-rated show "American Maniacs," who is eager to interview Mickey 
in a live special after the Super Bowl in the hopes of beating the ratings 
for the infamous Manson trial. This all ends in pure fire and fury during an 
eerily effective, blood-on-the-walls prison riot climax that remains the most 
horrifying footage Stone has ever shot on film. 
I must say that I hated "Natural Born Killers" when I first saw it in a 
theatre in August of 1994. I knew the reactions of the primarily young 
audience in the theatre - who laughed and cheered at Mickey's actions during 
a particularly vicious opening sequence - was a definite sign of how times 
were changing. 1994 was the year where "Pulp Fiction," released a month 
later, changed film forever with its portrait of criminal antiheroes as the 
protagonists to root for. With "Natural Born Killers," the visual style is 
what bothered me the most initially. I could not sit still and watch such 
disorienting images coming in at a faster clip per second than say the 
bullets of a gun. I gave it a second chance much later on video and I can say 
that it is not as visually exhausting as it was in theatres. There are 
performances that stand out amidst all the noise. For example, Tom Sizemore 
does a marvelous job of balancing sorrow and sheer apathy for his character 
Jack, who grows more and more attached to the wild Mallory. Robert Downey Jr. 
is hilarious and pathetic as the loquacious TV host who will do anything for 
higher ratings, even if it means killing people himself. There are also some 
volatile turns by Joe Spinelli and Pruitt Taylor Vince as the warden's most 
trusted guards. 
What works to a lesser degree is Tommy Lee Jones, overacting as much as 
anyone else in the movie - a simply cartoonish character who would be at home 
in a Road Runner short. It is hard to remove the memory of Woody Harrelson 
from TV's "Cheers" - he appears to be too nice to play such a rough character 
like Mickey. Harrelson does try and there is a nicely underplayed scene where 
he is interviewed by Downey and claims his rather unbelievable reasons for 
bloodletting (all based on the words of Charles Manson during an infamous 
Geraldo Rivera interview). 
Mallory is played superbly by Juliette Lewis and she certainly stands out the 
most in Stone's universe. She manages to make Mallory into a beautiful, 
believably scary and sometimes sweet monster almost ready to explode at any 
moment. Lewis is so good and inhabits the movie so often that becomes the 
soul center of the amoral world of this movie. This performance was so 
unusual for Lewis considering she's played mostly ordinary girlish types in 
films like "What's Eating Gilbert Grape" - the closest in proximity to 
Mallory is Lewis's role in "Kalifornia" and a TV movie she did with Brad Pitt 
called "Too Young to Die." Her work in "Natural Born Killers" will long be 
remembered, especially when she memorably utters "How sexy do you think I am 
now punk?" before brutally pounding an overzealous male. Lewis's appearance 
changes dramatically from short black hair to long blonde wigs, and she also 
wears cowboy hats, outlandish dresses, and bright red lipstick complete with 
a dangling cigarette. 
Part of Oliver Stone's problem is that he has no idea of how to direct a 
satire or to steer it in the right direction - he is just out to thrill us. A 
satire can makes it points truly through exaggeration but also through 
pointed black humor. Consider Stanley Kubrick's anti-violent masterpiece "A 
Clockwork Orange" which is done with far more subtlety and restraint. One can 
argue that "Natural Born Killers" is not meant to be a satire but a mere 
condemnation of our media-obsessed world where killing is a stepping stone to 
celebritism on the same wavelength as movie stars. But even an outright 
condemnation needs a little breath of air or else you end up cancelling 
yourself out - you can't fire with fire. Stone has made a desensitized movie 
about desensitized killers and has filled the canvas with lots of cartoonish 
violence - the sort of violence one would associate with an Arnold 
Schwarzeneger movie not an Oliver Stone flick. The violence is silly and 
trivial with none of the reality evident in Stone's hard-hitting war films 
such as "Platoon" or "Born on the Fourth of July." Sure, it is a movie about 
amoral killers in a typically amoral, devalued society but such rampant 
amorality would have served Ollie better as a sharp character study. 
Amorality is all that represents Mickey and Mallory, and what saves them in 
the end is love ("Love beats the demon.") They are essentially romantic 
rebels wronged by society for acting out their fantasy of a post-modern road 
movie where killers kill and get away with it. Since every other character in 
the film is as nasty and dehumanized as they are (particularly Scagnetti and 
the warden), then it is difficult not to empathize with Mickey and Mallory. 
This point-of-view was represented by Kubrick's "Clockwork Orange" but not to 
the degree that Stone's film does. After all, "Clockwork's" killer 
protagonist Alex is far more human and clever than all the cartoonish types 
in this film, and thus a thematically richer film dealing with the nature of 
violence and how it can't be controlled. 
Visually, Oliver Stone is on a dizzying mind trip as he continually shifts 
our point-of-view using everything from color to black-and-white to color 
negatives, scratchy film, 35mm, 16mm, video and stylized animation in various 
film stocks and speeds. These shifts in images are not sparingly used - they 
usually occur within one specific scene. The editing is brilliant, the 
filmmaking is dazzling (courtesy of noted cinematographer Robert Richardson), 
yet the overall effect is nauseating (there are reportedly 3,000 images in 
the entire film). If Ollie chose to use this breakthrough editing technique 
less frequently, then his various opinions of Mickey, Mallory and the media 
would have beem more fully realized.
The best scenes in "Natural Born Killers" are the quiet ones where Stone 
allows motion to move smoothly without bludgeoning the camera. I love the 
scene after the ultraviolent cafe attack where Mallory dances on top of a car 
(to the tune of Cowboy Junkies' version of Lou Reed's "Sweet Jane") and 
superimposed images of angels, red horses, and bright colored lights flash 
by. There is also the masterfully edited and composed scene where Mickey and 
Mallory declare their love for each other by a bridge overlooking a gorge. 
They make a blood pact, eschewing the traditional wedding engagement, and 
their blood trickles into the water in animation style forming twin serpents 
(a recurring motif in the film). 
After having seen "Natural Born Killers" twice, I am convinced that Stone's 
grandiose visions are spectacular to watch but storywise, the film is 
interestingly muddled. I recommend the experience of watching this film but 
only as a visual odyssey of rampant images, a crosscutting style of excess. 
It is a film I am not able to take off my mind, and everyone will read it 
differently. Some will see it as a dangerous polemic of our times and others 
will see it as the very same trashy exploitative violence that Stone was only 
pretending to skewer. It makes you wonder how one should view this film when 
we are asked to root for the remorseless killers.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at Faust668@aol.com or 
at faustus_08520@yahoo.com

Title
Review for Talented Mr. Ripley, The (1999)
How does one comprehend the chameolonic Mr. Tom Ripley's actions, and his
desires to be someone else by any means necessary? Is it an attraction to the
posh lifestyle of his new friend, Dickie , or a need to come to terms with his
own identity? Director Anthony Minghella's adaptation of Patricia Hightsmith's
1955 crime novel is as smooth and clever as the titled character, a thrilling,
masterfully told thriller - an exemplary character study of deception and lies,
and of an identity crisis in turmoil. 
Matt Damon plays the youthful Ripley, whom we see at the beginning of the film
playing the piano at a reception wearing a Princeton University jacket. He
catches the eye of a wealthy New York ship magnate (James Rebhorn), who falsely
assumes that Ripley went to college with his son, Dickie, considering that
Ripley's jacket is emblazoned with a Class of '56 patch. Under false pretenses,
Ripley is asked by Dickie's father to fly out to Italy to bring back his son,
who is living the high life with his girlfriend, Marge (Gwyneth Paltrow). Once
Ripley arrives in Italy and meets Dickie, he is introduced to a glamorous world
of lavish parties, concerts, beaches, and hot jazz clubs. Dickie (Jude Law) is
a difficult man to get to know, but he is immensely likable and full of energy.
His girlfriend Marge (Gwyneth Paltrow) likes everyone, and takes a liking to
Ripley who is the total opposite of Dickie. But slowly Ripley falls in love,
and Dickie is the man he adores and wants to be - Marge and a snobbish friend
of Dickie's (Philip Seymour Hoffman) are merely distractions in Ripley's
fantasy world. 
"The Talented Mr. Ripley" weaves its story and characters smoothly like a
snake, and the slow pace exemplifies its creepy atmosphere - we get the sense
that Ripley's intentions or goals are unclear throughout the film. What does he
want with Dickie, and will he help Dickie's father or does he begin to see
himself as Dickie? And who in fact is Ripley? Sure, he is a talented piano
player and a gifted mimic, but who is the real Ripley? 
Excluding "Good Will Hunting," I have not cared for Matt Damon as an actor,
especially in the cartoonish funk called "Dogma." In the guise of Thomas
Ripley, Damon finally finds a character as complex, mischievous and
duplicitious as anything he's ever managed to play before. One moment he is a
smiling simpleton who seems utterly harmless, the next moment he's a conniving,
amoral, two-faced murderer. The transition is brilliantly executed by Damon and
he makes us hold our breath during every moment he is on screen - we are never
sure how he is going to react. And to Damon's credit, he makes Ripley
sympathetic, and there were moments when I was tense and scared for him, since
his murderous ways could be uncovered. 
Jude Law, who played the cyber hero in David Cronenberg's "eXistenZ," displays
an interesting range for his character - a devious, devilish grin that masks
his own insecurities about getting close to people, and displays a gradual
tempermental attitude toward Ripley. Law looks like he belongs in the past, and
think of how well he could have fit in any of Hitchcock's thrillers, especially
"Rope" or "Strangers on a Train." If Law did not utter a syllable, he would
still be a commanding presence on screen, so let's hope Oscar nominations are
in the running. 
Gwyneth Paltrow turns in a surprisingly credible and intelligent performance,
her best turn since "Hard Eight." Though the role is somewhat thankless and
similar to the awful "A Perfect Murder," she gives the character, Marge, more
weight and nuance than expected. She is amorous, lovable but she also is
suspicious of Ripley, though she does love him as a friend. Paltrow slowly
shows irritation at seeing Ripley everywhere she goes, especially after Dickie
mysteriously disappears. It is a superb performance overall - I'd rather hand
her an Oscar for this mature role than for her Oscar gold in "Shakespeare in
Love." 
Director Anthony Minghella, who previously helmed "The English Patient,"
follows Hitchcock's golden rule of psychological thrillers - to make us care
for the characters enough that we feel for their safety, even for a murderer
like Ripley. And no secret is made about Ripley, we know what he is and what he
is capable of and so Minghella makes us wonder what will happen next. He also
shows us the decor and atmosphere of Italy in all its splendor, and all the
sights will make you wish you were there along with Ripley, Marge and Dickie. 
Tightly structured and suspense built on characters motivations (what a rarity
nowadays), "The Talented Mr. Ripley" is a masterpiece in the best tradition of
Hitchcock. And there is a sense of emotional doom when Ripley discovers that he
is not aware of his own identity, and may continue searching for any kind of
identification. Brimming with vital supporting turns by Cate Blanchett, Philip
Baker Hall and Philip Seymour Hoffman, "Talented Mr. Ripley" is a uniquely
great film - it may leave you with a bitter taste but you won't soon forget it.
Now that takes talent. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or comments at Faust667@aol.com or at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com
